Good. Those answers lock in a lot. Let me crystallize the key design decisions before I write, so we're building on the same foundation:
Aethel is canonical, it's in Rosland, and it's a living city — not a ruin. That's a powerful choice because it means Rosland's democratic traditions have a physical monument to point at, which makes House Ironside's power grab feel like desecration rather than just politics.
Xaria as a provincial outpost of a larger overseas empire is a massive detail that changes everything about how the peninsula functions. It means Xaria isn't isolated jungle primitives — it's the frontier edge of something potentially as large or larger than the Nionic Empire ever was. That empire beyond the map is a source of dread, mystery, and leverage. The temple-cities aren't just local religion; they're colonial infrastructure. That's going to ripple through everything.
The language situation — a shared tongue with regional dialects and a "neutral register" for cross-regional communication — is very realistic and very Chilean, frankly. It's how Spanish works across Latin America. That grounds the world immediately.
Gunpowder-era lost tech — cannons, Da Vinci-style war machines — means the deep past was in some ways more technologically advanced than the present. That's a beautiful irony: civilization went backwards. The Age of Fire didn't just impose order, it destroyed knowledge in the process of conquering. The empire burned libraries to build roads.
Now here's the Age of History, written as the first section of Book I of the lore bible.

BOOK I — COSMOLOGY & DEEP HISTORY
THE AGE OF HISTORY (c. 50,000 BE – 1,211 BE)
Preamble: On the Poverty of the Record
What follows is reconstructed from fragments. The Age of History spans roughly forty-nine thousand years — a period so vast that the entire Age of Fire, with its nine centuries of imperial glory, could fit inside it fifty times over and still leave room for civilizations to rise and fall unnamed. The Magos of the Isle of Knowledge have spent centuries attempting to assemble a coherent chronicle from the scraps that survive: clay tablets in languages no one reads, stone foundations buried beneath later construction, tool-marks on quarry walls that imply machines no living smith can explain, and the oral traditions of remote peoples who remember things in song that they cannot remember in fact.
The difficulty is not merely the distance of time. It is that the Age of Fire, for all its accomplishments, was catastrophically destructive to what came before. The Nionic emperors did not conquer a blank continent. They conquered a continent full of history, and then they burned it. Libraries were torched to deny rebels knowledge. Temple archives were seized and rewritten to serve imperial theology. Local scripts were suppressed in favor of Munnish. Construction crews demolished ancient structures for building material — the great imperial roads are paved, in many stretches, with the crushed tablets of civilizations whose names are now unknown. What the emperors did not destroy, time and neglect finished. By the present day, Year 1308 of the Age of Faith, the deep past is less a history and more a wound: a place where knowledge used to be, visible only by the scar it left.
The Magos divide the Age of History into three broad periods, though they acknowledge these divisions are imposed rather than intrinsic. The boundaries are soft, the dates approximate, and the confidence of any claim diminishes the further back one reaches.

I. The First Peoples (c. 50,000 – 30,000 BE)
The Indigenous Presence
The continent of Mundus was not empty when the great migrations began. In at least four regions — Xaria, the Red Coast, the Frozen South, and western Rosland — archaeological evidence and persistent oral tradition point to human populations that predate the migrations by an unknown but considerable span. Who these people were, where they originated, and how they arrived on the continent are questions that have no satisfying answers.
In the Frozen South, the clans preserve fire-songs — sung genealogies passed mouth to mouth across generations — that claim descent from people who "were born from the mountain's breath," a poetic way of saying they have always been there, as native to the land as the volcanic stone itself. The oldest fire-songs make no reference to arrival, to crossing water, or to any homeland beyond the fjords. To the southern clans, the question of origin is nonsensical. They are the land's children. The land made them. That is enough.
On the Red Coast, the evidence is physical. In the deep canyons of the Montañas de Cobre Rojo, Magos expeditions have documented cave paintings executed in mineral pigments whose chemical composition does not match any known artistic tradition from the later city-state period. The paintings depict human figures alongside animals that are either fantastically imagined or faithfully rendered from species that no longer exist — broad-skulled quadrupeds with copper-colored hides, long-necked wading birds the height of a man. The pigments have been dated, through the layering of calcium deposits, to periods that precede the earliest migration estimates by millennia. Someone was there. Someone was painting. Their descendants mixed with later arrivals so thoroughly that the seam is invisible, but the paintings remain, silent and unexplained, deep in canyons where the sun reaches the floor for only twenty minutes a day.
In Rosland, the western fjord communities maintain traditions distinct from the inland population — different boat-building techniques, different funerary practices, a strain of folk medicine that shares no ingredients with the Heartlands pharmacopoeia. Linguistic scholars on the Isle of Knowledge have identified a substrate layer in western Roslandic dialect: roughly two hundred words with no cognates in Munnish or any other regional variant, words for specific coastal weather patterns, tidal movements, and shellfish species that appear to belong to an older, unrelated language. These words survive as fossils in the living tongue, the bones of a language whose flesh has long since rotted away.
Xaria presents the most complex case. The peninsula is not an isolated landmass but the western edge of a much larger island empire — the Ix'Atani Dominion — whose full territorial extent stretches beyond the eastern horizon, across waters that Mundane sailors have never successfully navigated. The Xarian population is therefore not indigenous to the continent in the same sense as the southern clans or the Red Coast cave painters. They are, rather, the westernmost settlement of an external civilization, a colonial frontier that predates the Nionic Empire by tens of thousands of years. How long the Ix'Atani have maintained their presence on the peninsula is unclear even to their own chroniclers. Their temple records, carved into basalt step-pyramids, reference a "First Planting" — the establishment of the original temple-cities — but the date is expressed in a calendrical system that Magos scholars have been unable to reconcile with continental chronology. The Xarians themselves consider the question irrelevant. The gods placed them where they are. The jungle grew around them. They have been feeding K'tharr since before the sun learned to set. That is their history, and it requires no further explanation.
The Great Migration
At some point — the Magos place it tentatively around 40,000 to 30,000 BE, though this range is little better than a guess — humans arrived on the continent of Mundus in successive waves from an unknown landmass or landmasses. The migration was not a single event. It was a process stretched across centuries, possibly millennia, with different groups arriving at different points along the continental coastline and penetrating inland along river systems.
Where they came from is the great unanswered question of Mundane history.
The most popular scholarly theory among the Magos is the Single Origin Hypothesis: that all migrant populations departed from the same continent, but from different coastal regions of it, arriving at Mundus from multiple directions across open ocean. This would explain both the broad physiological similarity of the continent's peoples and their initial cultural diversity — they shared a deep ancestry but had diverged before departure. The theory is elegant. It is also unprovable, since no Mundane ship has ever successfully crossed the deep ocean and returned with reliable charts of what lies beyond.
A minority of Magos scholars advocate the Multiple Origin Hypothesis — that the migrants came from two or more separate landmasses entirely. They point to the significant cultural and physiological differences between, say, the tall, pale-complexioned populations that settled the northern Heartlands and the shorter, darker peoples who arrived along the southern and eastern coasts. But physiological variation can be explained by adaptation to different climates over the vast timescales involved, and cultural divergence is an inevitable product of geographic separation. The debate continues in the Scriptorium's upper reading rooms, where it generates more heat than light and has produced no fewer than seventeen competing monographs in the current century alone, none of them conclusive.
What is known — or at least broadly agreed upon — is this: the migrants arrived in groups of varying size and landed at points distributed around the continental periphery. They came by sea, which implies a maritime technology sufficient for open-ocean crossings, a capability that was subsequently lost and not recovered until the Age of Republics. They brought with them domesticated grain species, basic metallurgy, and a common linguistic root from which all modern Mundane dialects descend.
They did not arrive as a unified people. They had no shared political structure, no common religion beyond fragmented animistic practices, and no awareness that other migrant groups existed. The continent was vast — roughly three thousand miles from the northern tip of the Horns to the southern coast of the Frozen South — and the migrants dispersed into it like water poured onto sand. Groups that landed on the western coast had no contact with groups that settled the eastern river deltas. The Heartlands were reached last, as migrants pushed inland from all directions, their paths converging over generations in the fertile central plains without any awareness that they were part of the same species-wide movement.
Where the migrants encountered indigenous populations — in Rosland, the Red Coast, the Frozen South, and along the Xarian frontier — the results varied. In most cases, the process was gradual enough to leave no record of conflict. The populations mixed over centuries, intermarrying and blending traditions until the distinction between "original" and "arrived" became meaningless. In the Frozen South, the fire-songs record no foreign arrival at all, which either means the mixing was so ancient and so complete that the memory of separateness was lost, or means the southern clans genuinely predate the migrations and simply absorbed the newcomers into their existing social structures. In Xaria, the dynamic was reversed: the established Ix'Atani civilization was sophisticated enough to absorb or repel migrants on its own terms, incorporating new labor into its temple-economy without disruption to its existing hierarchies.
The result, after millennia of settlement and mixing, was a continent populated by a single species that spoke variations of the same root language but had developed, through geographic isolation and environmental pressure, into a patchwork of cultures as distinct from one another as the climates they inhabited. The people of the Horns, shaped by maritime survival on storm-lashed peninsulas, had almost nothing in common culturally with the river-valley farmers of the Heartlands, despite sharing an ancestor who might have sat in the same boat ten thousand years earlier. The thread of commonality was there — a shared grammar buried beneath layers of local innovation, a handful of cognate words for water, mother, fire, death — but it was so thin that it would take an empire to make it visible.

II. The Age of City-States (c. 30,000 – 5,000 BE)
The River Revolution
Civilization, as the Magos define it — settled agriculture, permanent architecture, written records, social stratification — emerged independently in multiple locations across the continent, driven in each case by the same basic pressure: river systems. Where water was reliable, people stopped moving. Where people stopped moving, they began to build.
The earliest known urban settlements cluster along three great river systems: the central Heartlands rivers (which would later become the backbone of the imperial road network), the Sangrea river valleys descending from the Sierras de Sangre, and the Xarian delta system (though the Ix'Atani temple-cities may predate these, their chronology remains unresolved). In each case, the pattern was similar. Agricultural surplus allowed population concentration. Population concentration demanded administration. Administration demanded record-keeping. Record-keeping produced writing.
The first scripts were not literature. They were ledgers. Grain counts pressed into wet clay with sharpened reeds. Tax assessments scratched onto bone. Inventories of livestock marked with notches on sticks that were later formalized into symbolic systems. The oldest confirmed writing on the continent — a set of clay tablets recovered from a collapsed granary foundation near the modern city of Aethel in Rosland — records nothing more poetic than the following: forty-three measures of emmer wheat received from the village of [untranslatable], twelve goats assessed as tribute, one goat dead on arrival, deducted. The first sentence in Mundane history is an accounting dispute.
From these crude beginnings, the city-states grew. They grew unevenly, in fits and starts, with long periods of stagnation punctuated by bursts of innovation or catastrophe. They grew in isolation from one another for the most part, separated by distances that, without roads or organized trade networks, might as well have been oceans. A city-state in the northern Heartlands could flourish and collapse without anyone in Sangrea ever learning it had existed.
The Patchwork of Power
By roughly 10,000 BE — and here the dates become less speculative, anchored by cross-referenced astronomical observations carved into stone monuments — the continent hosted hundreds of independent city-states in varying stages of development. They defied easy categorization. The Magos have identified at least nine distinct forms of governance operating simultaneously across the continent during this period:
Theocratic city-states dominated by priest-kings who claimed to mediate between the human and divine — common in the Heartlands, where the ziggurats and stone circles whose ruins still break the skyline were constructed as astronomical observatories and sacrificial platforms both. The priest-kings interpreted the stars, declared the planting seasons, and demanded tribute in grain and labor for construction projects whose purpose was as much theological as practical: build high enough and you can touch whatever put the stars there.
Merchant oligarchies controlled the coastal settlements of what would become the Horns and Nionia — pragmatic, transactional societies where authority belonged to whoever controlled the most trade goods. The earliest Nionian settlements were fishing villages whose headmen accumulated power by monopolizing salt production, an essential commodity in a world without refrigeration. From salt monopolies grew fleet ownership, from fleets grew the capacity to project force, and from force grew the first island polities.
Warrior aristocracies ruled in Rosland and the northern reaches, where the constant pressure of raids — from whom is unclear; possibly from other human groups, possibly from the large predatory fauna that was still abundant — produced societies where military capability was the primary qualification for leadership. The first "First Citizens" of Rosland were simply the best fighters in their communities, chosen by acclamation after battle.
Matrilineal clan structures persisted in the Frozen South, where the harsh environment enforced cooperation and punished hierarchy. Leadership was situational — the best hunter led the hunt, the best navigator led the migration, the eldest woman settled disputes — and no individual held permanent authority. This system proved so durable that it survives in modified form to the present day.
In Xaria, the temple bureaucracy of the Ix'Atani operated on principles entirely alien to the rest of the continent: a theocratic command economy in which every resource, every labor hour, and every human life was understood as currency in the Great Exchange with the gods. The Xarian city-states were not independent polities in the Mundane sense. They were administrative nodes in a religious network whose center lay across the eastern ocean, receiving directives from a priesthood that answered to authorities the continent would never see.
And then there were the stranger experiments — the ones that didn't last, that exist only in fragments: a city-state near the modern Teeth that appears to have been governed by designated eunuchs, its rationale lost; a settlement in the Red Coast whose ruins suggest governance by lottery, with leaders chosen at random from the adult population for fixed terms; a Heartlands community that seems to have been run by a council of the eldest members, period, regardless of any other qualification, a gerontocracy so absolute that all records were kept in the memories of the old rather than committed to clay, and which therefore vanished without trace when a plague carried off everyone over forty.
This was the world's great experiment in human organization, conducted simultaneously across a continental laboratory with no communication between the test sites. Every conceivable answer to the question "who should be in charge?" was tried somewhere, and most of them failed within a few generations, leaving behind only foundations and puzzles for later scholars to misinterpret.
The Lost Arts
It is during this long middle period of the Age of History — roughly 15,000 to 5,000 BE — that the most troubling archaeological evidence emerges. Troubling because it implies capabilities that the present world cannot replicate and cannot explain.
In the deep Heartlands, buried beneath the foundations of structures built during the Age of Fire, Magos excavation teams have uncovered metal cylinders of a type that no modern smith can identify. The metal is not iron, not bronze, not copper, not any alloy in current use. It resists corrosion absolutely. It is harder than tempered steel. And the cylinders — roughly two feet in length, hollow, open at one end and sealed at the other — show scorch marks on their interiors consistent with intense, directed heat. When a Magos artificer filled a recovered cylinder with black powder (a substance known to alchemists but considered too unstable and too expensive for practical use), sealed the open end with a stone ball, and ignited the charge, the ball was propelled with enough force to punch through a wooden wall at fifty paces. The Magos suppressed the report. The experiment was not repeated. The cylinder was locked in a vault on the Isle of Knowledge, where it remains.
These are not isolated finds. In the northern Heartlands, a collapsed underground chamber yielded a set of interlocking metal gears — dozens of them, machined to tolerances that modern clockmakers envy — that appear to be the remnants of a mechanical device of unknown purpose. In the Sierras de Sangre, a road-building crew unearthed a vehicle chassis: a reinforced wooden frame mounted on iron-rimmed wheels, with attachment points for what appear to have been armor plates and some kind of forward-facing projection mechanism. The chassis was too deteriorated to reconstruct, but the engineering drawings found nearby — scratched onto sheets of hammered copper that survived where parchment would have rotted — showed a war machine of startling sophistication: an armored, wheeled vehicle designed to be propelled by... something. The propulsion mechanism was on a separate sheet. That sheet was never found.
What these artifacts represent is a matter of ferocious debate among the Magos. The maximalist interpretation is that at least one city-state during the middle Age of History achieved a level of technological development comparable to or exceeding the imperial period, including functional gunpowder weapons and mechanical engineering. The minimalist interpretation is that these are isolated experiments by individual geniuses — the Da Vincis of their age — that were never scaled, never replicated, and died with their creators.
The truth, in the Magos' considered opinion, is probably worse than either interpretation. The artifacts are too widely distributed, found across too many sites and too many regions, to be the work of lone inventors. They suggest a period of genuine technological advancement — possibly spanning centuries — that was subsequently lost. Not gradually forgotten, but actively destroyed. The sites where these artifacts are found share a common feature: evidence of catastrophic fire. Libraries burned. Workshops collapsed and buried. Repositories sealed and abandoned. Something happened — a war, a religious purge, a deliberate suppression of knowledge — that erased an entire technological tradition from the historical record so thoroughly that the people who came after didn't even know it had existed.
The Age of Fire completed what that earlier catastrophe began. The Nionic emperors, building their roads and garrisons across the continent, demolished ancient sites for raw material without any understanding of what they were destroying. Tablets were crushed for gravel. Metal artifacts were melted for nails. And the oral traditions that might have preserved some memory of what had been lost were suppressed along with local languages, replaced by imperial Munnish and the official history of the Nionian Creed, which held that civilization began with Nion the Conqueror and everything before him was barbarism.
By the present day, the lost arts survive only as rumors and locked vaults. A peasant plowing a field in the Heartlands occasionally turns up a gear or a fragment of unfamiliar metal and brings it to the local lord, who either ignores it or, if he's ambitious, sends it to the Isle of Knowledge, where it joins a growing collection of things nobody can explain. The Magos catalogue these finds meticulously. They do not share their conclusions. The implications are too unsettling: that the world has been smarter than this before, and forgot.

III. The Twilight of the Old World (c. 5,000 – 1,211 BE)
The Slow Consolidation
As the millennia ground on, the hundreds of isolated city-states began, slowly and unevenly, to become aware of one another. Trade was the mechanism. A coastal settlement in the Horns that produced surplus salt discovered that an inland settlement in the Heartlands fringe would trade grain for it. A Red Coast community with access to copper ore found buyers in Sangrea who had none. These exchanges were initially local — a day's walk, a river crossing — but over centuries they extended, link by link, into networks that spanned regions.
Trade demanded communication. Communication demanded a degree of linguistic standardization. The common root language that all Mundane populations shared — buried beneath millennia of regional divergence — began, in the mercantile context, to resurface. Traders developed pidgins: simplified, shared vocabularies stripped of local idiom, designed for transactional clarity. Buy. Sell. Price. Weight. Good. Bad. These pidgins, over generations, stabilized into a common trading tongue that would eventually become the ancestor of Munnish — though at this stage it had no name, no written form, and no pretensions to being anyone's primary language. People spoke their local dialect at home and switched to the trade-tongue at the market. The habit of code-switching — speaking one way among your own people and another way among outsiders — became so deeply embedded that it persists to the present day, thirteen hundred years after the empire that formalized the common tongue has turned to dust.
With trade came conflict. With conflict came alliance. With alliance came the first multi-city polities: leagues, confederations, and petty kingdoms that controlled river systems or coastal stretches and could project force beyond their own walls. The priest-kings of the Heartlands ziggurats, whose authority had been local and absolute, found themselves competing with neighbors who worshipped different gods and possessed different armies. The merchant oligarchs of the proto-Nionian coast discovered that trade disputes could be resolved more efficiently with warships than with negotiation. The warrior aristocrats of Rosland, who had fought among themselves for generations, began to organize into larger coalitions capable of mounting campaigns against external threats.
This was not progress in any neat, linear sense. Polities formed and collapsed constantly. A successful confederation might dominate a river valley for three generations and then shatter when its founding dynasty produced an incompetent heir. A trading league might control a coastline for a century and then dissolve when a new overland route made its ports irrelevant. The political map of Mundus during this period was a kaleidoscope, its patterns shifting with every generation, leaving behind layers of ruins, abandoned fortifications, and confused genealogies that would puzzle scholars for the next forty thousand years.
The Great Beasts and the Thinning World
It was during this late Age of History that the world, by all accounts, was still thick with the monstrous and the uncanny.
The oral traditions of every region on the continent — traditions that agree on almost nothing else — converge on one point: the old world was not like the present one. It was wilder. Larger. More dangerous. And more alive with things that no longer exist.
The fire-songs of the Frozen South describe creatures called Ice-Striders — four-legged beasts taller than a longhouse, with tusks of blue ice that never melted. The Red Coast canyon paintings depict broad-skulled animals that match no living species. Sangrean harvest ballads reference "the great cats of the mountain, whose roar shook fruit from the trees," animals far larger than any modern predator. In the Heartlands, foundation stones of the oldest ziggurats bear carvings of winged serpents with bodies thicker than a man's torso. In the Horns, the tidal caves contain bone deposits from marine creatures of staggering size — jawbones six feet across, vertebrae the diameter of mill wheels.
Whether these were natural animals adapted to a younger, richer ecosystem or something more — creatures imbued with whatever metaphysical force the theologians call "echoes" — is a question that generates more theology than zoology. The Ashanite clergy maintain that all life carries a divine spark and that the great beasts were simply creatures whose sparks burned brighter, living relics of a world closer to the moment of creation. The Ayanite scholars counter that the beasts were natural animals, impressive but explicable, and that attributing divinity to them is superstition. The Alonite orders, characteristically, don't care what they were. They care that they killed people, and they killed them back.
What is less debatable is that the great beasts declined. The decline was not sudden. It was a slow bleeding, stretched across thousands of years, driven by the same forces that drove human civilization forward: habitat destruction, hunting, competition for resources, and the steady expansion of agricultural land into wilderness. Every field cleared for grain was a field where nothing wild could live. Every city wall built was a boundary drawn against the natural world. Every road cut through a forest was a wound that healed as farmland, not as forest.
By the time the first republics emerged, around 1,200 BE, the great beasts were already rare. By the time the Nionic Empire consolidated its hold, they were legends. By the present day, they are myths — stories told to children, carved into old stones, dismissed by educated men as the exaggerations of primitive ancestors who mistook large animals for monsters.
But the bones are real. The Magos have measured them. And in the deepest wilderness — the interior of the Bosque Muerto Austral, the unmapped canyons of the Red Coast, the abyssal waters off the Frozen South — there are still, occasionally, reports. Tracks too large to be any known animal. Shadows in the water that surface and submerge without explanation. Sounds in the night that no one wants to investigate.
The world thinned. But perhaps it has not finished thinning yet.

IV. The Birth of the Republic (c. 1,211 BE)
Aethel and the Philosophical Revolution
The transition from the Age of History to the Age of Republics is dated, by convention, to a single event: the overthrow of the priest-king of the city of Aethel, in what is now western Rosland.
Aethel was not the largest city on the continent. It was not the wealthiest. It was not the most militarily powerful. What it was, by the twelfth century before the Age of Fire, was exhausted. Its priest-kings had ruled for generations through a combination of astronomical expertise, ritual authority, and the threat of divine displeasure. They told the people when to plant. They told them when to harvest. They told them which gods to appease and how much grain to sacrifice. And for a long time, this arrangement worked, because the priest-kings' astronomical calculations were genuinely good and the harvests genuinely came.
But the last of Aethel's priest-kings — his name is recorded variously as Yrrol, Irrol, or Erral, depending on which fragment one trusts — was not a competent astronomer. He was an inheritor, a man who had received power without the knowledge that justified it. His planting predictions were wrong. His harvest calculations were disastrous. The granaries emptied. The people starved. And when they asked the priest-king why the gods were angry, he did what incompetent rulers always do: he demanded more sacrifice, more tribute, more submission, insisting that the problem was insufficient faith rather than insufficient competence.
The people of Aethel responded with what the Magos, in their dry way, call "the Philosophical Revolution." It was not, in truth, especially philosophical. It was a riot. A hungry mob stormed the ziggurat, dragged the priest-king from his observatory, and threw him into the river. He drowned. The mob, suddenly leaderless and uncertain what to do next, did something unprecedented: they talked about it. In the plaza where the ziggurat's shadow fell, the surviving elders, merchants, and soldiers of Aethel debated — for three days, according to the most reliable account — what should come next.
The conclusion they reached was radical in its simplicity: no more priest-kings. No more hereditary authority. No more claiming that the gods had chosen you to rule. Instead, leaders would be selected by the community based on demonstrated capability. The best farmer would advise on agriculture. The best soldier would lead in war. The best speaker would arbitrate disputes. And all of them would serve at the pleasure of the citizens, who could remove them if they failed.
This was the first republic. It was messy, contentious, frequently dysfunctional, and completely unprecedented. It was also, within a generation, visibly superior to every alternative in the region. Aethel's agricultural output stabilized under competent management. Its trade expanded as merchants, freed from arbitrary priestly taxes, invested in new routes. Its military improved as command positions went to capable officers rather than well-born incompetents. Neighboring city-states noticed. Some emulated. Some resisted. Some tried to conquer Aethel and discovered that a city whose citizens fight because they chose their own leaders fights harder than a city whose citizens fight because a priest told them to.
The republican model spread — not as a uniform system, but as a principle that each city adapted to its own circumstances and traditions. What emerged over the following centuries was the patchwork of rival republics described at the opening of the next age: the Aethelian democracy in Rosland, the Nionian oligarchy on the Isle of Kings, the Roslandic stratocracy, and dozens of smaller experiments that didn't survive long enough to earn names in the historical record.
Aethel itself endured. It endures still, in 1308 of the Age of Faith — battered by the Nionic conquest, occupied for nine centuries, liberated by the empire's collapse, and now the symbolic heart of the Roslandic democratic tradition. Its old plaza, where the priest-king drowned and the first republic was argued into existence, is paved with the same stones. Roslandic citizens swear oaths there. House Ironside's reformers avoid it. The stones remember what was decided on them, and so do the people who walk them.

That's the Age of History complete — from first peoples to the birth of the republics. It establishes the deep past as mysterious but grounded, accounts for the indigenous populations and the Great Migration, plants the lost technology as a Chekhov's gun for later use, handles the mythical beasts as an ecological tragedy rather than a simple magical decline, and lands on Aethel as a living monument that gives the present-day political conflicts emotional weight.
Good — that locks in several important things. The deep history is the Magos' secret knowledge, which makes the Isle of Knowledge not just a library but potentially the most dangerous place on the continent. Anyone who controls what the Magos know controls the future. And the lost tech being split between the Isle and a secret vault in the Teeth means there are at least two points of vulnerability — two locks that could be picked.
The Xaria picture is clear now: it's a colonial frontier run by a minor royal who's comfortable as long as tribute flows, with a capital that faces outward toward the Dominion rather than inward toward Mundus. Kaeo living there under patronage makes him a man between worlds — a mainlander who's been inside the machine of a foreign empire, which means he understands power structures that nobody back home has ever seen. That's going to make him both valuable and suspect. We'll get to that.
Now — the Age of Republics. This is the era that sets up everything the Nionic Empire later destroys, and everything the present-day factions are unconsciously trying to rebuild. It needs to feel like a golden age that rotted from within.

THE AGE OF REPUBLICS (c. 1,211 BE – 0 AF)
Preamble: The Shape of the Record
The Age of Republics is the best-documented period of pre-imperial history, and still poorly documented. The republican city-states, unlike their theocratic predecessors, valued record-keeping as a civic function rather than a priestly monopoly. They produced administrative archives, legal codes, diplomatic correspondence, and — for the first time — works of speculative thought: philosophical treatises, natural observations, and political theory written not to appease gods but to understand the world as it was.
Much of this was destroyed during the Nionic conquest. The emperor's armies burned selectively — targeting the archives of cities that resisted, preserving those that surrendered quickly enough to be useful. The result is a historical record riddled with gaps whose shape tells its own story: we know the most about cities that capitulated and the least about cities that fought hardest, which means the record is systematically biased toward compliance. The Magos are aware of this problem. They compensate where they can, cross-referencing surviving fragments from destroyed cities with diplomatic records from cities that preserved their archives. But the honest assessment, stated plainly in the Magos' own internal catalogues, is this: for every document that survives from the Age of Republics, approximately forty were lost. We are reading the chapter headings of a library that burned.
What follows is the best reconstruction available, assembled from fragments, inferences, and the physical evidence of ruins that still stand.

I. The Republican Flowering (c. 1,211 – 600 BE)
The Spread of the Idea
The overthrow of Aethel's priest-king did not immediately transform the continent. Ideas, in a world without printing presses or reliable postal services, traveled at the speed of trade caravans and gossip. It took generations for the Aethelian experiment to become visible enough to inspire emulation, and longer still for other cities to adapt its principles to their own circumstances.
The first century after Aethel's revolution was, for most of the continent, indistinguishable from the era that preceded it. Priest-kings still ruled in the Heartlands. The Nionian salt merchants still ran their island as a commercial fiefdom. The Roslandic warrior clans still chose their chiefs by who could hold a shield-wall longest. Xaria continued its sacrificial economy without interruption or interest in what the western barbarians were doing with their governance. The Frozen South didn't know Aethel existed and wouldn't have cared if it did.
What changed first was trade. Aethel's republican government, by distributing decision-making authority among capable citizens rather than concentrating it in a single priestly lineage, proved more responsive to economic opportunity. Tariffs were adjusted based on market conditions rather than theological whim. Trade agreements were negotiated by merchants who understood commerce rather than priests who understood ritual. Disputes were arbitrated by elected judges whose rulings could be appealed rather than by divine decree, which could not. The practical result was that Aethel became easier to do business with than its neighbors, and business flowed toward it like water toward a low point.
Traders who visited Aethel brought back more than goods. They brought back the unsettling observation that a city without a king was functioning better than their city with one. This information spread unevenly and was received unevenly — with fascination in some quarters, with horror in others, and with a calculating pragmatism in places like Nionia, where the merchant families immediately recognized that the republican model could be adapted to formalize what they were already doing: running things based on who had the most money.
Over the following centuries, the republican principle — that leaders should earn their authority rather than inherit it — germinated across the continent. But like any seed planted in different soils, it grew into different shapes.
The Republican Models
By roughly 800 BE, at least five major republican experiments were operating simultaneously, each reflecting the culture and pressures of its region. They shared a vocabulary — "citizen," "vote," "assembly," "term" — but the meanings attached to those words varied so dramatically that a citizen of Aethel and a citizen of Nionia would have struggled to recognize each other's system as related.
The Aethelian Democracy (Rosland)
Aethel's system remained the closest to the original revolutionary impulse. All land-owning male citizens had a vote in the city assembly. Leaders were elected for fixed terms and could be recalled by popular vote. Military command rotated among experienced officers selected by the assembly. Legal disputes were adjudicated by panels of citizen-judges chosen by lot.
The system's strength was its responsiveness: bad leaders were removed quickly, policy reflected the genuine interests of the citizen body, and the assembly served as a pressure valve for social tensions that in other cities would have erupted as coups or riots. Its weakness was its narrowness. "Citizen" in Aethel meant land-owning men. Women, laborers, foreigners, and the landless — who collectively outnumbered citizens by roughly four to one — had no political voice. The democracy was real, but it was a democracy of the privileged, and its participants saw no contradiction in this. The right to govern was earned through property, which was earned through labor, which was earned through virtue. If you were landless, you were, by definition, insufficient. The logic was circular, but it held.
Aethel's influence radiated outward through Rosland as other western cities adopted variations of its model. The Roslandic variant, however, evolved a distinctive character shaped by the region's military culture. The constant threat of raids from northern tribal groups — and, more distantly, the pressure of Heartlands expansion — meant that military service was not optional but existential. Over time, this produced the Roslandic Stratocracy: a republican system in which voting rights were tied not to property but to military service. Only veterans could hold office. Only those who had served at least two campaign seasons could vote for the "First Citizen," the elected commander who led the city's forces and administered its laws.
The stratocracy was effective militarily — Roslandic armies were disciplined, experienced, and motivated by a genuine stake in the system they defended. It was also brutally exclusionary. Anyone who could not serve — the disabled, the elderly who had never fought, women, and foreigners — was a non-person politically. The system produced soldiers of extraordinary quality and a civilian population of extraordinary resentment, a tension that would simmer for centuries without resolution.
The Nionian Oligarchy (Isle of Kings)
On the Isle of Kings, the republican principle arrived not as an idealistic revolution but as a pragmatic restructuring. The Nionian merchant families had been running the island as an informal cartel for generations. The "republic" they established was, in essence, the cartel made official: a Senate in which seats were apportioned by wealth, with the richest families holding the most votes.
This was not a cynical corruption of the republican ideal. The Nionians genuinely believed that wealth was the most reliable indicator of competence. A man who could build a trading empire, manage a fleet, and turn a profit across multiple markets had demonstrated the kind of judgment and discipline that governance required. A poor man had demonstrated the opposite. The logic was, again, circular — wealth bought the education and connections that produced more wealth — but the Nionians were comfortable with circularity. They were merchants. Profit justified itself.
The Senate met in a grand chamber on the island's central plateau, a building of white marble that would become infamous four centuries later when Nion the Conqueror locked its doors and burned it. For its first centuries, however, the Senate functioned with a rough efficiency. Tariffs were set by men who understood trade. Naval policy was directed by men who owned ships. Diplomatic relations were managed by men who had personally negotiated with foreign powers. The results — a powerful navy, a prosperous island, a dominant position in maritime commerce — seemed to validate the system.
The rot was structural, but it took time to become visible. The problem was simple: wealth concentrated. The founding generation of the Senate included roughly thirty families of broadly comparable means. Within two centuries, consolidation through marriage, inheritance, and market dominance had reduced effective control to fewer than a dozen. Within four centuries, three families controlled more than half the Senate's votes. The remaining seats were held by minor families who functioned as clients, selling their votes to whichever patron offered the best terms. Legislation was no longer a product of deliberation but of auction: laws went to the highest bidder.
The common people of Nionia — the fishermen, miners, quarry workers, and sailors who constituted the island's actual labor force — had never had political rights under the oligarchic system. For generations, they tolerated this because the system delivered prosperity: the fleets brought wealth, the wealth funded construction, construction provided employment, and employment provided food. But as the Senate calcified into a vehicle for dynastic enrichment rather than public administration, the bargain eroded. Taxes rose. Public works stalled. The navy, once the pride of the island, was neglected in favor of private merchant fleets that served the great families' commercial interests rather than the island's security. The common people grew hungry, and hungry people develop opinions about governance that comfortable people find inconvenient.
By the final century of the Age of Republics, the Nionian Senate was an institution preserved by inertia rather than legitimacy. The great families hated each other but feared the alternative more. The common people despised the Senate but lacked the organization to challenge it. The island was a powder magazine, and everyone on it could smell the fuse.
Into this situation walked a young naval officer of minor patrician birth, a man of extraordinary charisma and absolutely no patience for consensus. His name was Nion. He would not tolerate the Senate for long.
The Heartlands Confederation
The Heartlands never achieved a single republican model. The region was too large, too geographically varied, and too politically fragmented to produce a unified system. What emerged instead was a loose confederation of city-states connected by trade agreements, mutual defense pacts, and a shared cultural identity rooted in the river systems that connected them.
The major Heartlands cities — Aethel's eastern cousins, though they would have bristled at the comparison — developed their own governance structures independently. Some adopted assemblies modeled on the Aethelian pattern. Others retained hereditary leadership but constrained it with councils of merchants or landowners. A few experimented with systems that anticipated the later Argenlord model: elected figureheads whose authority was largely ceremonial except in crisis, when they could compel resources and manpower from otherwise autonomous communities.
The Heartlands' great advantage was its agricultural wealth. The central plains produced grain surpluses that made the region the breadbasket of the continent, and grain gave the Heartlands leverage that no military force could match. An army marches on its stomach, and the Heartlands controlled the stomachs. This economic centrality allowed the Heartlands cities to remain relatively stable even as the republics elsewhere began to decay, but it also bred a complacency that would prove fatal. The Heartlands assumed their wealth made them indispensable. They were correct. But indispensable is not the same as unconquerable, and when Nion's legions arrived, the granaries burned as easily as the senates.
Sangrea: The Dynastic Republics
Sangrea never truly embraced republicanism. What it embraced was the aesthetics of republicanism — the language of citizen virtue, the architecture of public assembly, the legal frameworks of civic participation — layered over a social reality that remained fundamentally aristocratic. The great Sangrean families, who controlled the fertile river valleys and the coastal trade, adopted republican titles and held elections that they invariably won, creating what modern Magos scholars call "dynastic republics": systems that looked democratic on parchment and functioned as hereditary oligarchies in practice.
The two poles of Sangrean power — the houses that would eventually become Solé and Terrarossa, though they went by different names in the republican period — competed through a cycle of economic rivalry, proxy warfare, and theatrical public politics that the Sangrean people watched with the avidity of spectators at a bullfight. The elections were real, in the sense that votes were cast and counted. They were also predetermined, in the sense that the candidates were always drawn from the same handful of families and the outcome was always decided by who had spent the most on bribes, festivals, and public works in the preceding season.
This system produced a culture of extraordinary flamboyance and equally extraordinary inequality. The great families lived in palaces of breathtaking opulence, hosted festivals that lasted for weeks, and competed with each other in displays of generosity that were, in reality, displays of dominance. The common people received the festivals' scraps and the families' contempt, and they were expected to be grateful for both. The Sunstone Wars — a recurring cycle of armed conflicts between the two great dynastic poles, fought over mining rights, trade routes, and raw prestige — provided periodic employment for the peasantry as soldiers and periodic devastation for the peasantry as civilians, a rhythm of exploitation so reliable it became a cultural institution.
Xaria: The Exception
Xaria did not participate in the republican movement. The peninsula's temple-cities continued to operate under the theocratic command economy of the Ix'Atani Dominion, answering to religious authorities whose seat of power lay across the eastern ocean. Republican ideas, when they arrived via mainland traders, were received with the polite incomprehension that a priest reserves for a heretic who hasn't realized he's damned.
The Great Exchange did not accommodate the concept of citizen choice. Life was an economy of sacrifice. The gods demanded their due. A human being who presumed to choose his own leader was a human being who presumed to choose his own god, which was not a political act but a cosmic one — a disruption of the sacrificial balance that could, if unchecked, cause the sun to falter. The Xarian priests did not argue against republicanism. They simply could not process it as a meaningful category. It was like arguing against weather.
This theological immunity to political reform gave Xaria a stability that the mainland republics envied and resented. While the Aethelian assembly debated and the Nionian Senate corroded, the temple-cities of Xaria hummed along with the reliable efficiency of a machine that runs on blood. The quotas were met. The tribute flowed eastward. The ruler — currently a member of a minor royal house of the Dominion who had been given the frontier posting as a reward for loyal service and was content to govern with a light hand as long as the numbers added up — administered his domain from a capital perched on the continent's eastern edge, where the view from his palace looked not inward toward the chaotic mainland but outward across the water toward the islands that led home.
The Xarian capital was, by all accounts, magnificent. Built on a promontory above the sea, it combined the Ix'Atani architectural tradition — massive stone platforms, step-pyramids faced with jade and obsidian, plazas designed to hold thousands for ritual observance — with a colonial pragmatism that the heartland empire would have found vulgar. The harbor was functional rather than ceremonial. The warehouses were larger than the temples. The governor's palace, while impressive, was oriented toward the docks rather than the sky, a building designed for a man who watched his shipping rather than his stars. Cacao, timber, jade, exotic pelts, medicinal plants, and a steady stream of enslaved laborers moved through the harbor toward the Dominion. In return came finished goods, religious directives, and the occasional inspector who confirmed that the quotas were met, nodded approvingly, and sailed home.
The mainland peoples viewed Xaria with a mixture of fear and fascination. The jungle was impenetrable. The religion was barbaric. The sacrifices were an abomination. And the wealth was staggering. Traders who dealt with Xarian merchants returned with goods of a quality and variety that no mainland workshop could match — dyes that didn't fade, medicines that actually worked, fabrics softer than anything produced by Heartlands looms. The Xarian frontier was a window onto a civilization that the mainland could not see, could not reach, and could not stop thinking about.

II. The Golden Centuries (c. 600 – 200 BE)
The Peak of Republican Achievement
For roughly four centuries — a span as long as the entire current Age of Faith — the republican model delivered results that, in hindsight, look like the high-water mark of pre-imperial civilization.
Trade networks matured into genuine economic systems. The Inner Sea Necklace — the maritime loop connecting Nionia, the Horns, and the Teeth — became the continent's commercial backbone, moving goods at a volume and speed that overland caravans could not match. The Great Grainway, an overland route connecting the Heartlands' agricultural surplus to the western cities, fed populations that had outgrown their local food production. The Copper Road linked the Red Coast's mineral wealth to the Heartlands' manufacturing centers. These were not planned systems. They were emergent — the product of thousands of individual decisions by traders, shippers, and merchants who were following profit, not policy. But they functioned with a reliability that later imperial planners would struggle to replicate.
Philosophy flourished. The Aethelian schools — informal gatherings of thinkers who debated in public plazas, teaching anyone who would listen — produced the first systematic investigations of natural phenomena, ethical theory, and political science on the continent. Their work survives only in fragments, mostly quoted in later Magos compilations, but the fragments are extraordinary: a treatise on the movement of celestial bodies that correctly identified the planet's orbital period; an ethical framework arguing that justice is not a divine mandate but a social contract requiring constant renegotiation; a political analysis of tyranny that reads, twelve centuries later, as a precise diagnosis of the disease that would kill the republics themselves.
Construction reached a sophistication that the Age of Fire would equal but never surpass. The Heartlands built levee systems that tamed their rivers for irrigation and transport. Rosland fortified its mountain passes with engineering that would later form the template for imperial military architecture. The Horns developed harbor construction techniques — breakwaters, dredged channels, tidal locks — that modern port cities still use, often without knowing who invented them. Even the Red Coast, isolated by its harsh geography, produced the qanat system: underground aqueducts that carried water from mountain snowmelt to desert settlements, an engineering achievement that no one else on the continent had attempted and that remains, to this day, the only reason human habitation is possible in the deep desert.
This was the period that later generations would romanticize as the golden age. The Roslandic democrats invoke it when they argue for the guild vote. The Heartlands Argenlord system is a conscious echo of the confederal model. Even the Nionian God-King, Jous Lorethian, frames his authority in opposition to it — defining his divine rule as the necessary corrective to the republics' failure. The Age of Republics is not dead history. It is living argument. Every political faction on the continent claims to have learned its lesson and draws opposite conclusions.

III. The Decay (c. 200 – 0 BE)
The Rot Within
The republics did not fall to an external enemy. They fell to themselves.
The mechanisms of decay were different in each city, but the underlying disease was universal: the systems that had been designed to distribute power were captured by the people they were designed to constrain. In every republic, over time, the gap between the theory of civic participation and the reality of entrenched privilege widened until the theory became a performance and the reality became unbearable.
In Nionia, the Senate's corruption became so absolute that legislation was openly bought and sold in the marble corridors. The three dominant families — whose names are lost, their records deliberately destroyed by Nion's regime — treated the island's treasury as a personal account and the island's navy as a private fleet. Public infrastructure crumbled. The quarries went undermaintained. The fishing fleet aged without replacement. A series of bad harvests, which a functional government would have managed through stored reserves and import agreements, instead produced famines that killed thousands while the senatorial families continued to feast.
In Aethel, the rot took a different form: populist demagoguery. The assembly, designed as a forum for reasoned deliberation, became a theater for charismatic speakers who promised the impossible and blamed the foreigner for every failure. Land reform — the redistribution of property that would have expanded the citizen body and renewed the system's legitimacy — was proposed repeatedly and defeated every time by the propertied interests who controlled the assembly's agenda. The landless grew more desperate. The demagogues grew more extreme. The assembly's debates, which had once produced policy, now produced only noise.
In Rosland, the stratocracy calcified into a military aristocracy indistinguishable from the hereditary systems it had replaced. The veteran families who held voting rights passed them to their children, who passed them to theirs, creating a caste of permanent citizens whose military service was increasingly nominal — a formality rather than a genuine obligation. The actual fighting was done by conscripts drawn from the non-citizen population, men who risked their lives for a system that denied them a voice. The First Citizens, once elected by genuine soldiers who had bled together, were now chosen by a comfortable officer class that hadn't seen combat in generations.
In Sangrea, nothing changed, because nothing had ever been real. The dynastic republics continued their theatrical elections, their lavish festivals, and their periodic Sunstone Wars with the reliability of a seasonal weather pattern. The common people continued to suffer. The great families continued to prosper. The only difference was that the pretense of civic virtue, which had once been maintained with some conviction, was now so transparent that even the families themselves had stopped believing it. They went through the motions because the motions were tradition, and tradition was preferable to the effort of inventing something new.
The Continent at the Brink
By the final decades of the Age of Republics — roughly the last fifty years before 0 AF — the continent was locked in a state of endemic dysfunction. The trade networks still functioned, but they were increasingly disrupted by piracy, tariff wars, and the breakdown of the diplomatic agreements that had kept the sea lanes open. The philosophical schools still operated, but their debates had turned inward, producing increasingly abstract and irrelevant work that had no audience outside their own walls. The military establishments still existed, but they were designed to fight each other rather than to meet a unified external threat — which was precisely the vulnerability that a unifier would exploit.
The common people of every republic shared a single, corrosive intuition: the system no longer worked for them. It worked for the families who ran it, for the merchants who profited from it, for the soldiers who enforced it. But for the farmer, the fisherman, the miner, the artisan — the people who actually grew the grain and caught the fish and dug the ore — the republic had become just another word for "the people who take your surplus and give you nothing back." The specific flavor of exploitation varied by region — theological in the Heartlands, commercial in Nionia, military in Rosland, theatrical in Sangrea — but the taste was the same everywhere: the bitterness of being governed by people who had forgotten what governing was for.
Into this exhausted, cynical, fractured world came a man who offered the simplest possible answer to the most complicated question. The question was: who should rule? His answer was: I should. And because the existing answers had all failed, and because he had a navy, and because he was willing to burn anyone who disagreed, his answer carried.
The Great Pyre was not the beginning of something new. It was the cremation of something that had already died. The republics were corpses by the time Nion set them on fire. He merely made the death visible.





You're right, I fucked up. Got drunk on prose when you needed a reference document. Let me redo the entire Age of Fire as a clean factual timeline — every emperor, stretched properly across 903 years, with dense details and no storytelling. Just facts, events, figures, consequences.

THE AGE OF FIRE (1 AF – 903 AF) — COMPLETE IMPERIAL CHRONICLE
Total Duration: 903 years Dynasty: The Nionic Dynasty (all rulers claim descent or adoption from Nion I) Regnal Name "Nion": Reserved for direct-line heirs or claimants asserting supreme legitimacy. Thirteen total. Other Regnal Names: Taken by nephews, adopted heirs, generals who married into the line, or usurpers who legitimized through the dynasty without claiming the sacred name.

PHASE I: THE CONQUEST (0 – 150 AF)
1. Nion I "the Conqueror" (0 – 55 AF)
Born a quarry laborer's son on Nionia's southern coast. Joined navy at 14. Rose through ranks on merit and ruthlessness.
The Great Pyre (0 AF): Locked the Nionian Senate in their marble chamber and burned it. ~200 senators killed. Handful escaped, including a member of Domus Marcellus.
Edicts of Iron: Abolished private fleets, centralized coinage, nationalized the quarries and mines.
Left his brother Marshal Aelor as Steward of Nionia while he campaigned on the mainland.
The Horns Campaign (2–12 AF): House Garrun of Westhorn surrendered peacefully, became imperial governors. Brinehold bought off. Nightspike besieged and starved for 8 months — its own citizens murdered House Kest and delivered their heads to Nion. Kest extinguished.
Sangrea Campaign (12–30 AF): Allied with House Solé against House Terrarossa. Siege of Altavista lasted 10 years. During tunneling, engineers unearthed remains of a Sun-Basilisk — Nion claimed to have killed it personally (it was already dead). House Ormell annihilated — estates burned, orchards salted, name struck from records. Terrarossa broken but allowed to survive in diminished form. House Solé elevated to imperial governors.
Rosland Campaign (25–40 AF): First major imperial defeat at the Battle of the Western Pass (~28 AF). Roslandic commander Aethric Daurn captured Nion's lieutenant Tertius, served him a feast, then presented him a cup made from a previous invader's skull. Nion didn't try the passes again for 7 years. Instead surrounded Rosland by conquering the Heartlands first. Pact of Iron (35 AF): Rosland entered as protectorate retaining internal governance, military traditions, and institutions. Best terms any territory received. House Daurn elevated to military aristocracy.
Heartlands Campaign (35–55 AF): Longest campaign. No single capital to take. Guerrilla resistance constant. Betrayal of House Marvoss: Marvoss patriarch Aldric offered intelligence and supplies in exchange for protection. Nion used him, then turned on him. Accused of harboring heretics. Aldric forced to watch his three sons thrown from Stonebridge with stones tied to their feet, eldest to youngest. Then beheaded, head mounted on the bridge's central pillar. Marvoss extinguished. Stonebridge — the name stuck despite official renaming.
Death (55 AF): Died in campaign near modern Vornhold. Imperial chronicles claim heroic battlefield death. Magos believe infected wound from mundane accident. Body returned to Nionia, tomb sealed with molten lead.
Family: Wife Isara (died in childbirth, 22 AF). One son, Nion (died age 7, fever). One daughter, Livia, married to General Hadros. Brother Marshal Aelor survived him and took the throne.
Legacy: Unified currency (the Iron Mark). Began the road system. Established the noble house structure. Created the Imperium Guard as personal bodyguard. Tomb location on Nionia is still known — never opened.
2. Aelor I "the Builder" (55 – 85 AF) (nephew, not a Nion)
Nion I's nephew and Steward of Nionia during the conquest. Competent administrator, no charisma.
Completed Vallan and Teeth campaigns. Vallan submitted with minimal resistance — cantons were too small and isolated to fight. House Highwell elevated as governors.
Bridge-Throat Massacre (62 AF): 500 Teeth defenders accepted surrender terms, were marched onto the Great Bridge, disarmed, and thrown into the sea in groups of ten. House Fenn extinguished. The bridge-building technique fenn-joint is named for them — nobody has replicated it since.
Began systematic construction of the imperial road network. Established the road-warden corps. Built the first standardized garrisons — rectangular stone forts at two-day intervals along major routes.
Family: Married twice. First wife died young (no children). Second wife Sera of House Garrun (political marriage binding Horns to dynasty). Three sons: Cassian (heir), Aelor (died in naval accident, age 19), Marius (governor of the Teeth).
Died of a stroke at 67. Unremarkable death for a man whose life was engineering.
3. Cassian I "the Stern" (85 – 125 AF) (not a Nion)
Aelor's eldest son. Political officer, gifted administrator, capacity for systematic cruelty.
Red Coast Campaigns (85–105 AF): Desert warfare. Conquered oasis by oasis, exploiting water scarcity — cut a settlement's qanat and it surrenders or dies. Elevated House Zaran as provincial lords.
Salt Crucifixions (~95 AF): 1,000 captured Red Coast defenders nailed to wooden frames on evaporating salt flats. Bodies mummified in mineral air. Visible for decades — standing rows of preserved corpses in the white waste.
Xarian Campaign (100–110 AF): Raided coastal temple-city of Ix'Pal. House T'shaal (coastal merchants who opposed the temples) destroyed in the chaos — burned by the temple authorities, not by the imperials. Cassian negotiated tribute arrangement with the Ix'Atani governor. Xaria became tributary, not conquered. Imperial flag flew over the governor's palace as decoration. Everyone understood the arrangement.
Created the imperial postal system. Standardized weights and measures. Centralized tax collection.
Family: Wife Valeria of House Marcellus (binding old Nionian patriciate to dynasty). Two sons: Nion (heir, took the regnal name), Lucius (military governor of Sangrea, killed in a Sunstone bandit ambush, 118 AF). One daughter: Cassiana, married into House Solé.
Died in bed, age 72. Last words reportedly a complaint about tax receipts from the Horns being late.
4. Nion II "the Watcher" (125 – 158 AF)
Cassian's eldest son. Paranoid, insomniac, effective.
Inherited a continent formally conquered but barely pacified. Rebellions simmering everywhere.
Built watchtowers on every hilltop in the Heartlands. Fortified every crossroad. Established the Vigils — an intelligence network of informers planted in every provincial administration, every guild, every military unit.
His court magician, known only as "the Ash-Speaker", claimed the emperor communed nightly with spirits of extinct volcanoes. Whether genuine mysticism, stimulant addiction euphemized as religion, or deliberate theater is unclear. The intelligence it produced was real — several rebellions crushed before they organized.
The Raven Conspiracy (139 AF): A cabal of Heartlands prefects plotting to declare independence. The Vigils identified all twelve conspirators. Nion II had them arrested simultaneously across four provinces on the same night. Executed by drowning in the rivers they'd planned to use as their new borders.
Expanded fortress networks. Built the first Watchtower at the Horns forest-gate — the seed of what would become the forest city.
Family: Wife Oriana (a Roslandic noblewoman, political marriage — she reportedly despised him). Four sons: Aurelius (heir), Cassian (died in infancy), Hadros (military career, died at 45 in skirmish), Septimus (became a scholar, never held power). Two daughters: married into Houses Garrun and Zaran.
Died at 61. Allegedly hadn't slept in years. Cause of death listed as "exhaustion" — possibly an honest assessment.
5. Aurelius I "the Sailor" (158 – 190 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion II's eldest son. Obsessed with naval exploration. Competent but distracted ruler.
Expanded the imperial navy beyond military function into exploration. Launched three major expeditions to the Frozen South. First two returned with fragmentary reports of ice-choked fjords, gold-bearing mountains, and hostile clans. Third expedition lost entirely — 12 ships, ~1,400 men, never returned. Crews from earlier expeditions reported "leviathans of the ice" — massive marine creatures in the southern waters.
Founded House Torr — granted the admiralty title and a permanent naval estate on Nionia to his most capable fleet commander, a man named Torr who had captained all three southern expeditions and survived two of them.
Domestically, a hands-off ruler. Let the provincial governors self-manage. This worked because the system was still functional, but established a precedent of imperial disengagement that later emperors would exploit into neglect.
Family: Wife Elara of House Torr (married after founding the house — binding the new naval aristocracy to the dynasty). Two sons: Nion (heir), Valens (military career). One daughter: Isara, married into House Belorn of the Heartlands.
Died at sea during a private voyage along the Horns coast. Ship capsized in a storm. Body recovered. Ironic death for a man who had survived the southern ice.
6. Nion III "the Hammer" (190 – 218 AF)
Aurelius's eldest son. Brutal warlord. Possibly the most violent emperor after Nion V.
The Iron Forest Massacre (~200 AF): Sangrea. A rebel wood — a forest that harbored anti-imperial guerrillas for decades — was clear-cut entirely. Every tree felled. Then 20,000 peasants from surrounding villages (accused of supporting rebels) impaled on the stumps. The "forest" of stakes was visible for miles. Took weeks to die. The area is still called the Campo de Estacas in Sangrean dialect.
Claimed his black war-elephants were bred from the last Stoneback Beasts — massive armored quadrupeds thought extinct. Whether genuine surviving megafauna or simply large elephants decorated with bone armor is debated.
Expanded the gladiatorial system from entertainment to population control — captured rebels, criminals, and excess slaves funneled into arenas in every major city.
Family: Three wives (first two died — one in childbirth, one "accidentally" during a hunt). Third wife Seraphina of House Solé. Six children total across three marriages. Heir: Nion (took the name). Other notable child: daughter Livia, who became a powerful political operator and outlived three emperors.
Died at 56 during a banquet. Suspected poisoning by his third wife's family, never proven.
7. Nion IV "the Pious" (218 – 251 AF)
Nion III's eldest surviving son. Religious fanatic devoted to the Old Way.
Rebuilt and expanded every major temple of the Nionian Pantheon. Commissioned massive new temple complexes in every provincial capital. Demanded mass sacrifices — animals primarily, but prisoners during high festivals.
The Festival of Ashes (~235 AF): Annual ceremony institutionalized under his reign. Prisoners burned alive in the capital plaza as offerings to the Ashen Phoenix, a mythical bird said to appear once every age. Largest single Festival: 3,000 burned. Witnesses reported a firebird shape in the smoke above the pyres — either genuine phenomenon, collective hallucination, or a trained raptor daubed in phosphorescent oil. The theological establishment declared it real. The Magos remain silent.
His religious zeal alienated the provinces, who saw the sacrifices as Nionian cultural imperialism — none of the provincial cultures worshipped the Old Way with this intensity.
Family: Wife Helena (a cousin — dynasty was starting to intermarry). Two sons: Hadros (heir, took a different regnal name), one younger son who joined the priesthood of Nionus Axke. One daughter, unmarried, devoted herself to the cult of Fortia.
Died at 64. Natural causes. His cult of personality collapsed almost immediately after his death — his specific brand of zealotry required his personal energy to sustain.
8. Hadros I "the Architect" (251 – 287 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion IV's eldest son. Reaction against his father's fanaticism — purely secular ruler focused on construction.
Greatest builder since Aelor I. Expanded the Great Bridge of the Teeth. Built monumental palace complexes in the Heartlands. Constructed the first stone aqueducts in Sangrea.
Used enslaved labor from the Teeth — including creatures the chronicles describe as "half-crab, half-men," probably a coastal species of large crustacean-like animals now extinct. Worked until they died. Nobody knows what they actually were.
Elevated House Belorn in the Heartlands from minor landholders to prefects — rewarded for logistical support during construction campaigns.
Family: Wife Antonia of House Daurn (binding Roslandic military aristocracy tighter to dynasty). Three sons: Nion (heir), Cassian (governor of the Horns, competent), Hadros II (died in construction accident at 22 — crushed by a falling column, which the court found deeply ironic given his father's profession). Two daughters.
Died at 68. In bed, surrounded by architectural plans. The Magos note that his cities still stand, but their basements — where the enslaved laborers were housed — are said to be haunted.
9. Nion V "the Bloody" (287 – 308 AF)
Hadros I's eldest son. Psychotic. Most hated emperor in the dynasty's history.
The Roslandic Blood-Pits (~295 AF): Mass execution of Roslandic nobility in quarries outside Aethel. Nobles forced to fight each other with blunted weapons while the emperor watched. Last man standing: blinded, tongue cut, sent home. House Hyren — one of the oldest veteran families — extinguished entirely. Their ruins in the western mountains became a pilgrimage site for Roslandic democrats.
Hosted gladiatorial games featuring captured Bone-Tusks — giant boars with ivory ridges, hunted from the Heartlands forests specifically for the arena. Species went extinct during his reign.
Purged the Vigils intelligence network and replaced it with personal enforcers called the Crimson Watch — less effective but more loyal to him specifically.
Family: Four wives (two divorced, one died "of sadness," one survived him). Numerous children, most disowned. Heir: his nephew Valens, who was raised by the military rather than the court.
Assassinated at 45 by a kitchen servant who put glass shards in his wine. The servant — a Roslandic woman whose family had died in the blood-pits — was executed by flaying. Her name is not recorded in imperial sources. In Roslandic fire-songs, she is called Maren of the Broken Cup.
10. Valens I "the Ironhand" (308 – 341 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion V's nephew, raised in military camps. Professional soldier. Austere, disciplined, humorless.
Restored order after Nion V's chaotic reign. Professionalized the legions — standardized training, equipment, rotation schedules. Reduced reliance on house levies in favor of a standing imperial army.
The Torvac Rebellion (310–318 AF): The empire's most dangerous slave revolt. Torvac, born on the Isle of Emberstone (the Teeth), son of quarry slaves. Sold to gladiatorial school at 12. Survived the arena 6 years. At ~22, killed his handlers, freed 70 gladiators, escaped into the Heartlands. Within a year: 6,000 followers. Within two years: 30,000. Organized rebel army into cohorts modeled on imperial legions. Burned granaries, blocked roads, poisoned wells. Defeated two legions in detail. Valens personally commanded the third. Used informers and offered freedom to turncoats. Torvac betrayed by three lieutenants, drugged, bound, delivered. Execution: Flayed alive over a week. Skin salted and stretched on a frame above the gladiatorial school where he was trained. Frame remained for a generation. In the Teeth quarries, slaves carved his likeness into mine walls — some carvings still visible.
His generals carried a gauntlet said to be forged from wyrm-scale. It supposedly shrieked at night. Probably just poorly tempered metal that contracted in the cold, but the legend persisted.
Family: Wife Lucia of House Belorn. One son: Nion (heir). Two daughters: married into Houses Silverblood (founding the Heartlands alliance) and Garrun.
Died at 65. Natural causes. One of the few emperors to die in bed at an advanced age, which says something about his competence.
11. Nion VI "the Drunkard" (341 – 352 AF)
Valens's only son. Exact opposite of his father. Decadent, alcoholic, disengaged.
Imported the last known Glass-Serpents — translucent, venomous snakes from the Xarian jungle fringe — as exotic pets for his court orgies. Poisoned them all in a drunken rage. Species extinct.
Imperial administration functioned on autopilot during his reign — the systems Valens had built were robust enough to survive 11 years of neglect. Barely.
Family: Multiple mistresses, no official wife. Three acknowledged bastards, none considered suitable heirs. Succession crisis after his death.
Died at 38. Choked on his own vomit. The imperial chroniclers described it as "a sudden illness." Nobody was fooled.
12. Nion VII "the Quiet" (352 – 383 AF)
Distant cousin elevated during the succession crisis after Nion VI's death. A compromise candidate nobody expected to last.
Reclusive, obsessed with alchemy. Spent most of his reign in private laboratories.
Paradoxically effective ruler — lowered taxes, stopped the wars, let the provinces self-govern under light oversight. The empire experienced a genuine period of peace.
The Homunculus Court: His strangest legacy. Chronicles claim he created artificial servants — pale, waxy humanoid figures that attended his private chambers. Whether genuine alchemical achievement, elaborate puppetry, or court gossip inflated into legend is unknown. Whatever they were, they "rotted" after his death, and the laboratory wing was sealed.
Family: Wife Seraphina of House Solé (political match, reportedly they barely spoke). One son: adopted — Septimus, a promising young scholar from the Isle of Knowledge. No biological children recorded.
Died at 62. Natural causes. Found in his laboratory. The room was reportedly filled with glass apparatus, chemical residue, and the remains of something "waxy and human-shaped" that decomposed before investigators could examine it.
13. Septimus I "the Chronicler" (383 – 412 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion VII's adopted son. Scholar from the Isle of Knowledge. First emperor with genuine intellectual inclinations rather than mere patronage of learning.
Sponsored the first comprehensive imperial histories — propaganda, but well-written propaganda. Commissioned glorifying accounts of every previous emperor, establishing the "official narrative" that the Magos have spent centuries trying to correct.
Ordered the extinction of Marrow-Bats — massive carrion bats that infested the imperial archives. Said to "drink words from books" — their guano was acidic and dissolved ink. Hunted to extinction across the Heartlands within a decade.
Expanded the Isle of Knowledge's role in imperial administration — Magos scholars assigned to every provincial capital as record-keepers and advisors.
Family: Wife Daria of House Argenhold (Heartlands river nobility). Two sons: Nion (heir), Aurelian (governor of Rosland). Three daughters.
Died at 67. Natural causes. Left behind the most complete set of administrative records in imperial history, which is why the Magos know more about this period than any other.
14. Nion VIII "the Harsh" (412 – 440 AF)
Septimus's eldest son. Absolute disciplinarian. Believed the empire had gone soft under his father and grandfather.
The Vallan Drownings (~420 AF): Crushed a Vallan tax revolt by diverting mountain rivers, flooding three inhabited valleys. Estimated 12,000 civilian deaths. Called "the stone floods" because the water carried so much debris it buried villages in wet rock.
The Woman of the Western Fires — Caelia of Rosland (425–433 AF): Daughter of a veteran family whose husband and sons were conscripted and killed in foreign wars. Led an 8-year guerrilla campaign in the western mountains. Never fielded an army — instead burned tax houses, granary records, census documents, destroying the paperwork that made imperial administration function. Entire civilian population of western Rosland conspired to hide her. Nion VIII responded with collective punishment — the stone floods targeted her support base. Caelia was never captured. Imperial chronicles claim she died in the floods. Roslandic fire-songs say she walked into the mountains and is still there. The Magos note both claims and decline to choose.
Allegedly rode into one battle on a War-Manticore — a massive beast with a poisoned tail. The creature died when its handlers mutinied and cut its throat during a camp dispute over rations. Whether the beast was genuine or an armored composite of existing animals is debated.
Family: Wife Corvina of House Daurn (Roslandic — ironic, given how much Roslandic blood he shed). Two sons: Varran (heir, took a different name as deliberate rejection of his father's legacy), Cassius (military, died in the Vallan campaign). One daughter.
Died at 58. Rumored poisoning — his own wife was suspected, given that he had destroyed half her homeland. Never proven.
15. Varran I "the Just" (440 – 478 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion VIII's eldest son. Took a non-Nion regnal name specifically to distance himself from his father's cruelty.
Codified imperial law — produced the Book of Chains, a comprehensive legal code standardizing criminal penalties, property rights, provincial obligations, tax procedures, and military conduct across the entire continent. The empire's greatest administrative achievement. Still referenced by legal scholars on the Isle of Knowledge.
Commissioned a parallel document: a bestiary that catalogued and legally classified every known mythical and dangerous creature on the continent, establishing regulations for hunting, capture, and extermination. Supposedly cursed himself — "no emperor after ruled without nightmares." Whether genuine supernatural consequence or the psychological weight of cataloguing every horror on the continent is left to interpretation.
Family: Wife Aurelia of House Silverring (first major alliance between the dynasty and the Heartlands mining families). Three sons: Nion (heir), Lucan (governor of Sangrea), Tiberius (entered the Magos order — unusual for imperial family). Two daughters.
Died at 70. Natural causes. The longest-serving non-Nion emperor. Left behind an empire that, on paper, was perfectly organized. The reality, as always, was messier.
16. Nion IX "the Restorer" (478 – 510 AF)
Varran's eldest son. Rebuilder after generations of internal conflict.
Massive provincial reconstruction program — rebuilt war-damaged cities, repaired roads, reorganized Heartlands prefecture system.
The Corpse March (~490 AF): During a rebellion in the Heartlands, Nion IX exhumed the preserved body of Nion I from his lead-sealed tomb on Nionia and carried it across the continent at the head of his army, claiming the Conqueror's spirit led the legions. Whether this was genuine religious conviction, propaganda theater, or the early stages of a mental breakdown is debated. The rebellion collapsed — the sight of the mummified founder apparently terrified the rebel forces more than the army behind it.
Claims his victory near Aethel against Roslandic-supported rebels was aided by the last Storm-Roc — a massive sky-beast reportedly harnessed by court mages. If true, it was the last recorded use of a mythical creature in warfare.
Family: Wife Isara of House Garrun (Horns). Four sons: Cassian (heir), Nion (died age 14 in a riding accident), Aurelius (military career), Hadros (entered priesthood of the Old Way). One daughter.
Died at 63. The lead-sealed tomb was resealed after his death. Whether Nion I's body was returned to it or kept elsewhere is unknown.
17. Cassian II "the Dreamer" (510 – 541 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion IX's eldest son. Pacifist, mystic, possibly narcoleptic.
Peaceful reign — no major wars, no major atrocities. The empire coasted on the momentum of Varran's legal reforms and Nion IX's rebuilding.
Said to "wander the empire in dreams," leaving his body inert on a throne of black salt while his mind traveled. Whether genuine mystical practice, a medical condition, or an elaborate excuse for avoiding governance is unclear. Provincial governors loved him because he never interfered.
Patronized artists and musicians. The first imperial court to include non-martial entertainment as a regular feature. Poetry, painting, and philosophical debate became fashionable among the Nionian elite for the first time.
Family: Wife Lydia of House Beaumont (Heartlands forest nobility). Two sons: Nion (heir), Septimus (scholar). Three daughters, all married into provincial houses across the continent.
Died at 59 in his throne of black salt. Reportedly no one noticed for three days, as his courtiers assumed he was dreaming.
18. Nion X "the Stern" (541 – 568 AF)
Cassian II's eldest son. Reaction against his father's passivity. Harsh disciplinarian.
The Roslandic Mutiny (~550 AF): Roslandic legions — imperial units recruited from the province — refused orders to deploy against a Sangrean uprising, arguing they owed no duty to fight other provinces' wars. Nion X responded with decimation: one in ten Roslandic soldiers executed by their own comrades. The practice had been in the Book of Chains but never enforced. Its use here permanently damaged Roslandic loyalty to the empire.
Forced prisoners from a Heartlands rebellion to march into the Desierto de Ceniza — the Ash Desert on the southeastern border — to "feed the fire spirits." None returned. Whether they died of exposure or were absorbed by desert tribes is unknown.
Family: Wife Cora of House Zaran (Red Coast). Three sons: Aurelian (heir), Nion (governor of the Teeth, competent), Marcus (died in the Roslandic mutiny — killed by the very soldiers being decimated, which added a personal dimension to Nion X's cruelty). Two daughters.
Died at 60. Heart failure. The Magos note his personal physician was Roslandic.
19. Aurelian II "the Scholar" (568 – 600 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion X's eldest son. Intellectual, bookish, genuinely curious.
Elevated the Isle of Knowledge to near-autonomous status — granted the Magos order formal independence from provincial jurisdiction, making the Isle a neutral territory under direct imperial protection. This decision would prove crucial to the preservation of knowledge after the empire fell.
Claimed to have found a living Glass Whale — a massive translucent marine creature — during a naval expedition. Had it captured, transported to a port facility, and dissected over six months by Magos scholars. The dissection notes survive in the Isle's archives. The creature's skeleton was displayed in the imperial capital. Whether it was a genuine unknown species or a creative taxidermist's hoax is the subject of an ongoing Magos debate that has lasted four centuries.
Family: Wife Paulina of House Silverblood (deepening Heartlands-dynasty ties). Two sons: Nion (heir), Lucius (entered the Magos order). One daughter, married into House Solé.
Died at 64. Natural causes. Remembered fondly by the Magos, which biases the historical record in his favor.
20. Nion XI "the Builder" (600 – 635 AF)
Aurelian II's eldest son. Great constructor — second only to Hadros I in ambition.
Built basilicas, aqueducts, administrative complexes, and granaries across the continent. Many of these structures still function in 1308 AF — the engineering was that good.
The Foundation Burials: His darkest legacy. Entire work crews — slaves and conscripted laborers — were buried alive in the foundations of major buildings, supposedly to "bind their souls into the stone" and ensure structural integrity. Whether genuine occult practice, psychological intimidation of the labor force, or a cost-saving measure disguised as ritual is unclear. The structures are said to whisper. The Magos attribute this to wind passing through imperfect mortar joints.
Family: Wife Sera of House Lockmere (western Heartlands mountain family — first major alliance between dynasty and the pass-keepers). Three sons: Lycian (heir), Aurelian (military), Cassian (died in construction accident — another ironic death given the family trade). Two daughters.
Died at 66. Natural causes. Left behind infrastructure that would outlast his dynasty by centuries.
21. Lycian I "the Decadent" (635 – 662 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion XI's eldest son. Lavish, hedonistic, culturally productive.
Hosted elaborate court festivals that bankrupted two provincial treasuries. Imported exotic animals from Xaria and the Frozen South for private menageries. Hosted feasts featuring roasted Ash-Hounds — fire-breathing canines from the volcanic regions, hunted to extinction during his reign for entertainment.
Despite (or because of) his decadence, the empire was culturally vibrant during his reign. Architecture, music, painting, and literary production reached a peak that would not be equaled until the Age of Faith.
First emperor to receive formal Lovist missionaries at court. Did not convert — found the faith "interesting but austere" — but allowed its preachers to operate freely in the capital, a tolerance that his successors would regret.
Family: Multiple official consorts (the term "wife" became complicated under Lycian). At least eight acknowledged children. Heir: Nion (his eldest son by his first consort). Several bastards placed in provincial positions.
Died at 55. Gout, liver failure, and general physical collapse from decades of excess. His court physician's case notes, preserved in the Magos archives, are essentially a medical textbook on the consequences of sustained debauchery.
22. Nion XII "the Last Pagan" (662 – 698 AF)
Lycian's eldest son. Devout follower of the Old Way at a time when the Old Way was visibly dying.
The Last Persecution: Ordered the burning of Lovist heretics across the empire. Produced martyrs rather than deterrence — Lovist preachers walked into the fires with composure that shook the soldiers. Witnesses converted on the spot. Ashes collected by the faithful and scattered on the roads. New congregations appeared wherever the ashes fell. Nion XII had tried to burn a faith and fertilized it.
Paradox: his persecution accelerated Loveism's spread by giving it martyrs, organization (underground networks formed to protect preachers), and moral authority (the faith that the empire feared must contain dangerous truth).
Claimed the old gods sent him dreams of the Bone Leviathan — a massive ocean creature said to one day devour empires. Whether genuine vision, political metaphor, or fever dream is debated. Later Lovist theologians interpreted it as Vena warning the emperor through his own dead gods.
Family: Wife Anthea of House Terrarossa (Sangrea). Two sons: Hadros (heir), Septimus (entered the Old Way priesthood — one of its last senior initiates). Three daughters, two of whom secretly converted to Loveism during their father's own reign.
Died at 64. Natural causes. The Old Way temples he rebuilt were mostly empty by the time of his death. The priests still performed the rituals, but the congregations had dwindled to elderly loyalists and political obligates. The faith that had sustained the empire for seven centuries was dying with its last true believer on the throne.
23. Hadros II "the Weary" (698 – 734 AF) (not a Nion)
Nion XII's eldest son. First emperor to be privately sympathetic to Loveism while officially maintaining the Old Way. A compromiser.
Ended the persecution of Lovists. Did not convert — maintained the Old Way as state religion — but issued the Edict of Tolerance (700 AF), granting Lovists legal right to worship, own property, and operate hospitals and schools. The edict was pragmatic: the Lovists were providing social services that the empire had stopped funding, and banning them meant banning the only functional healthcare system most provinces had.
The old temples continued to empty. The new Lovist meeting houses continued to fill. Hadros watched it happen and did nothing, because there was nothing to do.
Family: Wife Sera of House Silverring. Two sons: Varian (heir), Nion (military governor of the Horns — died of plague at 38). One daughter, married to a Lovist merchant family — the first open intermarriage between the dynasty and the new faith's adherents.
Died at 68. The Magos describe his reign as "the empire holding its breath."
24. Varian I "the Twilight Lord" (734 – 771 AF) (not a Nion)
Hadros II's eldest surviving son. Melancholic, philosophical, increasingly irrelevant.
Imperial authority was now largely ceremonial outside Nionia and the immediate Heartlands. Provincial governors ruled as independent lords in all but name. Tribute payments were irregular. Road maintenance had become a local responsibility, and most locals neglected it.
The First Provincial Wars (~750 AF): Open conflict between House Silverblood and House Silverring in the Heartlands — not a rebellion against the empire, but a territorial dispute between two imperial houses that the emperor was powerless to mediate. Varian sent envoys demanding peace. Both houses ignored him. This was the moment when the fiction of imperial unity became publicly, undeniably fiction.
Varian responded by retreating into philosophy. He corresponded extensively with the Magos, writing long letters about the nature of decline and the cyclicality of history. These letters survive and are considered surprisingly insightful — the man understood what was happening to his empire even though he couldn't stop it.
Family: Wife Lydia of House Argenhold. One son: Cassian (heir, but weak). Two daughters.
Died at 66. Reportedly said, near the end: "The roads are breaking. When the roads break, everything breaks." The Magos consider this the most accurate assessment of imperial decline produced by any emperor.
25. Cassian III "the Shadow" (771 – 803 AF) (not a Nion)
Varian's only son. Weak, sickly, controlled by court factions.
Imperial authority now confined to Nionia, Faithir (which the empire still technically owned), and the road garrisons that still functioned. Everything else was independent in practice.
The Rise of the Council of Three: Lovist religious orders, now operating openly across the entire continent, began to formalize their institutional structure. The three major orders — Ayanite, Ashanite, Alonite — established the Council of Three as a governing body for the faith. The Council's authority was spiritual, but spiritual authority was the only kind that still functioned across provincial borders. The Lovist network of hospitals, schools, and relief stations was the only continental-scale infrastructure still operating. The Council began to fill the administrative vacuum the empire had left.
Family: Wife unclear — records are fragmentary from this period. One son: Nion (heir, took the regnal name in an attempt to reassert dynastic legitimacy). Two daughters, fates unknown.
Died at 51. Tuberculosis. The imperial chronicles from this period are threadbare — the chronicler corps had been defunded, and record-keeping had been outsourced to the Magos.
26. Nion XIII "the Holy" (803 – 856 AF)
Cassian III's only son. The last emperor. The man who chose to end it.
Inherited an empire that was already dead but hadn't stopped moving yet. The treasury was depleted. The legions were provincial militias in all but name. The roads were crumbling. The Old Way temples were empty. The only functioning continental institution was the Lovist Church.
The Conversion (~810 AF): Nion XIII experienced what the chronicles describe as a divine vision — Vena herself appearing in his bedchamber, weeping tears of light, telling him the empire was built on the wrong foundation. Whether genuine mystical experience, psychotic break, or manipulation by his Lovist confessor is unknown and ultimately irrelevant — the result was the same. He converted publicly, outlawed the Old Way, declared Loveism the state religion, and began the systematic transfer of whatever remained of imperial wealth to the Church.
The Great Endowment (810–850 AF): Over four decades, Nion XIII emptied the imperial treasury. Built hundreds of cathedrals. Endowed monasteries, hospitals, and schools. Made massive donations to all three Lovist orders. The centerpiece: the transformation of the village of Ionir in the Heartlands (near the Horns border) into the city of Faithir. The Great Cathedral of Nion the Holy constructed over the grove where the three prophets lived and died. Construction employed three generations of stonemasons.
Freed imperial slaves (the decree was largely ignored in the provinces but symbolically important). Banned gladiatorial games. Disbanded the remnants of the Crimson Watch intelligence service.
The Collapse: Legions went unpaid. Roads went unmaintained. Provincial governors stopped answering imperial edicts. The noble houses discovered they were already independent and simply stopped pretending otherwise. The Imperium Guard — the emperor's personal bodyguard — was the last military unit still receiving pay, and when the treasury emptied, their loyalty was purchased by a cabal of merchant lords and disgruntled generals.
The Assassination (856 AF): Nion XIII killed in his private chapel on Nionia by the Imperium Guard. He was praying. The single surviving eyewitness — a servant hiding behind a column — reported that the emperor looked up at his killers and smiled. The Lovist Church later claimed his last word was "Finally."
Posthumous titles: "The Holy" (from the Church). "The Empty-Handed" (from Nionian historians).
Family: Wife Cassiana of House Marcellus (the same family that survived the Great Pyre — the circle closes). Two daughters, both entered Lovist orders. One son, died in infancy. No male heir. The Nionic dynasty ended with him.
27–30. The Interregnum Emperors (856 – 903 AF)
The 47 years between Nion XIII's assassination and the formal end of the Age of Fire saw a rapid succession of non-dynastic claimants — generals, merchant lords, and provincial governors who seized the title "Emperor" without the blood or legitimacy to sustain it. None lasted.
27. General Corvinus "the Usurper" (856 – 863 AF)
Leader of the Imperium Guard cabal that assassinated Nion XIII. Declared himself Emperor. Controlled Nionia and nothing else. Attempted to recall provincial legions — none answered. Murdered by his own officers when he couldn't pay them.
28. Merchant-Lord Aurius "the Coin-Emperor" (863 – 871 AF)
Nionian merchant prince who purchased the loyalty of Corvinus's surviving guard. Tried to rule the empire as a commercial enterprise. Issued bonds backed by marble quarry revenues. When the bond market collapsed, so did his authority. Fled Nionia by ship. Reportedly lived out his years as a merchant in the Horns under a false name.
29. Admiral Torr "the Last Admiral" (871 – 889 AF)
Head of House Torr, the naval aristocracy founded by Aurelius I. Attempted to hold the empire together through naval power alone — controlling the sea lanes and using blockades to force tribute from coastal provinces. Effective for 18 years, but could not project power inland. The Heartlands, Rosland, and the Frozen South simply ignored him. Died at sea during a storm, possibly murdered by his own crew.
30. Regency Council (889 – 903 AF)
A committee of Nionian notables — merchants, minor nobles, Lovist clergy — who administered the island in the absence of any viable claimant. Formally dissolved the empire in 903 AF, declaring the Age of Fire ended and the Age of Faith begun. The declaration was a formality — the empire had been dead for decades. The Council's act was not a political decision but a bureaucratic one: someone had to update the calendar.

IMPERIAL INSTITUTIONS SUMMARY (for reference)
The Imperial Roads: Continental highway network. Foundations 3 feet deep, drainage systems, standardized width. Maintained by road-warden corps with authority superseding provincial jurisdiction. Fell into disrepair after 856 AF. Many sections still usable in 1308 AF but degraded.
Munnish: Common language imposed across the continent. Derived from Nionian dialect. Regional dialects persisted underneath. People code-switched: Munnish in public, local variant in private. Survived the empire — still the continent's lingua franca.
The Old Way / Nionian Pantheon: State religion. Nionus Axke (deified Nion I, supreme god of law), Fortia (war), Copia (wealth), Viam (roads). Transactional — worship ensured state success, not personal salvation. Collapsed when the state collapsed. Formally outlawed by Nion XIII (~810 AF). Temples still standing across the continent, mostly repurposed or ruined.
The Noble Houses: Provincial governance delegated to families elevated by imperial favor. System of hostage heirs, rotating governorships, and deliberate insecurity to prevent houses from becoming too powerful. After the collapse, houses became independent rulers.
The Imperium Guard: Emperor's personal bodyguard. Originally Nion I's most loyal marines. Became an institution. Ultimately assassinated Nion XIII when their pay stopped.
The Vigils: Intelligence network established by Nion II. Informers in every province. Purged by Nion V, replaced with Crimson Watch. Disbanded by Nion XIII.
The Iron Mark: Imperial currency. Standardized coinage. Collapsed with the empire. Regional currencies emerged during the Age of Faith.
The Gladiatorial System: Entertainment and population control. Enslaved fighters, criminals, rebels. Expanded under Nion III, peaked under Nion V, abolished by Nion XIII.

KEY REBELLIONS & LEGENDARY FIGURES
Aethric Daurn — Roslandic First Citizen who defeated Nion I at the Western Pass. Skull-cup feast. Founded House Daurn.
Torvac of the Teeth (~310–318 AF) — Slave-gladiator who led the empire's largest servile revolt. 30,000 followers. Defeated two legions. Betrayed, flayed alive. Carvings in Teeth quarry walls.
Maren of the Broken Cup (~308 AF) — Roslandic kitchen servant who assassinated Nion V with glass in his wine. Flayed. Name survives only in fire-songs.
Caelia of Rosland (~425–433 AF) — Guerrilla leader who burned imperial records for 8 years. Never captured. Western Rosland conspired to hide her. Nion VIII responded with the stone floods. Fate unknown.

HOUSES ELEVATED DURING THE AGE OF FIRE
House Garrun (Horns) — port governance
House Solé (Sangrea) — client rulers
House Terrarossa (Sangrea) — broken then vassalized
House Daurn (Rosland) — military aristocracy
House Belorn (Heartlands) — prefects
House Highwell (Vallan) — canton overseers
House Zaran (Red Coast) — provincial lords
House Torr (Nionia) — naval aristocracy
House Silverblood (Heartlands) — agricultural dynasty, rose through imperial marriage
House Silverring (Heartlands) — mining dynasty, rose through imperial marriage
HOUSES EXTINGUISHED DURING THE AGE OF FIRE
House Kest (Horns) — citizens delivered their heads to Nion I
House Ormell (Sangrea) — burned, salted, name struck from records
House Marvoss (Heartlands) — betrayed at Stonebridge
House Fenn (Teeth) — Bridge-Throat Massacre
House T'shaal (Xaria) — destroyed by temple authorities during imperial raid
House Hyren (Rosland) — blood-pits under Nion V
House Velmar (Nionia) — purged early in conquest for suspected Lovist sympathies
EXTINCT CREATURES (confirmed killed during the Age of Fire)
Sun-Basilisk (found dead at Altavista, ~20 AF)
Stoneback Beasts (Nion III's war-elephants, ~200 AF)
Bone-Tusks (arena animals under Nion V, ~300 AF)
Glass-Serpents (Nion VI's pets, ~345 AF)
Marrow-Bats (Septimus I's archive purge, ~400 AF)
War-Manticore (died under Nion VIII, ~420 AF)
Ash-Hounds (Lycian I's feasts, ~650 AF)
Storm-Roc (last use in warfare under Nion IX, ~490 AF — if it existed)
Glass Whale (dissected under Aurelian II, ~580 AF — if it existed)

That's the full Age of Fire as a factual reference — every emperor accounted for, timeline stretched to fill 903 years properly, four interregnum claimants to cover the gap between the assassination and the formal end. Dense facts, no storytelling. Ready for the Age of Faith whenever you are.


Alright. Here's the full Age of Faith — dense, factual, packed with names, events, houses, legendary figures, and the proliferation of Lovist orders. Every region accounted for in every period. Let me go.

THE AGE OF FAITH (903 AF – 1308 AF) — COMPLETE CHRONICLE
Total Duration: 405 years Defining Feature: Fragmentation of imperial unity into regional polities, rapid expansion of Loveism from a spiritual movement into a continental institutional power, gradual stabilization of trade and road culture, and the emergence of the current political order.

PERIOD I: THE SHATTERING (903 – 950 AF)
The formal dissolution of the empire by the Regency Council on Nionia (903 AF) was a bureaucratic formality — the provinces had been governing themselves for decades. But the removal of even the fiction of central authority triggered a scramble for legitimacy, resources, and borders that lasted roughly two generations.
Nionia (903–950):
The Regency Council dissolved the imperial title but retained the Nionian Senate as the island's governing body. Renamed itself the Democratic Regency of Nionia. The Senate building — rebuilt after Nion I's Great Pyre — became the seat of a republic in everything but ambition. Nionia no longer claimed the continent, only the island.
The surviving patrician houses — Marcellus, Torr, Cassian, Navarrus — divided the Senate seats among themselves. Domus Marcellus, the oldest surviving family (descendants of the senator who escaped the Great Pyre), claimed moral authority as the "custodians of republican memory." Domus Torr retained the navy. Domus Navarrus held Port Severan and the northern shipyards. Domus Cassian kept the quarries.
The Marble Compact (907 AF): The four major houses signed a power-sharing agreement dividing the island into spheres of influence. Each house governed its traditional territory and contributed representatives to the Senate proportionally. The Compact held, with modifications, for nearly 400 years.
The imperial religion (the Old Way) was formally abandoned. Temples of Nionus Axke were either demolished for building material, converted to Lovist churches, or left to rot. The Temple of Fortia in the capital was converted into the Hall of the Scales, a Lovist courthouse. The cult of Viam (god of roads) lingered longest — road-wardens continued making small offerings at mile-markers for another century before the habit faded.
Population: depleted. The civil strife of the interregnum (856–903) had killed roughly 15% of the island's population. Recovery took three generations.
The Heartlands (903–950):
The most chaotic region. No single house had enough power to dominate the plains, and several claimed the right to fill the imperial vacuum.
The Grain Riots (904–908 AF): With imperial grain distribution collapsed, three consecutive bad harvests caused famine across the central plains. House Silverblood — already the largest landowner — hoarded grain in their Vornhold silos and sold at extortionate prices. Starvation-driven riots in at least six cities. House Silverring, based in the mountains and less affected by the crop failures, sent grain caravans south to buy loyalty from the starving plains towns. This was the origin of the rivalry.
The War of Five Dukes (912–919 AF): Five Heartlands houses — Silverblood, Silverring, Beaumont, Belorn, and Argenhold — each declared themselves sovereign rulers of their territories, each claiming a variation of the old imperial title. The war was inconclusive. No house could conquer the others, but the fighting destroyed bridges, burned granaries, and killed an estimated 40,000 people.
Daven Argenhold "the Peacemaker" (919 AF): The patriarch of House Argenhold, a river lord whose territories sat at the junction between all warring parties, brokered the Treaty of Five Bridges (919 AF) — named for the five destroyed bridges he personally funded the rebuilding of as a gesture of good faith. The treaty established the Argenlord system: a ceremonial leader elected every three years by the heads of the major houses, with emergency powers in war and famine but no permanent authority. Daven Argenhold was elected the first Argenlord by unanimous vote, serving until his death in 931 AF. His diplomatic legacy became House Argenhold's defining identity — every subsequent Argenhold patriarch was raised in the tradition of mediation, neutrality, and bridge-building (literal and political). The city of Argenhold, built at the river junction, became the continent's premier trading port.
The ducal titles were adopted during this period. The houses wanted something grander than "lord" but distinct from "king" — "duke" carried echoes of imperial nobility without the pretension of a crown. The Argenlord title, with its silver prefix, reflected the region's obsession with the metal that financed everything.
House Seeder elevated during this period — Old Man Hemlock's crop rotation innovation during the famines earned his family lands and a minor title. Within two generations, they controlled the largest granary network in the plains.
Sangrea (903–950):
The Sunstone Wars, which had been suppressed (but never eliminated) during imperial rule, immediately resumed. House Solé and House Terrarossa, both freed from imperial oversight, began fighting over the sunstone deposits, river crossings, and coastal ports that defined Sangrean wealth.
The First Post-Imperial Sunstone War (906–914 AF): House Solé, controlling the coastal wealth and port access, attempted to blockade Terrarossa's inland estates. Terrarossa responded with cavalry raids on Solé caravans. Eight years of intermittent fighting with no clear victor.
The Sangrean houses adopted the viceroy model — each major house ruling its territory as an independent lord with absolute authority, styling themselves "Lord-Patron" rather than duke or king. The title carried deliberate echoes of a merchant patron rather than a feudal ruler — wealth, not blood, was the basis of authority. Minor houses (Botano, Carvallo, Fuente) aligned as vassals to one pole or the other.
The Festival of the Red Grape (c. 920 AF): House Solé instituted this annual festival in Castesol — ostensibly a harvest celebration, functionally a display of wealth and power designed to attract vassal loyalty. Musicians, acrobats, bullfights, and a public feast lasting seven days. The festival survives to 1308 AF and has become Sangrea's most famous cultural event.
Rosland (903–950):
The democratic tradition, which had survived underground during 900 years of imperial occupation — preserved in the cohort system, in fire-songs, in quiet oaths sworn on the old stones of Aethel's plaza — re-emerged rapidly.
The Restoration Assembly (905 AF): Veterans, guild masters, and surviving minor nobles met in Aethel's plaza and formally declared the restoration of the republic. The Iron Codex — a written constitution modeled on the old stratocratic principles but expanded to include guild representation — was drafted over six months of heated debate. Key provisions: the High Baron (renamed from "First Citizen" to reflect the feudal reality) would be elected for 10-year terms; noble families and guilds of wealth and renown would each cast votes; the High Baron could be recalled by a two-thirds supermajority.
First High Baron: Aethric Daurn IV (905–915 AF) — descendant of the original Aethric Daurn who negotiated the Pact of Iron with Nion I. His election was largely symbolic — binding the new republic to its pre-imperial roots. He spent his decade rebuilding the western mountain passes and establishing the Frostguard patrol in the Daudrwood.
House Greenhand did not yet exist as a major dynasty. The family that would become the Greenhands were yeoman farmers in the central valleys — the "Greens" — who earned their reputation over the following centuries through agricultural innovation and civic reform.
The Horns (903–950):
Reverted to port-city competition almost immediately. The four power centers — three port cities (Westhorn, Brinehold, Nightspike) and the forest gate city (Skogrim) — each fell under the control of different factions.
House Garrun retained Westhorn, having been the imperial governors and having the deepest roots. They transitioned smoothly from imperial servants to independent port lords.
Brinehold: Fell to the Merchant-Captains' Council, a collective of trading families who governed by commercial consensus. No single house dominated. The strongest family was House Dalgaard, salt merchants who had operated since before the empire.
Nightspike: After the Kest extermination during the conquest, the city had been governed by imperial appointees. With the empire gone, a shipwright family named House Veldren seized control — descended from the laborers Nion I had reassigned to his naval yards, they had accumulated enough skill and wealth to claim the city their ancestors had been enslaved to build.
Skogrim (the forest city): Controlled by a Lovist order called the Lampkeepers — originally lighthouse wardens who expanded inland, maintaining way-stations and signal fires through the dense forest connecting the Horns to the mainland. The Lampkeepers were technically a religious order, but in practice they were a merchant-military guild that charged tolls for safe passage through the forest. Brother Erland, the first Lampkeeper Prior, established Skogrim's neutrality as a toll city — no house could claim it, but all houses needed it. The arrangement held.
The Pilot Wars (920–935 AF): Westhorn and Brinehold fought over control of the shallow coastal straits that connected the Horns to the open sea. Whoever controlled the pilots — the specialist sailors who guided ships through the treacherous channels — controlled maritime commerce. Fifteen years of raids, blockades, and assassinations. Ended with the Pilots' Charter (935 AF) — an independent Pilots' Guild operating from a neutral island between the two ports, answerable to neither but serving both for standardized fees.
Vallan (903–950):
Smallest region, least affected by the collapse. The valley cantons had always been semi-autonomous under the empire, and the removal of imperial authority changed almost nothing about daily life.
House Valenne — a family that claimed descent from the pre-imperial valley wardens — was elected Valley-King by the canton elders in 908 AF. The title was deliberately humble ("Valley-King" rather than "King") and the power was deliberately limited: the Valley-King arbitrated disputes, maintained the roads, and represented Vallan to outsiders. Internal governance remained with the individual cantons.
The Waystone Renewal (910–930 AF): House Valenne's first major act — rebuilding and standardizing the waystone markers and road-inns that served travelers passing through Vallan's mountain passes. Every inn was required to offer food, shelter, and medical aid to any traveler regardless of origin, funded by a small road-tax. This policy made Vallan the safest travel corridor on the continent within a generation, and the road-tax revenue became the Valley-King's primary income.
The Red Coast (903–950):
The most violent transition. Without imperial garrisons to maintain order, the oasis cities immediately turned on each other in a series of water wars.
The Qanat Wars (905–925 AF): Twenty years of intermittent conflict over the underground aqueduct systems that were the only source of water in the deep desert. Houses sabotaged each other's qanats, diverting water, poisoning wells, collapsing tunnels. Thousands died of thirst rather than combat.
The Red Crown: Established in approximately 930 AF when House Cenizar — a coastal family that controlled the largest natural harbor and the most reliable freshwater spring on the coast — brokered a water-sharing agreement among the surviving oasis houses. The agreement gave Cenizar arbitration authority over water disputes, and the copper crown they wore at the signing ceremony became the symbol of that authority. The Red Crown was never a true monarchy — it was a water-court, a judicial role that expanded over centuries into broader governance. But it was always, at its root, about who controlled the water.
House Alsiroth — lords of the inland gate-city Alsiroth's Gate — resisted the Red Crown from the beginning. Their city sat at the junction of the major caravan routes and had its own deep wells, making them less dependent on the qanat system. The rivalry between Cenizar (coast) and Alsiroth (interior) became the Red Coast's defining political tension.
The Teeth (903–950):
The four islands — Northwind, Emberstone, Verwhisper, Shadowtide — had always been distinct cultures united only by the Great Bridge. With imperial authority gone, each island reverted to independent governance.
Northwind: Fell under the control of fishing and maritime families. House Stormglass — a clan of navigators who had served as imperial naval scouts — claimed the island and governed from the clifftop fortress of Galehold.
Emberstone: The volcanic island's quarry-slave population, freed by Nion XIII's edict (and actually freed, unlike most provinces, because the island's small size made enforcement possible), reorganized under a workers' council. Within two generations, the council had been captured by a family of former overseers — House Pyrmont — who ran the volcanic stone quarries with only marginally better conditions than the imperial slavers.
Verwhisper: The forested island, rich in timber and fertile soil, became a haven for Lovist monasteries. House Verdane — a family of timber merchants — governed in partnership with the Order of the Green Thorn, an Ashanite sub-order dedicated to forest conservation. The island became the most religiously devout of the four.
Shadowtide: The jungle island remained ungovernable. Dense tropical forest, hostile wildlife, and a population of fishermen and foragers who refused to submit to any centralized authority. Various families claimed lordship; none could enforce it. By 1308 AF, Shadowtide is still functionally anarchic.
The Bridge Keepers: After House Fenn's extermination in the Bridge-Throat Massacre, maintenance of the Great Bridge had fallen to imperial engineers. With the empire gone, a consortium of island families — one representative from each island — formed the Bridge Council to maintain and toll the span. This arrangement lasted until Morvayn's coup in 1298 AF.
The Frozen South (903–950):
Barely noticed the empire's fall. The southern clans had been nominally tributary but practically independent throughout imperial history. The removal of the imperial flag changed nothing about daily life in the fjords.
Clan Aurax was already the dominant force — controlling the richest gold deposits in the Kjölfoss Mountains and the largest fleet of longships. The Winter-Moot system (annual gathering of clan chiefs to settle disputes and coordinate defense) continued uninterrupted.
Clan Daudrguard held the deep forests of the interior. Clan Raudbjorn controlled the coastal settlements and the fishing grounds. Clan Eldblod occupied the geothermally heated valleys of the Heitdalr. Smaller clans — at least a dozen — occupied the spaces between, paying deference to whichever major clan controlled their water or pasture.
Clan Hroth — a mountain clan that had feuded with Clan Aurax for generations — was destroyed during a winter famine circa 940 AF. Aurax refused to share grain stores. Hroth starved. The survivors were absorbed into Aurax, and the Hroth name was erased from the fire-songs — the southern equivalent of damnatio memoriae.
Xaria (903–950):
Nothing changed. The Ix'Atani Dominion's colonial administration had never been meaningfully disrupted by the empire, and its removal was irrelevant. The Xarian governor continued to administer the peninsula from the capital on the eastern coast, paying tribute to the Dominion across the sea and ignoring mainland politics entirely.
House Ix'za — the River Kings — continued to control the delta trade and the floating capital of the peninsula's interior. The temple-cities continued the Great Exchange. The jungle continued to be impenetrable.
The Church (903–950):
The Council of Three — now the only continental institution with cross-regional legitimacy — moved rapidly to fill the imperial vacuum.
The Great Dispersal (903–930 AF): Using the enormous endowment from Nion XIII, the three major orders funded the creation of dozens of new sub-orders across the continent. Each order was given a specific mandate — healing, education, road maintenance, criminal justice, agricultural improvement, funeral rites — and a territorial assignment. The money flowed outward from Faithir like blood from a heart, and everywhere it reached, Lovist institutions appeared: hospitals, schools, courts, hostels, granaries.
First named sub-orders founded during the Dispersal:
Brothers of the Open Road (Alonite): Road maintenance and pilgrim escort. Mandate: keep the imperial roads functional. Funded by donations and road-tolls. Members took vows of service and poverty. Recognizable by their grey cloaks and iron walking staffs. Within 50 years, the Brothers maintained more road-miles than the empire had at its peak.
Sisters of the Veil (Ashanite): Cloistered women devoted to contemplation, prophecy, and the care of orphans. Founded in a convent on Nionia — the same convent where, four centuries later, Jous Lorethian would be born. Members took vows of silence and seclusion, never interacting with men. They were said to "see the thread of a soul" — whether this was genuine mystical ability, trained psychological intuition, or simply the reputation that accrued to women who spent decades in meditative silence is debated. The order was small, secretive, and deeply respected.
Order of Alon's Silence / The Wandering Mutes (Alonite): Itinerant healers and laborers who took a vow of silence in emulation of the mute prophet Alon. They traveled from village to village, fixing roofs, treating wounds, digging wells, and moving on without speaking a word. Paid nothing, asked nothing, refused nothing. Possibly the most beloved order among the common people across every region. By 1308 AF, roughly 200 active members continent-wide.
The Blind Daughters of Aya (Ayanite): Women who blinded themselves voluntarily as a devotional act, believing that physical sight obscured spiritual truth. They served as oracles, counselors, and arbiters of disputes in communities that lacked formal courts. Controversial — the self-blinding was condemned by some Ayanite theologians as self-harm, defended by others as the ultimate act of faith. The order was small and concentrated primarily in the Heartlands and Sangrea.
Order of the Harvest Bell (Ashanite): Agricultural order focused on crop improvement, seed banking, and famine relief. Operated granary-monasteries across the Heartlands and Sangrea. Their bell — rung at dawn and dusk — became a standard feature of rural life. Close relationship with House Seeder.
The Bonekeepers (Ashanite): Specialists in funeral rites, grief counseling, and the maintenance of ossuaries. In a world where plague and famine killed regularly, the Bonekeepers provided the essential service of dignified death. They maintained charnel houses, recorded the names of the dead, and performed the Rite of Rejoining — the Lovist funeral ceremony.
The Lampkeepers (Alonite): Originally lighthouse wardens in the Horns, expanded into a broader road-safety order maintaining signal fires, way-stations, and navigation aids along dangerous routes. Became the de facto rulers of Skogrim in the Horns.
Isle of Knowledge (903–950):
The Magos order, granted autonomy by Aurelian II, was the only imperial institution to survive the collapse fully intact. The Isle's neutrality — guaranteed by the fact that everyone needed the Magos' archival and arbitration services — held.
Elder Magos Kael (served c. 890–932 AF): Oversaw the transition from imperial administration to independent operation. Issued the Charter of the Pale Reed — the Isle's founding document as a sovereign micro-polity, guaranteeing neutrality, open access to all scholars regardless of origin, and the right of sanctuary.
The Magos began the Great Catalogue — a systematic inventory of all surviving imperial documents, provincial records, and oral traditions. The project would take two centuries and produce the most comprehensive historical archive on the continent.
Secret vaults of lost technology from the Age of History were consolidated — some on the Isle itself, some in a hidden vault on one of the Teeth islands (Emberstone, beneath the volcanic stone quarries). Only the Elder Magos and a small circle of senior archivists knew the vaults existed.

PERIOD II: THE AGE OF ORDERS (950 – 1050 AF)
The second century of the Age of Faith was defined by the explosive proliferation of Lovist religious orders and the gradual stabilization of regional governments.
The Church (950–1050):
Nion XIII's endowment was so vast that it took over a century to fully distribute. By 1050 AF, the number of distinct Lovist orders operating across the continent exceeded three hundred. Some were large (the Brothers of the Open Road had thousands of members), others were tiny (the Blind Daughters of Aya never exceeded fifty). Some were devoted to charitable service, others to scholarship, others to military protection, and a growing number to increasingly esoteric interpretations of the faith.


Major new orders founded during this period:


Sons of Loreth (Alonite/martial): A knightly order devoted to the defense of the faith and the protection of pilgrims. Founded circa 970 AF by a Heartlands knight named Ser Brannoc of Vornhold who organized a company of veterans to escort a pilgrim caravan to Faithir through bandit-infested roads. The mission's success inspired formal organization. By 1308 AF, the Sons of Loreth are the most powerful martial order on the continent — landed, wealthy, and politically influential. Braven Lorethson, one of the story's protagonists, is a member.
Order of the Copper Bowl (Ashanite): Alchemical healers operating primarily on the Red Coast. Specialized in mineral-based medicines derived from the region's copper deposits. Their signature: a small copper bowl used to mix tinctures, carried on a chain around the neck. Controversial for their willingness to use substances that bordered on intoxicants — Frostpetal derivatives, Dreambud infusions — as pain management.
The Chain-Breakers (Alonite): Anti-slavery order operating on the Xarian frontier and in coastal cities where the slave trade persisted. Small, militant, frequently in conflict with Xarian temple authorities and mainland merchants who profited from the trade. Named for their practice of literally breaking the chains of enslaved people they encountered, which made them heroes to abolitionists and criminals to slavers.
Order of the Quill (Ayanite): Education order operating schools in every major city. Taught literacy, basic arithmetic, and Lovist catechism. Their curriculum was standardized across the continent — a child taught by the Quill in Rosland could read the same texts as a child taught in Sangrea. This standardization, more than any other single factor, maintained Munnish as the continental lingua franca after the empire fell.
The Crimson Penitents (no specific order affiliation): Self-flagellating pilgrims who walked barefoot between holy sites, scourging themselves to atone for sins — their own and the world's. Tolerated but not endorsed by the Council of Three. Common in Sangrea and the Heartlands. Disturbing to watch. Effective at attracting donations from guilty nobles.
Order of the Still Water (Ashanite): Contemplative monasteries in remote locations — mountaintops, islands, deep forests. Monks devoted to silence, meditation, and the copying of manuscripts. Produced some of the finest illuminated texts on the continent. Their monastery on a small island off the Vallan coast — the Quiethouse — became a renowned retreat for scholars and exhausted rulers.
Order of St. Maren (Alonite): Named after Maren of the Broken Cup — the Roslandic servant who assassinated Nion V. A small, fierce order of women warriors based in Rosland, devoted to the protection of abused women and children. Condemned by the Council of Three as "glorifying regicide" but tolerated because their charitable work was genuinely needed. Popular in Rosland, despised in the Heartlands.
The Ember Watch (Alonite): The remnant of the beast-hunting orders. Originally formed to exterminate dangerous mythical creatures that threatened settlements. By 1050 AF, most of the great beasts were gone, and the Ember Watch had shrunk from a major military order to a few hundred eccentric specialists who tracked rumored creatures, investigated livestock kills, and were hired by nervous villagers to check dark caves and abandoned ruins. By 1308 AF, they are a shadow — maybe forty active members, seen as oddities or curiosities.
The Venic Path (heretical/mystical): Not an order but a movement — mystics who believed that divine truth could be accessed through altered consciousness (meditation, fasting, plant intoxicants, sensory deprivation). Named after Brother Venic, a Sangrean monk who claimed to have achieved direct communion with Loreth through a seven-day fast in a sealed cave. The Council of Three declared the Venic Path heretical in 1023 AF, but the movement persisted underground, particularly among artists, poets, and the rural poor who couldn't afford formal religious participation.
The Schism of the Lesser Life (c. 980–1010 AF): The great doctrinal crisis. Debate: do non-human creatures bear divine echoes? If animals carry sparks of divinity, then hunting them is a form of murder. If they don't, then the entire Alonite beast-hunting enterprise is justified, and the Ashanite reverence for all life is sentimental overreach.


The Conclave of Castesol (998 AF): Called after a flock of direwolves devastated Sangrean vineyards and the local Ashanite prior refused to sanction a hunt, insisting the wolves be "shepherded" to less populated territory. The wolves killed twelve villagers while the Ashanites tried to relocate them.
The Beast-Pardoners: A fringe Ashanite faction that refused any killing of any creature. Declared schismatic after a harpy flock they attempted to "protect" slaughtered an entire fishing village on the Horns coast. Their leader, Sister Galena, was excommunicated and died in exile on the Venic Path.
Resolution: The Doctrine of Measured Culling (1010 AF): Compromise. Non-human life bears lesser echoes — worthy of respect but not equal to human life. Sanctioned hunts for public safety permitted with proof of threat. Unsanctioned "trophy" kills forbidden. Alonite beast-hunters required to perform a Rite of Acknowledgment before each kill. The compromise satisfied no one fully but held.
The Logosian Crisis (c. 1020–1040 AF): An intellectual heresy emerging from within the Ayanite order. The Logosians — named for their insistence that logos (reason) was the only valid path to truth — argued that the gods were dead, that the "echoes" were psychological phenomena rather than divine residue, and that Loveism's value was purely ethical, not metaphysical. In short: keep the morality, discard the theology.


Father Thesan of Silvermont — the movement's founder, an Ayanite scholar who published The Cogitant Letters, a series of arguments dismantling traditional Lovist theology using Lovist ethical reasoning. The work was brilliant, devastating, and immediately banned.
The Council of Three's response (1035 AF): Formal condemnation. Father Thesan excommunicated. His followers — several hundred scholars and students across the Heartlands — expelled from Ayanite institutions. Many fled to the Isle of Knowledge, where the Magos offered sanctuary under the Charter of the Pale Reed (which guaranteed neutrality regardless of theological status). The Logosian tradition survived in the Magos archives, where it influenced secular scholarship for centuries.
The Purge of the Concordant (1038 AF): The Ayanite order conducted an internal purge — removing any scholar suspected of Logosian sympathies from teaching positions. Approximately 200 scholars dismissed. Some joined the Magos. Some recanted. A handful were imprisoned. The Purge created a lasting rift between the Ayanite order and the Isle of Knowledge, which the Ayanites accused of harboring heretics.
The Heartlands (950–1050):
The Argenlord system stabilized. House Argenhold's diplomatic tradition, established by Daven the Peacemaker, became the baseline — the Argenlord was expected to be a mediator, not a ruler. The title alternated between Silverblood and Silverring candidates, with occasional compromise elections of candidates from minor houses (Beaumont, Belorn) when the two silver dynasties deadlocked.
The Silver Covenant (c. 960 AF): A formal partnership between House Silverblood and House Silverring — dividing the Heartlands into spheres of influence (plains and agriculture for Silverblood, mountains and mining for Silverring) and agreeing to alternate the Argenlord title between them. The Covenant held for roughly 200 years and was the foundation of Heartlands stability. Its collapse would become the Argent Schism.
House Lockmere consolidated control of the western passes — their family had been pass-keepers since the imperial era, and the removal of imperial authority simply formalized what was already true.
Stonebridge — the site of the Marvoss betrayal during the conquest — became a market town and pilgrimage site. The bridge itself, still bearing the name of the extinguished house, was maintained by the Brothers of the Open Road. Travelers crossing it often left small offerings — a habit rooted in guilt rather than piety.
Rosland (950–1050):
The republic stabilized under a succession of competent High Barons drawn from the veteran families — Daurn, Riverblade, and a rising house called Greenhand (originally yeoman farmers from the central valleys who earned their reputation through agricultural reform and civic engagement).
High Baron Tomas Greenhand (c. 990–1000 AF): First Greenhand to hold the office. A farmer's son who rose through guild politics and was elected on a platform of land reform and expanded voting rights. His decade in office established the guild vote — giving formal political representation to artisan and trade guilds for the first time. The innovation was controversial (nobles argued it diluted their authority) but popular (the guilds represented the majority of the productive population). The guild vote survived and became a defining feature of Roslandic democracy.
House Ironside did not yet exist as a major power. The family that would become the Ironsides were mining foremen in the Fyrhold mountains — hard, disciplined men who ran their mines like military operations. Their rise would come later.
Sangrea (950–1050):
The Sunstone Wars continued their cyclical pattern — roughly one major conflict per generation, with skirmishes and proxy fights in between. Historians (and the Magos) counted at least four distinct Sunstone Wars during this century, though the boundaries between wars, truces, and armed standoffs were blurry.
The Second Post-Imperial Sunstone War (c. 965–972 AF): Triggered by the discovery of a new sunstone deposit in the disputed borderlands between Solé and Terrarossa territories. Seven years of fighting. Ended with The Feast of Mirrors (972 AF) — a peace banquet hosted by House Solé in Castesol at which both houses agreed to joint exploitation of the deposit. The feast got its name from the reflective sunstone panels that lined the banquet hall. Three years later, Terrarossa accused Solé of underreporting yields. The joint exploitation collapsed. The deposit was fought over for another century.
House Botano consolidated control of the Selvaverde jungle province during this period — the matriarchal dynasty that governed through botanical knowledge and control of the jungle's medicinal resources. Their vassal house, Carvallo, established the messenger-parrot network that gave Botano a communications advantage no other Sangrean house could match.
The Red Coast (950–1050):
The Red Crown system, under House Cenizar, gradually expanded from water arbitration to broader governance. Cenizar established the Copper Courts — traveling judges who circulated between oasis cities, settling disputes and enforcing the water-sharing agreements. The judges wore copper circlets and carried copper rods of office. Their authority was respected because everyone understood that without the water agreements, the desert would kill them all.
House Khorim — lords of the volcanic Qasr Ash'khor — rose to prominence during this period. Their territory included failing obsidian mines that still produced enough volcanic glass for a lucrative weapons trade. Khorim obsidian blades were prized across the continent — sharper than steel, though more brittle.
House Rukh and House Ramad — two houses on the volcanic peninsula — fought a bitter feud over geothermal resources (hot springs used for bathing, healing, and mineral extraction). The feud lasted four generations and was settled only when both houses nearly bankrupted themselves. The Truce of Ash (c. 1020 AF) divided the peninsula's resources and established shared access to the largest hot springs.
The Teeth (950–1050):
The four-island system stabilized. The Bridge Council managed the Great Bridge, collecting tolls and funding maintenance. Each island developed its own economy and culture.
Emberstone's Secret: The Magos' hidden vault of lost technology, buried in the volcanic quarries beneath the island, remained unknown to the island's rulers. A single Magos agent — disguised as a quarry inspector — maintained the vault. The position was hereditary within a small circle of Magos families, passed from father to son or mother to daughter without the Elder Magos' direct involvement (a dangerous independence that would later become a vulnerability).
The Frozen South (950–1050):
Clan Aurax continued to dominate through gold wealth. The Winter-Moot system functioned as the region's only cross-clan institution.
The Ice-Road Wars (c. 980–990 AF): Clan Raudbjorn attempted to establish a winter trade route across the frozen interior, bypassing Aurax-controlled mountain passes. Aurax responded by raiding the caravans. Ten years of seasonal skirmishing — fighting in winter on frozen rivers, retreating in summer when the ice melted. Ended inconclusively. The ice roads were abandoned as impractical.
No contact with the mainland beyond occasional fishing encounters with Roslandic coastal villages.

PERIOD III: THE CENTURY OF BLOOD AND CONSOLIDATION (1050 – 1150 AF)
Every region had its defining conflict during this century. The political systems that had been improvised in the first 150 years were now tested, and the ones that survived were the ones that held at 1308 AF.
Nionia (1050–1150):
The Senate functioned. Nionia experienced a genuine golden age — maritime trade boomed, the quarries produced high-quality marble for export, and the island's merchant fleet became the largest on the continent.
The Trade War of the Inner Sea (c. 1070–1085 AF): Nionia vs. the Horns over control of the sea lanes. Not a shooting war but an economic one — blockades, tariff manipulation, piracy, and espionage. Ended with the Accord of Three Tides (1085 AF), which established free navigation for all parties but gave Nionia preferential docking rights in Horns ports. The Horns resented the arrangement. It held because Nionia's navy was bigger.
Domus Navarrus emerged as the island's dominant naval house during this period, eclipsing Domus Torr (which had been declining since Admiral Torr's death in 889 AF). Navarrus controlled Port Severan, the empire's former naval headquarters, and maintained the largest fleet.
The Heartlands (1050–1150):
The Silver Covenant held. The Argenlord title continued to alternate between Silverblood and Silverring. The region's major crisis was economic, not military.
The Blight of 1087: A grain fungus devastated the Silver Plains for three consecutive harvests. Famine across the Heartlands. The Argenlord (a Silverblood) invoked emergency powers and commandeered grain from Silverring mountain stores. Silverring complied but resented it — the incident planted the seed of suspicion that the Argenlord's emergency powers could be used as a weapon by whichever house held the title. First visible crack in the Covenant.
House Belorn declined during this period — poor management, a succession of incompetent heirs, and the loss of their primary trade route to House Argenhold's river network. By 1150 AF, Belorn was a minor house, its name more prestigious than its resources.
Rosland (1050–1150):
The Ironside Rebellion (c. 1090–1095 AF): The mining foremen of Fyrhold, led by a man named Kael Ironside — a former soldier turned mine owner — attempted to secede from the republic, declaring the mountain provinces an independent state. Their grievance: the republic taxed their mineral wealth to fund agricultural projects in the lowlands, but provided no roads, no schools, and no courts in the mountains. The rebellion was put down by the republic's combined militia, but the settlement gave the Fyrhold miners guild representation and established House Ironside as a recognized noble family with a seat at the election table. Kael Ironside was pardoned, granted formal lordship of Fyrhold, and spent the rest of his life building the fortress-city of Forgetown from the profits of his iron mines.
This was Rosland's "big war" — not a full civil war but a regional uprising that reshaped the political balance. From this point forward, House Ironside was a permanent faction in Roslandic politics, representing the mountain mining interests against the lowland agricultural interests championed by the Greenhands.
Sangrea (1050–1150):
The Great Sunstone War (c. 1100–1118 AF): The largest and most destructive Sunstone War. Triggered by the assassination of a Solé heir at a Terrarossa-hosted tournament — possibly a genuine accident (jousting lance through the throat), possibly arranged. Eighteen years of open warfare across the entire region. Every minor house forced to choose a side. The Campaneros (bellringers of Sangrea's villages) used their bell networks as a military alert system — the Riverbell Alarm — coordinating troop movements across distances that horseback messengers couldn't cover.
The Butcher of Fuentarossa (c. 1108 AF): A Terrarossa general named Don Alvaro Sangreverde — nicknamed "the Butcher" — sacked the town of Fuentarossa, which had declared for Solé. He hung the town's entire male population from the bridge over the Fuente River — reportedly 800 men and boys. The bridge collapsed under the weight. The town's women and children were expelled into the countryside. Fuentarossa was rebuilt a generation later, but the name Sangreverde became synonymous with atrocity in Sangrean culture.
The Peace of the Broken Chalice (1118 AF): Brokered by the Council of Three, who threatened to excommunicate both houses if they didn't stop. The peace was sealed by a ceremonial breaking of a golden chalice — each house kept one half, symbolizing their incomplete unity. The peace held. Barely.
The Horns (1050–1150):
The Nightspike Fire (c. 1075 AF): Nightspike's dockyards burned — either an accident (tar-vat ignition) or arson by Brinehold agents. The fire destroyed 40% of the city's shipbuilding capacity and killed roughly 2,000 people. House Veldren accused Brinehold. Brinehold denied involvement. A brief naval skirmish in the straits ended in stalemate. The fire was never conclusively attributed, but it permanently weakened Nightspike's position relative to the other port cities.
House Garrun of Westhorn used the opportunity to position itself as the Horns' premier port — offering shelter and contracts to displaced Nightspike shipwrights. By 1150 AF, Westhorn was the largest and wealthiest of the three ports.
The Red Coast (1050–1150):
The Madness of King Alsiroth (c. 1080–1110 AF): The lord of Alsiroth's Gate — Lord Yusef Alsiroth III — descended into genuine madness over a 30-year reign. He ordered the construction of increasingly bizarre monuments: a tower of copper mirrors designed to "blind the sun," a canal project intended to bring seawater to the desert interior (which would have salted every farm in its path), and a palace extension built entirely of human bone (sourced from ossuaries, not fresh kills — though the Bonekeepers were furious). His court magician, a self-styled alchemist named Qadir the Dry, encouraged the king's delusions and used the distraction to embezzle enormous sums.
House Sadiq — the merchant dynasty controlling the Grand Souk — used this period to quietly acquire commercial control of the city. Merchant-Prince Rashid Sadiq (grandfather of the current Omar Sadiq) purchased land, warehouses, and trade contracts from the bankrupt Alsiroth treasury, gradually becoming the city's true economic power. The strategy continues to 1308 AF: the Sadiqs fund the mad king's projects (his descendants inherited the tendency toward eccentricity if not outright madness), knowing each project brings the Alsiroth house closer to bankruptcy and the Sadiq family closer to power.
Vallan (1050–1150):
The Annexation Crisis (c. 1120 AF): The Heartlands Argenlord — a Silverblood — proposed that Vallan be incorporated into the Heartlands as a vassal duchy, arguing that the tiny region couldn't sustain itself independently and that its road network was essential to continental trade. Valley-King Aldric Valenne II rejected the proposal, closed the mountain passes, and threatened to destroy the roads rather than surrender sovereignty. The Heartlands backed down — the cost of losing the Vallan road network exceeded the value of annexation. Vallan remained independent. The incident cemented Vallan's fierce independence as a national identity.
The Teeth (1050–1150):
The Bridge Tax Riots (c. 1100 AF): The Bridge Council tripled tolls to fund earthquake damage repairs to the central span. Merchants from all four islands rioted. House Pyrmont of Emberstone attempted to seize the bridge's northern approach, claiming "custodial authority." The other three islands formed a temporary alliance to block the grab. The crisis was resolved by the Magos, who mediated a new toll structure and quietly ensured the Emberstone vault remained undiscovered during the chaos.
The Frozen South (1050–1150):
The First Gold War (c. 1070–1080 AF): Clan Raudbjorn attempted to seize Aurax's primary gold mine — the Kjölfoss Deeps. Ten years of raiding and counter-raiding in the mountains. Aurax won through attrition and harsh weather. Raudbjorn was forced to pay tribute in whale-oil and seal-fur for a generation. The defeat created a permanent grudge.
The Church (1050–1150):
The Council of Three reached peak institutional authority during this century. The Peace of the Broken Chalice in Sangrea demonstrated that the Council could force secular rulers to the table. The Council began deploying Arbiters — senior clergy empowered to mediate disputes between houses, with the implied threat of excommunication for non-compliance.
The Crusade of the Skogrim Corridor (c. 1060–1075 AF): The first and only "Crusade of Relief." The forest road through Skogrim (the Horns gate city) had become impassable due to a combination of Grave-Stag herds (massive, aggressive cervids with bone-plated skulls) and harpy rookeries nesting in the canopy. Trade between the Horns and the mainland was strangled. The Alonite order organized a combined military-charitable expedition: Ember Watch beast-hunters to clear the fauna, Brothers of the Open Road to rebuild the path, Ashanite healers to treat the wounded. The Lampkeepers of Skogrim provided guides and tolled the cleared route. The campaign took 15 years but succeeded — the corridor was reopened, and the Horns' economic connection to the mainland was restored. It was the Ember Watch's finest hour and effectively their last major operation.

PERIOD IV: THE GOLDEN CENTURY (1150 – 1250 AF)
A century of relative peace, cultural flourishing, and the beginning of the Church's overreach.
Continental trends:
Trade flowed freely. The roads — maintained by the Brothers of the Open Road, funded by regional tolls and Lovist tithes — were safer than they had been since the imperial peak. A merchant could travel from Vornhold to Fairhaven in two weeks with reasonable expectation of arriving alive and unrobbed.
Regional identities crystallized. Each region developed distinct architectural styles, culinary traditions, musical forms, and fashion. The Heartlands became known for silver-threaded formal wear. Sangrea for bright colors and elaborate embroidery. Rosland for practical wool and leather. The Horns for oiled canvas and sailor's knots worn as jewelry. The Red Coast for copper ornament on everything.
Literacy expanded dramatically thanks to the Order of the Quill. By 1250 AF, approximately 30% of the urban population could read (compared to perhaps 5% at the empire's fall). Rural literacy remained low (~5%) but the Quill schools were slowly expanding.
The Road Culture matured. Inns, way-stations, pilgrim hostels, and market towns along major routes developed a shared culture of hospitality and mutual aid. Attacking a caravan or robbing a traveler was not just criminal but sacrilegious — a violation of the Lovist principle that roads were sacred arteries of the community. Regional governments took road safety as a point of pride. A duchy with dangerous roads was a duchy with a failing lord.
Population growth. The continent's population, which had declined sharply during the Shattering and the Century of Blood, recovered and then exceeded its imperial peak. New towns were founded. Forests were cleared for farmland. The wild places shrank.
The Church's Turn:
With the great beasts mostly gone, the roads safe, and the hospitals funded, the Church's original charitable mandate was largely accomplished. Success created a problem: what does a massive, wealthy, continent-spanning institution do when the crisis that justified its existence is over?
The answer was institutional expansion — the Council of Three began asserting authority over areas previously left to secular rulers: marriage law, inheritance disputes, commercial regulations, education standards. The justification was always theological ("all human activity is within the scope of divine concern"), but the effect was political: the Church was becoming a government.
The Indulgence Trade (c. 1180 AF onward): The Council authorized the sale of spiritual indulgences — payments that reduced the theological burden of sin. Originally intended as donations to fund construction of new cathedrals, the indulgence system quickly became a revenue machine. Wealthy nobles purchased elaborate indulgences for themselves, their families, and even their deceased ancestors. The poor, who couldn't afford indulgences, were told their poverty was itself a form of spiritual penance. The theological gymnastics required to justify this were considerable.
The Relic Markets: Bones, clothing, and personal effects attributed to saints became enormously valuable commodities. Every cathedral wanted relics; demand exceeded supply; forgery became an industry. The Magos documented at least seventeen separate "authentic" finger-bones of the prophet Alon in circulation simultaneously. The Council of Three established a certification process, which created a bureaucracy, which created opportunities for bribery, which created a certification market that was almost as corrupt as the relic market it was meant to regulate.
The Centralization Push (c. 1200–1250 AF): The Council of Three — alarmed by the hundreds of independent orders operating with minimal oversight — began attempts to consolidate authority. Orders were required to submit annual reports, accept Council-appointed auditors, and seek approval for new foundations. Many orders complied. Many resisted. The tension between the Council's desire for control and the orders' traditions of independence became the Church's defining internal conflict.
Nionia (1150–1250):
Golden age continued. The Senate functioned, trade flowed, culture flourished. Nionian marble, Nionian wine, and Nionian silk were luxury goods across the continent. The island's population peaked.
The seeds of the future crisis: wealth concentrated in fewer hands. Domus Ferronus did not yet exist — the family that would become the Ferronus were common miners in the Marchia Ferrus mountains. But the mines were being expanded, and the labor conditions were brutal.
The Heartlands (1150–1250):
Peak of the Silver Covenant. Silverblood and Silverring cooperated, alternated the Argenlord title, and the region prospered. The ducal courts became centers of art, music, and scholarship. The Vaultkeepers of Silvermont established the continent's first formal banking system — deposit accounts, letters of credit, and commercial loans.
House Argenhold continued its diplomatic tradition. The city of Argenhold became the continent's premier river port, handling goods from every region. The Bargemen's Guild became a powerful economic force.
Rosland (1150–1250):
The Greenhand Era: House Greenhand held the High Barony for three consecutive terms (~1160–1190 AF) under High Baron Aldric Greenhand "the Reformer." His administration expanded the guild vote, established public granaries, and funded the first public schools in rural areas. He was beloved by the commons and resented by the nobility. His death in office (natural causes, aged 71) triggered a contested election that House Ironside won — the first Ironside to hold the High Barony. The Ironside–Greenhand rivalry, which would define Roslandic politics for the next century, began here.

PERIOD V: THE LONG PEACE & ITS CRACKS (1250 – 1308 AF)
The last century before the story. The continent enjoyed unprecedented stability. Trade flowed. Roads were safe. Each region was proud of its identity and its institutions. But beneath the surface, tensions accumulated.
Key Events (chronological):
c. 1258 AF — The Raven's Fall (Heartlands):
House Griffinwing of Corvallis — an ancient dynasty tracing pre-imperial roots — had grown stagnant. Resources depleted. No male heir. The current head, Lord Caelan Griffinwing, was rumored to prefer men, which in the Heartlands' conservative political culture made him vulnerable to accusations of failing his dynastic duty.
House Corbeau — a merchant family from the Heartlands lowlands, funded by House Silverring — launched a swift military takeover. The assault on Griffinkeep lasted three days. Lord Caelan was captured and exiled (his current whereabouts unknown). Most of the Griffinwing household was killed or scattered.
House Corbeau installed itself as the new rulers of Corvallis. Within a decade, they improved roads, expanded trade, and invested in infrastructure — winning grudging acceptance from the common people even as the old nobility viewed them as usurpers.
The surviving Griffinwing heirs — led by Arion Griffinwing (nephew of Lord Caelan, now around 25) — waged an insurgency from the eastern hills. The insurgency was still active at 1308 AF.
The Raven's Fall was the first open act of aggression in the Argent Schism — Silverring using a puppet house to seize territory from a Silverblood-aligned province. Silverblood protested diplomatically but did not intervene militarily. The precedent was set: the cold war could turn hot.
c. 1270 AF — The Wildwoman's Bargain (Frozen South / Heartlands):
Ser Edric Corbeau — uncle of Baron Corbeau, a knight patrolling the roads through the Deadwood Valley that separated the Heartlands from the Frozen South — encountered a clanwoman of the Frozen South during a scouting mission. Her name is recorded in Corbeau family legend as Sinna (probably not her real name — southern clan names are secret). They fell in love.
Sinna returned to Clan Aurax and convinced the clan elders that trade with the mainland was advantageous. She presented the steel weapons Edric had given her as proof of what the clans could obtain. The elders agreed.
First gold-for-goods trade (c. 1272 AF): Clan Aurax began sending small gold shipments through the Deadwood Valley to House Corbeau's trading posts. In exchange: steel weapons, grain, textiles, medicines. The trade was sanctioned by Clan Aurax but secret from the other clans.
The trade enriched both parties. Corbeau's wealth increased dramatically — funding the infrastructure improvements that won them legitimacy in Corvallis. Aurax gained military advantages that made them even more dominant among the southern clans.
The Aurax Gold War (c. 1285–1290 AF): When the trade was discovered by other clans, Clan Raudbjorn and Clan Daudrguard declared war on Aurax, accusing them of betraying southern independence by dealing with mainlanders. Five years of vicious winter warfare. Aurax won — their steel weapons gave them a decisive edge over Raudbjorn's bone-and-obsidian armaments. The defeat left Raudbjorn humiliated and Daudrguard isolated. The Winter-Moot of 1291 AF confirmed Aurax's dominance but the resentment was permanent.
Roslandic scouts — sent by House Ironside to investigate the rumors of southern gold — began appearing in the Deadwood Valley around 1295 AF. House Gorban, the border wardens, reported increased activity. Nobody in the Roslandic capital cared enough to investigate. They would later regret this.
c. 1284 AF — Birth of Jous Lorethian (Nionia):
Born inside the convent of the Sisters of the Veil on Nionia — a cloistered Ashanite sub-order whose members never left and never interacted with men. His mother was a young sister named Sera (surname unknown — the order stripped family names upon entry). The circumstances of the pregnancy were never explained. The order declared it a miracle — a virgin birth, the child of Loreth himself made flesh.
The baby was raised within the convent walls for the first years of his life, treated as sacred. The Sisters' prophetic reputation — they were said to see the destiny of souls — was staked on his divinity. From infancy, Jous was told he was the son of god. He never had a reason to doubt it.
Whether Sera was genuinely a virgin or had been assaulted by an intruder, a fellow sister, or a visiting benefactor is unknown. The order's seclusion made investigation impossible. The truth died with Sera, who died in childbirth.
c. 1290 AF — The Argenhold Exile (Heartlands / Xaria):
Kaeo Argenhold, eldest son of Duke Harros Argenhold, departed Argenia under circumstances that remain unclear. He was approximately 17. The official story: he was sent to study abroad. The rumored story: a falling-out with his stepmother, Lady Marthys (née Hurth), who wanted her own son Darric to inherit. The real story: probably a combination of family politics and Kaeo's own restlessness.
Kaeo traveled south through Vallan, then east to the Teeth, then by sea to the Xarian coast. He arrived at the Ix'Atani capital and somehow obtained the patronage of the Xarian governor — a member of the Ix'Atani royal house whose relaxed style of colonial administration made him open to entertaining foreign guests, especially well-born ones with useful mainland connections.
Kaeo spent 11 years in Xaria. What he did there, who he became, what he learned — these are mysteries to everyone on the mainland. He returned only when his entire family was murdered.
c. 1298 AF — The Bridge Coup (The Teeth):
Lord Morvayn — a minor noble of Emberstone with military ambitions — assassinated Lord Borakin, the chairman of the Bridge Council, during a diplomatic dinner on the central span of the Great Bridge. The method was poison — slow-acting, mixed into wine. Borakin died over the course of the evening, his collapse initially mistaken for drunkenness. By the time anyone realized what had happened, Morvayn's men had seized the bridge's toll-gates and the two towers flanking the central span.
Morvayn declared himself Lord-Warden of the Bridge — a title he invented — and imposed new tolls that effectively gave him a stranglehold on all land trade between the northern and southern halves of the continent.
The other island lords were furious but divided. House Stormglass of Northwind wanted to retake the bridge by force. House Verdane of Verwhisper preferred negotiation. House Pyrmont of Emberstone — Morvayn's home island — was split between factions that supported and opposed him. The result was the Whispering War — a cold conflict of espionage, embargo, and assassination that was still ongoing at 1308 AF.
Critical detail: Morvayn's island, Emberstone, contained the Magos' secret vault of lost technology. Morvayn did not know about the vault. But his seizure of the bridge disrupted the Magos agent's ability to access and maintain it. The Elder Magos, for the first time in centuries, was genuinely worried.
c. 1301 AF — Vlado Ironside elected High Baron (Rosland):
Vlado Ironside — head of House Ironside, lord of Fyrhold, master of the mines — won the election for High Baron through a combination of legitimate support from the military-conservative faction and backroom deals with smaller noble houses. His platform: security, order, and the "Long Vigil" — a declared state of emergency citing unspecified external threats that justified expanded executive powers.
Within two years, Vlado had suspended several provisions of the Iron Codex, packed the judiciary with allies, and begun the process of stripping the guild vote of real power. His reforms were technically legal — each one individually justified by precedent or emergency — but their cumulative effect was the slow strangulation of Roslandic democracy.
He adopted Valo — a young man of unclear parentage, possibly the orphan son of a minor noble house destroyed in a mining accident — as his heir. Vlado was believed to be infertile. Valo was groomed as his successor: educated, trained, presented to the public as the next generation of Ironside rule. The adoption was widely seen as Vlado's attempt to found a dynasty — to turn the elected High Barony into a hereditary position by ensuring his chosen successor won the next election.
His current term ended in 1311 AF. Three years away at the story's start.
c. 1304–1306 AF — The Nionian Civil War:
The Democratic Regency of Nionia had functioned for 400 years, but by the 1300s, the Senate was as corrupt as the one Nion I had burned. Domus Marcellus and Domus Navarrus controlled the majority of seats. Legislation served patrician interests. The common people — miners, quarry workers, sailors — were taxed heavily and represented not at all.
Ferron "the Upstart" (c. 1300 AF): A common miner in the Marchia Ferrus who discovered the richest iron vein on the island. The discovery made him fabulously wealthy overnight. He used the wealth to hire mercenaries, buy influence, and — critically — fund a young man who claimed to be the son of God.
Jous Lorethian's emergence (c. 1302 AF): Jous left the Sisters of the Veil convent at approximately 18 years old. He was strikingly charismatic, articulate, and possessed of an absolute conviction in his own divinity that was either inspiring or terrifying depending on your perspective. He was also plagued by sleep paralysis and lucid dreams that he interpreted as divine communication — visions of a purified Nionia, a world scrubbed clean of corruption and sin.
Ferron recognized Jous as a weapon — a charismatic figurehead who could unite the common people against the Senate. Whether Ferron believed in Jous's divinity is irrelevant; he believed in Jous's usefulness. He funded Jous's movement, armed his followers, and provided the military muscle.
Domus Lux — originally a minor religious militia, a local chapter of the Sons of Loreth that had gone rogue — attached themselves to Jous as his personal enforcers. Their leader, a zealot of unknown origin, declared Jous the prophesied "Vessel of Loreth" and placed his order at Jous's disposal.
The Civil War (1304–1306 AF): Two years of street fighting, naval skirmishes, and political assassination. The Senate's forces — primarily Domus Marcellus's household guards and Domus Navarrus's navy — were better equipped but less motivated. Jous's followers fought with the fervor of true believers. Key events:
The Burning of the Scriptorium (1304 AF): Jous's followers torched the Nionian branch of the Order of the Quill — the island's largest school and library — accusing the scholars of heresy. The Quill's records of Nionian republican history were destroyed. This act severed the island's connection to its own democratic past.
The Battle of Port Severan (1305 AF): Domus Navarrus's fleet attempted to blockade the capital. Ferron's mercenaries, using fire-ships funded by Ferronus iron money, broke the blockade and burned six of Navarrus's warships. Navarrus capitulated and offered its surviving fleet to Jous in exchange for survival. Jous accepted.
The White Night (1306 AF): The war's end. Domus Marcellus, the last holdout, surrendered after their patriarch was assassinated by a Domus Lux infiltrator. Jous entered the Senate chamber — the same chamber rebuilt after Nion I's Great Pyre — and declared the Republic dissolved and the Senate replaced by divine rule. He did not burn the building. He converted it into a cathedral.
The Triumvirate: Three elected magistrates who had served as the Senate's executive officers were retained by Jous — not out of respect for the institution but because they had been the ones to formally place the crown on his head, ending the bloodshed. They survived as a vestigial check on his power, a procedural echo of the republic that Jous tolerated because abolishing them entirely would have required acknowledging that the republic had ever been legitimate.
Jous renamed the capital: The ancient city, which had gone by several names over the centuries, was officially rechristened Vellium — after the marble (vellum-white) that defined its architecture. The name also carried a deliberate echo of "veil" — the Sisters of the Veil who had raised him.
The Pure Way: Jous's heretical theology. Not a new religion but a radical reinterpretation of Loveism. Key differences from orthodox Loveism:
Jous claimed to be the physical incarnation of Loreth — not metaphorically (all people carry divine echoes) but literally (he was Loreth made flesh, born of a virgin through divine will).
The Pure Way emphasized purity, order, and obedience over the orthodox Lovist values of compassion, service, and intellectual inquiry. Sin was not a failure of love but a failure of discipline. Redemption came not through acts of charity but through submission to divine authority — which meant submission to Jous.
The Council of Three was declared corrupt and illegitimate. The Pure Way recognized no clerical authority above Jous himself. The three orders (Ayanite, Ashanite, Alonite) were collapsed into a single hierarchy under Jous's personal priests.
The Inquisitors of the Pure Way — white-cloaked enforcers drawn from Domus Lux — replaced the traditional Lovist clergy on Nionia. They enforced doctrinal compliance through surveillance, denunciation, and public punishment.
By 1308 AF: Jous had consolidated control of Nionia. He was 24 years old, ruler of the island, and planning the conquest of the mainland. The continent had not yet realized how dangerous he was.
c. 1307 AF — The Feast of Poison (Heartlands):
Duke Harros Argenhold — aging, weakened by drink — hosted the coronation feast for his son Darric at the castle of Argenhold. Every major figure in Argenian politics attended. By midnight, every guest was dead.
Victims: Darric Argenhold (the heir), Lady Marthys Argenhold (Kaeo's stepmother), Duke Harros himself, Lord Rynald Hurth, Ser Tovan Valenti, Lady Aevra Bargemont, Lord Pelrin Redmarsh, Father Jorn of the Ayanite Concord, plus dozens of lesser nobles and servants.
The poisoner: Unknown. Suspects include House Silverblood (seizing the opportunity to install a regency), Jous Lorethian's agents (destabilizing the Heartlands ahead of invasion), Lady Marthys's own enemies (she had many), and House Valenti (whose leader Damon was conspicuously absent from the feast).
House Silverblood moved immediately — Lord Athelric Silverblood declared a regency over Argenia "until a proper heir can be installed." A bird was sent to Kaeo in Xaria.
Kaeo's return: Kaeo departed Xaria with gifts from the governor, a household of Xarian-trained servants, and the reputation of a man who had spent 11 years inside a foreign empire's colonial apparatus. He traveled by land caravan through the jungle, north through Vallan, and into the Heartlands. He arrived in Argenia in 1308 AF — the year the story begins.
1308 AF — The Giants Arrive:
Three ships. That's all that survived the crossing from the volcanic subcontinent deep to the south of Mundus, past the most dangerous seas on the planet. A fleet of (unknown number — possibly dozens) had departed. Only three made landfall.
Ship One: Landed on the coast of the Frozen South. First contact with Clan Raudbjorn territory.
Ship Two: Landed on the Red Coast. First contact with the copper settlements.
Ship Three: Landed behind the Silver Mountains in the southern Heartlands, where the mountains meet the sea. First human to spot them: Venania Sarko, a hunter's daughter from the Sandsword holding near Ashgate.
Each ship carried a different tribal faction:
The Druids (Wisemen): Masters of druidic magic — the old magic that had faded on the continent but remained potent on the volcanic subcontinent. They understood ecology, weather, animal husbandry, and the manipulation of natural forces in ways that no mainland practitioner could replicate. Their leader was the eldest druid of each ship.
The Warriors: Giant soldiers equipped with weapons and armor scaled to their enormous size. Disciplined, hierarchical, loyal to their tribal structure.
The Builders (Engineers): Specialists in construction, metalwork, and the practical sciences. They had built the ships that crossed the ocean. They could build anything.
Physical description: Giants stood roughly 12–15 feet tall. Proportioned like humans but heavier, denser — a single giant weighed as much as four large men. Skin tones varied by tribe. Life expectancy approximately 200 years. They bred slowly — a giant woman might bear two or three children in her lifetime.
Their homeland: A volcanic subcontinent called (in their language) something the mainland peoples would later approximate as Jötunheim or Eldraholm — the Fire-Home. A landmass dominated by a single massive volcano whose eruptions had been accelerating for centuries. Lava had consumed nearly a third of the island by the time the fleet departed. The giants were not invaders. They were refugees.
The magic: The volcanic subcontinent was saturated with the old magic — the same force that had once sustained the great beasts of Mundus but had faded as civilization expanded. The giants had lived with this magic for millennia and had learned to work with it. Their druids could communicate with animals, accelerate plant growth, sense weather patterns, and perform feats of natural manipulation that would be considered miraculous on the mainland.
The fauna: The giants brought their animals. White-furred mammoths with red eyes — massive beasts they farmed like cattle, used for transport, and mourned when they died. And other creatures — things from the volcanic ecology that had never existed on the continent. These creatures, infused with the subcontinent's potent magic, began appearing in Mundus as the giants settled. The world was about to get thicker again.
Giant society: Three tribes, each defined by its role. The Wisemen/Druids governed through counsel and prophecy. The Warriors defended and conquered. The Builders created and maintained. Within each tribe, all necessary social functions existed — farmers, healers, artisans, teachers. The three tribes were not competitors but complementary parts of a single civilization. Their religion was animistic — they worshipped the volcano that was killing them, the ocean that had nearly drowned them, and the earth that they hoped would receive them. They did not understand Loveism and had no frame of reference for a god who had sacrificed himself to become the world. Their gods were the world. The world was trying to kill them. They loved it anyway.

KEY INSTITUTIONS AT 1308 AF (Summary Reference)
Political Systems by Region:
Nionia: God-King (Jous Lorethian). Absolute theocratic rule. Triumvirate as vestigial check.
Heartlands: Argenlord (elected every 3 years by ducal heads of house). Currently Silverblood. Emergency powers in war/famine.
Sangrea: Lord-Patrons (independent dynastic rule). Solé vs Terrarossa as poles.
Rosland: High Baron (elected every 10 years by nobles + guilds). Currently Ironside.
The Horns: Four-house balance (Garrun/Westhorn, Dalgaard/Brinehold, Veldren/Nightspike, Lampkeepers/Skogrim).
Vallan: Valley-King (House Valenne). Ceremonial authority.
Red Coast: Red Crown (House Cenizar). Water arbitration expanded to governance.
The Teeth: Four island lords + contested Bridge (Morvayn as Lord-Warden).
Frozen South: Clan system (Aurax dominant). Winter-Moot.
Xaria: Ix'Atani colonial administration. Governor appointed by the Dominion.
Isle of Knowledge: Order of Magos. Elder Magos leads. Neutral.
Faithir / Holy See: Council of the Holy Three. Spiritual authority, diminishing temporal power.
Number of Argenlords (903–1308 AF): Approximately 135 (elected every 3 years for 405 years). Most served a single term. Some served multiple. The title has been held by Silverblood (~45 times), Silverring (~40 times), Argenhold (~20 times), Beaumont (~15 times), and various minor houses (~15 times).
Number of High Barons (905–1308 AF): Approximately 40 (elected every 10 years for 403 years). Greenhand has held the office the most times (~12). Ironside has held it ~6 times. Daurn held it early. Other houses have held it intermittently.

NAMED LOVIST ORDERS (Comprehensive List at 1308 AF)
Major Orders (the Big Three):
Ayanite Order (Truth/Law) — scholars, judges, educators
Ashanite Order (Feeling/Healing) — healers, hospices, grief counselors
Alonite Order (Action/Service) — military, construction, beast-hunting
Named Sub-Orders (active at 1308 AF): 4. Sons of Loreth (Alonite/martial) — knightly order, largest martial force 5. Brothers of the Open Road (Alonite) — road maintenance, pilgrim escort 6. Sisters of the Veil (Ashanite) — cloistered seers, Nionia 7. Order of Alon's Silence / Wandering Mutes (Alonite) — itinerant mute healers 8. Blind Daughters of Aya (Ayanite) — self-blinded oracle women 9. Order of the Harvest Bell (Ashanite) — agriculture, famine relief 10. The Bonekeepers (Ashanite) — funeral rites, ossuaries 11. The Lampkeepers (Alonite) — lighthouses, signal fires, road safety (Horns) 12. Order of the Copper Bowl (Ashanite) — alchemical healers (Red Coast) 13. The Chain-Breakers (Alonite) — anti-slavery (Xarian frontier) 14. Order of the Quill (Ayanite) — education, literacy, schools 15. The Crimson Penitents (unaffiliated) — self-flagellating pilgrims 16. Order of the Still Water (Ashanite) — contemplative monasteries 17. Order of St. Maren (Alonite) — women warriors, protection of abused (Rosland) 18. The Ember Watch (Alonite) — remnant beast-hunters (~40 members) 19. Order of the Green Thorn (Ashanite) — forest conservation (Verwhisper, Teeth) 20. The Venic Path (heretical) — mystical consciousness exploration 21. The Logosians (heretical/exiled) — rationalist theology, based at Isle of Knowledge
Implied but unnamed orders: Hundreds more — monastic breweries, fishing cooperatives, bridge-maintenance guilds, animal husbandry orders, musical orders (the Faithir Choirkeepers), manuscript-copying orders, medicinal herb gardens, criminal rehabilitation houses, orphanages, leper colonies, and dozens of regional devotional groups organized around local saints and holy sites. The exact count is unknown because new orders formed spontaneously and many operated without Council of Three authorization, which was part of what the Council was trying to rein in.

LEGENDARY FIGURES OF THE AGE OF FAITH
Daven Argenhold "the Peacemaker" (919 AF) — First Argenlord. Brokered the Treaty of Five Bridges. Established House Argenhold's diplomatic tradition.
Brother Erland (c. 910 AF) — First Lampkeeper Prior. Established Skogrim as a neutral toll city.
Kael Ironside "the Miner-King" (c. 1090 AF) — Led the Fyrhold rebellion. Founded House Ironside.
Don Alvaro Sangreverde "the Butcher" (c. 1108 AF) — Terrarossa general. Hung 800 men from the Fuentarossa bridge.
Aldric Greenhand "the Reformer" (c. 1160–1190 AF) — Three-term High Baron. Expanded guild vote and public schools.
Father Thesan of Silvermont (c. 1020 AF) — Logosian founder. Wrote The Cogitant Letters. Excommunicated.
Sister Galena (c. 1000 AF) — Beast-Pardoner. Excommunicated after harpy flock massacre.
Ser Brannoc of Vornhold (c. 970 AF) — Founded the Sons of Loreth.
Ferron "the Upstart" (c. 1300 AF) — Miner who funded Jous Lorethian's rise. Founded Domus Ferronus.
Sinna of the South (c. 1270 AF) — Wildwoman who brokered the Frozen South gold trade.
Aldric Valenne II (c. 1120 AF) — Valley-King who refused Heartlands annexation. Threatened to destroy his own roads.
Lord Yusef Alsiroth III "the Mad" (c. 1080 AF) — Mad king of Alsiroth's Gate. Tower of mirrors, bone palace.
Merchant-Prince Rashid Sadiq (c. 1100 AF) — Grandfather of Omar. Began the Sadiq strategy of buying Alsiroth from within.
Tomas Greenhand (c. 990 AF) — First Greenhand High Baron. Established the guild vote.



THE ECHOES — A Codex of Magic in Mundus
What the Learned Call "The Echo-Theory" and What Everyone Else Calls "The Old Feeling"

I. THE SOURCE: WHAT MAGIC IS
The theology is the physics. That's the first thing to understand.
Loreth and Vena did not create the world and then leave it, like an architect walking away from a finished building. They became the world. The Great Sacrifice was literal: their divine bodies dissolved into stone, water, air, soil, light, heat, growth, and decay. Their consciousness — fragmented beyond recognition, beyond thought, beyond anything a mortal mind could call "awareness" — saturated every particle of the material universe. This is Lovist orthodoxy, and in Mundus, it also happens to be true.
What the faithful call echoes — those metaphysical sparks that Aya's Scrolls describe as "the breath of the divine still warm in the clay" — are not metaphors. They are the residual presence of two dead gods whose bodies are the world and whose minds were shattered into everything that exists. A rock does not think. But a rock, at some molecular level that no alchemist has ever measured and no scholar has ever adequately described, remembers being part of something that thought. A river does not love. But a river carries, in the particular way it curves around stone and pools in hollows, the echo of something that once did.
This is what magic is in Mundus: the ability to sense, interact with, and channel the residual divine consciousness embedded in the natural world.
It is not a force. It is not energy. It is not a substance you can bottle, though alchemists have spent centuries trying. It is closer to a frequency — a hum beneath the audible, a warmth beneath the tangible, a presence beneath the visible. The Ashanite mystics, who understand it better than anyone on the mainland, describe it as "the vibration between heartbeats." The Ayanite scholars, who understand it worst, describe it as "theoretical."
The Xarians have a different name for it. They call it the Blood of the Exchange — the current of life-energy that their gods demand back through sacrifice. They are wrong about the theology but right about the mechanism: something flows through living things, and it can be moved.
The Giants call it Eldra — which translates roughly as "the warmth that was there before fire." They do not theorize about it. They work with it the way a farmer works with soil: practically, intimately, without needing to explain it.
Key principle: echoes are not evenly distributed. Some places, some creatures, some materials carry more residual divine consciousness than others. The variables are age, wildness, density of life, and — critically — how much the thing has been processed by human hands.

II. THE MECHANISM: HOW IT WORKS
The Echo Gradient
Imagine a spectrum. At one end: raw, untouched wilderness — old-growth forest, deep ocean, volcanic fissures where the earth's interior pushes to the surface, caves that have never seen daylight. These places are saturated with echoes. The divine consciousness in them is dense, layered, ancient. Standing in a primeval grove, a sensitive person feels it as a physical sensation: a pressure behind the eyes, a tingling in the fingertips, a sense of being watched by something that doesn't have eyes. The Ashanites call this feeling the Pulse. The Venic Path mystics call it the Opening. Ordinary people call it "the creeps" and walk faster.
At the other end: a smelted iron ingot. A quarried stone block, cut and polished and mortared into a city wall. A field that has been plowed, planted, harvested, and plowed again for two hundred years. These things have had their echoes beaten out of them. Every act of processing — cutting, refining, smelting, tilling, building — disrupts the delicate lattice of residual consciousness in the material. The iron in the mountain is echo-rich; the iron in the sword is echo-dead. The tree in the forest hums with it; the plank in the ship is silent.
This is why civilization kills magic. Not through any active hostility, not through any deliberate suppression. Simply by existing. Every road laid, every field cleared, every mine dug, every city built replaces echo-rich wilderness with echo-dead infrastructure. The more humans transform their environment, the thinner the echo-field becomes. The process is glacial — centuries, not years — but it is relentless and, under normal circumstances, irreversible.
How Sensitivity Works
Every living thing carries echoes — humans most of all, according to Lovist theology, because humanity was the "primary creation" (though the Schism of the Lesser Life disputes this). But carrying echoes is not the same as sensing them. A person can have a spark of divinity in their chest and never feel it, the same way a person can have a heart and never hear their own pulse.
Sensitivity to echoes — the ability to feel the Pulse, to interact with the echo-field, to use what the learned would reluctantly call magic — depends on three factors:
1. Proximity to echo-dense environments. You cannot tune a lute in a silent room. Echo-sensitivity requires exposure to echo-rich stimuli. People who grow up in deep wilderness, who spend years in old forests or on untamed coastlines, develop a sensitivity that city-dwellers never acquire. This is not mystical — it is developmental. The neural pathways that process echo-stimuli form in childhood and adolescence; if they are never stimulated, they atrophy. A child raised in the Daudrwood's deepest groves will feel things that a child raised in Vornhold's stone corridors never will. The reverse is not true: the city child cannot learn sensitivity as an adult, any more than a person blinded at birth can learn to see by reading about colors.
This is why the Ember Watch recruited from frontier villages. This is why the Frozen South's clansfolk have traditions of "skin-listening" and "bone-reading" that mainlanders dismiss as superstition. This is why the Giants — who lived their entire civilization embedded in the most echo-saturated landscape on the planet — are, by mainland standards, wizards.
2. Biological echo-density. Not all humans carry the same concentration of echoes. The Lovist doctrine of "louder echoes" in kings and saints was political propaganda designed to legitimize aristocratic power, but it was built on a kernel of truth: echo-density varies between individuals. Some people are born with a denser lattice of residual consciousness in their tissues. These people are not "chosen" — they are statistical outliers, the way some people are born taller or with sharper vision. In a world saturated with echoes (the Age of History, the Giants' homeland), this variation matters little; everyone has enough. In a world drained of echoes (the mainland at 1308 AF), the variation becomes decisive: the rare person born with high echo-density in a low-echo environment is the person who sees things others don't, who heals with a touch that shouldn't work, who knows a storm is coming when the sky is clear.
Jous Lorethian has extremely high biological echo-density. Whether this is because he is genuinely divine, because the Sisters of the Veil — who lived in one of Nionia's last echo-rich environments, an ancient convent grove — somehow concentrated the trait through generations of selective seclusion, or because of some other factor, is deliberately unanswerable. His sleep paralysis, his visions, his charisma that borders on the supernatural — these are real phenomena, not performances. He feels things that other people do not. He interprets them as proof of his divinity. He may be wrong about the interpretation while being correct about the experience.
3. Altered states of consciousness. The human mind, in its normal waking state, filters out echo-stimuli the way it filters out the sound of its own breathing. This is protective — a mind fully open to the echo-field would be overwhelmed, flooded with the fragmented consciousness of every stone and tree and insect in its vicinity. The Ayanite scholars, in one of their rare moments of practical insight, call this filtering mechanism the Veil of Reason. The Venic Path calls it the Cage.
Certain states lower the filter. Meditation. Fasting. Exhaustion. Extreme emotion — grief, ecstasy, terror. And, critically, certain substances: Dreambud opens the filter gently, producing the "vivid dreams" and heightened sensory awareness that poets and Venic mystics prize. Sun-Dust blows it open violently, producing the "fiery visions" and "intense clarity" that come with the risk of permanent damage. Bonewater doesn't lower the filter so much as scramble it, producing the dissociative states that Xarian shamans use for ritual communion with their gods.
The Venic Path's heresy was not theological but practical: they discovered that systematic alteration of consciousness — through fasting, meditation, and controlled use of intoxicants — could produce reliable, repeatable echo-sensitivity in people who were otherwise too city-dulled to feel it. Brother Venic's seven-day sealed-cave fast was an echo-sensitivity protocol, not a prayer. The Council of Three banned it not because it didn't work, but because it did — and because its implications (that divine communion was a technique, not a gift) were theologically catastrophic.
What "Magic" Actually Looks Like
Echo-work is not sorcery. There are no fireballs, no telekinesis, no conjured illusions, no spoken spells. The echo-field is not a power source to be tapped; it is a presence to be collaborated with. The distinction matters.
What an echo-sensitive person can do:
Communication. The most common and least dramatic form of echo-work. Animals, being entirely natural and echo-rich, are far more attuned to the echo-field than humans. A person with sufficient sensitivity can feel an animal's emotional state — fear, hunger, territorial aggression, maternal protectiveness — and, with practice, project their own emotional state back. This is not telepathy. It is closer to empathy pushed past the species barrier. A skilled practitioner can calm a panicking horse, redirect a hunting wolf, or sense the presence of a predator through the distress of nearby prey animals. The Giants' druids can do this with a fluency that looks like conversation — the mammoth stops because the druid feels tired, and the mammoth feels the druid's tiredness as its own. But neither is speaking. Both are resonating.
Growth facilitation. An echo-sensitive person touching a living plant can accelerate its natural growth processes — not by forcing energy into it, but by deepening the plant's connection to its own echo-lattice, allowing it to draw more effectively on the residual divine consciousness in the soil, water, and sunlight around it. In practice, this means a druid can coax a seed to sprout in hours rather than days, persuade a dying tree to rally, or cause a wound to close faster by pressing living herbs against it (the herbs' echoes reinforcing the body's own). This is why hedge-medicine works when the healer has "the touch" and fails when they don't — it's not the herb that heals, it's the echo-sensitive person's ability to activate the herb's latent echoes against the wound's disruption.
Weather-sensing. The atmosphere carries echoes — wind is Vena's breath made physical, according to Ashanite poetry, and for once the poetry is mechanically accurate. Large-scale weather patterns create echo-field disturbances that a sensitive person can feel hours or days before the physical signs appear. Every coastal village has a grandmother who knows when the storm is coming. She is not a wizard. She is echo-sensitive and lives close enough to the ocean's echo-rich environment to pick up the signal.
Dread-sense. Echo-saturated creatures — the great beasts, the cryptids, the things the Ember Watch hunted — project an echo-field disturbance that sensitive humans experience as wrongness. A cold in the spine. A pressure in the temples. A conviction, irrational and absolute, that something is there and it should not be. This is not the beast being malevolent — most great beasts are no more evil than a thunderstorm. It is the human nervous system reacting to an echo-density it was not built to process. The Ember Watch called this feeling the Chill. They trained themselves to use it as a tracking sense — following the Chill to its source. Most of them were slightly mad by the time they retired, because years of deliberately exposing yourself to echo-overload leaves scars.
Subtle influence on physical processes. At the highest levels of sensitivity and skill — levels that no living human on the mainland possesses at 1308 AF, but that Giant druids demonstrate routinely — an echo-worker can influence physical processes by manipulating the echo-field around them. Not violating natural law, but nudging it: making water flow slightly uphill by deepening the echo-resonance of the destination; making fire burn slightly hotter by concentrating the echoes in the fuel; making stone fracture along a specific line by sensing the echo-lattice within the rock and finding its natural breaking point. This is what Giant builders do when they work stone without tools — they feel where the rock wants to break and help it.
Costs and Limits
Echo-work is not free.
Exhaustion. Channeling echoes is physically draining — it uses the practitioner's own biological echo-density as a medium, and prolonged use depletes it temporarily. A druid who spends a day accelerating crop growth will sleep for fourteen hours afterward and wake ravenous. A healer who mends a broken bone will have a headache for a week.
Dissonance. The more echo-sensitive you become, the more the civilized world hurts. Echo-dead environments — cities, smelted-metal-heavy spaces, heavily processed landscapes — feel to a sensitive person the way a loud, discordant noise feels to someone with perfect pitch. Giant druids cannot spend more than a few days inside a human city without becoming physically ill: headaches, nausea, disorientation, and eventually a dissociative state the Giants call Eldra-hunger — the sensation of suffocating in a place with no air, except the "air" is the echo-field. This is a critical plot constraint: the Giants cannot simply move into human cities. They need wild spaces, echo-rich environments, or they sicken and die.
Overexposure. On the other end, spending too long in hyper-saturated echo environments — the volcanic subcontinent, the deepest old-growth forests, the places where great beasts nest — can overwhelm human neurology. The symptoms are well-documented in the Ember Watch's training manuals: hallucinations, paranoid ideation, a sense that the landscape is alive and watching, and in extreme cases, a permanent alteration of perception that the Watch called greensight — the inability to stop seeing the echo-field, which makes normal life impossible. The victims wander in the wilderness, talking to trees and stones, until they die of exposure or starvation. The Ashanites maintained hospices for these cases. They never found a cure.
Non-creation. Echo-work cannot create something from nothing. It can accelerate, redirect, communicate, sense, and subtly influence — but it cannot conjure. A druid cannot make water appear in a desert; they can sense water underground and coax roots toward it. A healer cannot regrow a severed limb; they can accelerate the healing of a wound that the body could have healed on its own, given time. The line between "facilitation" and "creation" is the hard limit of the system.

III. THE THINNING: WHY THE WORLD GREW QUIET
At the beginning — in the Age of History, before cities, before empires, before even the concept of "civilization" — the echo-field was dense everywhere. The entire continent hummed. Every forest was old-growth. Every river was untouched. Every mountain was unquarried. The great beasts walked the land in vast numbers: storm-rocs darkening the sky in migration, griffins nesting on cliff-faces, grave-stags turning whole forests into their territories, dragons (if they ever existed) coiling in volcanic vents like cats in sunbeams.
Humans, in this saturated environment, were naturally echo-sensitive. Not powerfully — they were not Giants, who had millennia of echo-immersion — but enough to feel the Pulse in the soil, to sense weather, to communicate crudely with animals, to know when a great beast was near. The shamans and priest-kings of the early city-states were echo-practitioners: they led their communities because they could feel things others couldn't, and they used that sensitivity to make practical decisions about planting, hunting, migration, and defense. The "unexplained technologies" of the Age of History were, in many cases, echo-assisted engineering — stone worked along its natural echo-lattice fracture lines, crops grown in echo-optimized rotations, buildings placed at echo-resonant locations.
Then civilization happened.
Not all at once. Not with any single act. But with the cumulative weight of ten thousand acts of transformation: forests cleared for fields, rivers dammed for irrigation, mountains quarried for building stone, ore smelted into metal, land plowed and replowed until its echo-lattice was pulverized into agricultural monotony. Each act individually was trivial. Each act collectively was extinction.
The process accelerated under the Nionian Empire. The imperial roads — which the Brothers of the Open Road now maintain with such pride — were the single most destructive echo-engineering project in continental history. Thousands of miles of wild land stripped, leveled, paved with processed stone, and lined with cleared buffer zones. The roads made the empire possible, but they also carved the echo-field into fragments, cutting what had been a continuous web of resonance into isolated pockets separated by dead corridors.
The great beasts died not because humans hunted them (though humans did hunt them) but because their habitats shrank. A storm-roc needs an echo-dense territory of thousands of square miles to sustain its biological processes — its enormous body burns echo-energy the way a furnace burns fuel, and without sufficient ambient echoes, it sickens and dies. As the echo-field thinned, the great beasts retreated to the remaining dense pockets: deep forests, high mountains, oceanic trenches, volcanic regions. And as those pockets shrank, the beasts starved. The Ember Watch did not exterminate the great beasts. The Ember Watch cleaned up the last, desperate survivors — creatures driven to the margins of human settlement because there was nowhere else to go, attacking livestock and people because they were starving for echoes and couldn't distinguish between an echo-dense wild deer and an echo-depleted domestic cow.
By 1308 AF, the mainland's echo-field is at its lowest point in recorded history. The dense pockets that remain are small and scattered: the deepest parts of the Daudrwood, certain caves in the Frozen South, volcanic vents on the Red Coast, the jungle interior of Xaria (where the Ix'Atani colonial presence has been too light to cause significant echo-disruption), and a handful of other isolated locations. The great beasts are functionally extinct. The Ember Watch has forty members and nothing to hunt. Village hedge-witches and "touched" healers are rare and getting rarer — each generation, fewer children grow up in environments echo-rich enough to develop sensitivity. The Venic Path's techniques for artificial sensitivity are the last desperate attempt to access something that is almost gone.
The Isle of Knowledge sits on what the Magos privately suspect is a naturally echo-dense geological formation — the island's bedrock is ancient, unquarried volcanic basalt that has never been processed. This may explain why the Magos' archives, stored in underground vaults cut into this basalt, have survived for centuries without the decay that plagues libraries on the mainland. It may also explain why certain Magos scholars, the ones who spend decades in the deep vaults, develop odd sensitivities: an ability to "feel" when a document is a forgery, an intuition about where in the archives a particular text is shelved, a habit of talking to the stones. The Elder Magos has never officially acknowledged this phenomenon. Unofficially, senior archivists are rotated out of the deep vaults every five years to prevent "vault-dreaming."
The Theological Paradox
Here is the thing the Ayanite scholars have never been able to resolve, the question that the Logosians used to crack Loveism's intellectual foundations:
If the echoes are the residual consciousness of Loreth and Vena — if magic is literally the presence of God in the world — then the thinning of the echo-field means that civilization is killing God. Not metaphorically. Not symbolically. Every road built, every field plowed, every city raised is an act of deicide by inches. The very progress that Loreth (god of order, structure, civilization) supposedly ordained is the thing that destroys his presence in the world.
The Logosians argued this proved the gods were already dead — that the "echoes" were diminishing because they were echoes, not a living presence, and echoes fade by nature. The orthodox response (formulated hastily by Ayanite scholars during the Logosian Crisis of 1020-1040 AF) was the Doctrine of the Willing Recession: Loreth and Vena intended the echoes to fade as humanity matured, like parents stepping back as a child learns to walk. The divine presence withdraws because it trusts humanity to carry forward the work of creation without supernatural assistance. This is elegant theology. It is also, as the Logosians pointed out, unfalsifiable and suspiciously convenient.
The truth — which no one on the mainland knows — is more complicated and more tragic, and the Giants' arrival will force the question into the open.

IV. THE FIVE TRADITIONS
1. The Old Way / Druidic Echo-Work (Eldra-Craft)
The original practice, now preserved only by the Giants and in fragmentary oral traditions among the Frozen South clans.
The Giants did not "develop" druidic magic. They grew up inside it the way fish grow up inside water. Their volcanic homeland — Eldraholm, the Fire-Home — was the most echo-saturated landmass on the planet: volcanic geology constantly bringing unprocessed material from deep in the earth's echo-rich interior to the surface, a climate that discouraged large-scale agriculture (you don't plow lava fields), and a population too small and too pragmatic to engage in the kind of wholesale landscape transformation that drained the mainland.
Giant druids are not priests, not scholars, not specialists. They are simply the members of their community who were born with the highest echo-density and then trained — from childhood, through decades of practice — to refine their sensitivity into practical skill. A Giant druid can:
Communicate with animals with a fluency that approaches (but never quite reaches) true conversation. The mammoth herders speak of their animals the way a shepherd speaks of sheep — with intimate, practical knowledge of individual temperaments, needs, and capabilities. But also with a depth of emotional resonance that no mainland shepherd experiences: a druid who has bonded with a mammoth over fifty years does not "own" the mammoth. They share an emotional landscape. When the mammoth dies, the druid grieves with a totality that humans reserve for the loss of a spouse.
Sense and influence weather with enough precision to plan planting, travel, and defensive preparations days in advance.
Accelerate plant growth dramatically — not to the point of instant results, but fast enough to sustain a community in environments (volcanic ash-fields, rocky coastlines) that would be barren without intervention.
Work stone, wood, and bone along their natural echo-lattice lines, producing constructions that are structurally superior to anything human engineering can achieve — not through technology but through intimacy with the material's internal structure.
Sense other echo-sensitive beings (including humans) at great distances, feel their emotional states, and — with consent — share memories and experiences through a process the Giants call Eldra-melding. This is not mind-reading. It is closer to a shared dream: both participants enter a state of mutual echo-resonance in which memories, emotions, and sensory experiences bleed across the boundary between individuals. It is intimate, exhausting, and considered by the Giants to be one of the most sacred acts in their culture. It is also how they mourn their dead: the druids meld with the dying person's echo-lattice as it dissolves, carrying the last fragments of their consciousness into themselves, where it persists as a kind of after-image — not a ghost, not a soul, but a warmth that the druid carries for the rest of their life.
2. Folk Magic / Hedge Craft
The diluted, practical remnant of what was once universal human echo-sensitivity.
Every region has its version. The Frozen South calls it skin-listening. Rosland calls it the Old Touch. Sangrea calls it saber del campo — "the field's knowing." The Heartlands doesn't call it anything because the Heartlands, being the most heavily civilized region on the continent, has almost none of it left.
Folk magic works because some humans still live close enough to echo-dense environments to develop partial sensitivity. A healer in a Roslandic mountain village, surrounded by old-growth forest and unquarried rock, may have enough echo-sensitivity to feel when a patient's body is fighting an infection — not as a diagnosis, but as a sensation, a warmth or a wrongness under the skin. She presses a poultice of Willowglass bark against the wound, and her sensitivity allows her to unconsciously deepen the herb's echo-resonance against the infection. The patient heals faster than they should. The healer doesn't know why it works. She knows what she was taught: these herbs, applied this way, with this pressure, while saying this prayer. The prayer is irrelevant. The pressure is irrelevant. The herb matters because it is echo-rich. The healer matters because she is echo-sensitive. But neither of them knows this, and if you told them, they wouldn't believe you.
Folk magic is:
Unreliable. It depends on the practitioner's echo-sensitivity, which varies wildly and is never formally measured.
Underpowered. Partial sensitivity produces partial results.
Unsystematic. Knowledge is transmitted through apprenticeship and oral tradition, with no theoretical framework to distinguish effective techniques from superstitious accretions. A village healer's toolkit includes herbs that work (because they're echo-active) alongside rituals that don't (because they're cultural habit), and she has no way to tell which is which.
Disappearing. Each generation, as the echo-field thins and more young people move to cities, fewer folk practitioners emerge. The knowledge isn't dying because no one writes it down; it's dying because the environment that makes it functional is shrinking.
3. Alchemy
The attempt to extract, concentrate, and deploy echoes through physical processing. Alchemy is what happens when a systematic mind encounters folk magic and asks: "What if we could do this on purpose?"
The alchemists of Mundus — clustered primarily in the Magos archives, the Red Coast's copper-bowl healers, and the private laboratories of wealthy nobles — have, over centuries, developed a practical if imperfect understanding of echo-chemistry. They know, though they don't use these terms, that certain natural materials are echo-dense (volcanic glass, unprocessed copper, old-growth wood, specific fungi, fresh spring water). They know that combining certain echo-dense materials in certain ways produces effects that individual materials don't: a tincture of Moonmilk fungus and Copperthorn oil, mixed in a copper bowl, has analgesic properties far exceeding what either substance produces alone. They don't know why — their theoretical framework attributes it to the interaction of "essences" or "humors" or "sympathies" — but their recipes work, and they've been refined over generations of trial and error.
The fundamental problem of alchemy is the paradox of processing: the act of extracting and refining echo-dense materials inevitably destroys some of their echo-density. Grinding a fungus into powder, distilling a resin into tincture, heating a mineral into solution — each step strips echoes from the material. The alchemist is trying to concentrate something that the process of concentration destroys. The best alchemists have learned to minimize this loss — using echo-dense tools (copper bowls, not iron; glass, not steel; wooden mortars, not stone), working in echo-rich environments (underground, in old buildings, near natural springs), and performing their work quickly to limit exposure to echo-dead air. But they can never eliminate the loss entirely, which is why alchemical products are expensive, unreliable, and produce effects far weaker than what a true echo-practitioner could achieve through direct manipulation.
The Order of the Copper Bowl has pushed closest to the line. Their practice of mixing Frostpetal derivatives and Dreambud infusions into copper tinctures is, without their knowing it, a crude form of echo-frequency manipulation: the Frostpetal (grown in the echo-dense volcanic environment of the Frozen South) provides raw echo-material, the Dreambud lowers the patient's echo-filter (the Veil of Reason), and the copper bowl acts as a resonance chamber that minimizes echo-loss during preparation. The combination produces genuine analgesic and healing effects that purely chemical explanations cannot account for. The Council of Three tolerates the Copper Bowl because the results are real. They distrust them because the mechanism is uncomfortably close to what the Venic Path was banned for.
The Magos' vaults contain artifacts from the Age of History — objects whose construction implies a level of echo-engineering far beyond anything the current alchemists can achieve. Tools that still function after thousands of years. Metals that don't corrode. Documents that don't decay. The Magos don't understand how these objects work. They know they were made during a period when the echo-field was immensely denser, and they suspect that the "lost technology" of the Age of History was not technology in the modern sense at all — it was echo-craft practiced at a scale and sophistication that the current world cannot replicate.
Vlado Ironside's search for immortality is, at its core, an alchemical project: he has read the esoteric texts in the Magos archives, he has noted the references to "undying metals" and "ever-living waters," and he has concluded that the ancients possessed a means of extending life that has been lost. He is not wrong. He is, however, attempting to reverse-engineer a technology that required an echo-field a hundred times denser than the one he lives in, using tools and methods that actively destroy the thing he needs. His search is doomed. But he doesn't know that, and the people he pays to pursue it don't know that, and the trail of experimental failures (and human subjects) his researchers leave behind is becoming a problem.
4. The Venic Path
The heresy that was right.
Brother Venic discovered, through his seven-day fast in a sealed cave, that extreme sensory deprivation combined with fasting dropped the Veil of Reason low enough to make even a city-born monk echo-sensitive. His experience in the cave — which he described as "drowning in the voice of God" — was not a mystical vision. It was the raw experience of a human nervous system suddenly flooded with echo-stimuli it had spent a lifetime filtering out. The "voice of God" was the echo-field of the cave's ancient, unquarried stone, and it was loud.
The Venic Path's subsequent development was a systematic attempt to reproduce and refine Venic's experience. Through generations of experimentation — much of it dangerous, some of it fatal — the Path's practitioners developed a toolkit of consciousness-altering techniques:
Fasting protocols that lower the Veil gradually rather than catastrophically.
Meditation techniques derived from Asha's Tomes of Vibration — the raised-dot patterns on the Tablets, it turns out, produce echo-resonance patterns when traced with the fingertips, effectively tuning the practitioner's nervous system to the echo-field. The Ashanites use the Tablets devotionally; the Venics use them therapeutically.
Controlled intoxicant use. Dreambud for gentle lowering of the Veil. Sun-Dust for violent breakthroughs (dangerous but sometimes necessary for practitioners who have spent too long in echo-dead environments and need a shock to restart their sensitivity). Bonewater for deep echo-work that approaches the Giant druids' Eldra-melding — though without training, Bonewater-induced melding is uncontrolled, overwhelming, and frequently traumatic.
Environmental protocols. Venic practitioners seek out echo-dense locations for their work: caves, old forests, volcanic vents, ancient ruins. The most advanced Venic circles maintain secret maps of echo-dense sites across the continent — a network of caves, springs, and groves that the practitioners call the Veins. The name, coincidentally, is also what the Giants call the echo-rich geological formations of their homeland.
The Council of Three banned the Venic Path in 1023 AF for reasons that were theological on the surface and political underneath. Theologically, the Path's claim that divine communion was achievable through technique rather than grace undermined the Church's role as intermediary between humanity and the divine. Politically, an echo-sensitive population would have practical abilities that the Church could not control, could not monopolize, and could not attribute to its own institutional blessing. A healer who can feel infections doesn't need an Ashanite hospice. A farmer who can sense weather doesn't need a Harvest Bell almanac. An arbiter who can feel lies doesn't need an Ayanite court. The Path was banned because it threatened to make the Church irrelevant.
The Path persists underground. Its practitioners — estimated at perhaps two or three hundred across the continent, concentrated in Sangrea (where the culture's sensuality provides cover), the Frozen South (where the clan traditions never recognized the Council's authority anyway), and the rural Heartlands (where enforcement is lax) — are the mainland's closest equivalent to echo-practitioners. They are also the people best positioned to understand what the Giants represent when they arrive.
5. The Pure Way (Jous Lorethian's "Miracles")
Jous is a genuine echo-sensitive. His biological echo-density is exceptionally high. His upbringing in the Sisters of the Veil convent — one of Nionia's few remaining echo-rich environments — gave his sensitivity room to develop. His sleep paralysis is a form of involuntary echo-perception: during the paralysis state, his Veil of Reason drops completely, flooding him with echo-stimuli that his waking mind cannot process. His "visions" are not prophetic — they are his mind's attempt to narrativize raw echo-data into something it can understand. The images he sees (a purified Nionia, a world scrubbed clean) are not messages from Loreth. They are his own psychological obsessions reflected back at him through the echo-field's distorted mirror.
The Pure Way's theology is built on Jous's genuine but misinterpreted experience. He does feel things other people don't. He does have abilities that seem miraculous to people who have never encountered echo-sensitivity. His personal magnetism — the almost physical pull that people feel in his presence — is an unconscious echo-projection: his high biological echo-density creates a localized field that other humans' echo-remnants respond to. People near Jous feel more — more certain, more fervent, more alive — because his echo-field is activating their own dormant sparks. This is not mind control. It is resonance. But the practical effect is the same: people in Jous's presence find it very difficult to doubt him, and very easy to believe.
The dangerous irony: Jous's Pure Way theology, with its emphasis on purity, order, and obedience, is antithetical to the conditions that sustain echo-sensitivity. If Jous succeeds in conquering the mainland and imposing the Pure Way's rigid, systematized civilization, he will accelerate the thinning of the echo-field — destroying the very phenomenon that makes him "divine." His conquest would be self-negating: the more he wins, the less miraculous he becomes. The more cities he builds, the quieter the echoes get. The more order he imposes, the deader the world.
He doesn't know this. No one on Nionia does.

V. THE BEASTS: NODES IN THE WEB
The great beasts of Mundus — the storm-rocs, griffins, grave-stags, basilisks, harpies, manticores, sea-wyrms, and the unverified dragons — were not merely large animals. They were echo-nodes: creatures whose biological echo-density was so high that they functioned as living reservoirs of residual divine consciousness.
A storm-roc in flight did not simply ride the wind. It was the wind, in the echo-field sense: its body served as a focal point for atmospheric echo-currents, drawing them into patterns that produced the storms that accompanied its migration. Kill the roc, and the local weather patterns shift. Kill enough rocs, and the continent's climate changes. This actually happened: the extinction of the storm-roc flocks between 400 and 800 AF correlates with a documented shift in rainfall patterns across the Heartlands, which Magos climatologists have attributed to "natural cycles" because they don't have the theoretical framework to connect it to fauna die-off.
The harpies of the Horns coast were echo-nodes for wind and sound. Their "shrieks" were not merely loud — they resonated in the echo-field, producing effects that physical acoustics cannot explain: sailors' reports of hearing their dead mothers' voices in harpy screams, of entire crews becoming disoriented and rowing in circles, of ships' compasses spinning. These effects ceased when the Crusade of the Skogrim Corridor cleared the Horns harpy rookeries in 1060-1075 AF. The Lampkeepers of Skogrim, who lived closest to the harpy colonies, were the most echo-sensitive humans in the Horns — their "uncanny navigational skills" were a direct consequence of decades of exposure to harpy echo-emissions.
The basilisks — the most feared of the beasts — were echo-nodes for stasis. Their "gaze that freezes blood" was not a magical power but an echo-field emission so dense that it overwhelmed the target's nervous system, producing a paralysis indistinguishable from death. The victim's heart continued to beat (barely), their brain continued to function (dimly), but their voluntary nervous system shut down entirely. Victims recovered if removed from the basilisk's range quickly enough. Victims who were not removed entered a state of cascading organ failure as the echo-overload disrupted their biological processes. The Ember Watch developed countermeasures: reflective surfaces (which scattered the echo-emission), wax earplugs (which blocked an acoustic component of the field that the Watch never understood), and a pre-encounter dose of Frostpetal (which, by stimulating the nervous system, raised the threshold for echo-paralysis). These countermeasures were effective enough that basilisk hunts had a survival rate of roughly 60%. By 1308 AF, no basilisk has been reliably sighted in over a century. The Ember Watch's remaining members carry their ancestors' countermeasure kits as talismans.
The narrative implication: The great beasts were not just animals. They were load-bearing elements of the world's echo-infrastructure. Each extinction didn't just remove a species — it removed a node from the network, weakening the overall field, accelerating the thinning, making the next extinction more likely. The process was a cascade: as the field thinned, the beasts that depended on it weakened; as they weakened, they became easier to kill; as they were killed, the field thinned further. The Ember Watch, in their heroic century of beast-hunting, did not save civilization from monsters. They completed civilization's conquest of the divine.

VI. THE RETURN: WHAT THE GIANTS BRING
Three ships. An unknown number departed; three arrived. And with those three ships came an echo-field density that the continent of Mundus has not experienced in centuries.
The Giants themselves are echo-dense. Their bodies, developed over millennia of immersion in Eldraholm's saturated environment, are living echo-reservoirs. A single Giant standing in a Heartlands meadow would produce measurable effects within a radius of several hundred yards: plants growing faster, animals behaving strangely, weather patterns shifting subtly, and echo-sensitive humans (if any were nearby) feeling the Pulse for the first time in their lives.
Their animals are echo-dense. The white mammoths, in particular, are the closest thing to surviving echo-nodes that the mainland has seen since the last griffin died. Each mammoth carries an echo-field comparable to a small old-growth forest. Where the mammoths graze, the land wakes up.
And the Giants brought seeds, spores, and organisms from Eldraholm — volcanic-adapted flora and fauna carrying echo-concentrations that mainland biology has never encountered. As these organisms establish themselves — in the Frozen South where Ship One landed, on the Red Coast where Ship Two made landfall, in the southern Heartlands where Venania Sarko watched Ship Three disgorge its passengers — they will begin to re-saturate the local echo-field. Not quickly. Not dramatically. But steadily, and with consequences no one can predict.
What happens when the echoes come back:
The beasts return. Not the extinct species — they are gone. But the ecological niches they occupied still exist, and as the echo-field re-saturates, new creatures will evolve to fill them. Within a generation of the Giants' settlement, the regions surrounding their enclaves will see animals behaving in ways that haven't been observed in centuries: livestock exhibiting unusual intelligence, wild predators developing pack behaviors of uncanny coordination, marine life in the Giants' coastal waters growing to sizes not seen since the Age of History. And in the deep places — the caves, the old forests, the volcanic vents — things will begin to stir that have been dormant for so long that no human remembers them.
Humans become sensitive again. Children born near Giant settlements — exposed to echo-dense environments during the critical developmental window — will develop sensitivities their parents never had. The first generation will be small: a child who always knows when it's going to rain, a girl who can calm horses with a touch, a boy who has nightmares about things he's never seen. By the second generation, if the Giants remain and the echo-field continues to strengthen, the effects will be impossible to dismiss as coincidence. The Ember Watch's forty remaining members — most of them old, all of them wondering if they wasted their lives training for something that no longer exists — will suddenly have something to hunt again. And they will not be ready.
The Church panics. If the echoes are returning — if the divine presence is strengthening after centuries of weakening — then the Doctrine of the Willing Recession collapses. The gods are not stepping back to let humanity mature. Something else is happening, something the theology has no framework for. The Ashanites will welcome it (the sacred is returning). The Alonites will fear it (the beasts are returning). The Ayanites will deny it (because admitting it would validate the Logosians, who argued that echoes were natural phenomena, not divine grace — and if the echoes can be strengthened by a boatload of refugees, then they clearly are natural phenomena).
Jous Lorethian becomes simultaneously more powerful and more threatened. More powerful because the strengthening echo-field amplifies his abilities — his charisma becomes more intense, his visions more vivid, his presence more overwhelming. More threatened because the Giants' druidic practice proves that echo-work is a skill, not a divine gift, and if anyone ever makes that connection, his claim to be the unique incarnation of Loreth collapses. He is not the son of God. He is an echo-sensitive human with a good story. The Giants are an entire civilization of people like him — and they're better at it.

VII. THE NAMING OF THINGS
What the various cultures call the echo-field and its phenomena:
Lovist orthodox: "The Echoes," "the divine sparks," "the resonance of the Great Sacrifice." Treated as theology, not physics.
Ashanite mystics: "The Pulse," "Vena's breath," "the vibration between heartbeats."
Ayanite scholars: "Theoretical residual divine emanation." They have seventeen-syllable names for things they refuse to admit exist.
Venic Path: "The Opening," "the Veins" (echo-dense locations), "the Cage" (the Veil of Reason).
Ember Watch: "The Chill" (beast-proximity warning), "greensight" (echo-overexposure syndrome), "the Thick" (echo-dense area, as in "the forest is thick tonight").
Folk practitioners: "The Old Touch," "the knowing," "the sight," "skin-listening" (Frozen South).
Giants: "Eldra" — the warmth that was there before fire. Adjective form: "Eldra-rich," "Eldra-hungry." Practice: "Eldra-craft." The melding: "Eldra-melding." The sickness from echo-deprivation: "Eldra-hunger."
Xarians: "The Blood of the Exchange." Their sacrificial theology is a misinterpretation of echo-mechanics: they believe the echo-field must be fed with life to continue, which is backwards — the echo-field sustains life, not the reverse. But their sacrificial practices, by concentrating emotional echo-output (pain, terror, ecstasy) in ritually charged locations, do produce localized echo-density spikes that their priests interpret as divine favor. They are performing accidental echo-engineering and attributing the results to gods who don't exist. It works anyway.
Logosians: "A natural phenomenon of diminishing residual energy consistent with thermodynamic principles." They are the closest to correct and the least likely to be believed.
Common people: They don't have a name for it. They just know that grandmother's poultices work better than the apothecary's, that the forest feels different at night, that certain places are sacred and certain places are cursed, and that it's bad luck to build a house where a great beast died. They know these things the way they know that bread rises and rain falls — without theory, without explanation, as facts of a world they have never needed to analyze.

ELDRAHOLM — The Fire-Home
A Culture Bible of the Giants of Mundus

I. THE ISLAND
Geography
Eldraholm sits deep in the southern ocean, past waters so violent and currents so unpredictable that no mainland vessel has ever reached it — not because it cannot be found, but because it cannot be approached. The island is roughly the size of Iceland: large enough to sustain a civilization, small enough that its inhabitants knew every ridge and valley by name.
The dominant feature is Urdrath — the Burning Father. A stratovolcano so massive that its summit is perpetually shrouded in its own weather system, Urdrath occupies the island's center like a fist pushing through a table. Its slopes are terraced with ancient lava flows, some cooled into fertile basalt shelves, others still glowing with the slow creep of fresh magma. The volcano has been active for as long as the Giants' oral history stretches — which is roughly eight thousand years, given their two-century lifespans and their prodigious memories. But "active" is a spectrum. For most of recorded history, Urdrath rumbled and fumed and occasionally belched lava down predictable channels that the Giants mapped and avoided. The eruptions were manageable. The ash was fertile. The geothermal heat kept the winters mild. Urdrath was not a threat. Urdrath was the foundation.
The island's terrain radiates outward from Urdrath in concentric ecological rings:
The Ashlands — The inner ring. Barren lava fields, sulfurous vents, rivers of superheated water. Uninhabitable except by the most extreme echo-adapted organisms. The Ashlands have been expanding for the last three centuries as Urdrath's eruptions intensify, swallowing territory that was once part of the second ring.
The Thornwood — The middle ring. Dense, ancient forest of colossal trees — some over three hundred feet tall, with trunk diameters measured in the tens of yards. These are not mainland trees. They are echo-saturated organisms that have been growing in the island's hyper-dense Eldra-field for millennia, their root systems intertwined into a single underground network that the druids call the Weft. The Thornwood's trees have names. The druids speak to them. The trees do not speak back — they are not sentient — but they respond, the way a body responds to a hand placed on its chest: with warmth, with movement, with something that is not thought but is not nothing. The Thornwood was the Giants' homeland — their settlements were built within the forest, not cleared from it. They lived in and among the trees, carving homes into living trunks, building bridges between canopy platforms, farming the forest floor's rich volcanic soil without ever felling a tree that had not already died. A Giant who cut a living Thornwood tree was not a criminal. They were incomprehensible — the act was so alien to Giant psychology that their language didn't have a word for it. The closest translation: "one who cuts their own veins."
The Shorelands — The outer ring. Rocky coastline, tidal flats, shallow coves, and the massive kelp forests that ring the island. The Shorelands were the least populated zone — the Giants are not a seafaring people by temperament. Their size made boat-building enormously difficult: a vessel that could carry even a single Giant required more timber, more pitch, more labor than a human ship ten times its crew capacity. The Giants built small fishing craft for coastal use and occasionally ventured into deeper water for whale-hunting (a seasonal ritual, not a commercial enterprise), but the open ocean was alien territory. They did not explore it. They did not wonder what was beyond it. They knew the sea was vast and hostile, and they had everything they needed on the island. Why would they leave?
The Barrier — The Eldra-Veil
The island's extreme echo-saturation produced a phenomenon that the Giants never named because they never needed to — they didn't know it existed. From the outside, the effect would have been unmistakable: a zone extending roughly fifty miles in every direction from the island's coast where the echo-field was so dense that it produced catastrophic effects on any organism not adapted to it.
For ocean-going animals, the zone was a wall of dread. Fish turned back. Whales altered migration routes to avoid it. Seabirds flew around it. The echo-density at the boundary was comparable to a basilisk's paralysis-field, but diffused across a vast area: not intense enough to kill, but powerful enough to produce an overwhelming, irrational conviction that something terrible was ahead. Any mainland sailor who somehow navigated the currents and storms of the deep southern ocean would, upon entering the zone, experience escalating panic, disorientation, auditory hallucinations, and — if they persisted — a dissociative break severe enough to make navigation impossible. They would turn back. They would not remember clearly why.
For the Giants, the barrier was invisible. Their echo-adapted neurology processed the island's saturation as normal — the way a deep-sea fish doesn't feel water pressure. They could sail to the barrier's edge, but at the boundary, the echo-field changed character: the dense, familiar warmth of the island's Eldra gave way to a wall of noise — chaotic, unstructured echo-emissions from the vast ocean floor, amplified by the barrier's edge into a cacophony that the druids described as "the screaming of drowned stone." It was physically painful. Giants who ventured into it became ill within hours. The few exploratory voyages in Giant history — there were perhaps a dozen across eight millennia — all ended the same way: the crew turned back, sick and frightened, and reported that the world ended at the water's edge. The ocean was not a road. It was a wall. The Giants accepted this the way they accepted Urdrath's eruptions: as a fact of their world, not a puzzle to be solved.
The barrier was not magical in the sense of being deliberately created. It was an emergent property of the island's echo-ecology — the sheer concentration of residual divine consciousness in and around Eldraholm produced a self-reinforcing boundary, the way a massive gravitational body curves space around it. The echo-field was so dense that it held itself together, creating a bubble of saturation surrounded by a shell of chaotic interference.
When the Giants' evacuation fleet broke through the barrier — driven by a desperation that overrode the pain, the fear, and the disorientation — they did not merely cross a boundary. They ruptured the bubble. The echo-field that had been self-contained for millennia began bleeding outward through the breach, dissipating into the vast echo-depleted ocean and, eventually, reaching the distant shores of Mundus. Simultaneously, the island's internal echo-density began dropping — slowly at first, then with accelerating speed as the breach widened and stabilized. The Eldra-Veil did not repair itself. It could not. The structural integrity of the bubble depended on total containment. A single rupture was fatal.
The Giants who remained on Eldraholm — those who did not board the ships, who stayed because they were too old, too young, too sick, or too proud — are now living in a world that is losing its Eldra. Their druids are weakening. Their Thornwood trees are growing sluggish. Their animals are becoming listless, confused, behaving in ways they never have. The geothermal warmth is unchanged — Urdrath still burns — but the other warmth, the one that made the island alive in a way that no mainland person has ever experienced, is leaking away through the wound in the sea. The volcano is killing them from the center. The breach is killing them from the edge. They are dying in a closing ring.

II. THE TRIBES
Deep History
At their peak — roughly four thousand years before the story, during a period the Giants' oral histories call the Long Warmth — Eldraholm's population reached approximately thirty-five thousand. For a species that breeds slowly (a giantess might bear two children in a lifetime of two centuries, and many bore only one or none), this represented millennia of steady, careful growth. The island could have sustained more, but the Giants never pushed for more. They were not expansionist. Their culture was shaped by the Eldra-field's influence: a deep, instinctive sense that they existed within something, not above it. Growth for its own sake felt wrong to them the way standing in a fire felt wrong — not a moral judgment, but a physical revulsion.
The tribes were not political units. They were ecological ones — communities organized around the particular landscape they inhabited, the particular way they interacted with the Eldra in their region, and the particular animals, plants, and geological features they lived alongside. A Giant's tribe was not their government. It was their biome.
Over eight thousand years of history, tribes formed, merged, split, reformed, migrated, and occasionally dissolved. At any given point, between eight and fifteen distinct tribes existed simultaneously. By the time of the evacuation, the following were the recognized tribal identities:
The Twelve Tribes of Eldraholm (at the time of the crossing)
1. The Velthari — "Those Who Listen to the Root"
The largest tribe. Forest-dwellers of the central Thornwood, concentrated in the ancient groves closest to Urdrath's base where the volcanic soil was richest and the trees oldest. The Velthari were the island's spiritual core — their druids maintained the deepest connection to the Weft (the underground root-network) and served as the primary interpreters of the Thornwood's slow, vast communications. A Velthari druid could press their palms against a Thornwood trunk and feel weather patterns two days away, sense the health of trees on the opposite side of the forest, and — in rare, sacred ceremonies — access fragmentary echo-memories embedded in wood that had been growing for thousands of years. The Velthari believed these memories were the voices of dead druids whose consciousness had been absorbed into the Weft through Eldra-melding at the moment of death. They were probably right.
Velthari giants were the tallest of the tribes (averaging 14-15 feet), with bark-brown skin and deep green eyes — pigmentation adapted to the forest's filtered light. They wore living garments: moss-woven cloaks that continued growing on their bodies, vine-braided belts, crowns of slowly unfurling fern fronds. Their settlements were vertical — platforms ascending into the canopy, connected by bridges of woven root, with the forest floor reserved for ceremony and burial.
2. The Korvaan — "The Forge-Blooded"
Ashlands-edge dwellers who lived closest to Urdrath's active zones. The Korvaan were the island's metallurgists and builders — not because they disdained the Eldra (no Giant could) but because they had learned to work with it through fire rather than through growth. Where the Velthari listened to roots, the Korvaan listened to stone. They could feel the echo-lattice in volcanic basalt and obsidian, sense the stress lines in cooling lava, and — their most remarkable skill — shape molten rock with their bare hands, using their own echo-density to influence the cooling process and produce structures of extraordinary precision and beauty. Their architecture was volcanic glass and basalt, carved and fused rather than cut and mortared. Korvaan buildings looked grown rather than built — organic curves, flowing lines, surfaces that caught light like frozen water.
Korvaan giants were shorter and broader than the Velthari (averaging 12-13 feet), with ash-grey skin that carried a faint reddish undertone, as if lit from within. Their hands were their most distinctive feature: thick-fingered, heat-scarred, with palms calloused into a texture like cooled lava. They were the tribe most comfortable in extreme heat — a Korvaan smith could handle materials that would blister a Velthari in seconds. Their garments were leather and woven mineral fiber, practical and heat-resistant, dyed with volcanic pigments in deep reds, oranges, and blacks.
As Urdrath's eruptions intensified, the Korvaan were the first tribe to suffer direct losses — their Ashlands-edge settlements were swallowed one by one. They were also the first to argue for evacuation, and the tribe that designed and built the evacuation fleet. Every ship that sailed was a Korvaan creation.
3. The Dyrholmar — "Keepers of the Tide-Dream"
Coastal giants. Fisherfolk, kelp-farmers, whale-hunters. The Dyrholmar occupied the Shorelands and maintained the island's only relationship with the ocean — a relationship characterized by respect bordering on fear. They were the tribe best adapted to water: slightly webbed fingers and toes, a subcutaneous fat layer that made them buoyant and cold-resistant, and an echo-sensitivity attuned to marine environments. A Dyrholmar diver could feel the Eldra-currents in deep water — underwater rivers of echo-density that followed the ocean floor's geology — and navigate by them in total darkness. They were the closest thing the Giants had to sailors, though their vessels were coastal craft, not ocean-going ships.
The Dyrholmar knew the barrier existed. They didn't understand what it was, but they had a name for the zone where the ocean became hostile: the Screamwater. Their fishing routes were mapped to avoid it. Their whale-hunts circled within it. Their oral traditions included cautionary tales of ancestors who sailed too far and came back "emptied" — a term they used for the dissociative state produced by barrier exposure. Emptied Dyrholmar were cared for by the community but never recovered fully. They spent their remaining years staring at the sea with an expression that other Giants described as "listening to something that wasn't there anymore."
Dyrholmar giants had blue-grey skin, pale eyes adapted to underwater light, and hair that grew in thick, salt-stiffened ropes. They averaged 13-14 feet and were the leanest of the tribes. They wore seal-hide and kelp-fiber, ornamented with whale-bone and polished shell. Their settlements clung to cliff faces and tidal caves, built to withstand the enormous waves that battered Eldraholm's coast.
4. The Eshkári — "The Smoke-Singers"
A small, nomadic tribe that lived in the transitional zone between the Thornwood and the Ashlands — the most ecologically volatile region of the island, where forest gave way to lava field in a shifting, uncertain border. The Eshkári were the island's storytellers, historians, and — for lack of a better word — artists. Their relationship with the Eldra was uniquely auditory: where the Velthari felt the Weft through touch and the Korvaan felt stone through heat, the Eshkári heard the echo-field. They perceived Eldra-fluctuations as sound — a constant, layered harmonic that they called the Hum. Their druids could distinguish individual voices within the Hum: the bass of deep stone, the tenor of running water, the soprano of wind through canopy, the percussive crackle of cooling lava.
The Eshkári translated the Hum into song. Their oral tradition — the longest continuous musical tradition on the planet — encoded ecological information, tribal history, navigational data, and spiritual teaching into complex polyphonic compositions that could last for days. A trained Eshkári singer could perform a song that simultaneously told the story of a historical event, described the route between two settlements, catalogued the plants growing along that route, and predicted the weather for the next three days. The songs were not metaphorical. They were data, compressed into a format that the Giants' long-lived, echo-sensitive minds could decompress through listening. Losing an Eshkári elder was like losing a library.
Eshkári giants were the smallest tribe physically (averaging 12 feet) and the most varied in appearance — their nomadic range exposed them to multiple ecological zones, and their intermarriage patterns were the least restricted of any tribe. Their distinguishing feature was their voices: deep, resonant, with a harmonic range that human ears could feel in their chests. They wore whatever was practical for their current location, but always carried a throatstone — a small, echo-dense pebble worn on a cord around the neck, tuned through years of contact with the wearer's echo-field to resonate at their personal frequency. An Eshkári's throatstone was the most intimate object they possessed. It was buried with them. Taking a living Eshkári's throatstone was the closest thing Giant culture had to a killing offense.
5. The Hrundvaal — "The Still Ones"
Highland giants. The Hrundvaal occupied the high ridges and plateaus above the Thornwood's canopy, in the alpine zone where the air was thin, the wind was constant, and the echo-field had a different character: clearer, sharper, less layered than the dense warmth of the forest floor. The Hrundvaal were the island's astronomers and weather-workers. Their echo-sensitivity was atmospheric — they felt the sky the way the Velthari felt roots and the Dyrholmar felt water. A Hrundvaal druid standing on a ridge could sense storm systems forming over the open ocean days before they reached the island, feel the pressure differentials that preceded earthquakes (an invaluable skill on a volcanic island), and — according to their own traditions — perceive the faint echo-emissions of the two suns and the two moons, which they mapped into a cosmological framework more sophisticated than anything on the mainland.
The Hrundvaal were contemplatives. Their culture valued silence, observation, and patience to a degree that other tribes found unnerving. A Hrundvaal greeting involved standing quietly in the other person's presence for several minutes before speaking — long enough to "hear their weather," meaning to sense the other person's echo-field and gauge their emotional state. Rushing this process was not merely rude; it was considered dangerous, like approaching a cliff edge at a run.
Hrundvaal giants were lean and long-limbed, with pale, almost white skin and silver-grey hair — pigmentation adapted to high-altitude UV exposure. They averaged 13-14 feet. Their garments were wind-resistant layers of felted mammoth wool, and they were the tribe most associated with the white mammoths, which they herded on the high plateaus. Their settlements were stone cairns and wind-shelters, deliberately minimal — the Hrundvaal believed that a home should leave no more mark on the land than a sleeping animal.
6. The Gahlmarr — "Blood of the Mountain"
Cave-dwellers. The Gahlmarr occupied the extensive cavern systems that honeycombed Urdrath's lower slopes — natural tunnels carved by ancient lava tubes, expanded over millennia by the Gahlmarr into a subterranean civilization of extraordinary complexity. Their echo-sensitivity was geological: they felt the mountain's internal structure the way a physician feels a patient's pulse. A Gahlmarr druid could detect magma movements deep within Urdrath's chamber system, predict eruption timing with remarkable accuracy, and sense the stability of tunnel walls by pressing their ear to the stone.
The Gahlmarr were the tribe most directly threatened by Urdrath's intensification. Their tunnels, which had been stable for thousands of years, began collapsing as the magma chamber expanded. The Gahlmarr lost more of their population to the volcano than any other tribe — entire family networks buried alive in tunnel collapses, scalded by unexpected magma intrusions, or asphyxiated by volcanic gas that their druids failed to sense in time because the mountain's echo-signature was changing faster than their models could track.
Gahlmarr giants were the broadest and most powerfully built (13 feet but heavily muscled, weighing as much as the taller Velthari), with coal-dark skin, luminous amber eyes adapted to underground darkness, and a distinctive bioluminescent pattern on their forearms — faint blue-green lines that glowed in total darkness, an echo-biological adaptation unique to their tribe. They wore stone-fiber and lichen-cloth, decorated with cave-crystal and phosphorescent fungal pigments.
7. The Solveig — "Walkers Between"
The healers. Not a geographically defined tribe but a kinship network distributed across all other tribes — a family line whose members were born with unusually high biological echo-density and a corresponding gift for echo-work applied to living bodies. A Solveig healer could feel disease the way a Gahlmarr felt unstable stone: as a disruption in the patient's echo-lattice, a wrongness that could be sensed through touch and, with skill, corrected. Their healing was not miraculous — they could not cure what the body could not cure itself — but they could accelerate healing dramatically, calm pain, reduce fever, and in some cases restart hearts that had stopped.
The Solveig were rare. At any given time, perhaps two hundred to three hundred existed across the entire island. They did not marry within their own line (their echo-density was so high that Solveig-Solveig pairings produced children with sensory overload disorders), instead pairing with partners from other tribes and producing offspring who might or might not inherit the gift. A Solveig child manifested between the ages of eight and twelve — usually by instinctively laying hands on a sick animal or injured sibling and producing a visible acceleration of healing. The child was then claimed by the Solveig kinship network and trained, regardless of which tribe's territory they were born in.
Solveig giants had no distinctive physical appearance beyond a tendency toward slenderness and an unusual warmth to their skin — other Giants described touching a Solveig as "putting your hand near a fire that doesn't burn." They wore whatever garments were customary in their host tribe's territory, with one universal marker: a pale blue cord woven into their hair, dyed with a phosphorescent lichen that glowed faintly in darkness. The cord marked them as healers and, in Giant tradition, guaranteed them safe passage through any tribal territory and immunity from any inter-tribal dispute. A tribe that harmed a Solveig was shunned by all other tribes until restitution was made. In eight thousand years of history, this happened exactly twice.
8. The Thundrekk — "Storm-Striders"
Warriors. The Thundrekk were not a standing army — the Giants had no such concept — but a martial tradition that existed across tribal lines, similar to the Solveig but defined by temperament rather than bloodline. Giants who were drawn to physicality, to competition, to the defense of territory and the resolution of disputes through controlled violence, gravitated toward the Thundrekk tradition. They trained together, developed combat techniques scaled to their enormous bodies, and served as the island's de facto military when threats arose — primarily from the island's predatory fauna (echo-saturated megapredators that could threaten even a Giant) and from the rare inter-tribal disputes that escalated beyond verbal resolution.
Thundrekk training was brutal by Giant standards and would be lethal by human standards. Initiates underwent a year-long series of trials: climbing Urdrath's active slopes, swimming the Screamwater's edge, wrestling the island's largest predators (a practice that, combined with Eldra-communication, produced a strange, respectful combat — the predator was not killed if it submitted, and the initiate was not rescued if they failed). A Giant who completed the trials was marked with ritual scarring — volcanic glass drawn across the chest in patterns that recorded their tribal origin, their mentor's lineage, and the trials they had completed.
Thundrekk giants had no unified appearance but tended to be the most physically imposing members of whatever tribe they came from. They wore the heaviest practical garments — mammoth-hide armor, volcanic-glass weapons (swords and axes scaled to their size that would serve as battering rams in human hands), and shields carved from single pieces of Thornwood hardwood, reinforced with Korvaan metalwork.
The Thundrekk tradition was the closest thing the Giants had to a cross-tribal institution. A Thundrekk's loyalty was to the tradition first and their birth-tribe second — a principle that kept the martial class from becoming any single tribe's weapon. In practice, this meant that inter-tribal disputes were arbitrated by Thundrekk councils where warriors from both disputing tribes sat together and judged, a system that worked precisely because the arbitrators' primary loyalty was to the code rather than to either party.
9. The Ysvari — "The Bone-Keepers"
The death-workers. A small, ancient tribe concentrated in a single, sacred location: the Bonewood, a grove of petrified Thornwood trees on the island's western coast where, for reasons no druid had ever explained, the echo-field behaved differently. In the rest of the island, a dying Giant's echo-lattice dissolved into the surrounding environment — absorbed by the Weft, by nearby trees, by the soil, by the air. In the Bonewood, it stayed. The petrified trunks held echo-imprints of every Giant who had ever died there, layered like sediment, creating a repository of fragmentary consciousness stretching back to the earliest recorded history.
The Ysvari maintained the Bonewood and served as the island's funeral priests. When a Giant died — anywhere on the island — the Ysvari were summoned to perform the Rite of Carrying: a ritual in which the Ysvari druid Eldra-melded with the dying person, absorbed the last fragments of their consciousness, and then carried those fragments (sometimes over weeks of travel) to the Bonewood, where they were released into the petrified trunks. The process was agonizing for the druid. Each Carrying left a residue — the dead person's strongest emotions, their most vivid memories, their deepest fears — that the Ysvari druid carried for the rest of their own life. Elderly Ysvari were visibly burdened: slow-moving, distant-eyed, their speech interspersed with words and phrases from the dead. They were respected absolutely and avoided instinctively. To be a Ysvari was to be necessary and lonely.
Ysvari giants were gaunt, with deep-set eyes and prematurely grey hair regardless of age. Their skin had a faintly translucent quality — other Giants said you could see "the Carried" moving beneath it, though this was probably metaphorical. They wore undyed linen and bone ornament, and they spoke rarely, conserving their energy for the Carrying.
10. The Feldrunne — "Seed-Callers"
Farmers. The Feldrunne managed the island's agriculture — which, on Eldraholm, was less agriculture and more negotiation. In an echo-saturated environment, plants were not passive. They responded to the druids' intentions, growing toward or away from echo-projected stimuli, producing more or fewer fruit depending on the emotional state of the cultivators, and — in the case of the oldest, most echo-dense crop lineages — exhibiting behaviors that blurred the line between plant and animal. The Feldrunne did not plow, plant, and harvest. They communed, encouraged, and asked.
A Feldrunne farm was not a cleared field. It was a managed section of Thornwood undergrowth where edible species were echo-encouraged to proliferate: tuber networks that expanded when a Feldrunne druid knelt and pressed their hands into the soil; fruit-bearing vines that ripened faster when sung to (a practice shared with the Eshkári); grain-analogues that grew in volcanic ash and tasted of smoke and iron. The Feldrunne's greatest achievement was the deep garden — a network of echo-linked root systems that could be "played" like an instrument, directing nutrients and water to specific plants across acres of territory. A master Feldrunne could feed a hundred Giants from a garden that, to a human observer, would look like untouched wilderness.
Feldrunne giants were earth-toned — brown skin, green-flecked brown eyes, thick fingers perpetually dirt-stained. They were medium-height (13 feet) and strongly built, with a patience that other tribes found either admirable or maddening. They wore plant-fiber garments and smelled, always, of rich soil.
11. The Brúnaveld — "The Mammoth-Kin"
The herders. While the Hrundvaal were associated with the high-plateau mammoths, the Brúnaveld were defined by them. Their entire culture — settlement patterns, migration routes, spiritual practice, social structure — revolved around the care and companionship of the white mammoths. A Brúnaveld Giant was bonded to a specific mammoth from childhood, chosen through a matching ritual in which a juvenile mammoth and a juvenile Giant were placed together in an open meadow and observed. If the mammoth approached the child voluntarily — drawn by an echo-resonance between their individual fields — the bond was declared. If not, another mammoth was tried. Some children were never matched. These unbonded Brúnaveld were not stigmatized but were considered to have different destinies; many became Solveig healers or Eshkári singers.
The bonded pair lived together for the rest of the mammoth's life (mammoths lived roughly 120 years — shorter than the Giants, meaning most Brúnaveld experienced the death of their bondmate and the shattering grief that followed). The Eldra-melding between a Brúnaveld and their mammoth was deeper and more constant than any other Giant-animal relationship: not a conversation but a co-existence, two echo-fields overlapping until the boundary between them blurred. A bonded Brúnaveld felt their mammoth's hunger, pain, and contentment as their own. The mammoth felt the Giant's emotions in return. Separation for more than a few days produced a physical ache in both parties — the Eldra-fields stretching like overstretched muscle, cramping and weakening.
Brúnaveld giants had the most varied appearance of any tribe (their gene pool mixed freely with the Hrundvaal and Feldrunne, whose territories overlapped), but were recognizable by their garments: mammoth-wool felt, always white or cream, and by the smell — a warm, animal musk that no amount of bathing could fully remove, because the Brúnaveld did not bathe to remove it. It was the smell of their bondmate. It was who they were.
12. The Aldruun — "The First-Named"
The elders. Not a tribe in the conventional sense but a designation: the Aldruun were the Giants who had lived long enough to become something more than individual people. A Giant who reached approximately 180 years of age — rare, perhaps one in twenty — underwent a gradual change that the other tribes called the Deepening. Their echo-density, already high, continued to concentrate rather than diminishing with age (as happened in most Giants past their prime). Their sensitivity expanded. Their personality softened — not into senility but into something vaster, less individual, more porous. An Aldruun elder sitting in the Thornwood felt the forest not as an environment but as an extension of themselves. An Aldruun elder touching the ground felt the magma chamber miles below the way a young Giant felt a warm stone in their hand.
The Aldruun did not govern. They did not command. They simply were, and their presence influenced the communities around them the way a large stone influences a stream — redirecting flow without effort. When disputes arose that Thundrekk arbitration couldn't resolve, the disputing parties went to the nearest Aldruun and sat with them. Often, the mere experience of being in an Aldruun's echo-field was enough to resolve the dispute: the elder's vast, calm resonance dampened the emotional turbulence of the conflict, allowing the parties to see each other clearly for the first time.
At the time of the evacuation, there were nine living Aldruun. All nine chose to stay on the island. They were too deeply embedded in Eldraholm's echo-field to survive the Screamwater crossing — their expanded sensitivity would have been destroyed by the barrier's chaotic emissions. They knew this. They chose to die with the island that had become, in a very real sense, their body.

III. THE CONSOLIDATION
How Twelve Became Three
The twelve tribes coexisted for millennia with minimal conflict. Disputes over territory, resources, or mating were resolved through Thundrekk arbitration, Eshkári mediation (the singers served as neutral historians who could recall the exact terms of every agreement in living memory), or simple Aldruun presence. Wars, in the human sense, did not occur. The population was too small, the island too interconnected, and the Eldra-field too binding — a Giant who harmed another Giant felt the victim's pain through the ambient echo-field, making sustained violence psychologically unbearable.
The consolidation was not political. It was ecological.
As Urdrath intensified — the process accelerating sharply about three hundred years before the story — the Ashlands expanded, the Thornwood retreated, and the twelve tribes were compressed into shrinking territory. The Gahlmarr lost their caverns. The Eshkári lost their transitional zone. The Feldrunne lost their deepest gardens. Tribe after tribe was displaced, forced to share territory with neighbors they had previously maintained comfortable distances from.
The consolidation happened naturally, driven by geography:
The Wisemen — A coalition of the Velthari, Eshkári, Ysvari, and Aldruun (the spiritual, cultural, and death-working traditions). They consolidated around the remaining Thornwood groves and the Bonewood, preserving the island's spiritual infrastructure. The Velthari, as the largest and most central tribe, became the coalition's dominant voice, but all four traditions were represented in council.
The Warriors — A coalition of the Thundrekk, Gahlmarr, and Dyrholmar (the martial, underground, and coastal traditions). Driven together by shared displacement — the Gahlmarr fleeing the collapsing caverns, the Dyrholmar retreating from rising sea temperatures that disrupted their coastal ecology — they organized around the Thundrekk's cross-tribal structure, creating a unified defensive and logistical network. The Warriors were the faction that first argued for evacuation and that organized the fleet's construction.
The Builders — A coalition of the Korvaan, Feldrunne, Brúnaveld, Hrundvaal, and Solveig (the crafters, farmers, herders, weather-workers, and healers). The most practically diverse coalition, united by the shared imperative of keeping the remaining population alive as territory shrank. The Korvaan, with their construction expertise, became the coalition's public face, but the Feldrunne's ability to grow food in shrinking space and the Solveig's healing were equally critical.
The three-faction system was not a government. It was a survival structure — a way of organizing the island's remaining seven to eight thousand Giants (the population had fallen from a peak of thirty-five thousand over three centuries of volcanic displacement, starvation, and despair) into functional groups that could coordinate the increasingly desperate effort to keep the species alive.

IV. THE CROSSING
The Decision
The evacuation was not unanimous. The Wisemen faction opposed it — the Velthari argued that leaving the Thornwood was spiritual suicide, and the Ysvari insisted that the Bonewood could not be abandoned without losing eight thousand years of accumulated consciousness. The Aldruun, consulted individually, agreed: departure meant the death of everything that made them Giants rather than merely large animals.
The Warriors and Builders overruled them — not through force (unthinkable) but through a ritual called the Gathering of Voices, the closest thing Giant culture had to a democratic assembly. Every Giant on the island — every single one capable of standing — gathered in a clearing at the Thornwood's edge, and each spoke or sang or stood in silence according to their position. The Gathering lasted eleven days. At its end, the decision was clear: more voices called for departure than for death.
The Aldruun accepted the result. They also announced they would not leave.
The Fleet
The Korvaan built the ships. Twelve vessels — the largest constructed objects in Giant history, each requiring the felling of Thornwood trees for the first time in the species' existence. The felling was performed as a funeral: each tree was Eldra-melded with by Velthari druids before the axe fell, its accumulated echo-consciousness carried to the Bonewood by Ysvari priests. The shipwrights wept as they worked. The trees, the druids reported, did not resist. They understood.
Each ship was designed to carry approximately five hundred Giants plus livestock, supplies, and seed-stock. The total evacuation capacity: six thousand. At the time of departure, the island's population was approximately seven thousand. One thousand would stay — the Aldruun, their closest attendants, those too frail to survive the crossing, and a small contingent of Velthari who refused to leave the Thornwood on principle.
The Brúnaveld loaded their bonded mammoths onto the ships — an engineering nightmare, as each adult mammoth weighed as much as twenty Giants. The Feldrunne carried seed-pouches and root-cuttings. The Eshkári memorized the complete song-archive of the civilization, distributing it across multiple singers on different ships so that no single loss could destroy the whole.
The Screamwater
The fleet entered the Eldra-Veil on a windless morning. The druids had prepared for weeks — meditating, building their echo-reserves, rehearsing techniques for projecting calm across the fleet's collective consciousness. It was not enough.
The Screamwater hit them like a wall of noise. Giants collapsed on deck, hands over ears, screaming. The mammoths panicked, thrashing in their holds, splintering timbers. The Dyrholmar pilots — the only Giants with any experience near the barrier — fought to maintain course, but their navigational echo-sense was overwhelmed by the chaotic emissions. Ships drifted apart in the first hour. By the end of the first day, the fleet had scattered.
The barrier zone extended roughly fifty miles. At the speed the Giants' ships could manage — slow, wallowing, never designed for open ocean — the crossing took three days. Three days of unrelenting echo-assault. Giants went mad. Giants died — not from physical injury but from echo-overload, their nervous systems shutting down under stimuli their biology was never built to process. Mammoths died. Ships foundered as crews became too incapacitated to manage sails and rudders.
When the survivors emerged from the barrier's far edge, the silence was worse than the screaming had been. The open ocean's echo-field was empty — not hostile, not painful, but absent, a void where the warmth had been. For a species that had never experienced echo-deprivation, the effect was devastating. The surviving druids called it the Great Quiet. Many Giants simply stopped functioning — sitting motionless on deck, staring at nothing, breathing but not living. The Solveig healers worked without rest, cycling between catatonic patients, trying to restart echo-fields that had been shattered by the barrier and were now starving in the void.
The Losses
Of the twelve ships that entered the Screamwater, four emerged from the barrier zone intact enough to continue sailing. Of those four, the ocean took three more over the following weeks — storms, hull failure, crew attrition. The Giants were not sailors. Their ships were built for a crossing, not a voyage. They had no charts, no knowledge of ocean currents, no concept of navigation beyond the Dyrholmar's echo-sense, which was useless in the echo-dead open water.
One ship reached the coast of Mundus mostly intact. It ran aground on a reef off the Frozen South's coast. The hull broke apart. The survivors who could swim or wade made it to shore.
The other three survivors arrived separately — individual Giants who had been washed overboard from failing ships, who clung to wreckage, who drifted for days or weeks before washing up on distant shores. They arrived alone. They arrived with nothing.
The Four Who Arrived
1. In the Frozen South — Two survivors.
Thyra of the Brúnaveld — A mammoth-herder, female, approximately 90 years old (middle-aged by Giant standards). She arrived from the ship that broke on the reef, wading ashore with the body of her bondmate mammoth dragging behind her in the surf — the mammoth had drowned in the wreck, and Thyra had tied its corpse to her body rather than let it sink. She buried the mammoth on the beach in Clan Raudbjorn territory and then sat beside the grave for three days without moving. The Raudbjorn scouts who found her thought she was dead. She was not dead. She was performing the Carrying — absorbing her bondmate's echo-remnants into herself without a Ysvari priest to help, a process that left her permanently changed. She carries the mammoth's consciousness inside her like a second heartbeat.
Thyra is not a leader. She is a herder without a herd, a bonded partner without a bond, a member of a civilization she may never see again. She is also the only surviving Giant in the Frozen South who has any living animal with her: a single juvenile mammoth, barely weaned, that survived the wreck by climbing onto floating debris. The calf has imprinted on Thyra as a surrogate mother. It is, as far as she knows, the last of its kind on this side of the ocean.
Grevaan of the Gahlmarr — A cave-dweller, male, approximately 65 (young adult). He arrived from the same wreck but washed up on a different stretch of coastline, several miles from Thyra. Grevaan is a tunnel-engineer and stone-reader whose entire life was spent underground. The open sky unnerves him. The cold doesn't bother him — the Gahlmarr were adapted to the temperature-stable environment of deep caves, and the Frozen South's chill feels familiar in a way that the open air does not — but the space does. He is perpetually looking for walls. He sleeps in crevices, in shallow caves, under overhangs. The Frozen South's fjords and cliff faces are the closest thing to home he has found.
Grevaan's echo-sensitivity is geological. He can feel the Frozen South's bedrock the way he felt Urdrath's tunnels — and what he feels alarms him. The continent's echo-field is shockingly thin. Stone that should hum is silent. Soil that should pulse is dead. He has pressed his palms against the Frozen South's granite and felt nothing, and the absence frightened him worse than the Screamwater did.
2. In the Heartlands — One survivor.
Sëdhra of the Velthari — A root-listener, female, approximately 140 (elder, but not yet Aldruun). She washed ashore alone, clinging to a section of hull timber that still carried faint echoes of the Thornwood tree it had been carved from. She spent the first days on the mainland pressing her ear to the ground, searching desperately for the Weft — the underground root-network that had been the foundation of her entire sensory world. It was not there. This continent had trees, but they were silent — their root systems unconnected, their echo-fields negligible, their trunks as mute as fence posts. For Sëdhra, it was like going deaf.
She landed in the southern Heartlands where the Silver Mountains meet the sea, near the Sandsword holding. Venania Sarko was the first human she encountered. To Sëdhra, the encounter was as shocking as it was to Venania: Sëdhra had never seen a creature that was simultaneously echo-bearing (all humans carry faint echoes) and echo-deaf (no human in the Heartlands has the sensitivity to feel anything). To her senses, humans were like candles that had been lit and immediately snuffed — the wick was there, the wax was there, but the flame was out. She found this profoundly sad.
Sëdhra is the oldest and most knowledgeable of the four survivors. She carries the deepest understanding of the Eldra, the most extensive oral history, and the greatest spiritual authority. She is also the most psychologically damaged by the crossing — her expanded Velthari sensitivity made the Screamwater crossing nearly fatal, and the Great Quiet afterward left scars in her echo-field that have not healed. She hears things that are not there — fragments of the Thornwood's Weft, echoing in her damaged perception like phantom pain in a severed limb. She is not mad. But she is haunted by a forest that exists only in her memory.
Three animals survived with Sëdhra: a pair of Ashland fire-salamanders (small, heat-adapted amphibians whose skin glows faintly with bioluminescent echo-patterns) and a juvenile Thornwood canopy-hawk (a raptor with a six-foot wingspan and feathers that shift color with the echo-field's fluctuations — currently shifting constantly, confused by the mainland's alien frequencies). These creatures are radically unlike anything in the mainland bestiary. The fire-salamanders, in particular, are echo-dense enough to produce visible effects on their environment: plants near them grow faster, insects are drawn to their warmth, and the soil they sleep on becomes richer. Two small animals. The beginning of an ecological revolution.
3. On the Red Coast — One survivor.
Drothek of the Korvaan — A forge-blood, male, approximately 50 (young). The youngest and most physically resilient of the four survivors, Drothek washed up on the Red Coast's copper-rich shoreline after spending what he estimates was two weeks adrift on open water. He survived by entering a self-induced state the Korvaan call forge-sleep — a deep metabolic slowdown that the Ashlands-edge dwellers developed to survive volcanic gas events, during which the body's systems reduce to minimum function and the echo-field contracts into a tight, protective shell around the core organs. He awoke on a beach of red sand, dehydrated to the point of organ failure, and dragged himself to a freshwater spring by following the faint echo-signature of underground water — the only Eldra he could feel in the barren coastal landscape.
Drothek is the most practically skilled of the four. He can work stone and metal with an expertise that no human smith can match, feel structural weaknesses in buildings and bridges by touching them, and sense mineral deposits underground. He is also the most psychologically intact — the Korvaan temperament is pragmatic, forward-looking, and resistant to despair. Where Sëdhra mourns the lost Thornwood and Thyra carries her dead mammoth's ghost, Drothek has already begun working. Within days of his arrival, he found a cave, shaped it into a shelter using his bare hands and the local stone's echo-lattice (thin as it was, it was enough for a Korvaan), and began gathering materials. He does not understand this world. He does not know where the others are, or if anyone else survived. But he is alive, and there is stone to shape, and a Korvaan does not sit idle while there is stone to shape.
No animals survived with Drothek. He is entirely alone.

V. THE ECHO-BLEED
What the Breach Is Doing
The rupture in the Eldra-Veil is not a hole. It is a collapse. The barrier's integrity depended on total containment — a closed system of self-reinforcing echo-density. The fleet's passage punched through that system in a line roughly three miles wide (the dispersal pattern of the twelve ships as they entered the Screamwater). Through that line, the island's concentrated Eldra is bleeding into the open ocean.
The process is slow by human timescales — noticeable only over decades — but catastrophically fast by ecological ones. The island's echo-field, which took millennia to reach its current saturation, is draining at a rate that will reduce it to mainland levels within approximately two centuries. For the Giants who remained — and for the Thornwood, the Bonewood, the mammoth herds, the entire echo-adapted biome — this is a death sentence.
On the mainland side, the effect is the opposite: a gradual, almost imperceptible increase in ambient echo-density, concentrated along the ocean currents that carry the bleed northward toward Mundus. The increase is far too slight for anyone to notice yet — it will be years, possibly decades, before the effects become measurable. But the four surviving Giants, each functioning as a localized echo-node, are producing immediate effects in their vicinity:
Around Thyra and Grevaan (Frozen South): The mammoth calf's echo-field, combined with Thyra's and Grevaan's, is producing a zone of enhanced echo-density roughly a mile in radius around their respective locations. Within this zone, the Frozen South's sparse vegetation is growing noticeably faster. Lichen colonizes bare rock in weeks rather than years. The local fauna — arctic foxes, seals, sea-birds — are behaving with unusual boldness and coordination. The Raudbjorn clanspeople who live nearest to Thyra's landing site have begun reporting strange dreams — vivid, emotionally intense, featuring landscapes they've never seen (Thornwood imagery bleeding through the ambient echo-field). They don't know what's causing it. They are unsettled.
Around Sëdhra (Heartlands): The Velthari elder's expanded echo-field, damaged as it is, is still immensely powerful by mainland standards. In the vicinity of her landing site, the Silver Mountain foothills are experiencing what a Feldrunne farmer would recognize as a localized awakening — trees leafing out weeks early, wildflowers blooming in profusion, insects appearing in unusual density. The fire-salamanders are amplifying the effect, their bioluminescent echo-patterns functioning as miniature resonance chambers that strengthen the ambient field beyond what Sëdhra alone could produce. The canopy-hawk, circling overhead, is extending the effect vertically — its echo-dense feathers scattering Eldra-stimuli into the upper atmosphere like a living broadcast antenna.
Venania Sarko, the hunter's daughter, lives at the epicenter of this effect. She doesn't understand what she's feeling. She only knows that the world has become louder since the enormous woman walked out of the sea.
Around Drothek (Red Coast): The Korvaan's contracted, forge-trained echo-field is producing subtler effects — his Eldra-projection is tight and focused rather than broad, influencing the stone and mineral environment more than the biological one. The cave he shaped has become a minor echo-node: the walls hum at a frequency that human ears can't hear but human bodies can feel. Copper ore in the surrounding rock is developing a faint luminescence — Korvaan echo-work interacting with the metal's natural resonance. If any Red Coast miner discovers this cave, they will find copper that glows, and they will not know what to make of it.

VI. GIANT RELIGION — THE LIVING WORLD
The Giants did not worship gods. They did not have gods. The concept — a conscious being above the world, separate from it, issuing commands — was incomprehensible to a species that lived inside the Eldra-field the way fish live inside water. You do not worship water. You breathe it.
What the Giants had was closer to animism, but animism is too weak a word. The mainland's animistic traditions — the Frozen South's spirit-beliefs, the Xarian river-god cults — attribute consciousness to natural features: this river has a spirit, this mountain has a will. The Giants didn't attribute consciousness to nature. They experienced it. The Thornwood was not like a conscious being. It was a conscious being — fragmented, distributed, non-verbal, operating on timescales that made Giant lives look like heartbeats, but present in a way that no amount of metaphor could capture. Urdrath was not like an angry father. Urdrath was — something. Not angry. Not fatherly. But aware, in its geological way, of the creatures living on its slopes, and indifferent to them the way an ocean is indifferent to the fish.
The Giants' spiritual practice was not prayer. It was attention. The highest spiritual act in Giant culture was to sit quietly in a place and listen — not with the ears but with the echo-field, opening your sensitivity as wide as it could go and simply receiving whatever the landscape chose to send. The Hrundvaal did this with the sky. The Dyrholmar did this with the ocean. The Velthari did this with the Weft. The Gahlmarr did this with deep stone. Each tribe had its own version, but the core practice was the same: be still, be open, be small. Let the world talk. It usually did.
The Giants' relationship to death was shaped by the Ysvari tradition: the Carrying, the Bonewood, the layered echo-consciousness of eight millennia of ancestors. They did not fear death. They feared silence — the possibility that the dead might be lost rather than Carried, that their echo-remnants might dissolve into nothing rather than joining the vast, slow consciousness of the Bonewood. The evacuation's greatest trauma was not the physical danger. It was the knowledge that the Bonewood was being left behind, that the entire ancestral memory of the species was trapped on a dying island, and that every Giant who died on the crossing would die unCarried — their consciousness scattering into the echo-void of the open ocean, lost forever.
The four survivors carry this weight. Thyra performed a makeshift Carrying for her mammoth — a bond-partner, not a Giant, but the principle was the same — and it damaged her. The other three have no Ysvari training. If one of them dies on the mainland, there is no one to Carry them. They will be the first Giants in eight thousand years to die alone.

VII. LANGUAGE
Giant speech is physically impossible for humans to replicate. Their vocal apparatus produces sounds in frequency ranges that human throats cannot reach — deep, subsonic vibrations that travel through stone and soil as much as through air. A Giant speaking at conversational volume produces a sound that nearby humans would feel in their bones and organs more than hear with their ears. The emotional content of Giant speech is transmitted partly through the echo-field: the speaker's emotional state modulates their echo-projection, adding a layer of meaning that exists below and alongside the words themselves. Two Giants speaking to each other are simultaneously talking and feeling — exchanging linguistic content and emotional resonance in a blended signal that human neurology cannot fully decode.
The Giants' name for their language is Eldrasong — a term that reflects the Eshkári influence on the broader culture. It is not literally song (most Giants are not Eshkári-trained singers), but it is closer to song than to speech: tonal, rhythmic, with meaning carried as much by pitch and tempo as by vocabulary. A single Giant word can mean different things depending on the emotional resonance the speaker projects alongside it.
A few terms that the four survivors will introduce to the mainland, filtered through human ears' imperfect reception:
Eldra — The warmth-before-fire. The echo-field. The divine residue. Untranslatable in its full meaning, but humans will approximate it.
Urdrath — The Burning Father. Will become the mainland's name for the Giants' homeland volcano.
Velthari, Korvaan, Dyrholmar, etc. — Tribal names, which will initially be heard by humans as personal names or titles.
Eldra-melding — The shared-consciousness ritual. Humans will struggle with this concept.
The Great Quiet — What followed the Screamwater. Will become the Giants' shorthand for the mainland's echo-depleted state.
Thundrekk — Will be adopted by some humans as a word meaning "warrior" or "champion," losing its original meaning of a cross-tribal martial tradition.

VIII. WHAT THEY LEFT BEHIND
On Eldraholm, the remaining population — roughly one thousand Giants — faces a double extinction. The volcano continues to expand, consuming the Thornwood from within. The Eldra-Veil breach continues to drain the echo-field, weakening every biological process that depends on it. The Thornwood trees are growing more slowly. The mammoth herds are producing fewer calves. The druids' abilities are diminishing — what once required a moment's concentration now requires an hour's effort, and some tasks that were routine a decade ago are now impossible.
The nine Aldruun feel the drain most acutely. Their expanded echo-fields, once vast enough to encompass entire groves, are contracting. They are becoming smaller, more individual, more alone — a process they experience as a slow death of the self, a shrinking of consciousness from something oceanic to something merely human-sized. One of the nine — the oldest, a Velthari elder approximately 210 years old — has already entered a state the others recognize as terminal: her echo-field has contracted to the boundary of her own skin, and she sits motionless in the Bonewood, unable to feel the ancestors she spent a century communing with, staring at petrified trunks that are now as silent to her as they would be to a human.
The Ysvari priests are performing Carryings more frequently as the weakened population sickens and dies. But the Bonewood itself is changing — the petrified trunks, deprived of their echo-field's reinforcement, are beginning to lose the imprints they've held for millennia. The oldest layers, eight thousand years deep, are fading first — the most ancient ancestors dissolving into silence. The Ysvari can feel it happening: a gradual thinning of the voices, like a choir losing its lowest notes one by one. They do not speak of it to the others. There is no comfort to offer.
The Korvaan remnant — the builders who stayed — are attempting to seal the breach. They have sailed to the Screamwater's edge and tried to use their forge-craft to rebuild the Veil's structure, projecting concentrated echo-fields into the gap the way they would fill a crack in a tunnel wall. It is not working. The Veil was an emergent phenomenon, not a constructed one — you cannot rebuild an emergent property by applying brute force. The Korvaan know this. They keep trying anyway. A Korvaan does not sit idle while there is stone to shape, even if the stone is falling.
If the four survivors on the mainland ever learn what their crossing has done to the people they left behind, the knowledge will be the heaviest thing they carry — heavier than grief, heavier than exile, heavier than the Great Quiet. They broke the world to save themselves. The world is dying because they lived.

MUNDUS AT 1308 AF — The Living Continent
A Regional Overview

THE SHAPE OF THE WORLD
Mundus is a single vast continent — the only major landmass its inhabitants have ever known (until this year). It stretches from the arid northern plateau and the island of Nionia in the northwest, down through temperate heartland and sunlit vineyard country, south through forests and ironwork valleys into the frozen fjords and wind-scoured steppe at the continent's ragged tail. The eastern coast fractures into islands — the Teeth — and the jutting peninsula of Xaria, separated from the mainland by dense jungle and a culture that might as well be another planet. The western seaboard drops in a long vertical spine, rocky and fjord-cut, from the Horns' salt-sprayed ports down to the Frozen South's ice-bitten capes.
The interior is dominated by the Heartlands' river systems — vast, fertile, and fought over for millennia. Mountain ranges divide the regions like vertebrae: the Silver Mountains separating the Heartlands from the southern coast, the Fyrhold range walling Rosland's mining country, the volcanic ridges of the Red Coast baking under permanent haze. Between these barriers, the land is green, old, and contested.
Travel time matters. A fast rider on good roads covers the distance from Vornhold (northern Heartlands) to Fairhaven (Rosland's capital) in roughly two weeks. A merchant caravan, loaded and cautious, takes a month. A pilgrim walking to Faithir from the Red Coast might spend three months on the road. The world is large enough that regional cultures developed in genuine isolation for centuries, and small enough that trade, war, and religion keep them tangled together.

NIONIA — The Marble Isle
The Feel
White. Everything is white. That is the first thing any visitor notices stepping off the boat at Vellium's harbor — the docks are white marble, the warehouses are white plaster over white stone, the street cobbles are pale granite worn smooth by centuries of foot traffic, and the light bouncing off all of it is blinding until your eyes adjust. Nionia is an island that has been quarried into beauty and quarried into submission in the same motion. The mountains of the interior — the Marchia Ferrus — are scarred with open-pit mines and marble cuts that look, from a distance, like wounds in pale flesh. The lowlands are terraced with olive groves and vineyards, but even these have a manicured, controlled quality — nature permitted to exist within boundaries that human hands have drawn.
The air smells of marble dust, salt spray, incense, and the particular acrid sweetness of Ashleaf smoke drifting from dockworkers' pipes. In the capital, you add to that the scent of rendered whale-oil (used in the street lamps that burn all night — Jous has decreed that darkness is a breeding ground for sin) and the faint, cloying tang of the cleansing incense that the Pure Way's priests burn in bronze censers on every major corner.
The People
Nionians are Mediterranean in coloring — olive-to-brown skin, dark hair, features that range from sharp-boned aristocratic to broad-faced dockworker. They dress in linen and light wool, layered in the formal toga-derivative that the patrician houses still affect (a shoulder-draped wrap called a pallion, pinned with a house brooch) or the simpler belted tunic of the working class. White is the prestige color — bleached linen, chalk-whitened leather, marble-dust-powdered hair for formal occasions. Under Jous's Pure Way, white has become mandatory for clergy and encouraged for everyone else. The streets of Vellium look like a city dressed for a funeral that never ends.
Before the civil war, Nionians were loud, argumentative, theatrical in their public life — the Senate's plaza debates were spectator sport, and the tavern culture was boisterous and profane. That energy hasn't died; it's been driven underground. The taverns still roar, but they roar more quietly, and conversations stop when a white cloak passes the door. Humor has become a weapon — Nionian jokes under the Pure Way are sharp, dark, coded, told in a dialect of irony that outsiders can't always parse. A Nionian will smile while insulting you so elegantly that you thank them for it.
Architecture
Columned, domed, and terraced. Nionian buildings are designed to impress from a distance and intimidate up close. Public structures — courts, temples, baths, markets — feature the colonnaded façade inherited from the republican era: rows of fluted marble columns supporting triangular pediments carved with historical scenes. The Great Dome of Vellium (the converted Senate chamber, now Jous's cathedral) is the largest enclosed space on the continent — a hemisphere of white marble and iron ribbing that catches the afternoon sun and glows like a second moon. Private homes are built around interior courtyards, with exterior walls that present blank, fortress-like faces to the street. The wealthy live inward; the poor live upward, in tenement blocks of four or five stories that lean over narrow alleys where the sunlight never reaches the cobblestones.
Food
Olive oil is the foundation. Everything is cooked in it, dressed with it, or preserved in it. Bread is dense, sour, and baked in communal ovens. Fish — grilled, salted, stewed, pickled — is the primary protein for everyone below the patrician class. The wealthy eat lamb, kid goat, and pork sausage spiced with imported Sangrean pepper and Red Coast cumin. Cheese is sheep's milk, crumbly and sharp. Wine is mixed with water (drinking it straight is considered barbaric — a distinction Nionians maintain with aggressive cultural pride). The signature dish of Vellium's streets is teglia — a shallow pan of layered flatbread, roasted vegetables, and crumbled cheese, baked in a public oven and eaten with the hands. Street vendors sell it in greased paper for a copper.
Music
Vocal. Nionians sing — in taverns, in the baths, in the streets, at work. The traditional form is the lamento, a solo vocal piece accompanied by a stringed instrument called a kitharon (a long-necked lute with a nasal, buzzing tone). Lamentos are formally about love or loss; informally, under the Pure Way, they have become vehicles for coded political commentary. The Pure Way has introduced its own musical form — the cantus, a choral hymn sung in unison by white-robed choirs, designed to be heard from blocks away, filling the city's acoustics with the sound of collective devotion. The contrast between the raw, individual lamento and the controlled, collective cantus is the sound of Nionia's cultural civil war.

THE HORNS — Salt, Sail, and Silver Tongue
The Feel
Wet. Gray. Beautiful in the way that a storm is beautiful — all drama and danger and the smell of brine. The Horns are a peninsula of three major port cities (Westhorn, Brinehold, Nightspike) and one forest gate city (Skogrim), connected to the mainland by a dense woodland corridor and to each other by the most treacherous coastal waters on the continent. The landscape is cliffs, coves, tidal flats, and rocky headlands battered by wind that never seems to stop. Everything is damp. Wood rots. Iron rusts. Rope frays. The Horns' architecture, cuisine, and temperament are all shaped by the fundamental reality that the sea is trying to eat them and they have to rebuild constantly.
The light is extraordinary. The sun, when it breaks through the perpetual cloud cover, hits the wet stone and the churning water and produces colors that painters from the mainland travel weeks to capture — silvers, slate blues, golds that last for twenty minutes and then vanish. Horns artists are obsessed with light because light is the thing they have least of.
The People
Horns folk are stocky, wind-burned, pragmatic, and ferociously competitive. The three port cities have been rivals for centuries, and the rivalry permeates everything — which port's beer is better, whose shipwrights are faster, whose pilots are more skilled. A Westhorn man and a Brinehold woman at the same tavern will argue about the proper way to salt cod with the intensity that Heartlanders reserve for dynastic succession. The competition is real but also performative — underneath the rivalry, Horns folk recognize each other as their kind in a way that excludes mainlanders. They call non-Horns people drylanders and consider them soft.
Skin tones range from the ruddy pinkish-brown of the northern fishing villages to the darker olive-brown of Nightspike's mixed maritime population (centuries of trade with the Red Coast and the Teeth have produced a city with the continent's most diverse gene pool). Hair is typically dark, worn short or braided tight against the wind. Clothing is practical: oiled canvas jackets, leather boots treated with whale-fat to repel water, wool sweaters knitted in patterns that identify the wearer's home port (a tradition so old that the patterns have legal standing — a Brinehold pattern worn in Westhorn is considered a minor provocation). Sailors wear knotted cord jewelry — bracelets and necklaces of complex sailor's knots that indicate rank, experience, and marital status. A master pilot's knot-chain can weigh half a pound.
Architecture
Low, heavy, and built to endure. Horns buildings are stone-and-timber, with thick walls, small windows, and steep slate roofs designed to shed the constant rain. In the port cities, the waterfront districts are forests of masts, rigging, and crane-arms, with warehouses built directly into the cliff faces — their fronts opening onto the docks, their backs carved into the rock. The most distinctive feature of Horns architecture is the lantern tower — every significant building has one, a narrow turret with a glass-and-iron lamp at the top, originally designed as navigation aids for ships approaching in fog. Over centuries, the towers became status symbols: the wealthier the house, the taller and more ornate the tower. Westhorn's harbor, seen from the sea at night, is a constellation of amber lights climbing the cliff face.
Food
Seafood, obviously. But prepared with an intensity and variety that surprises mainlanders who expect boiled fish and hard bread. Brinehold's signature is saltboil — a communal pot of seawater, root vegetables, kelp, and whatever the day's catch provided, simmered over driftwood fires on the docks and served in wooden bowls to anyone who contributed an ingredient. Westhorn's cuisine is richer, influenced by trade with the mainland: smoked eel with horseradish cream, oysters roasted in their shells with garlic butter, salt-cod cakes fried in whale oil. Nightspike, with its Red Coast and Teeth trade connections, serves the spiciest food on the peninsula: grilled fish rubbed with cumin, coriander, and dried chili, wrapped in flatbread, eaten standing up at dockside stalls. Beer is the universal drink — dark, heavy, brewed with kelp-filtered seawater that gives it a minerally bite that mainlanders either love or spit out. Wine is imported, expensive, and consumed ostentatiously by anyone trying to signal that they're too refined for beer.
Music
Horns music is built on the chanty — a call-and-response work song originally designed to coordinate labor on ship decks and in the dockyards. Chanties have evolved over centuries from functional commands into a sophisticated musical tradition: multi-part harmonies, complex rhythmic patterns, and lyrics that range from obscene humor to genuine poetry. The best chanty-singers are celebrities in the port cities, performing in taverns to standing-room crowds. Instruments: the squeeze-box (a small accordion that fits in a sailor's sea-chest), the bone-whistle (carved from whale rib, producing a piercing, mournful tone that carries over wind), and drums made from barrel-heads and ship timbers. The Horns' most famous musical event is the Storm Sing — a competitive performance held during the worst winter gales, when the ports close and the population retreats indoors. Taverns compete to host the best singers, and the bragging rights last until the next storm season.

SANGREA — Sun, Blood, and Vine
The Feel
Gold. Where Nionia is white, Sangrea is gold — the gold of afternoon sun on sandstone, of ripe grapes on the vine, of Ashleaf smoke curling through warm air, of the ornate gilding that covers every surface the wealthy can reach. Sangrea occupies the continent's sun-drenched midsection: rolling hills planted with vineyards, river valleys lush with citrus and olive, and a southern border that dissolves into the tropical jungle fringe where the continent's flora shifts from Mediterranean to something wilder, wetter, and less tamed. The air is warm ten months of the year and hot for the other two. Everything ripens early and spoils fast. The culture has the same quality — passionate, short-fused, and intolerant of boredom.
The landscape is beautiful and brutally worked. The vineyards that produce Sangrea's famous wines are maintained by peasant labor under conditions that range from paternalistic to feudal. The sunstone quarries — the source of the region's mineral wealth and its bloodiest wars — scar the hills between Solé and Terrarossa territory like open sores. The rivers, dammed and diverted for irrigation, have been fought over so many times that every bridge has a plaque commemorating some battle or betrayal. Sangrea is a land that smiles while showing its teeth.
The People
Sangreans are warm-skinned, dark-haired, and expressive to a degree that Roslandic stoics find exhausting and Heartlanders find suspicious. They talk with their hands. They sing while they work. They mourn with their entire bodies — Sangrean funerals are theatrical productions, with hired mourners, processional bands, and the deceased displayed in open caskets decorated with flowers and gilded trinkets. They celebrate the same way: the Festival of the Red Grape in Castesol is a seven-day explosion of music, food, wine, bullfighting, acrobatics, and public drunkenness that draws visitors from across the continent.
Clothing is color. The peasant class wears undyed linen and leather, but anyone with a copper to spare adds color: sashes dyed with grape-skin purple, embroidered vests in sunstone-orange and vineyard-green, silk scarves traded up from the Xarian border. The noble houses are peacocks — Lord-Patrons and their courts dress in layered brocade, slashed sleeves, gold thread, and jeweled brooches the size of fists. House Solé's signature is white-and-gold; House Terrarossa's is crimson-and-black. Wearing the wrong house's colors in the wrong town can get you stabbed.
Architecture
Sangrean architecture is courtyard-centered, arched, and obsessively decorated. The style descends from the pre-imperial city-states and has evolved over centuries into something that combines the functional (thick walls against the heat, interior gardens for shade, tiled floors that cool the feet) with the extravagant (mosaic façades, carved stone balconies, wrought-iron window grilles twisted into patterns of vines and animals). The signature element is the azulejo — glazed ceramic tiles in blue, gold, and white that cover the exterior walls of public buildings and wealthy homes. In Castesol, entire streets are lined with azulejo-covered facades that shimmer in the afternoon heat like walls of liquid gold.
Country estates — the haciendas — are fortified farms: manor houses surrounded by working vineyards, stables, granaries, and worker barracks, enclosed by walls that served defensive purposes during the Sunstone Wars and now serve mostly as symbols of the lord's territorial claim. A Sangrean hacienda's gate is always ornate, always guarded, and always open during daylight — the culture demands a show of hospitality even from houses that would happily poison the guest once inside.
Food
Sangrea eats well and brags about it. The cuisine is oil, wine, bread, and meat in combinations that range from rustic to absurdly elaborate. The peasant diet: bread rubbed with garlic and olive oil (pa amb tomàquet), bean stews thickened with pork fat, grilled sausages made from every part of the pig. The noble diet: roasted lamb stuffed with herbs and dried fruit, whole fish baked in salt crust, guinea fowl in saffron sauce, and desserts involving honey, almonds, and enough sugar to fund a minor war. Wine is not a beverage; it is an identity. Every hacienda produces its own vintage, and the quality hierarchy is discussed with the seriousness that other cultures reserve for theology. A Sangrean who cannot identify a wine's region, house, and approximate vintage by taste alone is considered uneducated regardless of their actual literacy.
The Selvaverde jungle border adds a wilder layer: tropical fruit (mango, papaya, passionfruit), cacao, chili peppers, and the smoked meats that House Botano's territory produces — venison and wild boar cured over aromatic jungle wood, pungent and addictive. Botano's messenger-parrot network runs partly on bribery: the parrots are trained to expect dried mango treats at every relay station.
Music
Sangrea's musical culture is the richest on the continent. The dominant form is the copla — a song tradition that ranges from the mournful (lost love, dead sons, ruined harvests) to the celebratory (weddings, victories, successful vintages) and is always accompanied by guitar-like instruments called vihuelas, hand-drums, and castanets made from sunstone-polished hardwood. The copla is not just music; it is the primary form of cultural transmission. History, gossip, political commentary, and love declarations are all communicated through song. A talented copla singer — a cantaor — has social status comparable to a minor noble; a great one is effectively untouchable, protected by popular adoration from the political consequences of the truths they sing.
The second major tradition is the campanero culture — the bellringers. Every Sangrean town has a bell tower, and the bells serve practical functions (time-keeping, alarm, market-opening) and cultural ones (wedding announcements, funeral tolls, harvest celebrations). The campaneros form a guild with its own hierarchy, training system, and fiercely guarded bell-language — a system of rhythmic patterns that can transmit complex messages across miles of countryside. During the Sunstone Wars, the Riverbell Alarm system coordinated troop movements across distances that horse messengers couldn't cover. The campaneros are technically neutral in the Solé-Terrarossa rivalry. In practice, every bellringer knows which house pays their guild dues.

THE HEARTLANDS — Silver, River, and Old Stone
The Feel
Expansive. That is the first word. The Heartlands are big — rolling plains of wheat and barley stretching to horizons that seem to pull away from you as you ride, interrupted by river valleys so fertile that the banks are green even in winter, and punctuated by the ancient stone cities that sit at every major confluence like fat spiders in the center of their webs. The Silver Mountains wall the southern edge, snow-capped and blue in the distance. The northern border bleeds into the scrubby, drier grassland that transitions toward the Horns corridor. The light is different here than anywhere else on the continent — wide, clear, and somehow deep, as if the sky has more layers than it does on the coast. Heartlanders talk about their sky the way Sangreans talk about their wine.
The rivers are the Heartlands' arteries: the Argen (the great central river, navigable for most of its length, the economic foundation of House Argenhold's wealth), the Vorn (northern tributary, running through Silverblood territory), the Silvrenne (mountain-fed, cold, cutting through Silverring's mining country), and dozens of smaller waterways that connect the plains towns to the river network. Everything moves by barge. The barges are flat-bottomed, shallow-drafted, poled and sail-rigged, painted in house colors and stacked with grain, ore, wool, and gossip. The Bargemen's Guild is one of the most powerful organizations in the region — they carry cargo, but they also carry information, and a bargeman who's been up and down the Argen three times in a season knows more about the duchy's politics than most of the dukes.
The environment shifts as you move: warmer and greener near the Sangrean border, where the cuisine picks up tropical influences and the accent softens; colder and starker as you head south toward the Silver Mountains, where the wind comes off the peaks with a bite that Roslandic visitors find familiar. The central plains — the Silver Flats — are treeless grassland, golden in summer, frost-white in winter, and the most fiercely contested farmland on the continent. Whoever controls the Flats feeds the Heartlands. Whoever feeds the Heartlands holds the Argenlord vote.
The People
Heartlanders are varied — the region is too large and too old for any single ethnic profile. Northern Heartlanders tend toward lighter complexions, sandy or brown hair, and the angular bone structure that suggests pre-imperial Aethelian ancestry. Southern Heartlanders are darker, stockier, and show the mixed heritage of centuries of contact with Sangrea and the mountain tribes. What unites them is temperament: Heartlanders are formal, careful, and obsessed with precedent. They speak slowly and mean every word. A Heartlander's promise is either iron or nothing — the culture has no tolerance for casual oaths.
Clothing reflects status with surgical precision. The ducal houses wear silver — not just as ornament but as structural element: silver thread woven into wool and linen, silver clasps and buttons, silver belt-buckles engraved with house sigils. The wealthier the house, the more silver you see. A Silverblood lord at court glitters like a fish; a minor house retainer might manage a single silver pin on their cloak. The working class wears undyed wool in winter and linen in summer, with leather boots and wide-brimmed hats to keep off the plains sun. The one universal garment across all classes is the surcoat — a sleeveless, open-fronted overgarment that displays the wearer's house colors or guild insignia. In the Heartlands, you are always wearing your allegiance.
Architecture
River architecture. The Heartlands' cities are built at confluences, on riverbanks, around bridges — and the buildings reflect this: stone foundations rising from the waterline, wooden upper stories cantilevered over the current, and bridges that are as much market-street as crossing-point. The signature structure is the riverhall — a long, narrow building oriented perpendicular to the river, with a dock at one end and a street entrance at the other, serving as both warehouse and meeting hall. Riverhalls are the Heartlands' civic centers: disputes are arbitrated there, elections are held there, feasts are hosted there. The Argenhold Riverhall — the ducal seat — is the largest on the continent, with a vaulted stone ceiling and a dock large enough to berth six barges abreast.
The older architecture — pre-imperial Aethelian ruins, imperial fortifications, early Age of Faith churches — is heavy, blocky, and built to last. The newer construction is lighter, more decorated, influenced by two centuries of peace and trade: arched windows, carved lintels, the occasional Sangrean-style azulejo panel imported by a lord trying to seem cosmopolitan. The contrast between old stone and new ornament gives Heartlander cities a layered quality — the bones of empire visible beneath the skin of post-imperial prosperity.
Food
The Heartlands eat their geography. The plains produce grain — wheat, barley, oats — and the bread culture is accordingly deep. Every town bakes differently: Vornhold's round, dark, sour loaves; Argenhold's flat river-cakes cooked on heated stones; Silvermont's braided white bread, sweet and rich with butter. Meat is beef and mutton from the plains herds, pork from the river-valley farms, and freshwater fish — pike, perch, and the enormous Argen catfish that river towns smoke over apple wood and trade downstream. Near the Sangrean border, the cuisine picks up heat and color: chili-rubbed beef, tomato-based stews, tropical fruit preserves. Near the Silver Mountains, it becomes sparser and heartier: root vegetables, dried sausage, hard cheese, and the fortified wine that miners drink to keep warm underground.
The Heartlands' signature culinary institution is the guild table — a communal meal hosted by the local guild chapter, open to any guild member and their family, featuring whatever the members contributed. The guild table is simultaneously a social event, a business meeting, and a political caucus. Deals are made over bread and salt. Alliances are forged over shared wine. Grudges are nursed over the quality of someone else's sausage.
Music
Formal. The Heartlands' musical culture reflects the region's obsession with order and precedent. The dominant form is the ballad — a narrative song, typically performed by a solo singer with a fiddle or a small harp, recounting historical events, dynastic achievements, or cautionary tales of betrayal and downfall. Ballads are long (some run over an hour), structured (verse-chorus-verse, with a bridge called "the turn" that introduces a moral or plot twist), and treated with the seriousness of legal documents. A ballad about a house's founding is considered a legitimate source of historical authority — courts have ruled on inheritance disputes based on which version of a ballad the local tradition preserved.
The counter-tradition is the riverman's strum — a loose, improvisational genre played on barges and in dockside taverns, featuring the bargeman's banjo (a three-stringed instrument with a deep, twangy tone) and lyrics that are considerably less respectful of aristocratic dignity than the formal ballads. Rivermen's songs are where the Heartlands' actual opinions live — the ones that don't get spoken in riverhalls or printed in the Ayanite gazette.

ROSLAND — Iron, Forest, and the Commons
The Feel
Dense. Green. Cold. Rosland is a land of forests — enormous, ancient, thick-canopied forests that start at the northern border and thicken as you go south, broken by river valleys, mining towns, and the clearings where Rosland's sturdy, practical cities sit like camps hacked out of the wilderness. The trees are conifers in the south and hardwoods in the north — oak, beech, elm — and they are big, the remnants of growth that predates the empire. The air smells of pine resin, wet earth, and woodsmoke. It is cold eight months of the year and merely cool for the other four. Rain is frequent, snow is annual, and the grey sky is so constant that Roslandic visitors to Sangrea reportedly weep at their first clear sunset.
The landscape is hilly, rocky, and mineral-rich. The Fyrhold mountains in the east are riddled with iron mines, copper deposits, and the coal seams that fuel Rosland's smithing industry. The mining towns — Forgetown, Karthold, Blackridge — are grim, functional places: pit-head machinery, slag heaps, workers' barracks, and the constant metallic tang of smelting operations. The contrast between the wild forests and the industrial mining valleys is Rosland's defining tension: beauty and utility, commons and extraction, the forest and the forge.
The People
Roslandic people are broad, pale, and built for endurance rather than speed. They have the stocky, heavy-boned physique of a population that has spent centuries doing physical labor in cold weather — mining, forestry, smithing, farming soil that fights back. Skin is fair, freckling easily in the rare sun; hair ranges from straw-blond to dark brown to the distinctive Roslandic red that crops up in certain mountain families and is considered (without evidence) a sign of stubbornness. Faces are wide, square-jawed, and difficult to read — Roslandic emotional expression is internal rather than external, and outsiders frequently mistake their reserve for hostility.
Clothing is functional, heavy, and layered. Wool is the base — thick, scratchy, undyed or dyed in dark greens, browns, and the characteristic Roslandic blue-grey that comes from woad processed with iron-rich water. Leather is everywhere: belts, boots, vests, gauntlets for smithwork and forestry. The wealthy add fur — bear, wolf, fox — and the occasional piece of Heartlands silver jewelry, worn with a self-consciousness that suggests they know it's imported and slightly resent the fact. The universal Roslandic garment is the kolpak — a heavy wool coat, knee-length, double-breasted, with a high collar and deep pockets, worn by everyone from High Barons to charcoal-burners. A good kolpak lasts a lifetime. Roslandic mothers begin knitting their children's kolpaks before the child is born.
Architecture
Timber and stone, heavy and functional. Roslandic buildings are designed to keep heat in and weather out: thick log walls chinked with moss and clay, steeply pitched roofs to shed snow, deep stone foundations to resist the freeze-thaw cycle. Windows are small (glass is expensive; oiled parchment serves for most households) and shuttered against winter storms. The public buildings — guild halls, court houses, the High Baron's seat at Fairhaven — are grander versions of the same principle: massive timber-frame structures with stone cladding, vaulted halls heated by fireplaces large enough to stand in, and the carved wooden decorative tradition that is Rosland's primary art form. Every beam, lintel, and doorframe in a respectable Roslandic building is carved with interlocking patterns of leaves, animals, and geometric knotwork — a tradition that pre-dates the empire and carries echoes of the old Aethelian republic's democratic symbols: the open hand, the balanced scale, the unbroken circle.
The most distinctive Roslandic structure is the muster-field — a large, open clearing at the edge of every significant town, with a raised stone platform at its center (the speaking stone), an ancient oak (the oath-tree), and enough flat ground to drill a militia company. The muster-field is where elections happen, where law is read, where military service is organized, and where the community gathers for festivals. It is the physical manifestation of Rosland's civic identity — public space, owned by no one, available to all.
Food
Hearty, sour, and smoked. Rosland's cuisine is shaped by long winters, limited growing seasons, and the need to preserve everything that can be preserved. Bread is dense, dark rye — the kind that stays edible for a week and can double as a weapon if thrown. Soups and stews are the foundation: cabbage soup, beet soup, mushroom soup, potato soup, and the famous Roslandic goulash — a thick, paprika-red stew of beef, root vegetables, and sour cream that is the national dish in everything but name. Smoked meats are a staple: sausages of every description (blood sausage, liver sausage, garlic sausage, the coal-black miners' rope that Fyrhold workers carry in their pockets), smoked fish from the western rivers, and dried elk from the deep forest hunting traditions.
Fermented foods are universal: sauerkraut, pickled beets, pickled cucumbers, fermented rye drink (a sour, slightly alcoholic beverage called kvas that tastes terrible and is consumed in enormous quantities). Beer is the primary alcohol — Roslandic beer is dark, malty, and significantly stronger than the Horns variety. Spirits are distilled in the mountain towns: a clear, brain-stripping grain alcohol called zhivka that miners drink before shifts and that outsiders describe as "drinkable fire."
Music
Roslandic music is choral. The tradition descends from the military singing culture of the old stratocratic republic — songs were commands, were morale, were identity. A Roslandic cohort that couldn't sing together couldn't fight together. The legacy survives in the fire-song — a multi-part choral piece performed around the communal fire, with no instrumental accompaniment, voices only. Fire-songs are the repositories of Roslandic history: the founding of the republic, the Pact of Iron with Nion I, the Ironside Rebellion, the guild reforms, the names of the dead. Every Roslandic child learns fire-songs before they learn to read. Every guild has its own fire-songs. Every family has private fire-songs that are never sung outside the household.
The counter-tradition is the forge-beat — rhythmic percussion music played on anvils, hammers, and whatever metal is to hand in the mining towns and smithies. Forge-beats started as work-coordination rhythms and evolved into a percussive art form that Roslandic workers are fiercely proud of and that outsiders find either hypnotic or unbearable. A good forge-beat session in a Karthold tavern — six smiths hammering in syncopated rhythm on a table full of tankards — is one of the most exciting musical experiences on the continent.

VALLAN — The Quiet Passage
The Feel
Small. Green. Impossibly tidy. Vallan occupies a series of fertile mountain valleys — the Hortakin — nestled between the Heartlands to the north and the Silver Mountains to the south, with the Isle of Knowledge accessible by boat from its eastern ports. It is the smallest independent polity on the continent and the one most fiercely attached to its independence. The valleys are terraced for farming — neat rows of grain, vegetable plots, fruit orchards stepping up the hillsides in patterns that have been maintained for centuries. The roads are the best in the world: stone-paved, well-drained, marked with waystones every mile, and maintained by a road-tax system that makes Vallan's mountain passes the safest and most reliable trade corridors on the continent.
Everything about Vallan is careful. The stone walls between fields are precisely laid. The bridge arches are mathematically perfect. The inn at every waystone is stocked according to regulations that specify the minimum quality of bread, beer, and bedding. The Vallanaise take visible pride in things working correctly — a crumbling wall, a muddy road, a poorly stocked inn is a source of communal shame rather than individual failure. Visitors from larger, messier regions find Vallan either charming or claustrophobic, depending on how they feel about being judged for the state of their boots.
The People
Small-statured compared to their Heartlander and Roslandic neighbors, olive-skinned, dark-haired, with the weathered complexion of people who spend their lives outdoors at altitude. They are quiet, polite, stubborn beyond all reason, and possessed of a dry humor so understated that outsiders frequently miss it entirely. A Vallanaise insult is delivered with such gentle courtesy that the target often doesn't realize they've been insulted until they're three valleys away. They speak Munnish with a lilting accent and a vocabulary laced with local terms for geographical features — they have fourteen words for different kinds of mountain pass and six for different grades of road surface.
Clothing is practical mountain-wear: leather boots, wool trousers, the ubiquitous Vallanaise strappjacke — a fitted wool jacket with leather reinforcements at the shoulders and elbows, designed for climbing, riding, and bridge-maintenance work. Colors are muted earth tones. The one splash of color is the hauskord — a braided cord in house or canton colors, worn at the waist, that identifies the wearer's valley of origin. Removing your hauskord is a declaration of exile; losing it is a minor social catastrophe.
Food
Mountain cuisine: cheese, bread, dried meat, root vegetables, and the obsessive cultivation of herbs that Vallanaise cooks use to transform simple ingredients into something unexpectedly complex. The signature dish is käsknöpfle — hand-shaped pasta dumplings smothered in melted alpine cheese, fried onions, and fresh herbs, served with a side of pickled cabbage. It is the most comforting food on the continent and the subject of inter-valley rivalries as fierce as anything in Sangrea. Every valley claims its version is the original.
Dairy is central: cow's milk cheese in dozens of varieties (hard, soft, aged, fresh, smoked, herb-rubbed), butter, cream, and the rich, thick yogurt that mountain workers eat for breakfast with honey and toasted grain. Meat is preserved: air-dried beef (bündnerfleisch), smoked sausage, cured ham hung from farmhouse rafters for months. Bread is dense, seeded, and often enriched with nuts or dried fruit. Wine is produced in small quantities in the lower valleys — light, crisp, acidic — but the primary drink is a clear, fierce apple brandy called obstler that Vallanaise farmers distill in copper pot-stills older than some countries.

THE RED COAST — Copper, Sand, and Hidden Water
The Feel
Hot. Dry. The Red Coast is the continent's arid belt — a crescent of desert, scrubland, and oasis cities curving along the southeastern coast, backed by volcanic ridges that shimmer in the heat haze and fronted by a coastline of red sandstone cliffs dropping into warm, copper-tinted water. The color red is everywhere: in the sand, in the stone, in the native copper that streaks through the rock like veins in flesh, in the henna that stains the hands and beards of the people. The light is merciless — white, flat, and blinding from mid-morning to late afternoon. Life happens at dawn, dusk, and night. The middle of the day is for sleeping, praying, or sitting in the shade of a courtyard fountain and drinking mint tea until the sun stops trying to kill you.
Water defines everything. The oasis cities exist because water exists; where the water runs out, civilization ends. The qanat systems — underground aqueducts that tap deep aquifer water and carry it to the surface through gravity-fed tunnels — are the Red Coast's most important infrastructure and the subject of its most bitter conflicts. A house that controls a qanat controls life itself. The politics of the Red Coast are, at root, the politics of thirst.
The People
Red Coast people are dark-skinned, lean, and adapted to heat in ways that northerners are not — they can work in temperatures that would fell a Roslandic smith, and they move through their cities with an economy of motion that conserves energy and minimizes sweat. Faces are angular, sharp-featured, with dark eyes that seem to absorb light rather than reflect it. Hair is black, worn long by women (often braided with copper beads and henna-dyed thread) and cropped short or shaved by men (head-wraps and turbans serve as both sun protection and status display). The men's beards are a cultural institution: groomed, oiled, often henna-dyed in shades from auburn to deep crimson, and styled in patterns that indicate tribal affiliation, profession, and marital status. A clean-shaven Red Coast man is either in mourning or in disgrace.
Clothing is loose, layered, and designed for the desert: long robes of light cotton or linen (thawb variants), head-wraps that can be pulled across the face against sandstorms, and soft leather boots or sandals. The color palette is earth tones — sand, ochre, rust, umber — with copper ornament as the universal status marker. Everyone on the Red Coast wears copper: bracelets, rings, belt-buckles, brooch-pins, earrings, nose-rings, and the distinctive copper circlets that the Copper Courts' traveling judges wear as badges of authority. The metalwork is extraordinary — Red Coast coppersmiths produce filigree so fine it looks like frozen flame, and Khorim obsidian-and-copper jewelry is traded across the continent as luxury goods.
Architecture
Built for shade, built for water, built to disappear. Red Coast architecture is interior-focused: blank, fortress-like exterior walls of mud-brick or sandstone, enclosing lush interior courtyards centered on fountains, pools, or cisterns. The wealthier the household, the more water in the courtyard — a Red Coast merchant's social standing can be measured by the sound of running water in their home. Public buildings follow the same principle at scale: the Grand Souk of Alsiroth's Gate is a labyrinth of covered streets, vaulted arcades, and interior plazas connected by narrow alleys that channel wind through the market like a cooling system. The effect is disorienting to outsiders and perfectly navigable to locals.
The most dramatic architecture is the qasr — the fortified tower-house that the oasis lords build on the highest point of their settlement. Qasrs are tall, narrow, and decorated with geometric patterns carved into the stone or painted in mineral pigments (copper green, iron red, cobalt blue). Each qasr's rooftop serves as a signal station — mirror-flashes during the day, fire-baskets at night — maintaining the communication network that connects the oasis cities across the desert.
Food
Survival cuisine elevated to art. The Red Coast's basic diet is dates, flatbread, goat cheese, and dried meat — the caravan staples that have sustained desert travelers for millennia. But the oasis cities, with their irrigated gardens and trade connections, have developed a cuisine of surprising richness: slow-cooked lamb with dried apricots and almonds, couscous mounded with roasted vegetables and dusted with cinnamon, stuffed grape leaves in copper-bright saffron sauce, and the magnificent bastilla — a layered pastry of pigeon meat, eggs, almonds, and powdered sugar wrapped in gossamer-thin dough, baked until golden, and served at celebrations as a demonstration of the host's wealth and the cook's skill. Mint tea is the social lubricant: served sweet, hot, and in small glasses, poured from a height that produces a frothy head. Refusing tea is an insult. Accepting tea obligates you to at least three glasses. The fourth glass is optional but expected.

THE FROZEN SOUTH — Gold, Ice, and Old Bone
The Feel
Brutal. Beautiful. Empty. The Frozen South is the continent's bottom edge — a ragged coastline of fjords, glaciers, and wind-stripped tundra that dissolves into the southern ocean's permanent grey. The landscape is extreme: mountains that rise from sea level to snow line in a single sheer wall, fjords so deep and narrow that sunlight reaches the water for only a few hours a day, glacial valleys where the ice has carved the bedrock into shapes that look deliberately sculpted. The colors are limited and intense — the black of volcanic rock, the white of snow, the grey of overcast sky, and the sudden, shocking gold of the ore deposits that streak through the mountains like the earth's blood.
It is cold. Not the manageable cold of Rosland's winters, which come and go — this is permanent, structural cold, the kind that shapes bodies and minds over generations. The Frozen South has never been warm. The people who live here have adapted or died.
The People
The clans of the Frozen South are physically massive — the largest humans on the continent, averaging six feet for women and six-four for men, with heavy bone structure, broad shoulders, and a layer of subcutaneous fat that makes their silhouettes barrel-shaped and their handshakes bone-crushing. Skin is pale, wind-burned to permanent pink across the cheeks and nose, with a weathered quality that makes everyone look older than they are. Hair is thick, coarse, ranging from white-blond to dark brown, worn long by both sexes and braided in styles that indicate clan, family, and status. Beards are universal among men and considered sacred — shaving is a punishment reserved for oath-breakers.
Clothing is fur, leather, and felted wool, layered for insulation: a base layer of seal-skin, a middle layer of mammoth-wool felt (traded from the highland herders or produced from the region's own small, shaggy musk-oxen), and an outer layer of bear-hide or seal-hide, oiled against wet and wind. Boots are the most important garment — Frozen South boots are masterworks of engineering, multi-layered, insulated with dried grass, soled with mammoth-leather that grips ice. A person with bad boots is a dead person. Color is scarce: the natural tones of fur and leather dominate, with the only bright accents being the clan-markers — woven bands of dyed wool in clan colors, worn at the upper arm, that serve the same identification purpose as a Heartlander's surcoat.
Architecture
Semi-subterranean. The clan-holds are built into the landscape rather than on top of it — longhouses half-buried in hillsides, their turf roofs blending into the terrain, their interiors warm from the body heat of communal living and the peat-and-dung fires that burn day and night. The great hall — every clan-hold has one — is the largest interior space, a long, low-ceilinged room centered on a fire-pit, its walls hung with furs, weapons, and the ancestral gold-work that is the clan's treasure and identity. The gold-work is extraordinary: Frozen South smiths are the continent's finest goldsmiths, producing torcs, bracelets, brooches, and ceremonial weapons of interlocking knotwork and animal motifs (wolves, bears, eagles, and the mythical aurora serpent) that make Heartlands silverwork look crude by comparison.
The Kjölfoss Deeps — Clan Aurax's primary gold mine — is the closest thing the Frozen South has to a city: a sprawling complex of mine shafts, smelting works, barracks, and the great underground hall where the Winter-Moot meets. It is warm (geothermal heat from the volcanic roots of the mountains) and perpetually lit by tallow-lamps that give the gold-veined walls a liquid, breathing quality. Visitors describe it as stepping inside a living jewel box.
Food
Meat, fish, and fat. The Frozen South's cuisine is caloric by necessity — the body burns fuel just staying warm. Seal meat, whale blubber, smoked fish, dried caribou, and the dense, crumbling blood-sausage called blóðmör are staples. Dairy comes from the shaggy musk-oxen: thick, sweet milk curdled into a yogurt-like substance called skyr that is eaten at every meal. Bread is rare — grain doesn't grow this far south — and imported from Rosland or the Heartlands at considerable expense. The substitute is a flatcake made from ground lichen and rendered fat, cooked on hot stones, that tastes like the idea of bread as remembered by someone who hasn't eaten bread in years.
The one luxury is mead — fermented honey wine, produced from the short summer's wildflower bloom and hoarded through the long winter like liquid gold. Mead is the social currency of the Frozen South: offered at moots, poured at funerals, exchanged at betrothals. The quality of a clan's mead is a direct index of their status. Clan Aurax's mead, made from mountain heather honey and aged in gold-leaf-lined barrels, is considered the finest on the continent by the handful of outsiders who have ever tasted it.

XARIA — The Green Furnace
The Feel
Overwhelming. That is the universal first reaction of any mainlander who enters Xaria: the heat, the humidity, the density of the vegetation, the volume of the insects, the colors, the smells — everything is more. Xaria occupies the continent's eastern peninsula, separated from the mainland by a belt of tropical jungle so dense that the two major land routes through it (the Jungle Road and the River Passage) are engineering achievements comparable to the Heartlands' river network. Beyond the jungle belt, the peninsula opens into a landscape of stepped pyramids, canal cities, plantation estates, and the muddy, vast river delta that is the agricultural engine of Ix'Atani civilization.
The air is thick — not just with humidity but with presence. This is the most echo-dense region on the mainland, though no one uses that term. The jungle interior has never been fully cleared; the temple-cities were built within the forest canopy rather than against it; the agricultural zones work with the floodplain rather than against it. The result is a landscape where human civilization and wild nature exist in a proximity that mainlanders find unsettling. A temple courtyard in an Ix'Atani canal-city might have a thirty-foot caiman sunning itself on the steps. No one bothers it. It belongs there.
The People
Xarians are dark-skinned — deep brown to blue-black, with the full range of tropical human variation. Body types range from the tall, lean canal-dwellers of the delta to the shorter, muscular plantation workers of the interior. Hair is black, worn in elaborate braided and wrapped styles that indicate caste, profession, and ritual status — a Xarian priest's hair arrangement might take two hours and require three assistants. Facial scarification is common among the upper castes: geometric patterns cut into the cheeks, forehead, or chin during coming-of-age rituals, then rubbed with pigment to produce raised, colored scars that serve as permanent identity markers.
Clothing is minimal (the heat makes layering impractical) and spectacular. The basic garment is a wrapped loincloth or skirt of dyed cotton, with an upper-body wrap for formal occasions. Color is everything: Xarian dyes — extracted from jungle plants, insects, and mineral pigments — produce hues of startling intensity: cochineal crimson, indigo blue, turmeric gold, jaguar-spotted patterns in black and ochre. Featherwork is the highest art: cloaks, headdresses, and ceremonial garments constructed from the plumage of tropical birds — quetzals, macaws, toucans — assembled in mosaic patterns that can take years to complete. A high priest's feathered cloak is worth more than a Heartlands duchy.
Jewelry is gold, jade, and obsidian. The contrast with the Red Coast's copper aesthetic is stark — where the Red Coast's metalwork is filigree and delicacy, Xarian goldwork is massive, heavy, and designed to dominate. Ear-spools the size of fists. Lip-plugs of polished jade. Pectoral plates of hammered gold depicting jaguars, serpents, and the sun in its various aspects. The effect is deliberately intimidating: Xarian ornament is not decoration, it is armor — spiritual armor against the gods' hunger.
Architecture
Vertical. Xarian architecture reaches for the sky the way Heartlands architecture reaches for the river. The step-pyramids — teocallis — are the defining structures: massive, truncated pyramids of dressed stone, rising in stepped tiers to flat summits where the sacrificial altars and the priests' quarters sit above the jungle canopy. The largest teocallis are over two hundred feet tall and visible for miles — landmarks in a landscape where the flat jungle canopy otherwise renders navigation impossible.
The canal-cities are the other architectural marvel. Built on artificial islands in the river delta, connected by a network of canals that serve as streets, they are the Xarian equivalent of Venice — except larger, hotter, and populated by caimans. The buildings are plastered stone, painted in bright colors (red, white, blue, yellow) and decorated with carved and painted reliefs depicting religious scenes, historical events, and the endless catalog of the gods' appetites. The markets — floating on barge-platforms in the canals — are the most vibrant commercial spaces on the continent, trading everything from cacao to slaves to quetzal feathers to poisons.
Food
Xarian cuisine is built on the trinity of maize, beans, and chili — supplemented by the staggering abundance of the tropical environment: mango, papaya, avocado, cacao, vanilla, pineapple, a dozen varieties of squash, and the protein sources of a jungle ecosystem (wild turkey, iguana, fish, insects, and the small hairless dogs that Xarians breed for food and that mainlanders find distressing). The signature preparation is the tamale — masa dough wrapped around a filling of meat, chili, and vegetables, steamed in banana leaves, and eaten by the dozen at festivals. Cacao is consumed as a bitter, spiced drink — ground cacao beans frothed with hot water, chili, and vanilla — that is simultaneously a stimulant, a currency, and a sacred substance used in religious ceremonies. The Xarian elite drink cacao from jade cups and consider anyone who adds sugar to it a barbarian.

THE TEETH — Four Islands, One Bridge, No Agreement
The Feel
The Teeth are what happens when you put four completely different cultures on four adjacent islands, connect them with a single massive bridge, and give them a thousand years to develop grudges. Each island is distinct enough to be its own country; the bridge forces them into proximity; the proximity produces friction; the friction produces the most colorful, contentious, and unpredictable political environment on the continent.
The bridge itself — the Great Bridge — is the defining feature. It spans the archipelago in a series of arched segments, connecting island to island to island, with towers at each junction and toll-gates at each terminus. At its full extent, it is the longest artificial structure on the continent. It was built during the Age of History by methods that no one can replicate (the Magos suspect echo-engineering), and it has been maintained, repaired, fought over, and nearly destroyed so many times that the current structure is more patch than original. Walking the Great Bridge is a journey of several days. The views are extraordinary. The toll fees are criminal.
Northwind — Windswept, rocky, treeless. Fishing villages and clifftop fortresses. House Stormglass rules from Galehold, a castle carved into the living rock of the island's highest cliff. The people are sea-hardened, suspicious of outsiders, and renowned for the accuracy of their weather predictions (generations of living on the most weather-exposed island in the archipelago have produced a population that reads clouds the way Heartlanders read balance sheets). Culture is spare, maritime, and proud. They make the best rope on the continent and consider this a legitimate source of national identity.
Emberstone — Volcanic, warm, industrious. The smoking peaks of the island's two active volcanoes give the landscape a permanent sulfurous haze. House Pyrmont runs the volcanic stone quarries that are the island's primary export — Emberstone basalt is the hardest building stone available, and it ships across the continent for fortifications, bridge piers, and the foundations of buildings that need to last. The culture is working-class, guild-dominated, and politically volatile — Morvayn's coup drew support from the quarry-workers who felt Pyrmont's management had enriched the house at their expense. Beneath the quarries, unknown to everyone, the Magos' secret vault sits in the volcanic rock.
Verwhisper — Forested, fertile, pious. The green island, covered in temperate hardwood forest and terraced farmland, is the Teeth's breadbasket and its spiritual center. House Verdane governs in partnership with the Order of the Green Thorn, producing a culture that is simultaneously agrarian, devout, and deeply suspicious of the other islands' secular politics. Verwhisper's towns have a half-timbered, devotional quality — churches at every crossroad, monastery gardens behind every wall, and a quiet, well-fed contentment that the other islands find smug.
Shadowtide — Jungle, ungoverned, dangerous. The fourth island is the Teeth's wild card — tropical forest, hostile wildlife, and a population of fisherfolk and foragers who have never submitted to any centralized authority. Various families have claimed lordship; none have enforced it. Shadowtide is where the Teeth's criminals flee, where its exiles land, and where things happen that the other three islands prefer not to know about. The island produces rare hardwoods, exotic spices, and rumors of creatures in the deep jungle that shouldn't exist.

THE ISLE OF KNOWLEDGE — The Memory of the World
The Feel
Quiet. Damp. The smell of old paper and older stone. The Isle of Knowledge sits off Vallan's eastern coast — a small, rocky island accessible only by boat, its single harbor sheltered by a natural breakwater of basalt pillars that look deliberately placed (they may have been, in the Age of History, by methods now lost). The island's surface is mostly covered by the Magos compound: libraries, scriptoria, dormitories, laboratories, observatories, and the deep vault complex that descends into the island's volcanic bedrock like an inverted tower.
The atmosphere is monastic but not religious — the Magos serve knowledge, not God, and the distinction matters. The libraries are open to any scholar regardless of origin or faith, and the debates in the reading rooms are spirited, irreverent, and occasionally violent (academic disputes among the Magos have been known to escalate to the point where the Elder Magos has to physically separate combatants). The island runs on a system of barter and obligation: scholars pay for access with labor (copying manuscripts, maintaining the archives, cataloguing new acquisitions) or with knowledge (original research, rare texts, information from distant regions that the Magos have not yet catalogued).

FAITHIR — The City of God
The Feel
Overwhelming in a different way than Xaria. Faithir is not vast — it was a small town that became a city by accretion, growing outward from the Sacred Grove at its center in concentric rings of construction that span four centuries. The result is architecturally incoherent and spiritually overpowering: the innermost ring is the Great Dome Cathedral, built by Nion XIII's architects over the prophets' original home and tomb; the second ring is the administrative district of the Council of Three, with the headquarters of the Ayanite, Ashanite, and Alonite orders; the third ring is the pilgrim quarter — hostels, hospitals, markets, and the endless stream of devotional shops selling relics, prayer tokens, and sacred souvenirs of varying authenticity; and the outer ring is the working city, where the people who cook, clean, build, and maintain Faithir's enormous religious infrastructure actually live.
The streets are always crowded. Pilgrims from every region on the continent — Heartlanders in silver-threaded surcoats, Roslandic veterans in kolpaks, Sangrean families in bright embroidery, Red Coast merchants in copper-studded turbans, the occasional Horns sailor looking uncomfortable on dry land — fill the pilgrim quarter year-round, peaking during the great festivals. The economy runs on devotion: candle-makers, relic-sellers, icon-painters, prayer-scribes, and the hospitality industry that feeds and houses hundreds of thousands of visitors annually. Faithir is simultaneously the most sacred and the most commercial city on the continent. The tension between those two identities is the city's permanent condition.

NIONIA — The Marble Isle (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — Under the God-King's Shadow

I. THE ISLAND AT A GLANCE
Population: ~180,000 (down from ~220,000 before the civil war) Capital: Vellium (pop. ~90,000) Other settlements: Port Severan (naval base, pop. ~25,000), Marchia Ferrus (mining district, scattered camps and towns, pop. ~30,000), rural villages and farming estates (~35,000) Government: Theocratic monarchy under Jous Lorethian. The Triumvirate survives as a vestigial advisory body. Economy: Marble quarrying, iron mining, olive oil, wine, fishing, and a declining but still significant maritime trade. Religion: The Pure Way (mandatory). Orthodox Loveism is technically illegal but practiced in secret by a significant minority.

II. VELLIUM — The White City
Districts
The Dome Quarter — The city's heart. Dominated by the Great Dome Cathedral (the converted Senate chamber), the God-King's palace (formerly the Consul's Residence, tripled in size), and the administrative buildings of the Pure Way's clerical apparatus. White marble everywhere, kept obsessively clean by teams of indentured street-scrubbers. The Inquisitors of Domus Lux maintain their headquarters here — the Pale House, a former patrician mansion whose basement has been converted into interrogation cells. The streets are wide, patrolled, and eerily quiet after dark. This is the only district where the whale-oil lamps burn all night.
The Colonnade — The old patrician quarter. Grand houses with columned facades, interior courtyards, and generations of accumulated art and wealth. The surviving patrician families — Marcellus, Navarrus, Cassian — still live here, maintaining the fiction of aristocratic dignity while navigating the reality of life under a God-King who could dispossess them with a word. The architecture is the finest on the island: mosaic floors, frescoed ceilings, marble fountains that still run with spring-fed water. The Colonnade's public face is one of serene compliance with the Pure Way. Behind the courtyard walls, old habits persist — private lamento performances, uncensored wine, and conversations that would get the speakers killed if the walls had ears. Some walls do.
The Dockyards — Port district. Sprawling, loud, and the one part of Vellium that Jous's white-cloak patrols haven't fully tamed. The docks handle the island's fishing fleet, its merchant marine, and the growing war-fleet that Jous is building for his mainland invasion. Shipwrights, riggers, chandlers, and the supply chain of naval preparation dominate the economy. The taverns are rough, the brothels are technically illegal (the Pure Way forbids commercial sex), and the Domus Lux presence is heavy but ineffective — dockworkers are too economically essential to alienate with aggressive enforcement. The Anchor & Chain is the district's most famous tavern: a three-story wreck of salt-rotted timber where the best lamento singers perform after midnight and the Inquisitors know better than to enter uninvited.
The Terraces — Working-class residential. Tenement blocks rising in tiers up the hillside behind the docks, connected by narrow staircases and alleyways where the sun reaches the ground for maybe two hours a day. Overcrowded, under-serviced, and the source of most of Jous's common-born followers — the people who believed his promise that the old patrician order would fall and something better would replace it. Some still believe. Many are beginning to wonder what "better" means when the price is a white cloak on every corner and the sound of hymns that you didn't choose to sing.
The Quarry Road — The highway connecting Vellium to the Marchia Ferrus mining district. Lined with workshops, supply depots, and the barracks of the mining crews who rotate between the quarries and the city on monthly shifts. The road itself is rutted, dusty, and perpetually crowded with ox-carts hauling marble blocks and iron ingots. It is the least beautiful part of a beautiful island, and it is where most of the wealth comes from.

III. THE MAJOR HOUSES OF NIONIA
DOMUS LORETH — The God-King's House
Founded: 1306 AF (during the civil war) Seat: The Dome Palace, Vellium Sigil: A white sun on a pale blue field Words: "I Am the Way"
Domus Loreth is less a dynasty than a cult. It has no ancestral estates, no centuries of accumulated legitimacy, no genealogy deeper than one generation. It exists because Jous Lorethian exists. Its power is his power. Its future depends entirely on whether a 24-year-old man who believes he is God can hold an island and conquer a continent.
Current Members:
Jous Lorethian, God-King of Nionia (age 24) — Born in the convent of the Sisters of the Veil, raised to believe he was the physical incarnation of Loreth. Strikingly beautiful — high cheekbones, pale grey eyes, black hair worn long and unbound in the style the Pure Way has made fashionable. His physical beauty is one of his weapons: people who meet him for the first time often describe a feeling of unreality, as if they're looking at a painting that stepped off the wall. He is charismatic to a degree that borders on the pathological — not warm, exactly, but compelling, the way a fire is compelling. His echo-density produces a localized resonance effect that makes people in his presence feel more certain, more fervent, more willing to believe. He does not know this is a mechanism. He believes it is proof of divinity. He may not be entirely wrong.
Jous sleeps badly. The sleep paralysis that has plagued him since adolescence produces visions he interprets as divine revelation — images of a purified world, a continent united under his rule, a future of absolute order. The visions are becoming more vivid and more specific as his echo-sensitivity strengthens in the wake of the Eldra-Veil breach (though he doesn't know the cause). He is beginning to see places he has never visited — mainland landscapes, rivers he can't name, faces he doesn't recognize. He does not doubt these visions. He has never doubted anything about himself. That certainty is his greatest strength and his most dangerous flaw.
He is celibate — not by doctrine but by temperament. He finds physical intimacy repulsive in a way that may reflect genuine asexuality, psychological damage from his convent upbringing, or simply the impossibility of intimacy for someone who genuinely believes they are God. The Pure Way's clergy have elevated his celibacy into doctrine: the God-King's body is sacred, inviolable, not to be polluted by mortal contact. This creates a succession problem that no one around him is willing to discuss aloud.
Eduard Lorethian (age 19) — Jous's younger half-brother. Born in the convent five years after Jous — same mother (Sister Sera is listed, but Sera died birthing Jous; Eduard's mother was another sister named Elara, who survived). Eduard is everything Jous is not: cheerful, sociable, physically clumsy, intellectually mediocre, and utterly lacking in the charisma or echo-sensitivity that makes Jous extraordinary. He adores his brother with a desperate, puppyish devotion that Jous tolerates without returning. Eduard has been given the title "Prince of the Way" and a ceremonial role in state functions — standing behind Jous, holding a white banner, looking pretty. He is aware that his value is entirely decorative. This awareness is slowly curdling into something darker.
Eduard drinks too much. He has begun having quiet conversations with people he shouldn't — minor functionaries in the Triumvirate, dockyard workers, a wine merchant named Cato who may or may not be connected to the remnants of Domus Marcellus's intelligence network. Eduard is not plotting against his brother. He is looking for someone to tell him he matters. The distinction may not hold.

DOMUS FERRONUS — The Iron Upstarts
Founded: c. 1300 AF Seat: Ferronus Hall, Marchia Ferrus (a fortress-manor built atop the iron vein that made the family's fortune) Sigil: A black pickaxe on an iron-grey field Words: "From the Deep, We Rise"
The Ferronus family did not exist as a political entity thirty years ago. Ferron — who history will call "the Upstart" — was a common miner who struck the richest iron vein on the island, leveraged the wealth into mercenary contracts, and then made the single most consequential bet in Nionian history: he backed Jous Lorethian's revolution.
Current Members:
Ferron "the Upstart" (age ~58) — Patriarch. Short, thick-bodied, with hands like shovels and a face like a cliff — cragged, scarred, and permanently dusted with the iron-red grit of the mines he still personally inspects. Ferron is not intelligent in the way that patricians understand intelligence — he cannot parse Ayanite theology, discuss philosophy, or identify a wine's vintage. He is intelligent in the way that a wolf is intelligent: he reads people, he reads situations, and he acts decisively. He funded Jous's revolution not because he believed in Jous's divinity but because he recognized an opportunity to destroy the patrician class that had exploited his miners for generations. Whether he got more than he bargained for is a question he asks himself every night.
Ferron's relationship with Jous is the most politically significant dynamic on the island. Jous needs Ferron's money and muscle. Ferron needs Jous's legitimacy and popularity. Neither trusts the other. Both know that their alliance is the only thing holding the new order together. Ferron attends Pure Way services with visible devotion and private contempt. He has been heard, in his cups, calling Jous "the boy" — never within earshot of anyone who would report it. Yet.
Orla Ferronus (age ~35) — Ferron's eldest daughter and the family's real administrator. She runs the mining operations, the mercenary payrolls, the shipping contracts, and the complex web of bribes and favors that keeps the Ferronus economic machine functioning. She is tall (unusual for a miner's family), sharp-featured, and possessed of a memory for numbers that borders on the supernatural. She does not like Jous. She does not trust Jous. She has calculated, with the precision of a woman who knows exactly how many tons of iron ore her family produces per month, the point at which Jous will become more expensive to support than to oppose. She has not reached that point. She is watching.
Matteo Ferronus (age ~28) — Ferron's youngest son. A disappointment. Matteo was supposed to be the family's courtly face — educated, polished, presentable in the halls of power. Instead, he developed a passion for natural philosophy and a corresponding disinterest in politics, money, or the family business. He spends his time in a private laboratory in the Marchia Ferrus, conducting alchemical experiments of questionable legality and corresponding with scholars on the Isle of Knowledge through intermediaries (direct communication would attract Inquisitorial attention). He has accidentally discovered that certain iron ores, when heated in the presence of specific volcanic minerals, produce a metal alloy of unusual strength and lightness. He does not understand why. He is the closest person on Nionia to stumbling onto echo-chemistry, and he has no idea what he's looking at.
Drusa Ferronus (age ~30) — Ferron's middle daughter. Married young to a minor Navarrus cousin to cement the alliance between new money and old navy. The marriage is functional but loveless. Drusa is pious — genuinely, not performatively. She believes in the Pure Way with a convert's intensity that embarrasses her father and delights Jous. She has been appointed to the Pure Way's charitable commission, overseeing food distribution in the Terraces, and she does the work with real dedication. She is the Ferronus family member most likely to be remembered kindly by history, and the one least likely to survive what's coming.

DOMUS MARCELLUS — The Old Blood
Founded: Pre-imperial (one of the original Nionian patrician families) Seat: The Marcellus Compound, the Colonnade (reduced from their pre-war holdings, which included three country estates — two confiscated by the Pure Way) Sigil: A golden column on a red field Words: "We Were First"
The oldest surviving family on Nionia. The Marcelli trace their lineage to the senator who escaped the Great Pyre — the one man who saw Nion I's purge coming and had the sense to run. That ancestor's survival instinct has been bred into every subsequent generation. The Marcelli have survived the Pyre, the Empire, the Republic's corruption, and now the Pure Way's revolution. They survive by bending. They never break. They never forget.
Current Members:
Lucretia Marcellus (age 67) — Matriarch. Head of house since her husband Gaius died of a "fever" during the civil war (poisoned, almost certainly — by whom is debated; the Ferronus, the Navarrus, and the Marcellus family's own internal rivals are all candidates). Lucretia is small, white-haired, impeccably dressed in the old republican style (she wears a pallion pinned with a golden column brooch that is worth more than most houses in the Terraces), and terrifying. She survived the civil war by recognizing Jous's victory before anyone else and personally delivering Domus Marcellus's surrender — along with the Senate's ceremonial keys, a chest of gold, and a letter of such eloquent submission that Jous reportedly read it twice and smiled. She is the only person on the island who can make the God-King smile without trying.
Lucretia's private opinion of Jous is unknown. She has never spoken a word against him. She has also never spoken a word of genuine belief in his divinity. She attends services, tithes generously, and maintains a household that is a model of Pure Way compliance. Her courtyard fountain still runs with spring water. Her lamento singers still perform, though they now sing approved hymns. Her wine cellar is still the finest on the island. She has made no move against the regime. She has also preserved, in a vault beneath her compound, the Senate's complete archive of republican constitutional law — every charter, every precedent, every recorded vote. If the Republic is ever restored, the legal framework exists. If it is not, the archive is kindling. Lucretia does not bet on outcomes. She preserves options.
Quintus Marcellus (age 41) — Lucretia's eldest son. A career diplomat who served as the Republic's ambassador to the Heartlands before the civil war. He returned to Nionia during the fighting, was captured by Domus Lux, and spent six months in the Pale House before his mother negotiated his release. The experience left him with a permanent tremor in his left hand, a stutter he didn't have before, and an absolute refusal to discuss what happened in the basement. He now serves as the family's public face — attending court functions, making the required obeisances, projecting the image of a broken man who has accepted the new order. Whether the brokenness is real or performance is the question that keeps the Inquisitors interested.
Valeria Marcellus (age 36) — Quintus's younger sister. Unmarried, which at her age in Nionian patrician culture is a statement rather than an accident. Valeria is a scholar — trained at the Order of the Quill's Nionian academy before Jous's followers burned it during the civil war. She now teaches privately, tutoring the children of families wealthy enough to afford education and discreet enough to want their children taught by someone other than a Pure Way catechist. She keeps a coded journal. The code is based on a pre-imperial Nionian cipher that the Inquisitors have not yet cracked. The journal's contents, if decoded, would provide a detailed record of life under the Pure Way — names, dates, incidents, and the slow accumulation of evidence that Valeria compiles with the methodical patience of a woman who learned her craft from archivists.
Young Gaius Marcellus (age 14) — Quintus's only son. Named for his grandfather. A boy who has never known a world without the Pure Way and who is, consequently, a genuine believer — not in Jous specifically, but in the idea of order, purity, and divine certainty that the Pure Way promises. His grandmother watches him recite the cantus with a face that reveals nothing and a heart that, if it could be read, would show something very close to grief.

DOMUS NAVARRUS — The Fleet
Founded: Imperial era (elevated by Aurelius I as naval administrators) Seat: The Navarrus Citadel, Port Severan Sigil: A black ship on a silver sea Words: "The Tide Serves Us"
The Navarrus family controlled Nionia's navy for centuries. When the civil war came, they bet on the Republic — and lost. Their fleet was broken at the Battle of Port Severan when Ferron's fire-ships destroyed six Navarrus warships. The family surrendered, offered its surviving vessels to Jous, and was permitted to live — diminished, humiliated, but alive. They now serve as Jous's naval administrators, building the invasion fleet under the supervision of Domus Lux observers who trust them about as far as a dead calm will carry a warship.
Current Members:
Admiral Varro Navarrus (age 52) — Head of house. A career sailor who commanded the fleet that tried to blockade the capital and failed. The defeat broke something in him — not his competence (he is still the best naval tactician on the island) but his certainty. He gave his life to a Republic that turned out to be not worth dying for, and now he builds warships for a God-King he despises. He drinks every night. He never drinks enough to be incompetent the next morning. This discipline is the only thing keeping him alive.
Varro's wife, Livia, drowned herself in the harbor three months after the surrender. He does not speak of her. The household staff has been instructed to remove all mirrors from the Admiral's quarters — he cannot bear to look at his own face. The reason, never stated, is that Livia's eyes were the same color as his.
Senna Navarrus (age 29) — Varro's daughter. Serves as the fleet's logistics officer — supplies, provisioning, crew rotation. She is competent, cold, and harboring a fury so controlled that it has become indistinguishable from professionalism. She despises the Ferronus family with a specificity that goes beyond politics: Ferron's mercenaries killed her younger brother during the Battle of Port Severan. She has his name tattooed on her inner wrist in old naval cipher. She is waiting. She does not know what she is waiting for. But she will recognize it when she sees it.
Corvus Navarrus (age 24) — Varro's nephew, son of his executed brother. Raised by the household after his father was hanged for "conspiracy against the Way" (he had been caught meeting with mainland contacts — whether for treasonous purposes or simple trade negotiation is disputed). Corvus is beautiful, charming, bisexual in a culture that has recently criminalized same-sex relations under the Pure Way, and reckless in the specific way of young men who have decided they are already dead. He serves as a shipwright's apprentice in the Port Severan yards, where his draftsmanship is excellent and his habit of bedding other apprentices is an open secret that the Domus Lux observer has not yet reported — either through incompetence, sympathy, or the accumulation of leverage for future use.

DOMUS TORR — The Admiralty's Ghost
Founded: Imperial era (by Aurelius I "the Sailor") Seat: Formerly the Torr Estate, northern coast; now reduced to a townhouse in Vellium Sigil: A golden anchor on a blue field Words: "Into the Deep"
Once the most powerful naval house on the island, Domus Torr has been declining since Admiral Torr's death in 889 AF — over four centuries of slow collapse. By the time of the civil war, the Torr were a name without a fleet, a sigil without an army, and a family of perhaps fifteen people living on the diminishing returns of ancestral investments. The civil war barely touched them — they had nothing worth taking.
Current Members:
Old Aemilia Torr (age 78) — The last of the mainline Torrs. A tiny, fierce woman who lives alone in the Vellium townhouse with three cats and a collection of naval charts dating back to the imperial era. She is technically the head of house, though the house consists of herself, two distant cousins who work as fishermen, and a grandnephew in the Marchia Ferrus who mines iron and has never seen the sea. Aemilia is the island's foremost amateur historian — she has spent fifty years compiling a history of the Nionian navy from Aurelius I to the present, written in a cramped, precise hand on recycled parchment, and it is the most comprehensive naval record on the island. The Magos would kill for a copy. The Inquisitors would burn it if they knew it existed, because it includes unflattering accounts of Jous's naval strategy during the civil war.
Aemilia attends Pure Way services with the dutiful boredom of someone who has outlived the capacity for shock. She sits in the back, mouth moving with the cantus, eyes watching everything. She has outlived three governments. She expects to outlive this one.

DOMUS CASSIAN — The Quarrymen
Founded: Pre-imperial (one of the original four patrician families of the Marble Compact) Seat: Cassian Holdings, eastern quarry district Sigil: A white hammer on a grey field Words: "We Shape the Stone"
The Cassians controlled Nionia's marble quarries under the Republic, supplying the building material that made the island's architecture possible. They were the least political of the four Compact families — content to dig, cut, and sell stone while the Marcelli and Navarri played at Senate politics. This apolitical stance saved them during the civil war: they surrendered immediately, continued supplying marble to whoever was in charge, and emerged from the revolution with their quarries intact and their family largely unscathed. The Cassians are the boring dynasty — no great heroes, no great villains, just competent stone merchants who have been doing the same thing for a thousand years.
Current Members:
Petronius Cassian (age 45) — Head of house. A quiet, square-built man who smells permanently of marble dust and speaks in the measured, deliberate cadences of someone who learned patience from rock. He runs the quarries efficiently, pays his workers fairly (by Nionian standards), and stays as far from politics as a man on a small island ruled by a God-King can manage. He attends court when summoned, contributes to public works when asked, and donates to the Pure Way's building programs with an enthusiasm that may be genuine (the Pure Way builds a lot of marble structures) or strategic (every new cathedral is a Cassian contract).
His secret: Petronius's quarry crews have been encountering something strange in the deep cuts — a vein of marble that is not white but faintly luminescent, with a blue-green light visible only in total darkness. The vein is deep, narrow, and unlike any mineral deposit his engineers have ever seen. He has sealed the section and told no one. He does not know what he has found. He is afraid of it.
Cassia Cassian (age 17) — Petronius's eldest daughter. Headstrong, curious, and possessed of an intense interest in geology that her father considers unwomanly and her tutors consider inappropriate. She has been sneaking into the sealed quarry section at night. She has seen the glowing stone. She has touched it. She is the first person on Nionia in three centuries to feel the Pulse — a faint warmth in her fingertips, a pressure behind her eyes, a sense of being watched by something that doesn't have eyes. She doesn't know what it means. She can't stop going back.

DOMUS LUX — The White Cloaks
Founded: c. 1303 AF (originally a rogue chapter of the Sons of Loreth) Seat: The Pale House, Dome Quarter Sigil: A white flame on a white field (the sigil is deliberately almost invisible — "purity needs no display") Words: "We See All"
Domus Lux is not a noble house in the traditional sense. It is a religious-military order — the Pure Way's enforcement arm, Jous's personal instrument of control. Its members take vows of obedience to the God-King, wear the white cloaks that have become the most feared garment on the island, and operate with an authority that supersedes civilian law. They investigate heresy, enforce doctrinal compliance, interrogate suspects, and — when necessary — execute the condemned. They are judge, jury, and executioner under the Pure Way's legal framework, answerable only to Jous.
Current Members:
Prior Thaniel (age ~40) — Leader of Domus Lux. A zealot of unknown origin — his accent suggests Heartlands birth, but no one has been able to confirm his history before he appeared in Nionia around 1302 AF, already attached to the early Pure Way movement. He is gaunt, tall, soft-spoken, and radiates the particular menace of a man who is absolutely certain that everything he does is righteous. His eyes are pale blue, almost white, and people who have been interrogated by him report that he never blinks during questioning — a detail that may be exaggeration but that has become part of his legend.
Thaniel is a true believer. This makes him more dangerous than a cynic would be — a cynic can be bribed, blackmailed, or reasoned with. Thaniel cannot. He believes Jous is Loreth incarnate with the same certainty that he believes the sun will rise. He has personally overseen the execution of over forty people for heresy, apostasy, or "corruption of the Way." He does not enjoy these executions. He considers them necessary surgery — the removal of diseased tissue to preserve the body's health. He sleeps soundly.
Brother Cael (age ~25) — Thaniel's protégé and the Domus Lux's chief investigator. Where Thaniel is rigid, Cael is adaptive — he understands that not every heretic can be found through brute-force surveillance, and he has developed a network of informants, paid observers, and leveraged civilians that functions as an intelligence service more sophisticated than anything the Republic's old secret police ever managed. Cael is handsome, approachable, and charming in a way that Thaniel is not — he is the friendly face of the Inquisition, the one who sits down next to you in a tavern and asks how you're doing with such genuine warmth that you find yourself telling him things you shouldn't. He files reports on everyone he talks to. He has a filing system that cross-references names, locations, associations, and suspicious behaviors. He is building a map of Nionian society that would make the Magos jealous.
Cael's personal belief in the Pure Way is genuine but less absolute than Thaniel's — he has doubts, carefully suppressed, about whether Jous's visions are divine or merely unusual. He compensates for these doubts by working harder, investigating more aggressively, and punishing more severely than his role requires. The psychology is familiar: he is proving his faith to himself by performing it at maximum intensity.
Sister Merel (age ~30) — Head of the Domus Lux's "Daughters of Purity" — the female branch, responsible for monitoring women's compliance with the Pure Way's increasingly restrictive gender codes (modesty standards, prohibitions on unaccompanied travel, limitations on property ownership for unmarried women). Merel is a former dockworker's daughter who found in the Pure Way a structure and purpose her previous life lacked. She is efficient, incorruptible, and quietly horrified by the direction her role is taking — the gender restrictions she enforces are becoming more extreme with each passing year, and she can see where the trajectory leads. She has not spoken her concerns. She knows what happens to people who question the Way.

THE TRIUMVIRATE — The Last Echo of the Republic
Three magistrates who formally crowned Jous during the civil war and were retained as a vestigial advisory body. They have no real power. They serve at Jous's pleasure. Their continued existence is Jous's concession to the fiction that his rule has legal continuity with the Republic.
Magistrate Lucan Praxis (age 55) — The eldest Triumvir. A career bureaucrat who served in the Senate's treasury office for twenty years before the war. He crowned Jous because the alternative was being killed. He now manages the civil administration — taxes, infrastructure, public works — with the numb competence of a man doing his job inside a nightmare. He drinks moderately, sleeps poorly, and has developed a facial tic that activates when Jous enters a room.
Magistrate Iona Kess (age 48) — The only woman in the Triumvirate. A former commercial judge who was appointed to the Senate's judicial committee. Sharp, pragmatic, and the Triumvir most skilled at navigating the gap between what Jous wants and what is actually possible. She has quietly blocked or delayed several of the Pure Way's more extreme proposals (a ban on foreign-language texts, a curfew for unmarried women, the demolition of the old Temple of Fortia) by burying them in procedural reviews that she designs to take years to complete. She is the most useful person in Jous's government and the one he least appreciates.
Magistrate Darvos Sull (age 38) — The youngest. A former naval officer who switched sides during the civil war and was rewarded with a Triumvirate seat. He is the only Triumvir who is a genuine Pure Way convert — he believes in Jous, supports the regime, and uses his position to advocate for military expansion. He is also the Triumvir most likely to be promoted into Jous's inner circle and the one Lucretia Marcellus considers most dangerous, because a true believer in a position of institutional authority can do more damage than a zealot with a sword.

IV. MINOR HOUSES AND NOTABLE FAMILIES
House Vellius — Olive oil magnates. Control the largest olive plantations on the southern coast. Wealthy, cautious, apolitical by long tradition. The current patriarch, Marius Vellius (age 60), has survived every regime change by the simple expedient of supplying everyone with olive oil regardless of who's in charge. His youngest daughter, Thessia (age 22), has joined the Daughters of Purity against her father's wishes — a genuine conversion that has opened a rift in the family.
House Varro — Fishing fleet owners. Based in the dockyard district. The family has operated the island's largest fishing cooperative for three generations. Captain Sextus Varro (age 50) runs the fleet and serves as the informal mayor of the dockyards — the person Domus Lux negotiates with when they want something done (or not done) on the waterfront. His cooperation with the regime is transactional: he keeps the docks quiet, they keep their white cloaks out of his taverns. His son, Little Sextus (age 19), is an apprentice shipwright in the naval yards who has begun attending secret lamento performances — the old songs, the uncensored ones — in a cellar off the Quarry Road.
The Cato Family — Wine merchants. Not a noble house but a commercial dynasty with more liquid wealth than some patricians. Galen Cato (age 44) runs the business — importing mainland wines and distributing Nionian vintages. He is the man Eduard Lorethian has been having quiet conversations with. Cato is not a political operative. He is a businessman who recognizes that a prince with grievances is a valuable relationship, and who is positioning himself to profit from whatever happens next. His wife, Renata (age 40), is smarter than he is and managing the family's real intelligence network — a web of tavern-keepers, ship captains, and dock-workers who pass information along with wine barrels.
The Palladian Circle — Not a family but a secret society. An underground network of former Quill scholars, displaced academics, and nostalgic republicans who meet in rotating locations to preserve pre-war scholarship, maintain the old curriculum, and quietly resist the Pure Way's intellectual stranglehold. They number perhaps thirty active members and a hundred sympathizers. They are amateurs at conspiracy and professionals at preservation. Their most precious possession: a complete copy of The Cogitant Letters by Father Thesan — the Logosian text that the Council of Three banned in 1035 AF — smuggled from the Isle of Knowledge by a Magos agent who sympathized with their cause. They do not understand the text's implications for the echo-theory. But someone eventually will.

THE HORNS — Salt, Sail, and Silver Tongue (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — Four Ports, Four Tempers

I. THE PENINSULA AT A GLANCE
Population: ~120,000 total across four cities and their hinterlands Major Cities: Westhorn (pop. ~40,000), Brinehold (pop. ~25,000), Nightspike (pop. ~20,000), Skogrim (pop. ~10,000) Rural/Fishing villages: ~25,000 Government: No unified authority. Each city governs independently — three under dynastic/council rule, one under a religious order. Economy: Maritime trade, fishing, shipbuilding, salt production, timber (Skogrim), and the pilot services that control access to the treacherous coastal straits. Religion: Orthodox Loveism, with strong Alonite influence (the Lampkeepers of Skogrim are an Alonite order).

II. WESTHORN — The First Port
The City
The largest and wealthiest of the Horns cities, Westhorn clings to a U-shaped natural harbor protected by two massive stone breakwaters — one natural, one imperial-era construction. The city rises in tiers from the harbor: the waterfront district (docks, warehouses, chandleries, taverns, the fish market), the Midtown (merchant homes, guild halls, the Garrun manor, the Ayanite courthouse), and the Clifftop (the old imperial fortress, now the Garrun seat, overlooking the harbor from the highest point). The streets are steep, cobbled, and treacherously slick in the perpetual rain. Everything is built of grey stone and dark timber, roofed in slate, and hung with the iron-and-glass lanterns that give the city its nighttime identity — a cascade of warm light falling down the cliff face to the water.
The harbor never sleeps. Westhorn handles more trade volume than any other Horns port — mainland grain, Sangrean wine, Nionian marble, Red Coast spices, Teeth volcanic stone, and the local products (salt cod, smoked fish, ship timber, rope, sailcloth) that keep the Horns' economy running. The Harbormaster's Tower — a seven-story stone column at the harbor's entrance, topped with a rotating signal lamp — is the city's most recognizable landmark and the operational hub of the port: every ship that enters or exits the harbor is logged, inspected, and taxed by the Harbormaster's staff.

III. THE MAJOR HOUSES OF THE HORNS
HOUSE GARRUN — Lords of Westhorn
Founded: Pre-imperial (originally the Horns' local chieftains; survived the conquest by bending knee to Nion I) Seat: Garrun Keep, Clifftop, Westhorn Sigil: A grey ship's wheel on a green field Words: "Steady as the Tide"
House Garrun has governed Westhorn for over a millennium — first as chieftains, then as imperial governors, then as independent lords. They are not the flashiest dynasty on the continent, but they may be the most durable. Their survival strategy across every era has been the same: be useful, be reliable, and never reach for more than you can hold. The Garruns are administrators, not conquerors. They run the port, maintain the roads, keep the peace, and take their percentage. The city prospers because the Garruns understand that their wealth depends on the city's wealth, and the city's wealth depends on trade flowing freely.
Current Members:
Lord Harlan Garrun (age 58) — Head of house. A blocky, weathered man with salt-grey hair and the permanently squinting eyes of someone who has spent a lifetime looking into wind. Harlan has been lord of Westhorn for thirty years and has governed with the unspectacular competence that the Garruns are known for: the docks are well-maintained, the tariffs are fair, the criminal element is managed rather than eradicated (a realistic approach that acknowledges the impossibility of eliminating smuggling from a port city), and the Ayanite courts function without excessive corruption. He is respected without being loved — a distinction that suits him perfectly.
Harlan's great concern is Morvayn's bridge coup. Westhorn's economy depends on mainland trade, and Morvayn's extortionate tolls are strangling it. Harlan has advocated military action to retake the bridge — a position that puts him at odds with House Verdane of Verwhisper (which prefers negotiation) and that Brinehold would support if Brinehold trusted Westhorn to share the recaptured bridge's revenues (which Brinehold does not).
His private grief: his eldest son, Eddan, was killed in a sailing accident seven years ago — a squall took his racing sloop in the straits. The body was never recovered. Harlan has not raced since. He keeps Eddan's trophies — a shelf of carved wooden cups awarded at regattas — in his study, where he can see them from his desk. He does not mention them. No one else does either.
Lady Maren Garrun (age 54) — Harlan's wife. Born a Dalgaard of Brinehold — one of the rare inter-city marriages that was supposed to cement an alliance between the two ports. It didn't work (the Garrun-Dalgaard rivalry is older than any marriage), but Maren herself has been an effective Lady of Westhorn: she runs the city's charitable institutions, manages the household's social calendar, and serves as Harlan's most trusted advisor on matters of public opinion. She has a Brinehold accent she has never lost and a Brinehold intelligence network she has never disclosed.
Taryn Garrun (age 28) — Harlan's second son, now heir since Eddan's death. A competent sailor and an adequate administrator who lives in the shadow of a dead brother he can never match. Taryn is responsible, hardworking, and chronically anxious — he sleeps badly, bites his nails to the quick, and compensates for his insecurity by over-preparing for every meeting, every decision, every social interaction. He would be a perfectly good lord of Westhorn if he could stop believing he wasn't. His wife, Brynn (age 26), is a fisherman's daughter he married for love over his father's objections. She is cheerful, profane, and completely unintimidated by the aristocracy — qualities that either endear her to the court or horrify them, depending on the day.
Dalla Garrun (age 23) — Harlan's daughter. Serves as the family's trade envoy, traveling between the Horns ports negotiating contracts and maintaining commercial relationships. She is the most politically talented Garrun of her generation — sharp, personable, and possessed of her mother's Brinehold gift for reading people. She has been conducting secret conversations with contacts on Verwhisper about a possible alliance against Morvayn — conversations her father doesn't know about, because Harlan's approach (demand military action, wait for consensus) is too slow for Dalla's taste.

THE MERCHANT-CAPTAINS' COUNCIL OF BRINEHOLD
Founded: c. 905 AF (after the empire's fall) Seat: The Salt Exchange, Brinehold Sigil: A white sail on a blue-black field (the Council's collective banner)
Brinehold is not ruled by a single house. It is governed by the Merchant-Captains' Council — a body of twelve trading family representatives who collectively set policy, adjudicate disputes, and manage the port's operations. The system is oligarchic but genuinely competitive: Council seats are allocated by commercial volume (the twelve families who ship the most cargo in a given year earn seats), ensuring that the governance reflects the port's actual economic power rather than hereditary privilege. In practice, four or five families have dominated the Council for generations, with the remaining seats rotating among smaller operations.
The Dominant Families:
House Dalgaard — Salt merchants. The oldest and wealthiest family on the Council. The Dalgaards have controlled Brinehold's salt production — the evaporation ponds, the packing houses, the distribution network — since before the empire. Salt is boring. Salt is also essential: every preserved fish, every cured meat, every pickled vegetable on the continent requires salt, and the Dalgaards supply roughly a third of the Horns' total production.
Elgar Dalgaard (age 63) — Council Chair (a rotating position, but Elgar has held it for nine consecutive years by the simple expedient of being richer than everyone else). A massive, booming man who fills a room the way a ship fills a dock — completely and with no space left for anyone else. He laughs too loudly, drinks too much, and negotiates with the subtlety of a battering ram. His results speak for themselves: Brinehold's salt revenues have tripled during his chairmanship, and the Dalgaard shipping fleet is now the second largest in the Horns (behind Westhorn's combined merchant marine).
Elgar's weakness is his family. His wife died young. He raised four children alone, badly, and the results are visible: Sigrid (age 35), the eldest, is brilliant but alcoholic — she manages the salt operations with one hand and holds a bottle with the other. Kael (age 30) is a sailor who abandoned the family business to captain his own ship, running cargoes of questionable legality between the Horns and the Teeth. Anja (age 27) married into a Nightspike shipping family and hasn't spoken to her father in three years (the reasons involve an inheritance dispute, a forge-worker she was forbidden to marry, and a slap across the face in the Salt Exchange that twelve Council members witnessed). Little Rig (age 20), the youngest — real name Rigvald — is a dock-worker by day and a bare-knuckle fighter by night, competing in the illegal fighting circuit that operates in Brinehold's warehouse district. He has broken his nose four times and his father's heart continuously.
House Strand — Shipbuilders. The Strands operate Brinehold's largest shipyard — the Keel Works — producing everything from fishing smacks to merchant galleons. They are the Council's industrial heart: without Strand ships, the other families have nothing to trade in.
Bera Strand (age 49) — Matriarch and master shipwright. One of the few women to run a major Horns commercial operation, and the only one who did it by building ships with her own hands for twenty years before inheriting the business. Bera is stocky, callus-handed, and speaks in a voice roughened by decades of inhaling sawdust and pitch fumes. She is the most technically knowledgeable member of the Council and the most politically indifferent — she cares about ship design, timber quality, and whether her keels are true, and she considers everything else a distraction. Her apprentices worship her. Her competitors fear her. Her children — Torsten (age 25) and Liv (age 21) — are both in the yards, learning the trade, and both showing signs of their mother's exacting standards.
House Kemm — Fish brokers. The Kemms don't catch fish — they buy, process, sell, and distribute it. Their packing houses along Brinehold's waterfront handle roughly half the city's catch, salting, smoking, and barreling it for export. They are middlemen, and they are very, very good at it.
Oskar Kemm (age 40) — Council member. A thin, precise man who dresses better than any fishmonger should and negotiates like a man who has memorized the price of every commodity on the continent. He is widely disliked and universally consulted — no one in Brinehold makes a deal without checking the Kemm rate first. His personal life is unusually wholesome for a Horns merchant: married to his childhood sweetheart, Helke (age 38), father of three, and a devoted member of the local Ashanite hospice's board. The contrast between his ruthless professional persona and his genuine domestic warmth confuses people who expect merchants to be consistently unpleasant.

HOUSE VELDREN — Lords of Nightspike
Founded: c. 905 AF (descendants of the laborers Nion I reassigned to his naval yards) Seat: Veldren Tower, Nightspike Sigil: A red hammer on a black field Words: "We Built This"
Nightspike's ruling family began as slaves. The original Veldrens were among the workers Nion I forced to build his naval shipyards on the island — laborers who toiled under imperial overseers for generations. When the empire fell, the workers' descendants — now skilled shipwrights with intimate knowledge of the yards they'd been enslaved to build — seized the city and claimed it as their own. The Veldren name was adopted by the family that led the seizure: a shipwright foreman whose original name was lost when the imperial records burned.
This origin story defines Nightspike's culture. The city is proudly working-class, reflexively suspicious of inherited privilege, and possessed of a chip on its collective shoulder the size of a warship. The other Horns ports look down on Nightspike (Westhorn considers it a backwater, Brinehold considers it a rival). Nightspike looks back up with a glare.
Current Members:
Lord Aran Veldren (age 47) — Head of house. A former shipwright who still has sawdust in his hair and calluses on his palms despite twenty years as a lord. Aran governs Nightspike the way his ancestors ran their work-crews: directly, loudly, and with minimal tolerance for excuses. He walks the dockyards daily, knows his workers by name, and settles disputes with a combination of rough justice and genuine empathy that has made him the most popular lord in the Horns among common folk and the most irritating among aristocrats.
Nightspike never fully recovered from the Great Fire of 1075 AF. Forty percent of the city's shipbuilding capacity was destroyed, and the population dropped by a quarter. Aran has spent his lordship rebuilding — new drydocks, new warehouses, a new breakwater — but the city remains smaller and poorer than Westhorn, and the suspicion that Brinehold agents set the fire has never been proven or forgotten.
Ymma Veldren (age 44) — Aran's wife. Born in the Red Coast — a copper merchant's daughter who came to Nightspike on a trading vessel, met Aran on the docks, and stayed. She is the only Red Coast woman in the Horns' aristocracy, and her presence has introduced elements of Red Coast culture to Nightspike: spiced food, copper jewelry, and a henna tradition that has become fashionable among the city's younger women. She is also Nightspike's most effective trade negotiator — her Red Coast connections give the city commercial access that the other ports lack.
Jorik Veldren (age 22) — Aran's son and heir. A natural sailor who has been agitating for Nightspike to stop rebuilding and start projecting: build a war fleet, challenge Westhorn's naval dominance, break Morvayn's bridge monopoly by force. His father considers him reckless. Jorik considers his father cautious to the point of cowardice. The tension between them is the city's primary political dynamic — the dockyards workers are split between the father's gradualism and the son's ambition.
Old Thessa Veldren (age 73) — Aran's mother, called "the Iron Grandmother" by the city. A former labor organizer who led the dockworkers' guild for thirty years before her son inherited the lordship. She is retired but not inactive — she holds court in a dockside tavern called The Bent Nail, where she dispenses advice, adjudicates petty disputes, and terrifies young nobles with stories of the old days when the Veldrens still had calluses. She is the moral authority of the house: when Aran is uncertain, he visits his mother. When Jorik is reckless, his grandmother calls him to The Bent Nail and reduces him to silence with a look.

THE LAMPKEEPERS OF SKOGRIM
Founded: c. 910 AF (by Brother Erland) Seat: The Lamphall, Skogrim Sigil: A golden flame on a dark green field Words: "Light the Way"
Skogrim is not like the other Horns cities. It is a forest city — built at the point where the dense woodland corridor connecting the Horns to the mainland opens into the peninsula. Where the three port cities face the sea, Skogrim faces the trees. Its economy is not maritime but terrestrial: timber, charcoal, forest products (resin, tar, pitch, medicinal herbs), and — most profitably — the toll revenue from controlling the only viable land route between the Horns and the rest of the continent.
The Lampkeepers are an Alonite religious order that functions as Skogrim's government, military, and highway patrol. They maintain the signal fires and way-stations that mark the forest road, provide armed escort for caravans (for a fee), and collect the tolls that fund the entire operation. They are technically monks. They are practically a merchant-military corporation with a prayer schedule.
Current Members:
Prior Wulfric (age 55) — Head of the Lampkeepers. A former Heartlands soldier who joined the order after losing his family to a roadside banditry incident — he arrived at a Lampkeeper way-station with a dead wife on the back of his horse and a toddler in his arms, and never left. He has been Prior for eighteen years and has turned the order from a loose collection of road-wardens into a disciplined, well-funded organization that controls the forest corridor with an efficiency that imperial road engineers would recognize and respect.
Wulfric is devout in the Alonite tradition — faith through action, not contemplation. He prays by maintaining roads. He worships by keeping travelers alive. He has killed seven bandits personally in the line of duty and considers each death a failure of the system he was supposed to maintain. He does not sleep well. He rises before dawn to walk the nearest section of road, checking waystone markers and lamp-oil levels. His toddler grew up to be Sera Wulfric (age 22), now a Lampkeeper herself, who patrols the deepest section of the forest corridor — the Thornway — where the trees grow thick enough to block the sky and the last reported Grave-Stag sighting (1287 AF) keeps the order's beast-watch protocols active.
Brother Aldis (age 35) — The order's quartermaster and de facto treasurer. A former Brinehold merchant's clerk who joined the Lampkeepers after embezzling from his employer and needing somewhere to disappear. The order took him without questions (the Alonites believe in redemption through service), and his financial skills have proven invaluable — he manages the toll revenues, the supply chain for the way-stations, and the complex accounting that keeps the Lampkeepers solvent. He is also skimming approximately 3% of the toll revenue into a personal account. He considers this a reasonable administrative fee. Brother Wulfric suspects but has not confirmed. The day he does will be dramatic.

IV. THE PILOTS' GUILD
Founded: 935 AF (by the Pilots' Charter) Seat: Pilot's Rock — a small island in the straits between Westhorn and Brinehold Sigil: A compass rose on a white field
The Pilots' Guild is the Horns' most powerful independent institution. Its members are the specialist navigators who guide ships through the treacherous coastal straits — shallow waters, shifting sandbars, tidal races, and submerged rocks that can rip the bottom out of a merchant vessel in seconds. Without a licensed pilot, no ship enters or leaves the Horns' harbors safely. The Guild charges for this service, and the fees are non-negotiable.
The Guild operates from Pilot's Rock — a windswept lump of basalt in the middle of the straits, topped with a lighthouse, a barracks, and the Guild's administrative offices. Pilots live on the Rock for six-month rotations, training, maintaining their charts, and waiting for the signal flags that summon them to incoming vessels. The Guild is fiercely neutral — it serves all ports equally, charges all ports equally, and refuses all political entanglement. A pilot who shows favoritism toward any port is expelled. A port that attempts to coerce the Guild is blockaded.
Guildmaster Revka Thorne (age 50) — Head of the Guild. A woman of mixed Horns-Red Coast ancestry (copper skin, sea-grey eyes, hair braided with bone beads), Revka rose through the Guild's ranks by being the best navigator on the straits — she can read a tidal chart the way a musician reads a score, instinctively, in real time. She has guided over a thousand vessels through the straits without losing one. Her authority within the Guild is absolute, earned through competence rather than politics. She lives on Pilot's Rock year-round, leaving the island perhaps twice a year for Council meetings in Westhorn. She considers the mainland a distraction.
Her secret: Revka has noticed something in the straits that she cannot explain. The currents have been shifting — subtly, over the past year, in patterns that don't match her thirty years of charts. The water temperature has risen by a fraction of a degree. The fish stocks have changed — species appearing that she hasn't seen since her grandmother's logs. She has mentioned this to no one. She is watching the water. The water is doing something new.

V. NOTABLE UNAFFILIATED CHARACTERS (THE HORNS)
Mag "Half-Mast" Korren — Brinehold's most notorious smuggler. Runs a crew of fifteen out of a warehouse on the Brinehold waterfront, moving untaxed goods between the Horns, the Teeth, and the Red Coast. Lost his left arm to a cargo-crane accident at age twenty; the stump earned him his nickname. He is cheerful, generous with his crew, and completely amoral about his cargo — he'll move anything for anyone if the price is right. He has been arrested four times and convicted zero times. The Dalgaard family uses his network for off-book shipments. Elgar Dalgaard would deny this under oath.
Sister Efa of the Salt Chapel — Ashanite hospitaller, runs Brinehold's only free clinic from a converted salt warehouse. She treats dockworkers, sailors, prostitutes, and anyone else the city's respectable physicians won't touch. She is sixty, arthritic, and in possession of a bedside manner that combines genuine compassion with a vocabulary that would make a longshoreman blush. She has delivered over two thousand babies. She is the most trusted person in Brinehold's working-class districts.
Tomasz "the Fin" Berget — Nightspike's premier tavern-keeper. Runs The Bent Nail (with Old Thessa Veldren's blessing), the closest thing the city has to a civic institution. The Bent Nail serves beer, fish stew, and unfiltered truth — Tomasz allows no pretension in his establishment. Nobles who enter are served the same beer in the same chipped tankards as dockworkers. The walls are covered with carved initials, old ship's pennants, and a stuffed foamcoil serpent (almost certainly fake) that Tomasz claims was caught in the harbor in 1289 AF.
Heska Vonn — Skogrim. An elderly herb-woman who lives alone in a cottage three miles off the forest road, deep enough in the Thornway that casual travelers never find her. She is the Horns' last acknowledged folk healer — a woman with "the Old Touch," whose poultices work slightly better than they should and whose diagnoses are slightly more accurate than any mundane observation could produce. She is mildly echo-sensitive, though she would describe it as "listening to what the plants want to say." The Lampkeepers tolerate her because she treats their injured patrols for free. The Ashanite clergy tolerate her because her methods align with Asha's teachings on natural healing. The local farmers rely on her because she is the only person within fifty miles who can tell them whether a sick cow will live or die — and she is always right.
She is seventy-three, lives with a one-eyed cat named Grudge, and has recently begun experiencing something she has never felt before: a faint warmth in the forest floor, a hum beneath the roots, as if the Thornway's ancient trees are waking up from a very long sleep. She does not know about the Giants. She does not know about the Eldra-Veil breach. She only knows that the forest feels different this year, and the feeling is getting stronger.


NIONIA — Cities, Landmarks, and Legends

VELLIUM — The White City
Major Landmarks
The Great Dome — The converted Senate chamber, now the cathedral of the Pure Way. The largest enclosed space on the continent: a hemisphere of white Cassian marble supported by a skeleton of iron ribs forged in the Marchia Ferrus. The interior is 200 feet across and 140 feet from floor to oculus — the open eye at the dome's apex that admits a single column of daylight that tracks across the marble floor as the Elder Sun moves. Nion I built the original Senate chamber. It burned. The Republic rebuilt it, grander. Jous converted it, whitewashing the frescoed walls (which depicted scenes from the Republic's history — debates, elections, naval victories) under a coat of lime plaster so thick that the paintings are preserved beneath it, invisible but intact. The floor is a single mosaic of white and pale blue tesserae depicting Loreth's sun radiating outward from the center — the spot where the speaker's podium once stood and where Jous now conducts the Pure Way's daily cantus. The acoustics are extraordinary: a whisper at the center can be heard clearly at the walls. Jous exploits this during sermons, beginning in a voice so soft the congregation holds its breath, then building to a resonance that fills the dome like a struck bell. The effect is deliberate and devastatingly effective.
Below the Dome, inaccessible to the public, the old Senate's archive chambers still exist — a network of vaulted rooms where the Republic's records were stored. Jous sealed them after the conquest. Lucretia Marcellus's preserved archive is a copy; the originals are down there, in the dark, under the God-King's feet.
The Pale House — Domus Lux headquarters. Formerly the Palazzo Severan, a patrician mansion built by Domus Navarrus in the Republican era as a city residence for visiting admirals. The architecture is beautiful — columned entrance, frescoed atrium, a garden courtyard with a marble fountain depicting dolphins — and the beauty makes what happens inside worse. The upper floors are administrative: offices, records, the filing system that Brother Cael maintains with such frightening precision. The ground floor is the public face: a receiving hall where citizens can report heresies, request dispensations, or petition for the release of detained relatives. The basement is the interrogation level. The cells are small, windowless, and acoustically isolated — screams do not carry to the street. The fountain in the courtyard runs constantly. Some say this is to mask the sounds from below. Others say the Pale House has always had a fountain. Both are true.
The Pallion Steps — A monumental staircase of 217 white marble steps connecting the harbor district to the Dome Quarter. Built during the Republican era as a civic processional route — newly elected consuls would climb the Steps to take their oaths at the Senate. Under the Pure Way, the Steps serve the same function with different content: Jous descends them during high holy days, white-robed and barefoot, attended by Domus Lux guards and Pure Way choirs singing the cantus. The Steps are wide enough for thirty people to walk abreast. At the midpoint, a landing opens onto a terrace with a panoramic view of the harbor. Vendors sell prayer-tokens and sanctified water at the base. Pickpockets work the crowds on festival days. The Inquisitors patrol the middle sections. The Steps are simultaneously sacred space, public thoroughfare, and commerce zone — a vertical cross-section of Nionian society.
The Anchor & Chain — The dockyards' most famous tavern. Three stories of salt-rotted timber, leaning at an angle that suggests imminent collapse and has suggested it for the last eighty years. The ground floor is the public room: long tables, cheap beer, fish stew that tastes better than it looks, and a permanent haze of Ashleaf smoke. The second floor is the performance space — a low-ceilinged room where lamento singers perform after midnight, the songs getting more honest as the hour gets later and the Inquisitors' shift changes make the streets less watched. The third floor is officially storage. Actually, it is the meeting room of the Dock Council — an informal body of dockworkers' representatives who manage labor disputes, negotiate wages, and occasionally coordinate work stoppages when the regime pushes too hard. The Council has no legal status. It has no need of legal status. It has the docks.
The tavern's name refers to an anchor and chain mounted above the door — supposedly salvaged from the wreck of the first Navarrus warship burned in the Battle of Port Severan. Whether this is true is debated. The anchor is real.
The Convent of the Veil — On the northeastern coast of the island, three miles from Vellium proper, a compound of whitewashed buildings surrounded by a grove of ancient olive trees. This is where the Sisters of the Veil lived, where Jous was born, and where his mythology begins. The convent is now a shrine — Jous declared it "the Birthplace of the Way" and opened it to pilgrims, displacing the remaining Sisters (those who hadn't fled during the civil war) to a smaller building on the grounds. The original chapel, where Sister Sera allegedly gave virgin birth, has been preserved as a devotional space: white walls, a simple altar, and a painted icon of Sera holding the infant Jous that is the Pure Way's most sacred image.
The grove around the convent is the oldest stand of trees on the island — olive trees whose trunks are gnarled into shapes that look deliberate, as if something shaped them. The trees are echo-dense. This is the environment that nurtured Jous's sensitivity — and anyone with even latent echo-perception, spending time in the grove, feels something: a warmth, a pressure, a sense of the air being thicker than it should be. Pilgrims report "spiritual experiences" in the grove — visions, emotional breakthroughs, a feeling of being watched by something benevolent. The Pure Way attributes these to divine presence. The mechanism is simpler and stranger.
The Forum of Tears — A public plaza in the Terraces where the civil war's worst atrocity occurred. During the final days of fighting, a company of Domus Marcellus household guards, retreating from a Ferronus advance, barricaded themselves in the Forum with approximately three hundred civilians as human shields. The Ferronus mercenaries attacked anyway. The guards, the mercenaries, and roughly two hundred civilians died in the fighting. The Forum was renamed afterward — it had been the Forum of Copia, dedicated to the old goddess of wealth. The new name stuck. The plaza is now a memorial: the cobblestones are stained with a dark discoloration that residents say is blood that won't wash out (it is actually iron-oxide leaching from the stone, but the legend is more powerful than the chemistry). Families of the dead leave small offerings — flowers, candles, written prayers — along the Forum's edges. The Pure Way has attempted to repurpose the space as a "Triumph of Faith" monument. The flowers keep appearing.
The Scriptorium Ruin — The burned shell of the Order of the Quill's Nionian library, in the Colonnade district. Jous's followers torched it during the civil war, destroying the island's largest collection of secular scholarship, republican histories, and pre-imperial texts. The building has not been rebuilt. It stands open to the sky, its walls blackened, its interior choked with weeds growing in the ash of ten thousand books. The Pure Way considers the ruin a symbol of the old corruption's destruction. The Palladian Circle considers it a wound. Valeria Marcellus visits it monthly, alone, and sits in the ruined reading room for an hour without speaking. She tells no one what she does there. She is memorizing the layout, wall by wall, shelf by shelf, so that if the collection is ever reconstructed, she can tell the builders where everything was.
The Whale-Oil Works — On the harbor's northern edge, a complex of rendering vats, storage tanks, and the long stone piers where the whale-ships unload their catch. Nionia's whale-oil industry provides fuel for the city's street lamps (Jous's decree that darkness breeds sin has tripled demand) and the pitch-based fire-weapons that the navy is stockpiling for the mainland invasion. The Works stink. The smell — rendered fat, salt blood, the chemical tang of processing — drifts across the harbor on certain winds and reaches the Dome Quarter, where the priests burn incense to mask it. The workers are the hardest men on the island: whale-hunters, flensers, renderers, barrel-makers. They are Jous's least enthusiastic subjects. The whales, they say, are harder to kill than gods, and they've killed plenty of whales.

PORT SEVERAN — The Navy's Fist
A military harbor twenty miles down the coast from Vellium. Originally built by Nion I as the empire's naval headquarters, Port Severan has been a base for warships for over thirteen centuries. The town exists to serve the fleet: drydocks, ropewalk, sail-lofts, armories, barracks, and the massive stone breakwater — the Emperor's Arm — that extends half a mile into the sea, creating a sheltered anchorage for the largest warships afloat.
The Navarrus Citadel — The Navarrus family seat. A fortress built into the cliff above the harbor, its seaward wall dropping a hundred feet straight into the water. The Citadel has been the Navarrus home for centuries and now serves as both family residence and naval command center. Jous's Domus Lux observers occupy the eastern tower — the Watchtower — from which they can see every ship in the harbor and every light in the Citadel's windows. Admiral Varro Navarrus lives in the western wing and keeps his shutters closed.
The Fire-Ship Yards — A new facility, built since the civil war, where the navy is developing and producing the fire-weapons that won the Battle of Port Severan. The yards are restricted: surrounded by a stone wall, guarded by Domus Lux sentries, and operated by a hand-picked crew of Ferronus-loyal workers. The weapons themselves are a closely guarded secret — clay pots filled with a mixture of whale-oil, sulfur, and pulverized volcanic glass that ignites on impact and burns on water. The mixture is called Pyre-Seed by the workers. It is unreliable (one in five pots fails to ignite), dangerous to manufacture (three workers have died in production accidents), and devastatingly effective when it works. The mainland has no equivalent.
The Graveyard of Masts — A shallow bay south of Port Severan where the wrecks of the civil war's naval battles still protrude from the water at low tide. Six Navarrus warships, two Ferronus transports, and an unknown number of smaller vessels lie in the silt, their masts jutting at angles like a drowned forest. The navy has salvaged what it could — ironwork, anchors, intact hull sections — but the deeper wrecks remain. Fishermen avoid the area. They say the currents around the wrecks are unpredictable, which is true. They also say they hear sounds from beneath the water on still nights — creaking timber, the snap of canvas, once a voice calling a name. This is probably the wind channeling through the submerged rigging. Probably.

MARCHIA FERRUS — The Iron Hills
Not a city but a district — a scatter of mining camps, smelting works, and supply depots spread across the mountainous interior of the island. The Marchia Ferrus is where Nionia's iron comes from, and increasingly where its marble comes from as well (the Cassian quarries extend into the lower hills). The landscape is scarred and industrial: open pit mines, spoil heaps, roads rutted by ore-carts, and the permanent grey haze of smelting smoke that hangs in the valleys on windless days.
Ferronus Hall — Ferron's fortress-manor, built on a ridge directly above the iron vein that made his fortune. The architecture is aggressive: thick walls of unfinished basalt, iron-barred windows, a gatehouse designed to withstand a siege. Ferron built it to be ugly. He succeeded. The interior is surprisingly comfortable — Orla's influence — with good furniture, warm fires, and a cellar stocked with mainland wines that Ferron drinks with the deliberate pleasure of a man who grew up on mine-water. The Hall's most notable feature is the Assay Room — a laboratory where Ferronus metallurgists test ore samples, develop alloys, and conduct the experiments that Matteo Ferronus has quietly redirected toward his own interests. The Room's walls are lined with shelves of mineral samples from every mine on the island, organized by a system that only Matteo understands.
The Cassian Quarries — The marble pits. Stepped cuts in the white hillsides, some over two hundred feet deep, where crews of quarrymen have been extracting building stone for over a millennium. The quarries are beautiful in an industrial way — the exposed marble faces catch the sunlight and glow, and the geometry of the cuts has an accidental elegance that architects admire. The deepest quarry — the White Throat — is the one where Petronius Cassian's crews found the luminous vein. The sealed section is marked with a simple "Unstable — No Entry" sign. Cassia Cassian ignores it.

NIONIAN LEGENDS
The Burning Senator — The most famous ghost story on the island. The legend holds that during the Great Pyre — when Nion I locked the Senate inside and burned them alive — one senator refused to die. He burned but kept walking, a figure of living flame, and staggered out through the door that Nion's soldiers had barred. He walked through the streets of the city, setting fire to nothing, speaking to no one, leaving footprints of melted stone. He walked to the harbor, stepped into the water, and sank. The footprints, the legend claims, are still visible on certain streets in the Colonnade — smooth depressions in the cobblestones that fill with rainwater and never dry. (Several streets in the Colonnade do have smooth depressions. They are almost certainly natural wear patterns. Locals disagree.)
The Seventh Bell — The old Senate chamber had six bronze bells mounted in its pediment, rung to announce sessions, votes, and emergencies. When the chamber burned, the bells melted. When the Republic rebuilt the chamber, six new bells were cast. But workers reported hearing a seventh bell — faint, high-pitched, ringing at dawn on the anniversary of the Pyre. The sound has been reported for over a thousand years. It continued after Jous converted the building into the Great Dome Cathedral. It was heard most recently three months ago. No source has ever been identified. Jous's clergy say it is "the voice of divine approval." Older residents say it is "the dead asking to be let in."
The Senator's Daughter — A folk tale. During the Republic's final decades, a senator's daughter fell in love with a dockworker. Her father forbade the match — the class difference was insurmountable. She agreed to an arranged marriage with a patrician she despised. On her wedding night, she walked to the Pallion Steps, climbed to the top, and threw herself off. Her body was never found. Since then, the legend says, a woman in a white dress is seen on the Steps during fog — standing at the terrace, looking toward the harbor. Sailors consider her an omen: seeing the woman means fair weather (she is looking for her lover's ship). Not seeing her means nothing. The legend is almost certainly fabricated — it follows a pattern common to every port city on the continent. But the image of the white woman on the white steps is powerful enough that Jous's Pure Way has been unable to suppress it, despite several attempts.
Nion's Jaw — A geological feature off the island's northern coast: a natural arch of volcanic rock, roughly fifty feet high, that frames the view of the open sea. The arch is shaped like an open mouth — two pillars of dark basalt with a curved lintel connecting them. Local legend: when Nion I sailed north to conquer the mainland, the island itself opened its mouth to let him pass, and the Jaw is what remains. Fishermen use the Jaw as a navigation marker. Children dare each other to swim through it. One child drowns approximately every decade. The parents blame the currents. The children blame "the Teeth inside" — a submerged ridge of sharp rock just beneath the waterline that the arch conceals. The metaphor is too perfect for a world-builder to ignore.
The Last Griffin of Nionia — A widespread but unverified legend. The Forum Griffin — the heraldic beast of the old Republic — was supposedly based on a real creature that nested in the Marchia Ferrus mountains during the pre-imperial era. Mosaic depictions survive in several Colonnade mansions, showing a winged, leonine creature with an eagle's head perched on the Senate's pediment. The last living Forum Griffin was allegedly killed by Nion I's soldiers during the Great Pyre — the creature attacked the troops who were barring the Senate doors, and was brought down by javelin-fire. Its skull was mounted above the Senate entrance as a trophy. The skull disappeared during the Republic's reconstruction. Some say it was destroyed. Some say it was taken by the Marcelli and hidden. Old Aemilia Torr's naval history includes a footnote: "The Griffin's skull is in the deep archive. I have seen it. It is not what you expect."

THE HORNS — Cities, Landmarks, and Legends

WESTHORN — The Lantern City
Major Landmarks
Garrun Keep — The Clifftop fortress. Built on the highest point of Westhorn's harbor cliff, the Keep has been the seat of House Garrun for over a millennium. The original structure was a pre-imperial chieftain's hill-fort — a ring of dry-stone walls around a timber hall. Over centuries, the fort became a castle: stone walls, towers, a great hall with a hammer-beam roof, and the famous Garrun Lantern — a signal tower rising from the Keep's highest point, topped with a fire-basket large enough to be visible twenty miles out to sea. The Lantern has been lit every night since the Garrun family took power. It has never been extinguished — not during storms, not during sieges, not during the Nightspike Fire when half the peninsula was illuminated by burning dockyards. The maintenance of the Lantern is the Garrun heir's ceremonial duty. Taryn Garrun climbs the tower every evening at dusk to check the fuel, trim the wick, and ensure the light burns through the night. His dead brother Eddan did it before him. The climb takes fourteen minutes. Taryn times it. He always takes exactly fourteen minutes.
The Harbormaster's Tower — Seven stories of grey stone at the harbor entrance, functioning as port authority, signal station, customs office, and the most visible symbol of Westhorn's commercial power. Every ship that enters the harbor is logged in the Tower's records — a continuous ledger that stretches back to 923 AF, the oldest commercial record on the continent. The current Harbormaster, Gorran Felk (age 61), has held the position for twenty-five years and knows the name, tonnage, captain, and usual cargo of every vessel that regularly trades in Westhorn waters. He is also hard of hearing, stubborn, and in the habit of pretending not to understand foreign accents to gain negotiating time. He is universally described as "impossible" and "irreplaceable" in the same sentence.
The Knotmaker's Street — A narrow, cobbled lane in Westhorn's Midtown, lined with the workshops of the city's knotmakers — artisans who produce the sailor's knot-jewelry that is the Horns' most distinctive cultural product. The knots are not merely decorative; each pattern carries specific meaning (rank, experience, home port, marital status, number of successful voyages), and the knotmakers who produce them are trained in a guild tradition that takes seven years to master. The finest knot-work — the Master's Chain, a single cord twisted into a continuous pattern representing an entire career — can sell for the price of a small boat. Knotmaker's Street is also, not coincidentally, the best place in Westhorn to hear gossip: the artisans work with their doors open, their clients sit and talk while waiting, and the accumulated intelligence of a thousand dockside conversations filters through the workshops like coffee through a cloth.
The Regatta Grounds — A stretch of open water outside the harbor where Westhorn hosts its annual sailing races. The Regatta is the city's defining social event: two weeks of competitive racing in classes ranging from single-handed dinghies to full-crewed cutters, accompanied by onshore festivals, tavern competitions, and the kind of inter-port trash-talk that occasionally requires magistrate intervention. The Regatta has been held every year since 971 AF. Eddan Garrun won the cutter class three years running before his death. His trophy shelf in Lord Harlan's study includes a fourth cup — posthumously awarded, carved by the Knotmakers' Guild, with the inscription "The sea keeps what it takes, and gives nothing back." Harlan has never read the inscription aloud.
The Storm Wall — Westhorn's seaward fortification: a massive stone breakwater, fifty feet high and fifteen feet thick, that shields the harbor from the open ocean's worst weather. Built in sections over five centuries, the Storm Wall is a patchwork of construction styles — imperial basalt at the base, Republican limestone in the middle, Age of Faith granite at the top — and it has been breached, repaired, and reinforced so many times that local stonemasons can read its history like a geological cross-section. The Wall's landward face is covered with carved graffiti: names, dates, ships, declarations of love, obscene commentary on rival ports. Some carvings are centuries old. The oldest readable inscription, dated approximately 950 AF, reads: "HROLF WAS HERE. BRINEHOLD EATS BARNACLES." Some traditions endure.
The Drowned Chapel — A Lovist chapel in the harbor district, built at such a low elevation that it floods during the highest tides. The chapel — dedicated to Alon, patron of service — was constructed in 1034 AF by a Lampkeeper missionary who apparently didn't understand tidal charts. Rather than relocate, the congregation adapted: services are held at low tide, the pews are mounted on stone risers, and the altar is built on a platform three feet above the floor. During flood tides, the chapel fills with seawater to knee-depth, and fish swim between the pews. The congregation considers this a feature rather than a bug — "Alon served all creatures," they say, "even the ones with fins." The chapel's resident priest, Father Erven (age 45), conducts services in hip-waders and has a theological argument prepared for anyone who suggests the chapel should be moved. He has never lost the argument.

BRINEHOLD — The Salt City
Major Landmarks
The Salt Exchange — Brinehold's seat of government and commercial center. A massive stone building on the waterfront, with a trading floor large enough to hold a thousand people and an upper gallery where the Merchant-Captains' Council holds its sessions in full public view. The Exchange was built in 967 AF and has been the heart of Brinehold's commerce ever since: every major trade deal, every shipping contract, every tariff negotiation happens on the floor or in the private rooms that line its corridors. The building smells permanently of salt — the crystalline tang that permeates everything in Brinehold, from the stone to the food to the clothes to the air itself. Newcomers find it overwhelming. Residents stop noticing after a week and then find other cities smell wrong.
The Exchange's most famous feature is the Tide Clock — a massive mechanical device mounted on the building's seaward wall, powered by the tidal flow through a channel cut in the foundation. The clock doesn't tell time; it tells the tide. Its single hand points to the current tidal state (flood, ebb, slack, high, low), and its mechanism produces a low, rhythmic clunking that Brinehold residents use as a background pulse — they can tell the state of the tide without looking at the water, just by listening to the building breathe.
The Evaporation Terraces — Brinehold's salt works. A series of shallow stone pools stepped down the cliff face south of the city, where seawater is channeled and left to evaporate in the (rare) sun, leaving behind salt crystals that are scraped, sorted, and packed in the Dalgaard warehouses. The terraces cover approximately three acres and produce, in a good year, enough salt to supply the entire Horns peninsula and export to the mainland. In a bad year (too much rain, too little sun), production falls and prices spike, producing the periodic salt crises that have been the Horns' most reliable economic disruption for four centuries. The terraces are beautiful from a distance — the pools reflect the sky in graduated shades of blue and pink as the salt concentration increases — and backbreaking up close. The salt-rakers who work the terraces are the lowest-paid laborers in Brinehold, and their skin cracks and bleeds from the constant salt exposure. Their guild, the Brotherhood of the Rake, is the most militant labor organization in the Horns.
The Barrel Vaults — Brinehold's famous underground storage complex. A network of natural sea-caves beneath the city, expanded and reinforced over centuries into a climate-controlled warehouse system where salted fish, cured meats, and other preserved goods are stored for export. The Vaults extend for roughly a mile beneath the waterfront, with multiple access points from the street level. They are cool, damp, dark, and perpetually haunted by the smell of brine and smoke. The Kemm family operates the largest section; smaller merchants rent space from the city. The Vaults are also, inevitably, the site of Brinehold's smuggling operations — the cave system has passages that open onto hidden coves outside the city walls, and goods that enter through those coves pay no tariff. The Merchant-Captains' Council is aware of this. The Council members who don't use the passages themselves periodically call for enforcement. Enforcement periodically occurs. The smuggling periodically resumes.
The Bone Pier — A long, narrow wharf on Brinehold's eastern waterfront, built of whale-bone and ship timber salvaged from wrecks. The Pier is the traditional gathering place for Brinehold's fishermen — they meet here at dawn to divide the day's fishing grounds, compare catch reports, and settle the minor territorial disputes that are the permanent background noise of any fishing community. The Pier's name is literal: whale ribs, jawbones, and vertebrae are incorporated into the structure's pilings and railings, giving it a skeletal appearance that visitors find unsettling and locals find homey. The largest bone — a whale jawbone over thirty feet long, mounted as an arch at the Pier's entrance — is called Old Gape and is Brinehold's most recognizable landmark after the Salt Exchange. Tradition: a fisherman beginning their first voyage walks through Old Gape and spits into the water. A fisherman on their last voyage walks through and doesn't.

NIGHTSPIKE — The Reborn City
Major Landmarks
Veldren Tower — The ruling family's seat. Not a castle but a tower — a single, massive column of dark basalt rising from the harbor's edge, built (according to the Veldrens) by the original freed laborers using the same techniques they'd been forced to employ building imperial warships. The Tower is deliberately stark: no ornamentation, no courtyard gardens, no comfortable receiving rooms. The interior is functional — living quarters, a council chamber, an armory, and the Veldren archive (a collection of dockyard records, labor contracts, and the handwritten account of the original seizure of the city that the family treats as a founding scripture). The Tower's rooftop platform serves as Nightspike's signal station and, on clear nights, as Old Thessa Veldren's preferred location for telling stories to her grandchildren. She says the wind carries better up there. She means the stories, not the air.
The Char — The section of Nightspike's dockyard that burned in the Great Fire of 1075 AF and was never rebuilt. The ruins have been cleared of debris but not replaced: a stretch of blackened stone foundations, empty drydock basins filled with stagnant rainwater, and the stumps of crane-posts that once served the city's largest shipbuilding facilities. The Char is Nightspike's open wound — a permanent reminder of the catastrophe that reduced the city from a serious rival to Westhorn to a recovering underdog. Lord Aran has proposed rebuilding the Char multiple times. The funds are never sufficient. His son Jorik has proposed converting it into a naval weapons-testing facility. His grandmother has proposed leaving it as it is: "Scars heal. Memory doesn't. We need the memory."
The Char is also, by default, Nightspike's public gathering space — large enough for the entire city to assemble, flat enough for market stalls, and emotionally charged enough that speeches delivered there carry an extra weight. Political rallies, labor protests, and the annual Fire Remembrance (a candlelight vigil for the 2,000 dead) all happen on the Char's scorched ground.
The Bent Nail — Old Thessa's tavern. Already described in the house profiles, but worth noting architecturally: the building is a former ship-chandlery, still cluttered with nautical hardware (coils of rope, barrel hoops, iron fittings) that serves as both decoration and, in at least one memorable bar fight, improvised weaponry. The tavern's sign is a literal bent nail — a twelve-inch iron spike, hammered crooked, mounted above the door. The story: when the Veldrens seized the city, the last imperial overseer was nailed to his office door by the dockworkers. The nail bent under the force of the blow. Someone pried it out and kept it. Whether the nail above The Bent Nail is actually the original is debated. Old Thessa says it is. No one argues with Old Thessa.
The Sheerwater Cliffs — The natural feature that defines Nightspike's geography: a vertical wall of dark basalt rising 200 feet from the waterline, against which the city is built and into which much of it is carved. The cliffs are riddled with natural caves and hand-cut chambers that serve as homes, workshops, and storage for the city's poorer residents. The highest caves — accessible only by rope-ladders and carved foot-holds — are called the Nests and are home to Nightspike's most independent-minded residents: people who value privacy more than comfort and who can climb a vertical stone face with a sack of provisions on their back. The Nests have their own informal governance, their own water-collection system (carved channels that catch rainwater and funnel it to cisterns), and their own legend: the Cliff Witch of Nightspike, a healer who supposedly lived in the highest Nest during the imperial era and who could cure any illness by touching the patient with hands that had been washed in seawater and dried in wind. No one knows her name. Her cave is identifiable by the smooth, palm-shaped depressions worn into the stone at its entrance — worn by visitors touching the rock for luck. The depressions are very old. People still touch them.

SKOGRIM — The Forest Gate
Major Landmarks
The Lamphall — Lampkeeper headquarters and Skogrim's seat of government. Built of Thornway timber — massive, dark hardwood beams, some over three feet in diameter — the Lamphall is the largest wooden building in the Horns and one of the largest on the continent. It serves as meeting hall, chapel, barracks, toll office, and the operational center for the forest road network. The interior is dominated by a single great room, 120 feet long and 40 feet wide, with a ceiling of exposed beam-work so high that the upper reaches are permanently in shadow. The room is lit by a double row of iron braziers running down its center — the "lamp-row" that gives the building its name — and by the narrow windows cut into the eastern wall, which admit the morning light in slanting columns that make the dust motes look like floating sparks.
The Lamphall's most striking feature is the Map Wall — the entire western wall, covered floor to ceiling with a painted map of the forest road network. The map is updated annually by the Lampkeepers' cartographers and shows every waystone, every way-station, every bridge, every known hazard, and the current patrol routes. It is the most accurate map of the Horns' interior in existence. It is also, incidentally, a work of art — the cartographers, working in the Lampkeeper tradition of combining function with devotion, have rendered the forest in such detail that individual tree species are distinguishable, and the terrain features are shaded with a depth that makes the wall seem like a window into the actual landscape.
The Thornway — The forest road itself. Not a single road but a corridor: a cleared path roughly thirty feet wide, cut through the ancient forest that connects the Horns peninsula to the mainland. The Thornway runs for approximately forty miles through the densest woodland on the continent — trees 150 feet tall, canopy so thick that the road is in perpetual twilight, undergrowth so dense on either side that stepping off the path means disappearing from view within ten paces. The Lampkeepers maintain the road with religious dedication: paving stones are replaced, drainage ditches are cleared, fallen trees are removed, and the signal-lamp posts — iron standards topped with covered lanterns, spaced every quarter-mile — are checked and refueled daily.
Every five miles along the Thornway, a way-station provides shelter: a stone-and-timber building with a fire-pit, a water supply, stored firewood, basic medical supplies, and a Lampkeeper guard post. The way-stations are the closest thing the Thornway has to civilization, and they have developed their own micro-culture: way-station keepers are Lampkeepers who have chosen (or been assigned) solitary postings, and they tend toward the contemplative, the eccentric, or the antisocial. Travelers who stay overnight at a way-station are guaranteed safety, food, and the company of someone who may not have spoken to another human being in a week and who therefore talks with either desperate enthusiasm or unsettling reserve.
The Green Gate — The formal entrance to the Thornway on the Horns side: a stone arch built into the forest's edge, carved with Alonite devotional inscriptions and the Lampkeeper motto ("Light the Way"). The arch is flanked by two ancient oaks — the largest in the Horns — whose branches have grown together over the road, forming a natural vault. The effect is deliberate: entering the Thornway through the Green Gate feels like entering a cathedral. The light changes. The sound changes. The air smells different — pine resin, wet earth, the musty sweetness of decomposing leaves. Travelers who have made the crossing dozens of times still report a moment of adjustment at the Gate: a breath held, a sense of threshold, a recognition that the forest is not just a place but a presence.

LEGENDS OF THE HORNS
The Pilot Who Sailed Home — The oldest legend in the Horns. A pilot of the straits, lost in fog, sailed through a channel he'd never seen before and emerged in a harbor he didn't recognize. The buildings were made of living coral. The people spoke a language like breaking waves. They fed him fish that tasted of silver and wine that tasted of nothing. He stayed for what felt like a night. When he sailed back through the channel, twenty years had passed. His wife had remarried. His children didn't know him. He returned to the channel, but it was gone. He spent the rest of his life sailing the straits, looking for it. The other pilots say his ghost still sails — a lantern light moving through the fog on nights when the currents run wrong.
The Nightspike Fire-Bride — A folk tale from Nightspike. During the Great Fire of 1075 AF, a young dockworker named Asa tried to rescue his betrothed from a burning warehouse. He entered the fire. He didn't come out. Neither did she. But workers on the opposite dock reported seeing two figures walking through the fire — hand in hand, unhurried, untouched by the flames — and stepping off the burning pier into the water. They sank together. Neither body was recovered. On the anniversary of the Fire, Nightspike's fishing families launch small wooden boats, lit with candles, into the harbor — one for Asa, one for his unnamed bride. The boats burn to the waterline and sink. The ritual has been performed every year since 1076 AF.
The Brinehold Leviathan — A sea-monster legend. Brinehold fishermen have reported, for centuries, a massive creature in the deep waters beyond the straits — something too large for a whale, too slow for a shark, producing a wake that can be seen from the cliff-tops. Descriptions vary: a serpent, a turtle the size of a ship, a shape that defies comparison. Sightings are rare (perhaps one every decade) and always at a distance. No one has ever seen the creature up close. No one has ever found a carcass. The Ember Watch investigated in 1156 AF and found nothing. The Magos logged the reports and filed them under "Unverified Megafauna (Marine)." The fishermen don't care about verification. They leave offerings at the harbor mouth — small fish, coins, cups of mead poured into the water — and they do not fish in the deep water on days when the sea is unnaturally calm. "When the Leviathan sleeps," they say, "let it sleep."
The Seventh Tree of Skogrim — A Lampkeeper legend. The Thornway passes through six named groves — stands of particularly ancient trees that the Lampkeepers use as navigational markers and which have, over centuries, acquired individual personalities in the keepers' lore. The First Tree is the great oak at the Green Gate. The Sixth Tree is a lightning-struck elm at the mainland exit. The Seventh Tree, according to legend, does not exist on any map. It appears only to Lampkeepers who are lost — truly lost, not merely disoriented — and it marks the way home. The tree is described differently by everyone who claims to have seen it: an oak with white bark, a pine that smells of honey, a willow growing from a stone. The one constant is the light: a glow from within the wood, as if the tree is burning without being consumed. Prior Wulfric does not discuss the Seventh Tree publicly. In private, to his daughter Sera, he has admitted: "I saw it once. The night your mother died on the road. It showed me where to go." He has refused to elaborate.
The Rope That Binds — A universal Horns legend about the origin of the knotwork tradition. A fisherman's wife, waiting for her husband to return from a voyage, began tying knots in a length of cord — one knot for each day he was gone. The voyage lasted a year. By the time he returned, the cord was so dense with knots that it had become a solid rope. She presented it to him at the dock. He wept. He wore it around his wrist for the rest of his life. When he died, the rope was buried with him. When the grave was opened a century later (during a church expansion), the rope was intact — the only thing that had not rotted. The knots were still tight. The lesson, Horns folk say, is that love is the only thing that does not decay. The practical lesson is that good rope-work outlasts everything, which is why you should buy your knots from a certified knotmaker and not the cheap imitations sold at the market.
The Lampkeeper's Oath — Not exactly a legend but a tradition so old it has the weight of one. Every Lampkeeper, upon taking their vows, is led alone into the Thornway at night without a lamp. They walk in total darkness for one mile. At the end of the mile, a single lantern is lit — by the Prior, waiting in the dark. The new Lampkeeper must walk toward the light. The mile is not dangerous (the road is cleared and patrolled), but the darkness is real, and the forest at night is not silent — it creaks, rustles, breathes, and occasionally produces sounds that no natural explanation comfortably covers. The point of the oath is not courage. It is trust: trust that the light will be there, that someone is waiting, that the darkness is temporary. Every Lampkeeper remembers their oath-walk. Most of them lie about how scared they were.


NIONIA & THE HORNS — Minor Settlements, Geography, and Natural Landmarks
NOTE FOR FUTURE REGIONS: The complete regional build follows a three-prompt pattern:
Houses & Characters — Major/minor families, hierarchy, current members with traits, political dynamics
Major Cities & Legends — Landmarks, monuments, districts, local myths and folk tales
Gazetteer — Minor towns, villages, rivers, natural features, religious outposts, trade stops — the connective tissue
This document is Prompt 3. Repeat this pattern for each remaining region pair.

NIONIA — The Gazetteer

Rivers & Waterways
The Albara — Nionia's only significant river. Runs from the Marchia Ferrus highlands south-southwest to the sea, emptying into a silted estuary six miles east of Vellium. Shallow, fast-moving, unnavigable for anything larger than a flat-bottomed punt. Used primarily for freshwater supply, irrigation of the southern olive groves, and washing marble dust out of the quarry workers' lungs. The Albara turns chalky white downstream of the quarries — locals call the lower stretch "the Milk." Fish can't survive in it below the third quarry outflow. Above the quarries, the Albara is clear, cold, and home to a brown trout the locals call stone-trout — bony, bland, eaten only by miners who can't afford anything better.
The Veiled Springs — A cluster of freshwater springs on the island's northeastern coast, near the Convent of the Veil. The springs emerge from a basalt cliff face into a series of natural pools before draining into the sea. The water is unusually warm (geothermal origin, though the Nionians attribute it to divine blessing) and faintly mineral-tasting. The Sisters of the Veil used the springs for bathing and ritual purification. Under the Pure Way, the springs have been declared sacred — pilgrims bathe in them for spiritual cleansing, paying a fee to the shrine custodians. The water is genuinely good for skin conditions. The echo-density of the surrounding basalt may have something to do with it.
The Quarry Channels — Not natural waterways but an engineered drainage network: stone-lined channels that carry rainwater and groundwater away from the marble quarries to prevent flooding. The channels converge into the Albara at several points, contributing the chalky runoff that gives the lower river its color. The channel-keepers — a small guild of hydraulic engineers maintained by the Cassian family — are among the most quietly essential workers on the island.

Minor Settlements — The Coast
Ostara (pop. ~2,000) — Fishing village on the southern coast, twelve miles from Vellium. Known for its octopus. Ostaran octopus, grilled over olive-wood coals with lemon and sea salt, is considered the finest preparation of the dish on the island and is served at patrician tables in Vellium at prices that would make the fishermen who catch it weep. The village is built into a rocky cove with a single stone jetty. An Ashanite hospice — the House of the Settling Wave — provides care for elderly fishermen and their widows. The hospice's resident healer, Brother Demos (age 55), is an Ashanite monk who has been quietly refusing to implement Pure Way liturgical changes for three years. No one has reported him because Ostara is too small for the Inquisitors to bother with and Brother Demos delivers their babies.
Kephira (pop. ~1,500) — Coastal town on the western shore, built around a natural harbor used primarily by the island's smaller fishing boats. Known for two things: its lighthouse (a pre-imperial stone tower maintained by a family called the Pharoi who have been lighthouse keepers for eleven generations — the current keeper, Old Tessa Pharos (age 70), can recite the name of every keeper back to the founding) and its black sand beach, which is volcanic basalt eroded to fine grit. The black sand is exported in small quantities as a scouring agent for marble polishing. Children collect colored pebbles from the beach and sell them to tourists as "god-stones."
Pallonis (pop. ~800) — A hamlet on the northeastern coast, three miles from the Convent. Exists primarily to service the pilgrim traffic to the Veil shrine: two inns, a stable, a prayer-token vendor, and a bakery that produces the small, round, white-glazed biscuits called veil-cakes that pilgrims buy as devotional souvenirs. The baker, Marta Kolos (age 40), inherited the recipe from her grandmother and guards it with lethal seriousness. Knockoff veil-cakes produced in Vellium are, she will tell anyone who listens, "an insult to the Mother's milk."
Antheon (pop. ~3,000) — The island's second port, on the northern coast. A working harbor without Vellium's grandeur — salt-stained docks, a fish market, a rope-walk, and the island's only tannery (leather-working is prohibited inside Vellium's walls due to the smell). Antheon's reputation: tough, unglamorous, and resentful of Vellium's cultural dominance. The town produces the island's best salt-cod and the island's worst wine. An Alonite chapterhouse — the Brothers of the Northern Watch — maintains a small garrison here, ostensibly to patrol for pirates, actually to keep an eye on smuggling between Antheon and the Horns. The chapterhouse's captain, Ser Ilias (age 38), is a devout Alonite who refuses to join the Pure Way and has not been forced to — his usefulness as an anti-smuggling officer has so far outweighed his doctrinal inconvenience.
Kelossa (pop. ~600) — Tiny fishing hamlet on the island's southern tip. Famous for nothing except its remoteness and its annual Squid Festival — a three-day celebration of the autumn squid run during which the entire population gets drunk on squid-ink wine (yes, it's real; no, it doesn't taste good; yes, it stains your teeth black for a week). The village's only structure of note is a crumbling Alonite waystation — a remnant of the pre-war pilgrim road network — now used as a goat shelter.

Minor Settlements — The Interior
Ferronus Camp (pop. ~5,000, fluctuating) — The largest settlement in the Marchia Ferrus. Not a town but a sprawling mining camp: barracks, tool sheds, an assay office, a company store (operated by Ferronus agents at prices the miners consider extortionate), a drinking hall, and a Bonekeepers' ossuary for the workers killed in mining accidents (~20 per year). The camp has no permanent architecture — everything is timber-and-canvas, designed to be disassembled and moved when a mine is exhausted. The camp moves roughly every fifteen years. Its current location has been occupied for eight years. The miners call it "home" without irony and decorate their barracks with carved graffiti, pinned drawings, and the small personal altars that Lovist orthodoxy encourages and the Pure Way has not yet bothered to regulate in a place this remote.
Quarrytown (pop. ~3,500) — The Cassian family's company town, adjacent to the White Throat quarry. More permanent than Ferronus Camp: stone houses (built from quarry off-cuts), a marketplace, a school run by the Order of the Quill (one of the few Quill operations still functioning on the island, tolerated because Quarrytown is too far from Vellium for the Pure Way to have established an alternative), and a Harvest Bell granary that supplies the quarry workers' food. The town's social center is the Chiseler's Rest — a tavern built entirely of marble scrap, the walls glittering with embedded crystal inclusions that catch lamplight like stars. The proprietor, Demos "Chisel" Raxa (age 50), is a retired quarryman who lost three fingers to a splitting accident and turned to tavern-keeping. He serves a homebrew called Stone Bitter that tastes of minerals and regret.
Greenholm (pop. ~1,200) — An agricultural village in the island's central valley, the most fertile land on Nionia. Olive groves and vineyards. Quiet, prosperous, boring in the way that successful farms are boring. The village's claim to distinction: it produces the olive oil used in the Great Dome's eternal lamps. This contract — held by the same family, the Dassos, for over two hundred years — is worth more than the entire village's other output combined. The current contract-holder, Yiannis Dassos (age 44), treats his olive trees with the devotion of a father for his children and tests every pressing personally, rejecting any batch that doesn't meet his standard. He has rejected oil supplied to three consecutive governments without political consequence because everyone needs lamp oil and no one wants to argue with a man who can tell the difference between last week's pressing and today's by smell alone.
Petravale (pop. ~900) — A hill village in the Marchia Ferrus foothills, too high for olives, too rocky for grain. Known for its goats (the Petravale Black, a hardy breed with a reputation for stubbornness that mirrors its owners'), its cheese (a hard, sharp variety cured in volcanic caves), and its folk tradition of stone-singing — a practice in which elderly women sit against sun-warmed boulders and hum, producing harmonics that the stone allegedly amplifies and returns. Whether this is echo-sensitivity, acoustic resonance, or the self-fulfilling expectations of a community that has been doing it for centuries is unclear. The Venic Path maintained a small circle in Petravale until the Pure Way's ban; the circle dissolved publicly but its members still sit against the stones. They just don't talk about it.
Irongate (pop. ~2,000) — A fortified waypoint on the Quarry Road, halfway between Vellium and the Marchia Ferrus. Exists to provide security, rest, and resupply for the ore caravans. The town's defining structure is its namesake: an iron portcullis spanning the road, operated by a garrison of Alonite road-wardens (a small chapter of the Brothers of the Open Road, the only mainland order with a permanent Nionian presence). The gate is closed at sunset and opened at dawn. Between those hours, the road is dark. Bandits have been a problem on the Quarry Road for as long as the road has existed — not organized gangs but desperate individuals, usually deserters from the civil war or miners who've been fired from the camps. The Brothers deal with them efficiently and without drama. Their captain, Sister Nola (age 32), is a former Sangrean mercenary who took Alonite vows after a religious experience she refuses to describe. She is the only person on the island who carries a Sangrean-forged sword and an Alonite prayer-book with equal conviction.

Natural Features
The Marchia Ferrus Range — The island's mountainous spine. Not high by continental standards (the tallest peak, Mount Pallax, reaches ~4,000 feet) but rugged, heavily mineralized, and the source of virtually all of Nionia's non-agricultural wealth. Iron, marble, basalt, and trace deposits of copper and tin. The mountains are bare above the treeline — scrubby grass, exposed rock, wind — and forested below with the drought-resistant Ferrovan Iron-Olive that clings to the quarry edges. The eastern slopes catch the morning sun and are warmer; the western slopes face the prevailing wind and are battered.
The Throat — A narrow sea passage between Nionia and the mainland, roughly seven miles wide at its narrowest point. Strong tidal currents, unpredictable winds, and a shallow bar of submerged rock make the Throat hazardous for large vessels. Smaller boats cross regularly — fishermen, messengers, smugglers. The imperial navy maintained a chain across the Throat during certain periods; the anchor-points are still visible as rusted iron bolts driven into the cliffs on both sides. The Pure Way has stationed patrol vessels at the Throat's narrowest point, theoretically to intercept smugglers, actually to control who leaves the island.
Nion's Jaw — The volcanic sea-arch on the northern coast (described in legends above).
The Ash Flats — A barren plateau in the Marchia Ferrus interior, approximately two square miles of flat volcanic rock covered in a thin layer of ash and pumice. Nothing grows. Nothing lives there except wind. The Flats are used by the Ferronus mining operations as a waste dump — slag, spoil, and the chemical residue of smelting operations are piled on the edges. At dawn, when the rising sun hits the ash and the slag heaps glow with residual heat, the Flats look like a vision of the world after everything alive has been removed. Miners avoid it. Matteo Ferronus conducts some of his experiments there because no one will bother him.
The Corsair's Teeth — A line of sharp, half-submerged rock spurs extending from the island's western cape into the open sea. Navigation hazard. Three recorded wrecks in the last century. Named for a pre-imperial pirate captain — Kassander the Lame — who allegedly used the rocks as a trap, luring merchant ships into the shallows with false signal fires. Kassander's cave — a sea-cave accessible only at low tide — is a popular dare for Antheon's teenagers.
The Sister Pools — Two circular freshwater pools in the highlands above Greenholm, fed by underground springs, connected by a narrow channel. The larger pool is warm (geothermal); the smaller is cold (spring-fed). Local tradition: couples who swim together in both pools — warm first, then cold — will stay together for life. The tradition predates Loveism, probably predates the Republic, and has survived every religious and political change by the simple mechanism of being romantic enough that no authority has bothered to ban it. An Ashanite shrine — a carved stone basin with Vena's moon-symbol — sits between the pools. Offerings of flowers and small coins accumulate in the basin. A Bonekeepers' volunteer clears them monthly.

THE HORNS — The Gazetteer

Rivers & Waterways
The Skogrun — The Horns' only significant river. Runs from the interior highlands through the Thornway forest, emerging into a broad, marshy delta near Skogrim before draining into the sea through a network of channels too shallow and tangled for navigation. The Skogrun is the Thornway's drainage system — it carries the forest's runoff and, according to Lampkeeper patrols, occasionally carries stranger things: logs that haven't rotted despite floating for miles, fish species that don't match any known freshwater catalog, and once (reported by Sera Wulfric, 1306 AF) a smell "like honey and hot iron" that persisted for an hour and then vanished. The Skogrun's upper reaches, deep in the forest, have never been fully mapped. The Lampkeepers patrol the road, not the river.
The Strait of Knives — The primary navigation channel between Westhorn and Brinehold, named for the submerged rock formations that slice through the tidal flow like blades. The Strait is navigable only with a licensed Pilots' Guild navigator — unlicensed attempts average a 30% loss rate. The tidal race through the narrowest section produces standing waves up to six feet high during spring tides, and the currents shift with a complexity that defies simple charting. The Guild's pilots learn the Strait the way musicians learn an instrument: through years of practice, constant study, and an intimate, almost physical relationship with the water.
The Bone Channel — A secondary passage between Brinehold and the open sea, running through a gap in the underwater reef that protects the harbor. Narrower and shallower than the main approach, the Bone Channel is used by smaller vessels and, not coincidentally, by smugglers who want to avoid the Harbormaster's Tower. Named for the whale bones embedded in the reef — the remains of a whale-hunting station that operated on the reef's surface during the imperial era, now submerged by centuries of tidal erosion.
The Galewater — The open stretch of ocean between Northwind (the nearest Teeth island) and the Horns peninsula. Roughly forty miles of water notorious for sudden squalls, freak waves, and currents that can push a ship miles off course in hours. Crossing the Galewater is a two-day voyage in good weather and a significant gamble in bad. Ships that make the crossing carry Pilots' Guild charts, which are updated annually and are the most valuable navigational documents in the Horns.

Minor Settlements — Westhorn's Hinterland
Saltmere (pop. ~1,200) — A village three miles inland from Westhorn, built around a freshwater mere (small lake) that supplies the city's drinking water via a gravity-fed aqueduct. The village's economy is split between water management (the aqueduct keepers are a hereditary guild, the Merefolk, who maintain the pipes, filters, and cisterns with fanatical dedication) and sheep farming. Saltmere wool — coarse, oily, water-resistant — is the raw material for the heavy knit sweaters that are the Horns' signature garment. The village pub, The Wet Ewe, serves a lamb stew that Westhorn merchants make the trek inland specifically to eat.
Craghaven (pop. ~800) — A clifftop hamlet north of Westhorn, overlooking a cove where the tide exposes a shelf of fossil-rich limestone. Known for its fossils: ammonites, trilobites, and the occasional complete fish skeleton, which the locals extract with practiced skill and sell to collectors, scholars, and the occasional Magos agent who visits every few years to purchase specimens for the Isle's natural history collection. The hamlet's most famous son: Rolfe Cragg (deceased, 1245 AF), a fisherman who discovered a fossil so large and strange that the Magos sent a team to examine it. The team's report is classified. The fossil was removed to the Isle. Rolfe was paid handsomely and drank himself to death within three years. His descendants, the Cragg family, still run the fossil-hunting business and still refuse to discuss what Rolfe found.
Windhollow (pop. ~500) — The Horns' most exposed settlement: a scatter of stone cottages on a treeless headland north of Westhorn, battered by wind 300 days a year. The inhabitants are shepherds and seabird-egg collectors — people who climb vertical cliff faces with rope and iron pegs to harvest gull and gannet eggs from nesting ledges. The eggs are a delicacy in Westhorn (richer and more pungent than chicken eggs, with a faintly marine aftertaste). Windhollow's children learn to climb before they learn to read. The village has no tavern, no inn, no chapel — services are conducted by a visiting Lampkeeper who rides out from Skogrim once a month. The wind is so constant that the village's dogs have learned to walk leaning into it.
Tarrock (pop. ~1,000) — A fishing village on Westhorn's southern coast, specializing in crab and lobster. Known for the annual Crab Feast — a two-day gluttony festival held after the autumn crab haul, during which the entire village eats crustaceans until physically unable to continue. The Feast draws visitors from Westhorn and even Brinehold (who attend despite the inter-port rivalry because the crab is genuinely exceptional). Tarrock's other distinction: it has the Horns' only oyster beds, cultivated in the sheltered cove behind the village's breakwater. The oysters are small, briny, and consumed raw with a squeeze of the sour citrus that grows in the village's single, stubborn lemon tree — a Sangrean import that somehow survives the Horns' climate through sheer obstinacy and the fact that the tree is planted against a south-facing stone wall that retains the day's heat.

Minor Settlements — Brinehold's Territory
Rakkholm (pop. ~1,500) — An island settlement on a rocky islet two miles offshore from Brinehold, connected to the mainland by a tidal causeway that is walkable only at low tide. Rakkholm is Brinehold's quarantine station: ships suspected of carrying plague, rot, or foreign pests are directed to Rakkholm's isolated dock, where their cargo and crew are inspected by Brothers of the Still Anchor — a tiny Ashanite sub-order (twelve members) dedicated to disease prevention in port cities. The Brothers maintain a hospital, a fumigation chamber, and the most comprehensive log of maritime diseases on the continent. Their prior, Brother Havald (age 60), has personally identified and quarantined three separate plague outbreaks before they reached the mainland. He is the most important person in the Horns that no one has ever heard of.
Salthearth (pop. ~600) — A hamlet south of Brinehold, built on the cliffs above the evaporation terraces. Home to the salt-rakers and their families. The hamlet has no structures of its own distinction — it is a workers' village, functional and impoverished — but it is the spiritual home of the Brotherhood of the Rake, the salt-workers' guild, which holds its meetings in a converted drying-shed and whose members can be identified by their cracked, salt-white hands and a shared vocabulary of grievance. The Brotherhood has called three work stoppages in the last decade, each one resolved by Dalgaard concessions that were immediately eroded by subsequent policy changes. A fourth stoppage is being discussed. Elgar Dalgaard is aware of this. His response: "Let them stop. The tide doesn't stop. The salt makes itself."
Cormorant Point (pop. ~300) — A tiny fishing settlement on a spit of land jutting into the strait, named for the thousands of cormorants that roost on the rocks offshore. The settlement's sole economic function: supplying fresh fish to Brinehold's market, caught in the shallow waters where the strait meets the open sea. The fishermen of Cormorant Point are the only people in the Horns who routinely encounter Pilots' Guild vessels at close range — the pilots pass the Point on every approach — and they have developed a custom of waving a specific flag pattern (green over white) when a pilot passes, which the pilot acknowledges with a horn blast. The exchange has no practical purpose. It has been happening for over a century. Neither side remembers how it started. Neither side would dream of stopping.
Dunhallow (pop. ~700) — An inland village ten miles from Brinehold, in the scrubby grassland behind the coast. Sheep country. Dunhallow's sheep are the source of the black wool that Brinehold's rope-makers twist into the heavy, tar-impregnated marine rope that is the Horns' most important export after salt and ships. The village is unremarkable except for its chapel — a small Alonite stone building with a bell tower that was, improbably, designed by a Sangrean architect who was shipwrecked on the Horns coast in 1187 AF and who, while waiting for a ship home, designed a chapel for the village that had rescued him. The result is a miniature Sangrean-style building — arched doorway, azulejo-tiled interior, a bell with a tone more musical than anything the Horns has produced before or since — sitting in the middle of a sheep pasture. The architect, one Don Ferrer of Castesol, made it home eventually. The chapel remains, maintained by the village with a pride that borders on worship. They call it the Stranger's Gift.

Minor Settlements — Nightspike's Shore
Ashwick (pop. ~400) — A settlement built on the ruins of a pre-imperial fishing village, three miles south of Nightspike. Named for the ash trees that somehow grow in the thin, salt-sprayed soil of the cliff-edge. The village's specialty: ash-smoked eel, a local delicacy produced by smoking freshwater eels (caught in the Skogrun's delta) over burning ash-wood. The flavor — sweet, woody, faintly mineral — is unique. A small Harvest Bell granary serves the village and the surrounding farmsteads, run by Sister Ingva (age 45), an Ashanite who came from the Heartlands twenty years ago and has assimilated completely into Horns culture while retaining a Heartlands accent and a Heartlands recipe for rye bread that the locals have adopted as if it were their own.
Skarrholm (pop. ~200) — The smallest named settlement in the Horns. A cluster of stone cottages on a rocky islet accessible by rowboat from Nightspike's outer harbor. Skarrholm's residents are net-menders — specialists who repair and maintain the fishing nets used by every vessel in Nightspike's fleet. The work is tedious, poorly paid, and essential. The islanders are insular, intermarried, and possessed of a dialect so thick that mainland Munnish speakers need a translator. They are also the Horns' most reliable weather predictors — generations of observing the sea from a fixed point have given them an empirical forecasting tradition that rivals the Hrundvaal giants' atmospheric sensitivity (though through entirely different mechanisms). When the Skarrholm folk bring their boats to the inner harbor, Nightspike's captains cancel their voyages.
Ironshore (pop. ~1,000) — A settlement at the base of the Sheerwater Cliffs, south of Nightspike, where a shelf of iron-rich rock extends into the sea. The settlement exists because of the rock: the iron ore, though lower-grade than Nionian iron, is accessible by surface mining and provides Nightspike's shipwrights with a local source of nails, fittings, and anchor chain. The mining is done by hand — pick and hammer — by a workforce descended from the same laborers who built Nion I's naval yards. They are aware of the irony. An Alonite forge-chapel — dedicated to Alon-as-Builder — occupies a cave in the cliff face, where a Brothers of the Open Road smith named Brother Torben (age 50) maintains a forge and produces ironwork for the Lampkeepers' road-maintenance operations. He is the best blacksmith in the Horns and the worst conversationalist — he communicates primarily through grunts and the directional pointing of hammers.

Minor Settlements — The Thornway & Skogrim
Waystation One through Six — The Lampkeeper way-stations along the Thornway, spaced at five-mile intervals. Each station has a name, a keeper, and a personality:
Greengate Station (WS1) — Adjacent to the Green Gate. The most visited station, serving as the entry-point toll office and supply depot. Keeper: Brother Amis (age 28), young, enthusiastic, and convinced that every traveler has a fascinating story. He is right about 10% of the time.
Deepshade Station (WS2) — In the densest section of the Thornway, where the canopy blocks most daylight. Keeper: Sister Brenna (age 55), a woman of terrifying competence who has killed a wolf, a boar, and (she claims) a grave-stag calf during her twenty years at the post. The grave-stag claim is unverified. Her station is the cleanest, best-stocked, and most intimidating on the road.
Splitoak Station (WS3) — Named for a massive oak that was struck by lightning and split in half, both halves still alive and growing in opposite directions. Keeper: Brother Voss (age 42), a former Heartlands soldier who took Lampkeeper vows after deserting his lord's army during a campaign he considered unjust. He is quiet, capable, and harboring a guilt that manifests as obsessive road maintenance — his section of the Thornway is the best-paved stretch on the entire route.
Coldspring Station (WS4) — Built near a natural spring that runs year-round at a temperature just above freezing. Keeper: Brother Halm (age 63), the oldest active Lampkeeper, who has served at Coldspring for thirty-one years and has refused every offer of transfer. He knows every tree within a mile of his station by sight and claims to know several by name. Whether this is Alonite devotion, folk eccentricity, or latent echo-sensitivity is an open question.
Ridgetop Station (WS5) — The highest point on the Thornway, where the road crosses a forested ridge with views of the sea on both sides of the peninsula. Keeper: Sister Marga (age 35), a former Nightspike dockworker who joined the Lampkeepers to escape a violent marriage. She patrols her section with a crossbow and a sawed-off boat-hook and has been involved in more bandit confrontations than any other keeper on the route.
Mainland Gate Station (WS6) — The exit point, where the Thornway opens onto the mainland road network. Keeper: Brother Edric (age 48), the most politically aware Lampkeeper, who monitors mainland traveler traffic and compiles informal intelligence reports for Prior Wulfric. He can tell you the current grain price in Vornhold, the latest Argenlord election gossip, and which Heartlands houses are feuding, all from conversations with passing merchants.
Mosshearth (pop. ~600) — The only civilian settlement inside the Thornway proper. A timber village in a natural clearing roughly halfway along the route, home to charcoal-burners, resin-tappers, and the woodsmen who supply Skogrim's timber trade. Mosshearth is technically under Lampkeeper jurisdiction, but in practice it governs itself — the village elder, Grandma Rys (age 74), has been settling disputes, allocating grazing rights, and cuffing misbehaving children for forty years, and the Lampkeepers have the sense to let her. The village's claim to fame: its charcoal, produced from slow-burned Thornway hardwood, is the highest-quality fuel on the peninsula. Westhorn's finest metalworkers will accept no other. Grandma Rys has leverage and knows it.
Heska's Cottage — Not a settlement but a landmark. The herb-woman Heska Vonn's home, three miles off the Thornway on a track that isn't on any map. The cottage is small, stone-built, and surrounded by a garden of medicinal herbs organized in a system that makes sense only to Heska. A carved stone at the track's entrance — unmarked, undecorated, just a standing stone — serves as the only waymarker. Locals who need Heska's services know where to find her. Everyone else walks past the stone without noticing it. This may be intentional. This may be coincidence. Heska isn't saying.

Natural Features — The Horns
The Sheerwater Cliffs — Nightspike's defining geography (described in landmarks above). Extending roughly three miles along the coast, reaching heights of 200+ feet, riddled with caves and hand-cut dwellings.
The Stacks — A line of sea-stacks (detached rock pillars) off Westhorn's northern coast. The Stacks are nesting sites for thousands of seabirds — gannets, kittiwakes, puffins, and the enormous Gale Kestrels that Horns sailors salute as storm-omens. The largest stack, Old Man, rises over a hundred feet from the water and is topped with a natural platform where (legend has it) a hermit once lived for twenty years, fed by fishermen who rowed out to the base and left provisions in a bucket hauled up by rope. The hermit's name is lost. The bucket's rope-groove is still visible in the rock.
The Fog Banks — Not a physical feature but a meteorological one. The Horns' coastal waters are subject to sudden, dense fog — banks of white mist that roll in from the open ocean without warning, reducing visibility to arm's length within minutes. The Fog Banks are the primary reason the Pilots' Guild exists: navigating the straits in fog is suicide without an experienced pilot. The Banks form where warm ocean currents meet the cold water draining from the Thornway's river system, producing a temperature differential that generates condensation. They are most common in autumn and spring. They are always unwelcome. The Horns have a saying: "The fog is the sea's tax on everything you own."
Pilot's Rock — The Pilots' Guild headquarters island (described in house profiles). Worth adding: the Rock is home to a colony of grey seals that have lived on the island's western shore for centuries and are considered unofficial mascots of the Guild. Harming a Pilot's Rock seal is punishable by Guild law (not because the seals are legally protected, but because the Guild makes its own laws on its own rock and the pilots like their seals). The seals, for their part, have learned to associate human presence with discarded fish scraps and show no fear of the pilots whatsoever.
The Thornway Canopy — The forest itself is the Horns' most significant natural feature. Ancient hardwood — oak, beech, elm, and the enormous Span-Elms (whose wood is used for ship timbers and bridge construction) — growing in a density that mainland foresters find almost impossible. The canopy is so thick that the Thornway's road exists in permanent twilight. The forest floor is a carpet of moss, fern, and decomposing leaf-matter so deep that a person stepping off the road sinks to their ankles. The smell is earthy, wet, and faintly sweet — the decomposition of centuries of organic matter producing a fertile humus that, if it were farmland, would be the most productive soil on the continent. It is not farmland. It is the Thornway, and the Lampkeepers will break the hands of anyone who brings an axe within a mile of the road.
Wrecker's Cove — A hidden cove on the Horns' eastern coast, accessible only through a narrow gap in the cliffs. The cove has been used by smugglers for centuries — its concealed entrance makes it invisible from the sea, and its deep-water approach allows even large vessels to anchor close to shore. The Merchant-Captains' Council periodically "discovers" Wrecker's Cove and "clears" it of illegal activity. The cove is operational again within six months. The most recent clearance was 1304 AF. The cove is currently being used by Mag "Half-Mast" Korren's crew to store untaxed goods moving between the Horns and the Teeth. The entrance is marked by a weathered carving on the cliff face — a crude depiction of a hand giving a gesture that, in the Horns, means "mind your own business."
The Bellows — A geological curiosity on the coast between Brinehold and Nightspike: a sea-cave whose entrance narrows to a slit through which incoming waves are forced, producing a deep, rhythmic booming sound audible for a mile inland. The Bellows fires approximately every forty seconds during high-energy wave conditions — a steady, bass-register pulse that Brinehold's eastern neighborhoods use as an ambient clock. The sound varies with wave height: gentle weather produces a soft thump; storm waves produce a concussive blast that rattles windows and sends dogs under tables. Local folklore: the Bellows is the breathing of the Brinehold Leviathan, asleep beneath the cliff. The geological explanation (wave compression in a resonance chamber) is more plausible and significantly less interesting.

SANGREA — Sun, Blood, and Vine (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — The Beautiful War

I. THE REGION AT A GLANCE
Population: ~4,200,000 Capital: Castesol (pop. ~255,000) Other Major Cities: Puerto Luciente (~140,000), Altavista (~125,000), Muroverde (~108,000), Fuenterroja (~106,000) Government: Monarchic in name (House Doravanto), oligarchic in practice. The Lord-Patron system gives each major house absolute authority over its province. The crown arbitrates. Poorly. Economy: Wine, olive oil, sunstone mining, spice trade (coastal), tobacco, tropical fruit, medicinal herbs (jungle border), livestock, and the arms trade that the Sunstone Wars have made permanently profitable Religion: Orthodox Loveism with strong Ashanite and Alonite presence. The Venic Path persists underground, particularly among artists and rural communities. The Crimson Penitents are a common sight on the roads between holy seasons. Provinces: Five recognized provinces — Altasol, Costadoro, Vallesangre, Fuentarossa, Selvaverde

II. THE PARROT NETWORK — Sangrea's Living Post
Before anything else: the parrots.
They are everywhere. That is the first thing a visitor to Sangrea notices after the heat and the color — the birds. Bright green, scarlet-chested, blue-winged, yellow-headed, raucous and profane, perched on every rooftop, every balcony railing, every market awning, every nobleman's shoulder. They scream at dawn. They chatter through midday. They go quiet at dusk and then start again at midnight if something disturbs them. The sound of Sangrea is the sound of parrots.
Most of these are wild or semi-wild — feral populations descended from the Selvaverde jungle's native species, spreading northward over centuries as the region's agriculture created an abundance of fruit and grain that turned every orchard into a parrot buffet. They are pests, companions, alarm systems, and entertainment. Every Sangrean child grows up with a parrot story. Every Sangrean tavern has a resident bird that repeats the most embarrassing things said by last night's drunks.
But the trained parrots — House Carvallo's messenger birds — are something else entirely.
The Carvallo Messenger System
House Carvallo has been breeding and training messenger parrots for roughly three hundred and fifty years. The system began as a Botano family communication tool — the jungle's density made conventional messengers (horseback, foot-runner) unreliable, and the native Selvaverde Scarlet (a large, long-lived parrot species with a vocabulary capacity of several hundred words and an uncanny ability to distinguish between individual human voices) proved trainable for message delivery.
The training takes three years per bird. Carvallo trainers — called loreros — raise chicks from hatching, imprinting them on a home-station (a specific perch, roost, and feeding point at a Carvallo relay house). The birds are trained to fly between their home-station and up to three other relay houses, covering distances of up to sixty miles per flight. They carry messages in two formats:
Vocal messages: The lorero speaks a phrase to the bird, clearly and slowly, repeating it until the bird can reproduce it accurately. The parrot then flies to the destination relay house, where a receiving lorero transcribes the bird's speech. The system is limited by the bird's vocabulary and pronunciation — complex sentences are broken into shorter segments, each carried by a different bird. A message of fifty words might require five parrots, arriving in sequence. The birds are trained to land on the receiving perch in order (first bird on the left perch, second on the middle, and so on), so the segments can be reassembled correctly. Error rate: approximately 5% per segment. For critical messages, each segment is sent twice by two different birds. The redundancy doubles the cost but reduces error to less than 1%.
Written messages: Small, tightly rolled strips of parchment in wax-sealed copper tubes, attached to the bird's leg. Faster (one bird per message), more secure (the message is encrypted in Carvallo ciphers that only Carvallo loreros can read), and used for the most sensitive communications. The copper tubes are reusable and stamped with the Carvallo serpent-and-mortar sigil. Finding a Carvallo message tube that isn't yours is a criminal offense in Sangrea — the penalty ranges from a fine (for commoners) to the loss of a finger (for nobles who should know better).
The Relay Network: Carvallo maintains approximately forty relay houses across Sangrea — at least one in every major town, two in the cities, and a chain of jungle-edge stations connecting the Selvaverde to the interior. Each relay house employs two to four loreros and maintains a flock of thirty to fifty trained birds. The total network: roughly 1,500 active messenger parrots, serviced by approximately 120 loreros. The network is the fastest communication system on the continent — a message from Castesol to Muroverde (approximately 200 miles) can be transmitted in under a day via relay, compared to three days by horseback. The Campaneros' bell network is faster for simple alarm signals but cannot transmit complex messages. The parrots can.
Who uses it: Everyone who can afford it. The service is not free — Carvallo charges per message, with rates scaled by distance, urgency, and encryption level. A simple vocal message between neighboring towns costs a few coppers. An encrypted written dispatch from Castesol to Puerto Luciente costs a silver mark. The two great houses — Solé and Terrarossa — are the network's largest customers, each maintaining permanent contracts for priority service. Carvallo's neutrality is essential to the network's function: if either great house believed Carvallo was reading or delaying their messages, the network would collapse overnight. Carvallo does read the messages. They read all of them. The intelligence this produces is the real source of House Botano's political power — the Matriarch knows everything because Carvallo's loreros know everything.
The wild parrots' role: The feral populations serve an unintentional secondary function. Because parrots repeat what they hear, the wild birds that roost near relay houses, taverns, and market squares pick up fragments of conversation and broadcast them randomly across the region. A parrot screaming "TERRAROSSA MARCHES AT DAWN" from a rooftop in Castesol is probably repeating a drunk's boast, not an intelligence report — but it might not be. The result: Sangrea's air is saturated with ambient information, most of it garbage, some of it gold. The ability to distinguish signal from noise — to hear the real message inside the parrot-chatter — is a valued skill among spymasters. The Solé intelligence service has a specialist, Dona Vela (age 45), whose sole job is monitoring wild parrot speech in Puerto Luciente for fragments of useful intelligence. She keeps a journal of every phrase she collects. Most entries are obscenities. Occasionally, one isn't.

III. THE PROVINCES AND THEIR HOUSES
ALTASOL — The Sun-Baked Plains
The central province. Rolling golden hills, baked dry eight months of the year, dotted with the haciendas and tower-estates that the nobility has been building and burning for four centuries. Castesol sits on the province's highest hill like a crown on a sunburned head. The Doravanto monarchy rules from here — technically rules all of Sangrea from here — and the province's culture is accordingly courtly, theatrical, and exhausting.
House Doravanto — The Crown
Seat: The Alcázar of Castesol (a palace-fortress on the city's summit, rebuilt six times — once after each major Sunstone War, because it keeps getting besieged) Sigil: A golden sun crowned with seven rays on sky blue Words: "We Keep the Peace"
The Doravantos are descendants of the Nionian imperial governor assigned to Sangrea during the occupation. When the empire fell, they stayed, adopted local customs, married local nobility, and gradually transformed from foreign administrators into the region's nominal monarchs. Their authority was always fragile — they held the crown because the two greater houses couldn't agree on which of them should wear it — and by 1308 AF, the fragility has become structural. The Doravanto crown is the prize in the Sunstone Wars. Everyone wants it. No one respects it.
Queen Jasmina Doravanto (age 27) — Placed on the throne as a compromise after the last bloody chapter of the Wars. Intelligent, dignified, and trapped. Her court is infested with Solé agents — the faction called the Dorado Crows — who buy influence, sponsor poets, and commission towers from Los Torrebrava that make the crown's own palace look modest. Jasmina knows she is a puppet. She also knows that the strings are the only thing keeping her alive — without Solé's "support," Terrarossa would march on Castesol within a month. She drinks Botano herbal tea for the chronic insomnia that has plagued her since her coronation. The tea helps. The parrots outside her window, repeating courtiers' whispered conversations in garbled fragments, do not.
Prince Cassian Doravanto (age 19) — Jasmina's brother. Handsome, popular, reckless. He jousts in the Solé-sponsored tournaments, attends their parties, and accepts their gifts with the cheerful obliviousness of a young man who has never been forced to think about who pays for his life. He is being groomed — though he doesn't know it — as a potential replacement for his sister. Solé prefers a grateful, malleable king to a resentful, intelligent queen.
Dowager Lady Anais Doravanto (age 65) — Jasmina's grandmother. A survivor of the last Sunstone War who saw her husband killed, her son forced into a humiliating peace, and her granddaughter crowned as a compromise she considers a slow-motion execution. Anais is confined to her chambers by the grey wheeze — a chronic lung disease that has been slowly suffocating her for a decade — but her mind is intact and her network of informants, built over forty years of courtly survival, is still active. She is Jasmina's only trusted advisor. Their conversations happen at dawn, when the palace is quiet and the parrots haven't started yet.
The Alcázar's Parrots: A flock of semi-tame Scarlets nests in the Alcázar's bell tower. They have been there for at least a century and are considered palace fixtures. They repeat fragments of overheard conversation with the accuracy and timing of comedians. During formal court sessions, the parrots occasionally interrupt proceedings with comments that are either meaningless or devastating depending on what was said in the antechambers that morning. Jasmina has considered having them removed. Anais advised against it: "They say what we can't. Let them talk."

House Solé — The Golden Tide
Seat: The Solé Palazzo, Puerto Luciente (a cliff-top merchant palace with a private harbor, a spice warehouse the size of a cathedral, and the continent's only heated seawater bathing pool) Sigil: A golden kraken seizing a silver ship on deep sea-blue Words: "The Tides Bring Us Gold"
House Solé is new money in the oldest sense — merchants who became magnates who became lords who became kingmakers, all within the span of the post-imperial era. Their wealth comes from the sea: spice imports from Xaria, trade with the Horns and Nionia, and the merchant fleet that is the largest private navy in the region. They control the Costadoro province — the golden coastline — and from Puerto Luciente they project economic power across the entire continent. They don't need the crown. They need the crown to need them.
Lord Valerius Solé (age 37) — Patriarch. Charming, cultured, amoral. Valerius can discuss Ayanite theology, Sangrean wine vintages, and the terms of your assassination with equal eloquence and equal sincerity. He is the architect of the current cold war — the strategy of slow economic strangulation designed to make Terrarossa's vassals switch sides without a single sword being drawn. It is working. He takes no pleasure in cruelty but suffers no inconvenience from it either. He is the most dangerous man in Sangrea and the most pleasant dinner companion.
Lady Lyra Solé (age 45) — Valerius's wife. Eight years his senior, a marriage of alliance that has become, unexpectedly, one of genuine partnership. Lyra runs the household's intelligence operations from her salon — an evening gathering of artists, poets, merchants, and diplomats at the Solé Palazzo that is the most coveted social invitation on the coast. To be invited is to be important. To be uninvited is to be finished. Lyra tracks alliances, feuds, debts, and affairs with a precision that makes Brother Cael of Domus Lux look like an amateur. She maintains a parrot — a blue-and-gold macaw named Fortuna — that sits on a perch beside her salon chair and has been trained to say "How delightful" and "Tell me more" at appropriate intervals. Guests find this charming. They should find it terrifying.
Gaius Solé (age 24) — Heir. Ambitious like his father, lacking his father's subtlety. Known for decadent parties, a stable of prized racehorses, and a temper that has resulted in three duels (all non-fatal, all embarrassing for the other party). He is being groomed for leadership but is not ready. He knows this. The knowledge makes him reckless.
Serena Solé (age 21) — Valerius's daughter. Beautiful, cunning, trained in the arts of social manipulation since childhood. She operates as her father's agent at the Doravanto court in Castesol — attending the queen's functions, befriending the prince, gathering intelligence, and projecting the image of Solé generosity and cultural refinement that greases the family's political machine. She is good at her job. She hates it. The performance of constant charm is exhausting, and she has begun to suspect that the person she performs as is more real than the person she is underneath.
Admiral Lucan Solé (age 42) — Valerius's brother. Commander of the house fleet. A grim, capable sailor who personally oversees the disruption of Terrarossa's trade routes — not through piracy (too crude) but through tariff manipulation, port-access restrictions, and the selective enforcement of maritime regulations that Lucan himself writes and the crown rubber-stamps. He has the sea-weathered look of a man who has spent more of his life on water than on land, and the moral flexibility of a man who has jettisoned conscience as excess cargo.

House Terrarossa — The Old Blood
Seat: Altavista, the high city (a fortress-city built on a ridge overlooking three valleys, its walls incorporating the living rock of the mountainside) Sigil: Crimson grapes on a gnarled vine, on earthen red Words: "The Old Blood Endures"
If Solé is the future, Terrarossa is the past — and they wear it like armor. House Terrarossa traces its lineage to a pre-imperial warlord who first cultivated the great vineyards of the Vallesangre, and every generation since has defined itself against whatever threatens the old order. They are land-wealthy, honor-bound, and possessed of a stubbornness that has kept them fighting the same war for four hundred years. They cannot match Solé's gold. They trade in loyalty and steel — calling in ancient oaths, maintaining the vassal relationships that Solé's money is slowly eroding.
Lord Titus Terrarossa (age 58) — Patriarch. Proud, stubborn, tied to tradition in ways that are simultaneously admirable and suicidal. He sees the current cold war as a temporary and dishonorable state — an interval between the last Sunstone War and the next. He is not wrong. He is preparing accordingly: reinforcing Altavista, drilling his household guard, and sending his son to the vassal houses to tighten bonds that Solé gold is loosening. He drinks his own wine (the Terrarossa Reserva, the finest vintage in Sangrea, which he refuses to sell to Solé buyers even when the price is extravagant) and he prays every evening at the chapel where the Broken Chalice's Terrarossa half is displayed in a glass case. He considers the half-chalice a reminder that peace is always incomplete.
Ser Roric Terrarossa (age 30) — Heir. A warrior of genuine skill and genuinely terrifying temper. Roric has won every tournament he's entered, broken three opponents' arms (two accidentally, one not), and earned a reputation as the best sword in Sangrea. He is also his father's greatest vulnerability — his temper makes him exploitable, and Solé agents have been engineering provocations designed to make Roric do something public and unforgivable. So far, his father's restraining hand has held. So far.
Elara Terrarossa (age 26) — The daughter. Pious, gentle, betrothed to the heir of House Montefior in a match designed to cement the Terrarossa-Montefior military alliance. She accepted the betrothal as a duty. She does not love Ser Hector Montefior. She loves the convent library where she spent her girlhood and the Ashanite sisters who taught her to read. She writes poetry — quiet, careful, technically excellent — that she shares with no one.
Marius Terrarossa (age 55) — Titus's brother. A brilliant strategist broken by loss. His wife and son died in the last Sunstone War — the son at the Battle of Fuente Bridge, the wife of grief three months later. Marius has been prone since then to episodes of the red grief — a Sangrean term for a depressive state so severe that the sufferer cannot move, speak, or eat, sometimes for weeks. Between episodes, he is the sharpest military mind in the region. During them, he is a ghost occupying a chair in Altavista's war room, staring at maps of campaigns he can no longer finish.

House Botano — The Jungle Matriarchs
Seat: Muroverde (the gateway city, half-stone half-jungle, where buildings are laced with vine and the streets smell of medicinal herbs and rot) Sigil: A green serpent coiled around a silver mortar and pestle, on jungle-green Words: "Every Leaf Has Its Purpose"
House Botano rules the Selvaverde — the jungle border province where Sangrea's culture dissolves into the Xarian frontier. They are matriarchal (the eldest daughter inherits, always), their power is botanical (they know every plant in the jungle — which heals, which kills, which does both), and their neutrality in the Sunstone Wars is the fulcrum on which the entire conflict balances. Both great houses need Botano's medicinal supplies. Both great houses need Carvallo's messenger network. Neither dares to alienate them.
Matriarch Elena Botano (age 65) — A wise, weary woman and one of the most gifted healers on the continent. She trained at the Ashanite hospice in Faithir before returning to Muroverde to assume the matriarchy. She is trapped in a poisoner's dilemma: the Orden de Cascabella — the poison masters' guild that operates in her city — sells their products to both great houses, and Elena is forced to treat the victims of poisons she knows were purchased in her own market square. She has considered expelling the Cascabella. She has calculated the consequences. The Cascabella would relocate to Xarian territory, beyond her influence, and continue selling. At least in Muroverde, she can monitor them.
Joric Botano (age 35) — Elena's son and heir-apparent (the matriarchy passes to the eldest daughter, but Elena's daughters died young; Joric is a compromise heir whose accession will break tradition and create a succession crisis). He is a skilled herbalist who lacks his mother's moral conviction. He has been meeting with Cascabella representatives privately. Whether he is trying to regulate them, bribe them, or join them is unclear even to Elena.
Calla Botano (age 18) — Elena's niece, daughter of her deceased younger sister. The matriarchy's true heir by tradition — Elena's sister's daughter takes precedence over Elena's son. Calla is being raised in the Muroverde convent, educated in both herbalism and Ashanite theology, and kept carefully out of Joric's sight. Elena has not announced Calla's claim. The announcement, when it comes, will split the house.

House Carvallo — The Parrot-Lords
Seat: The Carvallo Aviary, Muroverde (a compound of breeding halls, training pens, and the relay headquarters from which the entire messenger network is managed) Sigil: A scarlet parrot on a golden branch, on white Words: "The Message Finds Its Way"
Vassals of Botano but functionally independent — the Carvallos run the messenger network that every power in Sangrea depends on, and that dependency gives them leverage far beyond their nominal status.
Lord-Lorero Tomás Carvallo (age 50) — Head of house and master trainer. A thin, sun-darkened man whose fingers are permanently scarred from parrot bites and whose conversation is regularly interrupted by the birds that perch on his shoulders, head, and arms at all times. Tomás is quiet, observant, and in possession of the most comprehensive intelligence picture in Sangrea — because he reads every message that passes through his network. He shares this intelligence with Elena Botano. He shares selected portions with whoever he chooses. He denies everything.
Rosalia Carvallo (age 28) — Tomás's daughter and the network's chief cipher-master. She designed the current Carvallo encryption system — a substitution cipher that changes keys monthly, based on a botanical codebook that only Carvallo loreros possess. She is the only person in Sangrea who can read every encrypted message in the system. She is also, quietly, one of the most powerful people in the region, and she knows it. She has a parrot named Chisme (gossip) that she's trained to say "I know what you did" in three languages. She uses this at dinner parties.

House Montefior — The River Lords
Seat: Castillo del Río (a fortress commanding the main bridge over the Sangra River in Vallesangre) Sigil: A silver fish leaping from a blue river on green Words: "The River Flows to War"
Terrarossa's most powerful vassals. The Montefiors control the Sangra River — the waterway that irrigates the great vineyards — and their barge-mounted soldiers are Terrarossa's primary military asset. Loyalty: absolute. Ambition: none. The Montefiors want exactly one thing: to serve the old order and fight its enemies.
Lord Rodrigo Montefior (age 48) — A bluff, hearty soldier-lord. Childhood friend of Lord Titus. More comfortable on a horse than in a council chamber. He has six sons, all trained as knights, and he considers each one a weapon pointed at Solé. His wife, Lady Sofia (age 45) — a Terrarossa cousin — manages the household and the river-barge logistics with the efficiency of a quartermaster and the warmth of a brick.
Ser Hector Montefior (age 25) — Eldest son and heir. Betrothed to Elara Terrarossa. He is dutiful, competent, and aware that his betrothed doesn't love him. He has decided that this doesn't matter. He is wrong, but he won't know that until it does.

House Bellacorte — The Cliff Lords
Seat: Bellacorte Castle (a fortress carved into the coastal cliffs north of Puerto Luciente, accessible only by a switchback road that a dozen men could defend against an army) Sigil: A silver falcon on a red cliff, on blue Words: "We Hold the Heights"
Solé's primary military vassal. The Bellacortes are warriors in service to merchants — an arrangement they find philosophically uncomfortable and financially indispensable.
Lord Dario Bellacorte (age 55) — A proud, impoverished aristocrat whose castle is magnificent and whose treasury is empty. He serves Solé because Solé pays his bills. He despises this dependency. He compensates by maintaining the highest martial standards in the region — his household guard is smaller than Terrarossa's but better trained and better equipped (with Solé money).
Isabela Bellacorte (age 23) — Dario's daughter. Fiercer than her father, scornful of the "soft" Solé court, a skilled falconer and archer who hunts in the coastal cliffs with the intensity of someone working out a grudge against the universe. She has no interest in the marriage market. She has considerable interest in the Cascabella's poison catalogue. The combination makes people nervous.

House Cigarral — The Tobacco Lords
Seat: Fuenterroja (the oasis town in the Fuentarossa dry fields) Sigil: Two golden tobacco leaves crossed behind a red clay pipe, on tan Words: "The Best Leaf Finds the Highest Bidder"
The swing house. Cigarral controls the tobacco crop that half the continent is addicted to, and they sell to anyone who pays. Their loyalty is to profit. Their diplomacy is hospitality. Their strategy is duplicity.
Lord Malio Cigarral (age 50) — A shrewd, smiling man who hosts lavish parties for agents of both great houses simultaneously, plying them with tobacco, wine, and carefully calibrated promises. He has six children and is using each as a marriage pawn — one daughter engaged to a Molinaro heir, one son courting a Bellacorte cousin, the others positioned at various minor houses. He is building a web of alliances so complex that attacking any single strand would shake the whole structure. This is deliberate. A spider in its web is hardest to kill.

House Molinaro — The Mill-Owners
Seat: Molinoblanco (a fortified town built around a series of white-plastered water mills on the Fuente River) Sigil: A golden water wheel on brown Words: "The Wheel Turns, the Grain is Milled"
The grain processors. Every sack of flour in central Sangrea passes through a Molinaro mill. This makes them essential and invisible — the most powerful house that no one thinks about until the bread stops coming.
Lord Pio Molinaro (age 60) — A cautious, hardworking man overwhelmed by the political games being played around him. He wants to mill grain, pay his workers, and attend chapel on holy days. The Sunstone Wars keep interrupting. His eldest son is engaged to a Cigarral daughter. He considers this a commercial partnership. Cigarral considers it a leash.

Guilds and Orders
Los Torrebrava — The Tower Builders — A construction guild based in Castesol that builds the competitive towers the nobility uses as status displays. Every new tower is a commission — a Solé-funded spire here, a Terrarossa-sponsored belfry there — and the skyline of Castesol is the physical register of the cold war's balance of power. The guild is technically neutral. Its current master, Maestro Gallo (age 55), accepts commissions from both sides and maintains a secret ledger recording exactly how much each house has spent on vertical ego. The ledger, if published, would be devastating. It stays locked.
Los Navegantes — The Cartographers — Based in Puerto Luciente. Master map-makers who chart Sangrea's sea lanes, coastal geography, and — increasingly — its political landscape. Their maps are the best in the world, and Solé's exclusive access to their intelligence-grade charts gives the house a navigation advantage that translates directly into military power. The guild's master, Cartógrafo Mayor Iñigo (age 62), is an artist and a spy in equal measure. His maps are beautiful. His intelligence reports are more beautiful.
Los Campaneros — The Bell-Founders — Based in Altavista but operating across Sangrea. The bellringers serve as the region's auditory communication network — coded chime patterns that transmit messages across valleys faster than horseback messengers. The system is less versatile than the parrot network (bells can send alarms and simple coded signals, not complex messages) but faster and more reliable in bad weather. The Campaneros are Terrarossa-aligned by tradition and geography, making the bell network a de facto Terrarossa military asset. Their master-founder, Doña Campana (age 70) — real name forgotten, everyone calls her Doña Campana — has been casting bells for fifty years and can tune a bell to a specific note by ear alone. She is deaf in her left ear from the forge. She considers this a reasonable professional expense.
Orden de Cascabella — The Poison Masters — Based in Muroverde. A feared and secretive guild of poisoners whose services are available to anyone with coin. They produce, test, and sell poisons derived from the Selvaverde jungle's vast pharmacopoeia — from subtle slow-acting compounds that mimic natural illness to fast-acting toxins that kill within minutes. The Cascabella maintain a code of professional neutrality — they sell to all parties and guarantee the confidentiality of their clients. Their current master, El Silencio (age unknown, face never seen in public), communicates exclusively through intermediaries and is rumored to be three different people, or no people at all, or a woman, or a Xarian exile. The uncertainty is cultivated. Fear is the Cascabella's best marketing.

IV. CASTESOL — The Golden City
The City
Sangrea's capital sits on a high, flat-topped hill in the center of the Altasol plain — a city of golden sandstone, tiled roofs, and the competitive towers that make its skyline look like a mouth full of crooked teeth. The Alcázar (the royal palace-fortress) crowns the summit. Below it, the city descends in concentric rings: the Court Quarter (noble mansions, guild halls, the Ayanite courthouse), the Market Ring (shops, taverns, the Great Souk where everything from spices to slaves is traded), and the Worker's Hem (tenements, workshops, the slaughterhouses and tanneries that aristocratic noses prefer to keep downhill).
The Alcázar — Six times rebuilt, always grand, always slightly shabby in the way of buildings that are more symbol than structure. The current incarnation is a Moorish-influenced palace-fortress: arched courtyards, tiled fountains, geometric azulejo covering every surface, and the throne room where Jasmina holds court under a dome painted with a sun-map of Sangrea that was commissioned by a Doravanto king three centuries ago and has never been updated. The parrot flock in the bell tower adds its commentary to every state function.
The Tower Forest — Castesol's most distinctive visual feature. Over two hundred private towers, built by noble and merchant families over four centuries of competitive construction, rising from the Court Quarter like a petrified forest. Some are functional (bell towers, watchtowers, grain-drying towers). Most are vanity projects — the tallest, thinnest, most elaborately decorated towers their builders could afford, commissioned from Los Torrebrava as displays of wealth and political allegiance. The tallest tower — the Torre del Sol, commissioned by House Solé, 180 feet high, capped with a golden sunburst that catches the morning light and blinds anyone looking east — was built specifically to be twelve feet taller than the Terrarossa-sponsored Torre de la Sangre next to it. The Terrarossa tower's architect responded by adding a wrought-iron weather vane that extends the height by another six feet. The dispute continues.
The Great Souk — Castesol's market. A labyrinth of covered arcades, open plazas, and narrow alleys where every commodity in Sangrea (and much of the continent) can be purchased. The Souk is organized by trade: the Spice Alley (Solé-controlled imports), the Vine Quarter (Terrarossa wines), the Smoke Market (Cigarral tobacco), the Green Stalls (Botano herbs and medicines), and the Shadow Market — a section that technically doesn't exist, located behind the legitimate stalls, where Cascabella products, forged documents, and information are traded in whispers. The Souk's parrots are legendary: generations of birds have learned the vendors' sales pitches and repeat them at random, creating a cacophony of "FRESH PEPPERS THREE FOR A COPPER" and "FINEST TERRAROSSA RESERVA" that echoes through the arcades and drives newcomers to distraction.
The Festival Grounds — A flat expanse below the Alcázar's walls where the Festival of the Red Grape is held every autumn. The Grounds are empty most of the year — a dusty field used for livestock auctions and military drilling. During Festival, they transform into a city-within-a-city: pavilions, stages, a bullring, wine tents, food stalls, a parade route, and the enormous bonfire at the Grounds' center around which the opening-night copla competition takes place. The Festival draws 30,000 visitors over seven days. The Grounds' capacity is 15,000. The overflow camps in the fields surrounding the city, creating a temporary shantytown that has its own economy, its own disputes, and its own parrot population.
The Broken Chalice Chapel — An Ashanite chapel in the Court Quarter where the Terrarossa half of the Peace of the Broken Chalice is displayed (the Solé half is in a private shrine in Puerto Luciente). The chapel is small, plain, and the most heavily guarded building in Castesol after the Alcázar — the Chalice half is a sacred relic, and its theft or destruction would be an act of war. Pilgrims visit the chapel to pray for peace. Soldiers visit to pray for its absence.

V. PUERTO LUCIENTE — The Shining Port
Sangrea's second city and its economic engine. Built on a curving bay where the Costadoro cliffs drop to sea level, Puerto Luciente is everything Castesol pretends to be — rich, cosmopolitan, alive — without the political paralysis that makes the capital feel like a beautiful cage.
The Solé Palazzo — The family's compound. Not a single building but a complex: the main residence (a cliff-top villa with panoramic bay views), the spice warehouses (stone vaults the size of cathedrals, climate-controlled by sea-breeze ventilation), the private harbor (six deep-water berths, guarded by Bellacorte marines), and the heated seawater bathing pool that Lyra Solé uses for her salon gatherings. The pool is tiled in gold and deep blue. The parrots that roost in the surrounding palm trees have been trained by a Carvallo lorero on Lyra's payroll to greet arriving guests by name. The effect is simultaneously charming and deeply unsettling.
The Spice Docks — Puerto Luciente's commercial heart. A mile of waterfront lined with warehouses, chandleries, trading offices, and the customs house where every imported cargo is inspected, taxed, and recorded by the Navegantes guild. The air is extraordinary — a layered perfume of cinnamon, cardamom, clove, pepper, vanilla, and the salt-rot of the harbor, mixed with the coal-smoke of the smithies and the fish-stink of the market. A person standing on the Spice Docks with their eyes closed can identify where they are by smell alone. A parrot can identify it from a mile away. They circle the docks in screaming flocks, diving for spilled grain and discarded fish-heads.
Los Navegantes' Hall — The cartographers' guild headquarters. A stone building on the harbor hill, its interior walls covered with the guild's master maps — hand-painted charts of every coastline, sea lane, current, and depth-sounding from the Horns to the Teeth. The maps are works of art: color-coded, precisely scaled, annotated in the Navegantes' own shorthand. They are also state secrets. Non-guild members may view the public maps (displayed in the entrance hall). The intelligence-grade charts (in the upper floors) are accessible only to Navegantes members and their Solé patrons.

VI. ALTAVISTA — The High City
Terrarossa's fortress-capital. Built on a ridge 2,000 feet above the Vallesangre floor, Altavista commands three valleys and is visible from every vineyard in the province. The city is fortified: thick walls of red-brown sandstone, battlements, gate-towers, and a keep — the Sangre Torre — that rises from the ridge's highest point like a fist raised at the sky. The city has been besieged four times in the Sunstone Wars. It has never fallen.
The Great Cellars — Altavista's most famous feature. The city sits on top of a network of natural caves that the Terrarossa family has converted into the largest wine-aging facility in Sangrea. The cellars extend for miles beneath the city, their temperature and humidity perfectly stable year-round, producing aging conditions that cannot be replicated elsewhere. The Terrarossa Reserva — aged a minimum of fifteen years in the Great Cellars — is considered the finest wine on the continent. It is also, discreetly, a diplomatic weapon: every bottle sent as a gift carries the implicit message "we can afford to give away fifteen-year wine."
The Belltower of San Campaña — The largest bell tower in Sangrea. Twelve bells, tuned to a chromatic scale, operated by Los Campaneros. The tower can transmit messages across the Vallesangre in minutes using the Campaneros' coded chime patterns. It can also, when all twelve bells are rung simultaneously, produce a sound loud enough to be heard thirty miles away — a full-muster alarm that has been sounded three times in history, each time summoning the entire Terrarossa military apparatus to war footing within hours.

VII. MINOR SETTLEMENTS AND GAZETTEER
Viña del Puente (pop. ~2,000) — A vineyard town on the Sangra River between Altavista and Castesol. Famous for its bridge — the Puente de la Sangre — where Don Alvaro Sangreverde hung 800 men in 1108 AF. The bridge has been rebuilt. The town has not forgotten. A memorial wall on the bridge's western approach lists every name — or, where names were lost, simply "hijo del puente" (son of the bridge). A Bonekeepers' ossuary beneath the bridge holds the remains that were recovered from the river. The town produces a wine called Sangre del Puente — a deep red, almost black, that tastes of iron and grief. It is not popular outside the town. Inside, it is served at every funeral.
Bahía Dorada (pop. ~3,000) — A fishing town on the Costadoro south of Puerto Luciente. Known for its pearl divers — women who free-dive in the warm coastal waters to harvest oysters from the bay's shallow reef. The pearls are small, irregularly shaped, and tinted gold by the copper-rich water. They are less valuable than eastern pearls but distinctively Sangrean, and Solé jewelers set them in designs that command premium prices on the mainland. The head diver, Marisela "La Buza" (age 40), can hold her breath for four minutes and has been diving since age eight. She is missing three toes (shark) and one finger (moray eel) and considers both losses acceptable business expenses.
Molinoblanco (pop. ~1,500) — The Molinaro seat. A fortified mill-town on the Fuente River where the water is channeled through a series of white-plastered mills that grind grain for the entire interior. The mills run day and night during harvest season. The sound — a constant, low, rhythmic grinding — is audible for a mile. Workers sleep to it. Visitors cannot.
Ceniza (pop. ~800) — A village in the foothills of the Vallesangre's southern mountains, built on the site of a sunstone quarry that was exhausted two centuries ago. The quarry is now a lake — a flooded pit of startling turquoise (mineral deposits coloring the water) that locals swim in during summer and avoid during winter (the water temperature drops to levels that have killed three incautious swimmers). The village survives on charcoal production and the surprisingly good goat cheese made by a Harvest Bell monastery — the Brothers of the Ash — who maintain a small goat herd on the quarry's terraced slopes.
Fuenterroja (pop. ~6,000) — The Cigarral seat. An oasis town in the dry interior, built around the Red Spring — a natural artesian spring whose water is tinted red by iron-oxide deposits. The spring feeds a system of irrigation channels that support the tobacco fields, pomegranate orchards, and grain farms of the Fuentarossa province. The town's streets are unpaved red earth. The buildings are red adobe. The sunsets, filtered through the dust, are red. Everything in Fuenterroja is red. The smell: dry tobacco leaf, pomegranate blossom, and the mineral tang of iron-water. The Cigarral family's tobacco-drying barns line the town's eastern edge — long, low, ventilated structures where the harvested leaves hang in dense rows, curing in the dry heat. Workers move through the barns in the predawn hours, turning leaves, checking moisture, and feeding the parrots that roost in the rafters and have learned to mimic the quality-assessment calls ("buena hoja," "mala hoja" — good leaf, bad leaf) that the inspectors use.
La Cascada Negra (pop. ~300) — A hamlet in the Selvaverde jungle border, built where a river drops 200 feet over a basalt cliff into a black pool. The waterfall's spray creates a permanent mist that supports a micro-ecosystem of ferns, orchids, and the luminescent fungi that the Botano healers cultivate for medicinal use. The hamlet's economy: gathering jungle products for the Muroverde market. The hamlet's fame: the Black Pool itself, which is sacred in local folk tradition. Offerings are thrown in — flowers, coins, small carved animals — and the pool supposedly returns them weeks later, washed up on the downstream bank, transformed. Coins come back green with copper patina. Flowers come back as seed-pods. Carved animals come back polished smooth. The explanation is probably the pool's unusual mineral chemistry. The locals prefer the other explanation.
Torremira (pop. ~1,200) — A hilltop town halfway between Castesol and Puerto Luciente, known for its watchtower (the oldest surviving Torrebrava construction, built in 987 AF, still manned by a Doravanto-paid garrison that has nothing to watch but the road below). The town produces the best Ashleaf pipe-tobacco outside Cigarral territory — a milder, sweeter blend grown on the hilltop's windward slopes. The tavern, El Loro Borracho (The Drunk Parrot), is famous for its resident macaw, a venerable bird named Don Pedro who is estimated to be over sixty years old, speaks four languages badly, and bites anyone wearing Terrarossa crimson. No one knows why. Don Pedro isn't saying.
Valle de los Huesos (pop. ~400) — A valley in the southern mountains, remote and superstitious. Named for the fossils — enormous bones, too large for any known animal — that erode from the valley's limestone walls during the rainy season. The locals believe the bones belong to "los antiguos" — the ancient ones, giants or gods who walked the world before human memory. A Magos geological survey in 1278 AF identified the bones as belonging to an extinct species of megafauna. The survey team also noted that the valley's ambient temperature was unusually warm and that their compass readings were inconsistent. They attributed this to geothermal activity. They may have been right. They may not have been.
Puerto Sombra (pop. ~2,500) — A secondary port on the Costadoro, south of Puerto Luciente. Used primarily for the Xarian trade — ships too large or too suspect for Puerto Luciente's regulated harbor dock here instead. Puerto Sombra is the Costadoro's back door: less policed, less taxed, less respectable. The town's economy runs on things that Puerto Luciente's customs house would confiscate: Xarian cacao, unregulated spice, the occasional human cargo (slavery is illegal in Sangrea but enforcement is selective, and Puerto Sombra is where selectivity goes to die). The Alonite Chain-Breakers maintain a safehouse here — a battered stone building with a green door where escaped slaves are sheltered, fed, and transported inland. The safehouse has been raided twice by Solé port authorities. Both times, the building was empty when they arrived. The Chain-Breakers' intelligence network is better than Solé's. This enrages Admiral Lucan personally.

VIII. NATURAL FEATURES
The Sangra River — Sangrea's central waterway. Rises in the southern mountains, flows north through the Vallesangre, past Castesol's western edge, and empties into the sea through a marshy delta north of Puerto Luciente. The Sangra is navigable by barge for most of its length and serves as the region's primary transport corridor. Montefior barge-soldiers patrol the river in flat-bottomed war-barges painted in Terrarossa crimson. The river's name means "blood" — whether named for the red silt it carries during the rainy season or for the battles fought along its banks is debated.
The Fuente River — A tributary of the Sangra, running through the Fuentarossa dry fields. The Fuente's water is red-tinted by iron deposits — the same geology that produces the Red Spring of Fuenterroja. The river is shallow, seasonal (dry for three months of the year), and critical to the interior's agriculture. The bridge at Fuentarossa is the one Sangreverde destroyed. The rebuilt bridge is wider, stronger, and painted white — a deliberate contrast with the red water beneath it.
The Costadoro Cliffs — The golden coastline. Sandstone cliffs, 50-200 feet high, running for roughly eighty miles north and south of Puerto Luciente. The cliffs are riddled with sea-caves used by smugglers, pearl-divers, and the Bellacorte castle's defenders (the castle's escape route runs through a cave system that emerges at a hidden cove a mile from the main harbor). The cliff-tops are where Sangrea's coastal estates are built — the haciendas with the million-crown views.
The Selvaverde — The jungle. Dense tropical and subtropical forest covering the province's southern and eastern reaches, thickening as it approaches the Xarian border. The Selvaverde is one of the most echo-dense environments on the mainland — largely uncleared, ancient growth, home to species that have disappeared from the rest of the continent. The jungle produces medicinal plants, poisons, exotic hardwoods, cacao, vanilla, and the Selvaverde Scarlet parrot. It also produces a persistent sense of unease in anyone who enters it — the forest watches. The Botano healers, who spend their lives in the jungle, describe the sensation as "the green attention" — a feeling of being observed by something that doesn't have eyes. They consider it normal. Mainlanders do not.
The Sunstone Fields — The disputed quarries in the borderlands between Solé and Terrarossa territory. Sunstone is a translucent mineral — amber to deep orange — that transmits light in a warm glow and can be polished to a mirror finish. It is valuable as a decorative stone, as a lens material, and as a status symbol. The deposits are concentrated in a twenty-mile band of hills between the two provinces. The quarries have been fought over so many times that the landscape is scarred with trenches, fortifications, and the ruins of extraction camps that were destroyed and rebuilt with each change of control.
The Vallesangre — Terrarossa's three valleys. Steep-sided, south-facing, terraced with the vineyards that produce Sangrea's finest wines. The valleys are beautiful in the postcard sense — rows of grapevines stepping up hillsides in perfect geometry, stone farmhouses with red-tile roofs, the Sangra River winding through the valley floor — but the beauty is maintained by labor conditions that range from feudal to brutal. Vineyard workers are seasonally employed, poorly paid, and housed in barracks that the Ashanite hospice in Altavista has repeatedly condemned as inadequate. Lord Titus considers this criticism impertinent. The workers consider it accurate.

IX. LEGENDS OF SANGREA
The Butcher's Bridge — The most famous Sangrean legend because it's true. Don Alvaro Sangreverde hung 800 men and boys from the Fuentarossa bridge in 1108 AF. The bridge collapsed under the weight. The bodies fell into the Fuente River and were carried downstream. For a week, the river ran red — not with blood (the water was already red from iron deposits) but with the clothing and personal effects of the dead, tangled in the riverside vegetation for miles. The legend: on the anniversary of the hanging, the bridge creaks as if bearing weight. The water beneath it runs darker. And if you stand on the bridge at midnight and listen, you hear breathing — not one person's breathing, but hundreds, shallow and afraid, the sound of 800 people trying to breathe through nooses that are slowly tightening. The Bonekeepers who maintain the memorial ossuary confirm none of this. The locals confirm all of it.
The Parrot King — A folk tale. A Carvallo lorero, the best in the guild's history, trained a parrot so perfectly that the bird could carry a conversation — not just repeat phrases, but respond to questions, improvise answers, and argue with the person it was speaking to. The lorero sent the parrot to the Doravanto court as a gift. The king was so impressed that he appointed the parrot to his privy council. For three years, the parrot advised the king on matters of state. The kingdom prospered. Then the king's human advisors, jealous, poisoned the bird. The kingdom immediately fell into war. The lesson: parrots are better than people. This is the most popular story in Sangrea. Doravanto courtiers hate it.
The Cascabella's Price — A cautionary tale about the poison guild. A nobleman hired the Cascabella to poison his brother. The Cascabella quoted a price. The nobleman paid. His brother died. A year later, the nobleman received a visit from a Cascabella agent who informed him that his brother had also hired the Cascabella — to poison him. The agent produced a vial: the nobleman had been drinking the poison for six months, a slow-acting compound mixed into his morning wine. The antidote, the agent explained, would cost exactly as much as the original contract. The nobleman paid. He survived. He never drank wine again. The lesson: the Cascabella work for everyone, and what you buy from them, your enemy buys too. Whether this specific story is true is unknown. The Cascabella's general practice of playing both sides is confirmed by every intelligence service on the continent.
The Song That Burned Castesol — A copla legend. During the Great Sunstone War, a cantaor named Maela de la Fuente composed a copla so scathing about both great houses — naming names, detailing bribes, mocking the dead — that both Solé and Terrarossa agents were sent to silence her. She sang the copla at the Festival of the Red Grape, to an audience of 10,000, standing in the bonfire's light. The song lasted forty minutes. She named every atrocity. She named every liar. The crowd rioted. Three buildings burned. Maela escaped in the chaos and was never seen again. The copla survives — it is called "La Verdad de la Sangre" (The Truth of the Blood) — and singing it in full is technically illegal under a Doravanto decree that has never been repealed. Young cantaores sing fragments of it as an act of rebellion. The fragments get longer every generation.
The Jungle's Memory — A Selvaverde legend. The jungle remembers. Every person who enters the Selvaverde leaves an impression — a scent, a warmth, a trace — that the jungle retains. Botano healers who spend decades in the jungle can reportedly feel the traces of previous visitors: this spot was where a hunter knelt; this tree was where a child cried; this path was where soldiers marched during a war that ended before the healer was born. The impressions fade over time but never fully disappear. The deepest jungle — the parts no human has entered in centuries — still holds the traces of people who walked there before the empire existed. What they felt is still there, the healers say, thick as honey in the air, old as stone. The Ayanite scholars call this superstition. The Botano healers smile and change the subject. They are describing echo-perception. They don't know that. They don't need to.
SANGREA — Expansion Supplement
Population Correction & Broader Scope

I. CORRECTED DEMOGRAPHICS
Total Regional Population: ~4,000,000 Castesol: ~120,000 Puerto Luciente: ~85,000 Altavista: ~45,000 Muroverde: ~20,000 Fuenterroja: ~15,000 Other named towns (50+): ~600,000 combined Rural population: ~3,100,000
Sangrea is densely populated by continental standards — fertile river valleys, a long growing season, centuries of agricultural investment. Every viable water source has a village on it. Every viable hilltop has a watchtower or a hacienda. The landscape is worked — terraced, irrigated, walled, fenced, and fought over until every acre has a name and an owner.

II. EXPANDED CULTURAL LAYERS
Honra — The Currency of Reputation
Sangrea runs on honra — honor, reputation, family name, and social credit combined into a single currency governing every interaction. A person with honra borrows without collateral, marries above their station, walks into any tavern knowing they'll be served first. A person without honra is socially dead — refused service, excluded from guilds, children unmarriageable.
Enforcement is communal. In villages, the song decides — a cantaor who sings that a man cheated a neighbor has convicted him without trial. A cantaor who sings a woman's virtue has given her an asset worth gold. The copla tradition is not merely cultural — it is judicial.
The dark side: honra killings. When a family's honra is damaged, the family restores it through violence. Technically illegal. Universally practiced. The Ayanite courts process approximately forty honra-related homicides per year. The actual number is higher. Many are staged as duels or bandit attacks.
Saudaverde — The Green Longing
A word with no direct translation: the ache for something beautiful that is gone or that never was. Homesickness for a home that may not exist. Grief for a future that was promised and never delivered. Sangrea's specific melancholy — it permeates their music, poetry, wine-drinking, and wars.
Saudaverde is why the Sunstone Wars never end. Both great houses fight for a vision of Sangrea each believes the other has stolen — Terrarossa for the old order where blood and soil meant something; Solé for the mercantile future where talent and gold outweigh birth. Neither vision has ever existed. Both houses ache for it. The ache drives the war. The war deepens the ache.
The Bull Culture
The toro bravo — the Sangrean fighting bull — has been bred for aggression, beauty, and courage for a thousand years. The breeding haciendas of the Vallesangre produce bulls weighing over a ton. They are the region's most valuable livestock.
The corrida is not a sport. It is a sacrifice. The bull enters knowing nothing. The matador enters knowing everything — that the bull will die, that honra rises or falls on the quality of the kill. A clean kill earns ovation. A messy kill earns silence, which is worse than jeering. The matador who fails is punished by the absence of song. No cantaor will sing his name.
The corrida seals alliances the way signatures seal treaties. The Festival of the Red Grape's opening-night corrida — six bulls from the finest breeders — is the most prestigious event in Sangrean culture.
The Processions
Every holy day, saint's feast, and seasonal transition is marked by procesiones — hooded penitents in pointed hoods carrying torches and icons through torch-lit streets, accompanied by drums, horns, and deep Alonite chant repurposed as devotional music. The Crimson Penitents join every major procession, blood speckling the cobblestones behind the sacred floats.
The most famous: La Procesión de las Ánimas — the Procession of Souls, held on the autumn equinox night. Hooded figures in black carry a float bearing a carved skeleton dressed in a queen's robes. The skeleton is La Dama del Olvido (the Lady of Forgetting) — not death that takes life, but death that erases name, honra, memory. The procession defies her: the crowd names the dead aloud as the float passes. The dead are spoken. The dead remain.
Folk belief: if you see the Procesión from inside your house, you are safe. If you see it from the street, you are already dead, walking with the souls, and you will not return. Every Sangrean child is taught to stay inside on equinox night. Approximately once a decade, a young person dies that night. The deaths are always explicable by mundane means. The explanations are never satisfying.
The Meigas
Sangrea has witches. Called meigas — wise women who live in rural margins, practice folk medicine, predict weather, curse enemies, bless crops. Most have no more echo-sensitivity than any village healer, but they operate within a folk tradition preserving fragments of genuine echo-knowledge: which plants respond to attention, which stones hold warmth, which places feel different at night.
The Ayanite order considers them heretical. The Ashanite order considers them colleagues. Common people consider them essential. A village without a meiga is a village without medicine.
The most feared: meigas chupasangre — blood-drinkers. Women accused of draining the vitality of livestock, children, and rivals through curses. Whether any meiga has harmed anyone through supernatural means is debated. Whether communities have murdered accused women is not — it has happened repeatedly, and the Ayanite courts have been complicit in at least twelve documented cases.
Castells — The Human Towers
A tradition practiced at festivals across Sangrea: teams of men, women, and children build castells — human towers reaching heights of forty feet or more. The base (the pinya) consists of dozens of tightly-packed men locking arms. Successive tiers climb on their shoulders, each lighter than the last, until a child — the anxaneta — crowns the summit and raises a fist. The tower holds for thirty seconds, then carefully dismantles. A successful castell earns the team enormous honra. A collapse (which happens roughly once per festival season, sometimes injuring or killing participants) brings collective shame but also respect — the attempt itself has value.
The castell tradition is nominally secular but carries deep cultural weight. The metaphor is obvious: Sangrea stands only when everyone holds everyone else up. The metaphor is also obviously ironic in a region where two great houses have been trying to topple each other for four centuries. The castell teams are drawn from both factions. For the duration of the tower, they cooperate. For the duration of the tower only.

III. EXPANDED SETTLEMENTS
Altasol Province
Villarosa (pop. ~8,000) — Livestock hub. Cattle, sheep, goats, fighting bulls. Annual Feria de Ganado draws 20,000. Famous for its leather-workers' quarter — saddlers, boot-makers — exporting continent-wide.
Soltera del Campo (pop. ~3,000) — Grain town on the Sangra's western bank. Home to the province's most respected meiga, Vieja Consuelo (age 77) — women travel from Castesol to consult her on fertility and marriage. She talks to her garden plants. The plants, neighbors say, listen.
Piedranegra (pop. ~2,000) — Black-basalt fortress-town on the Altasol-Vallesangre border. Changed hands seven times during the Wars. Currently neutral Doravanto garrison. Commander Capitán Ruiz maintains peace through a weekly card game for officers from both sides.
Campomuerto (pop. ~1,200) — Named for a 1045 AF battlefield: 3,000 dead in one afternoon. Field never plowed — dead buried where they fell. Haunted by the Compañía Silenciosa (Silent Company) — ghost soldiers marching as a line of torchlight on moonless nights. The Magos sent three investigators. One returned with no data. One returned with notes written in a language he didn't speak. One didn't return.
Loma del Rey (pop. ~5,000) — Ceramic capital. The Loma tiles are Sangrea's finest azulejo — hand-painted geometric patterns adorning buildings from the Alcázar to village chapels. Tile-masters' guild Los Azulejeros requires seven-year apprenticeships.
Aguasclaras (pop. ~4,000) — River town at a limestone gorge. Known for Sangra pike (grilled whole with garlic and lemon) and one of three paper mills in Sangrea. Paper quality good enough for Magos standing orders.
Torre de Vientos (pop. ~1,800) — Hilltop town famous for its windmills — thirty stone towers grinding grain on the province's windiest ridge. The mills are painted white with blue trim and visible for miles. The miller's guild has maintained them for three centuries.
Aldea de las Sombras (pop. ~500) — A village in a narrow valley that receives direct sunlight only four hours per day. Known for its mushroom cultivation — the Shadows' cellars produce the finest setas (wild mushrooms) in Sangrea, dried and exported in linen-wrapped bundles that sell for silver in Castesol's Great Souk.
Encrucijada (pop. ~3,500) — Crossroads town where the Castesol-Fuenterroja road meets the Castesol-Altavista road. Three inns, a Crimson Penitent wayhouse, a small Ayanite court, and the continent's busiest road-shrine — a carved stone alcove where travelers leave offerings for safe passage. The Brothers of the Open Road maintain a waystation here. Their warden, Brother Felix (age 50), knows every merchant, pilgrim, and spy who passes through and keeps a mental ledger more accurate than any customs house.
Costadoro Province
Bahía de las Sirenas (pop. ~6,000) — Ship-repair port south of Puerto Luciente. Safest natural harbor on the coast. Three drydocks. The Cofradía del Ancla guild competes with Horns shipbuilders. The bay produces a harmonic moaning in certain winds — the "sirens" — caused by sea-cave acoustics but attributed to drowned women who lure ships to safety.
Roca Fortuna (pop. ~3,500) — Lighthouse town. Treacherous coast has claimed over a hundred ships. Lampkeeper outpost. Current keeper Brother Isandro (age 38) — former Solé sailor, sole survivor of a wreck on the rocks below his own lighthouse. Keeps the light burning with atoning intensity.
Caleta Oscura (pop. ~1,500) — Twilight fishing hamlet. Its perpetual-shade cove breeds pale, blind pez fantasma — a raw delicacy in Puerto Luciente. Also harvests ambergris used by Cascabella alchemists.
Peñaroja (pop. ~2,500) — Red-cliff town. Salt pans, and annual Fiesta del Mar featuring cliff-diving from 60-80 feet. Deaths rare. Injuries common. Honra gained in quantities no other activity matches.
Puerto Sombra (pop. ~4,000) — Secondary port, Costadoro's back door. Less policed, less taxed, less respectable. Where the slave trade persists despite being illegal. The Alonite Chain-Breakers maintain a safehouse (green door) for escaped slaves. Raided twice by Solé authorities. Both times, empty when they arrived.
Arrecife (pop. ~2,000) — A town built on a coral shelf exposed at low tide. The reef produces the reddish-purple dye called múrex — extracted from sea snails in a process so foul-smelling that the dye-works are legally required to operate downwind. Múrex-dyed cloth is the most expensive textile produced in Sangrea and a Solé monopoly.
Punta del Halcón (pop. ~800) — A falcon-breeding station on a clifftop. House Bellacorte maintains the finest hunting falcons in Sangrea here — peregrine and gyrfalcon crosses bred for speed and aggression. A trained Bellacorte falcon sells for as much as a warhorse. Isabela Bellacorte visits monthly.
Vallesangre Province
Bodega Real (pop. ~7,000) — Wine-processing center at the Sangra's confluence. During harvest, population doubles. Streets run purple with spilled grape juice. The town's Bonekeepers' chapel doubles as a tavern after vespers.
Sangreverde (pop. ~800) — Named for the Butcher's atrocity. Maintains el silencio — one day per year, no one speaks. Not a word. Children learn the silence before anything else.
Puente de Hierro (pop. ~4,000) — Iron-bridge town, Montefior military chokepoint. Market under the bridge sells mountain goods: cured ham, hard cheese, orujo brandy.
Ermita de la Llama (pop. ~200) — Hermitage around a perpetual natural-gas flame burning from a limestone fissure. Has burned longer than memory. Ashanite shrine. The hermits report "visions in the fire." The flame sits on a geological fault bringing unprocessed stone from deep strata — echo-dense. The visions may not be superstition.
Viña Oscura (pop. ~1,000) — A vineyard village producing Sangrea's most unusual wine: the Tinta Negra, a black wine made from a grape variety that grows only on the valley's shadowed northern slopes. The wine is opaque, tannic, and tastes of blackberry, iron, and something undefined that wine experts describe variously as "smoke," "earth," "the end of something." It is an acquired taste. Once acquired, it is never abandoned.
Los Huesos (pop. ~400) — A valley where megafauna fossils erode from limestone walls. Locals call them "los antiguos." A Magos survey in 1278 AF identified extinct species and noted unusual warmth and compass anomalies. The hamlet's children collect fossil fragments and sell them to travelers.
Campana Alta (pop. ~1,500) — A mountain village known for its bell-foundry — the Los Campaneros' primary production site. The furnaces run year-round. The sound of hammer-on-bell testing is the village's constant background music. Children born here are reportedly immune to noise.
Fuentarossa Province
Tabacalera (pop. ~5,000) — Largest tobacco-processing town. Cigarral curing barns handle half the region's output. Air thick with curing-leaf scent. Workers develop nicotine tans. Local copla style: the hoja seca (dry leaf), performed in the barns.
Ojo del Diablo (pop. ~600) — Hamlet around a 200-foot sinkhole of warm, green, sulfurous water. Local legend: the eye of a buried beast. Ember Watch investigated 1201 AF, found nothing, recommended monitoring. Monitoring never happened.
Cortijo de los Perdidos (pop. ~0) — Ghost estate. Abandoned during the Great Sunstone War, never reoccupied. Three resettlement attempts failed — settlers left within a year, citing "the feeling." Livestock refuse to enter the main house. The well contained forty bodies. Bonekeepers sealed it. The feeling persists.
Pozos Rojos (pop. ~2,000) — Iron-oxide mining town. Produces the navajas — folding knives every Sangrean man carries. The smith's guild Los Herreros del Rojo stamps each blade. Counterfeiters get their hands broken.
Fuente Seca (pop. ~1,200) — A town whose spring dried up thirty years ago. The population stays because the tobacco fields don't need the spring (they're rain-fed) and because leaving would mean abandoning the ancestral cemetery. Water is hauled by mule from Fuenterroja, six miles away. The cost is ruinous. The people pay it. The dead keep them.
Molinoblanco (pop. ~1,500) — The Molinaro seat. White-plastered mills grinding grain day and night during harvest. The sound — constant, low, rhythmic — is audible for a mile.
Selvaverde Province
Raíz Profunda (pop. ~3,000) — Staging point for jungle expeditions. The Rastreadores guide guild provides escort. Rates high. Survival record good. Stories excellent.
Pueblo Veneno (pop. ~500) — Cascabella ingredient-gatherers' village. The work is lethal. Bonekeepers' chapel performs more funerals per capita than any settlement in Sangrea. Survivors immune to a remarkable range of toxins through controlled exposure.
Sombra Verde (pop. ~1,000) — Deepest permanent settlement in the Selvaverde. Built in the canopy — tree-house platforms 80 feet up, rope-ladders pulled up at night. Home to independent Yerbateros herb-gatherers who've domesticated the mono rojo (red monkey) as a secondary messenger system rivaling Carvallo parrots in the deep interior.
La Cascada Negra (pop. ~300) — Hamlet at a 200-foot waterfall dropping into a black pool. The pool is sacred. Offerings thrown in return weeks later, transformed — coins green with patina, flowers as seed-pods, carved animals polished smooth. Probably mineral chemistry. The locals prefer the other explanation.
Cruce de Jaguares (pop. ~700) — A settlement at the junction of two jungle tracks, named for the jaguar population that makes the surrounding forest dangerous after dark. The village maintains a night-watch of torchbearers who patrol the perimeter. Jaguars avoid flame. The torchbearers are the village's most honored citizens. The current watch-captain, Doña Selva (age 45), has personally encountered over sixty jaguars and killed two that entered the village. She wears their teeth as a necklace and is the only person in the Selvaverde whom the jaguars, by local account, recognize and avoid.

IV. EXPANDED NATURAL FEATURES
The Sunstone Badlands — Entire landscape of eroded sunstone-veined formations: pillars, canyon walls glowing amber, dry riverbeds floored with gemstone gravel. No water. Extreme temperature swings. Military ruins from four centuries of fortification. Deserters from both houses live here — los quemados (the burned ones) — hard men mining secret deposits and raiding caravans.
The Garganta del Diablo — Canyon where the Sangra narrows to twenty feet and drops through rapids so violent the noise carries five miles. Unnavigable. Montefior barges portage around it. The muleteers — the Garganteños — charge extravagant fees. They've been doing so for three centuries. They're the richest commoners in the Vallesangre.
The Bosque de los Ahorcados — Cork oak forest where both sides hung captured spies during the Great War. Trees still bear rope-marks. Now a Cigarral cork reserve. Unauthorized harvesting punished by hanging. The symbolism is intentional.
The Mar de Piedra — Fifty square miles of eroded limestone formations: pillars, arches, balanced rocks resembling a frozen ocean. Uninhabited. One of the most echo-dense locations in Sangrea — ancient, unprocessed limestone retaining residual presence. Meigas avoid it. Venic Path practitioners seek it out.
The Río Sangra — Central waterway. Navigable by barge for most of its length. Montefior war-barges patrol in Terrarossa crimson. Named "blood" — either for the red silt during rainy season or the battles along its banks.
The Río Fuente — Tributary, red-tinted by iron deposits. Shallow, seasonal. The bridge at Fuentarossa is where Sangreverde hung 800 men.
The Selvaverde Canopy — The jungle. Dense tropical forest thickening toward the Xarian border. One of the most echo-dense environments on the mainland. Largely uncleared ancient growth. Produces the "green attention" — a feeling of being observed by something without eyes. Botano healers consider it normal. Mainlanders do not.
Sierra de los Toros — A mountain range in the Vallesangre's southern wall where the fighting bulls are bred. The slopes are open grassland — natural pasture that has never been cultivated — and the bulls that graze here are semi-wild, rounded up annually in a dangerous cattle-drive called the recogida that involves fifty horsemen, two weeks of mountain work, and an average of three injuries per season.
The Isla de Sal — A small island off the Costadoro coast, roughly three miles from the mainland. A salt-production station and, since 1285 AF, a penal colony — the Doravanto crown sends its most dangerous prisoners here. The island has no fresh water (supplied by barge from the mainland), no shade, and no escape route. The current population: approximately eighty prisoners and twelve guards. The conditions are deliberately horrific. The Ashanite hospice has petitioned for reform seven times. The petitions have been noted, filed, and ignored.

V. EXPANDED LEGENDS
The Comte Maldito — Count Arnal Terrarossa (c. 970 AF) made a pact with something in the Selvaverde to win a Sunstone War. He won. But every night for the rest of his life, he rode a phantom horse through the Vallesangre, burning with invisible flame, screaming for forgiveness that never came. His descendants hear hoofbeats on nights when the wind comes from the south. Terrarossa stable-boys confirm the horses panic on those nights.
La Moura Encantada — A beautiful woman appears at springs and wells, combing her hair with a golden comb, offering travelers a drink from a golden cup. If they drink, they forget everything — name, family, purpose — and wander until they die. If they refuse, the spring runs dry. A water-scarcity parable. Also possibly a folk-memory of echo-phenomena at water sources — the springs where the Moura appears are invariably the oldest, deepest, most echo-dense water sources in the region.
El Sebastián — The Hidden King. King Estevan III, killed at the Battle of Piedranegra in 1056 AF, body never recovered, is sleeping in a cave beneath the Sunstone Badlands, waiting to return and unite Sangrea. Every generation produces a pretender. The most recent (1298 AF) — a charcoal-burner from Campomuerto — attracted hundreds before being arrested. He sits in a cell beneath the Alcázar. Jasmina hasn't decided what to do with him.
La Compañía Silenciosa — Ghost soldiers marching across Campomuerto on moonless nights. Visible as torch-light moving against the wind. No sound. If you follow the torches, you join the march. You don't return. If you turn away, you carry the silence — a heaviness in the chest, a taste of ash lasting days.
The Cantaor's Curse — Every generation's greatest singer dies young. Maela de la Fuente vanished. Ruy del Camino (1189 AF) found dead in a vineyard, throat cut, guitar unstrung. Catalina Sombras (1095 AF) poisoned by one great house (which one is debated — both deny it). The pattern is consistent enough for folk tradition to declare it cosmic principle: the gods give the greatest voice to those they intend to silence.
La Bestia del Badlands — A creature reportedly seen in the Sunstone Badlands — a four-legged thing the size of a bull, plated in what witnesses describe as "living stone," with eyes that glow amber in the dark. Sightings are rare (one every decade) and never confirmed. The Ember Watch investigated in 1256 AF and found tracks — deep, four-toed impressions in sunstone gravel — but no creature. The tracks ended at a cave entrance. The Watch did not enter the cave. Their report: "Insufficient resources for subterranean pursuit. Recommend future investigation." No future investigation occurred. If the creature exists, it is the last surviving echo-node in Sangrea — a beast sustained by the Badlands' residual echo-density, too weak to leave, too stubborn to die.
El Puente de las Almas — The Bridge of Souls. Every major bridge in Sangrea has, according to folk tradition, a soul sealed inside its foundation — not a sacrificed person (the practice, if it ever existed, predates recorded history) but a volunteer who chose to die beneath the bridge so that their spirit would hold the stones together. The Bonekeepers deny this practice. The bridge-builders' guild denies it more loudly. But every Sangrean bridge-builder, before pouring the foundation, leaves a small hollow in the base-stone — "for the soul." No one puts anything in the hollow. No one fills it. Every bridge in Sangrea has a small, empty chamber at its heart. What this means is a question the builders do not ask aloud.
The Feria de los Muertos — A festival in the Selvaverde villages during the winter solstice, unrecognized by orthodox Loveism. Families build altars — ofrendas — in their homes, decorated with flowers, food, candles, and the personal possessions of deceased relatives. The dead are invited to return for one night to eat, drink, and be among the living. The altars are prepared with the deceased's favorite foods. Candles are lit at dusk. Doors are left open. No one sleeps. At dawn, the altars are dismantled and the food is eaten by the living. The Ayanite clergy condemns the festival as "necromantic superstition." The Bonekeepers quietly attend. The Ashanite hospice provides the candles.
In the deepest Selvaverde, the Yerbateros of Sombra Verde practice a variant: they build the ofrendas in the canopy and leave them overnight. By morning, the food is gone — eaten, the Yerbateros say, by the dead. More likely eaten by monkeys and jungle birds. But the flowers on the altar are always arranged differently by morning — not scattered, not disturbed, but rearranged, as if someone looked at them and decided they would be prettier in a different pattern. The Yerbateros do not explain this. They smile and change the subject. They are the most echo-sensitive human community on the mainland and they have no idea what that means.

VALLAN — The Quiet Passage (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — Valleys, Roads, and Stubborn Independence

I. THE REGION AT A GLANCE
Population: ~45,000 Capital: Brynvaal (pop. ~12,000) — the only city, built at the junction of the three major valleys where they open onto the eastern coast Government: Valley-King (House Valenne). Ceremonial authority with limited executive power; real governance rests with the canton councils Economy: Transit tolls, alpine dairy, terrace agriculture, road maintenance, bridge construction, and the port trade connecting the mainland to the Isle of Knowledge and the Teeth Religion: Orthodox Loveism, strongly Ashanite in character. The Waystone Animism folk tradition persists alongside official observance Cantons: Seven recognized cantons, each governing a valley or mountain district

II. THE LAND
Vallan is a country of vertical geography. The Hortakin Valleys — seven major valleys radiating from the central massif like the fingers of a spread hand — cut deep gorges through limestone and granite, their floors narrow and fertile, their walls rising steeply to alpine meadows, bare ridgelines, and the snowfields that feed the streams. The valleys are connected to each other only by high passes that are open eight months of the year and buried under snow for the remaining four. In winter, each valley becomes an island.
The roads are everything. Without the road network — stone-paved, waystone-marked, bridge-connected — Vallan would not be a polity. It would be seven isolated farming communities that happen to share a language. The roads make Vallan a nation. They also make it a chokepoint: the Hortakin passes are the most efficient route between the southern Heartlands and the eastern coast, and every merchant caravan heading for the Teeth or the Isle of Knowledge passes through Vallan's toll stations. The road-tax is the Valley-King's primary revenue. The roads are, accordingly, perfect.
The environment shifts dramatically with altitude. The valley floors are temperate and irrigated: terraced fields of barley, potato, quinoa, and maize stepping up the hillsides in patterns maintained for centuries, fed by snowmelt channels that the Vallanaise engineer with an obsessive precision. Above the terraces, alpine meadows — the alp — provide summer grazing for the dairy herds that are Vallan's agricultural backbone. Above the meadows, bare rock and snowfield. The air at the valley floor smells of hay, manure, and wildflowers; at the passes, it smells of nothing at all except cold.
The eastern edge of Vallan drops to the coast through a dramatic descent — the Bryn Stair, a series of switchback roads carved into a cliff face that drops 3,000 feet in six miles. At the bottom: Brynvaal, the capital, built on a narrow coastal shelf between the mountains and the sea. Brynvaal's port is the gateway to the Isle of Knowledge (visible on clear days as a dark shape on the eastern horizon, roughly fifteen miles offshore) and the northern Teeth islands.

III. THE HOUSES OF VALLAN
HOUSE VALENNE — The Valley-Kings
Founded: c. 908 AF (elected by the canton elders after the empire's fall) Seat: The Valenne Hall, Brynvaal Sigil: A golden key on a green field Words: "The Road Is Open"
House Valenne has held the Valley-Kingship for four hundred years — not through conquest or political maneuvering but through the simple, unglamorous work of maintaining the roads, arbitrating disputes between cantons, and representing Vallan to the outside world. The Valennes are administrators, not rulers. Their power is real but deliberately limited: the Valley-King arbitrates, maintains infrastructure, collects the road-tax, and speaks for Vallan in foreign affairs. Internal governance — land disputes, criminal law, inheritance, marriage — belongs to the canton councils.
Current Members:
Valley-King Aldric Valenne V (age 61) — The current monarch. A quiet, deliberate man with the leathery tan of someone who spends more time outdoors than in a throne room. Aldric's daily routine involves a morning inspection of whatever road section or bridge project is nearest to his current location — he travels the valleys constantly, spending no more than a month in Brynvaal before setting out again on circuit. He considers sitting still a form of incompetence. His court is wherever he is: a roadside inn, a canton elder's kitchen, a bridge-builder's camp. Foreign ambassadors who expect a palace audience are instead invited to walk with him along a mountain road while he checks waystone alignments. Those who keep up earn his respect. Those who can't are given a mule.
Aldric's politics are defined by two commitments: independence from the Heartlands (the Annexation Crisis of 1120 AF is Vallan's founding trauma, and every Valenne since has treated Heartlands expansion as an existential threat) and alliance with the Isle of Knowledge (the Magos are Vallan's closest institutional partner, and the port of Brynvaal exists primarily to serve the Isle's supply needs). He is aware that the Argent Schism is making the Heartlands unstable and that instability in a neighbor twenty times your size is dangerous. He has been quietly reinforcing the western passes.
Queen Marisol Valenne (age 57) — Aldric's wife. Born a Sangrean — the daughter of a minor Carvallo vassal house, she came to Vallan as a trade envoy at twenty-two and married Aldric after a courtship conducted entirely on mountain roads (he proposed at the summit of the Dawnbreak Pass; she accepted on the condition that they stop walking and eat lunch first). Marisol brought Sangrean warmth to a culture that doesn't naturally produce it — she introduced color to the Valenne household (the Hall's interior, previously monochrome stone and timber, now features Sangrean textiles, Botano-province flowers in every window, and a kitchen that produces food with actual seasoning). She is beloved by the Vallanaise in a way that their own leaders rarely are: she is exotic enough to be interesting and practical enough to be useful. She speaks four languages, manages the port's trade relationships, and has a network of Sangrean contacts that provides intelligence the Valley-King couldn't otherwise access.
Aric Valenne (age 32) — Heir. Aldric's only surviving child (two older siblings died — one to a mountain fever at age six, one to a bridge collapse at age nineteen). Aric carries the weight of being the last Valenne of his generation with a quiet intensity that manifests as perfectionism: every decision analyzed from multiple angles, every road inspection conducted twice, every diplomatic letter drafted three times. He is intelligent, responsible, and paralyzed by the fear of making a mistake that could cost the dynasty its legitimacy. His wife, Lena (age 29) — a Brynvaal port-master's daughter — is the more decisive of the pair. She has been gently steering Aric's decisions for five years. He knows this. He is grateful.
Old Esther Valenne (age 84) — Aldric's mother. The previous Valley-Queen (consort to Aldric's father, King Aldric IV). A tiny woman who walks with two canes and a contempt for weakness that has not diminished with age. She was the one who negotiated the current toll agreements with the Heartlands merchants — agreements so favorable to Vallan that Silverblood diplomats are still trying to renegotiate them forty years later. She lives in a cottage in the Brynvaal hills (she refuses the Hall, calling it "drafty and political") and receives visitors who bring her the mountain cheese and obstler she considers the only acceptable gifts. She provides advice when asked. She provides it when not asked, too.

THE CANTON HOUSES
Vallan's seven cantons are each governed by a canton elder — usually the head of the valley's most prominent family, elected by landowners for life. The cantons are:
Brynvaal Canton — The coastal canton containing the capital. Governed by the Brynner family, who run the port and the shipyard that services the Isle of Knowledge ferry route.
Elder Torben Brynner (age 55) — Port-master and canton elder. A practical man whose life revolves around tide tables, cargo manifests, and the ferry schedule to the Isle. He considers the Valley-King a necessary overhead and the Magos the region's best customer. His ambition: expand the port to handle Teeth-bound trade that currently bypasses Vallan via the longer coastal route. His obstacle: funding.
Glyncoch Canton — The western valley, bordering the Heartlands. The gateway canton — the first point of contact for any traveler entering Vallan from the west. Known for its fortified bridge — the Glyncoch Span — a single stone arch over a gorge 400 feet deep that is Vallan's most famous engineering achievement and its primary defensive position.
Elder Petra Glyncoch (age 48) — A bridge-builder by training who inherited the canton when her father died mid-span (fell from scaffolding during a repair project; the family considers this an honorable death). Petra is the best structural engineer in Vallan — she can assess a bridge's load capacity by listening to it under strain. She has reinforced the Glyncoch Span's foundations twice and considers any bridge built by non-Vallanaise engineers to be inherently suspect.
Hortakin Canton — The central valley, the largest and most fertile. The agricultural heart of Vallan: terrace farms, dairy herds, the best käsknöpfle in the region.
Elder Renzo Hortakin (age 63) — Patriarch of the canton's founding family. A cheese-maker by trade and passion. Renzo can identify any Vallanaise cheese by texture alone and has been known to reject entire dairy shipments for failing his standards. His politics: keep the roads open, keep the taxes fair, keep the Heartlanders out, and for Loreth's sake maintain the irrigation channels. His second wife, Inés (age 40) — another Sangrean import, a trend that is becoming common in Vallan's upper class — runs the canton's Harvest Bell granary and has introduced quinoa cultivation to the valley's terraces with remarkable success.
Daurvaal Canton — The southern valley, bordering Rosland. Cold, forested, and home to the region's only significant mining operations (tin and copper in the mountain's lower slopes). The Daurvaal folk are the most Roslandic of the Vallanaise — heavier, more reserved, with a taste for smoked meat and dark beer that their northern cousins find crude.
Elder Kaspar Daurvaal (age 70) — The oldest sitting canton elder. A former miner who lost his left eye to a flying rock chip at age thirty and has governed Daurvaal with depth-perception-defying competence for four decades. He is the only Vallanaise leader who openly respects the Roslandic republic, having traded with Roslandic mining guilds his entire life. His views on Heartlands feudalism: "Kings are what you get when people stop paying attention."
Sternmark Canton — The highest-altitude canton, containing the passes to both the Heartlands and the Frozen South. Sparse population, extreme weather, and the Sternmark Shepherds — alpine herders who spend six months of the year above the treeline with their flocks, moving between mountain pastures in a seasonal migration pattern unchanged for centuries. The Shepherds have their own folk traditions distinct from valley Vallanaise: llama-wool weaving (the Sternmark herds include a breed of highland camelid, the Valenne Ridge-Llama, bred for wool and pack-carrying), a fermented mare's-milk drink called kumja that tastes like sour regret, and a tradition of stone-stacking that produces the eerie cairn-fields visible on every ridgeline.
Elder Ylva Sternmark (age 52) — A shepherdess who governs her canton from wherever her flock happens to be. Meetings with Ylva involve climbing to wherever she's camped. She considers this a feature. She once made a Silverblood trade envoy climb 2,000 feet to discuss a toll agreement, then rejected his terms before he'd caught his breath. The Silverblood never returned. Ylva considers this a successful negotiation.
Sunvaal Canton — The sunniest valley, south-facing, with the warmest microclimate in Vallan. Known for its fruit orchards — apple, pear, cherry, and the small, intensely flavored golden apricot that Vallan exports to the Heartlands at prices that make Sangrean vintners jealous. Sunvaal is also the canton most influenced by Peruvian-style terrace agriculture: the hillsides are sculpted into elaborate stepped systems — andenes — that maximize sunlight exposure and water distribution with an elegance that mainland agricultural experts consider borderline miraculous.
Elder Lucio Sunvaal (age 44) — The youngest canton elder. A fruit-grower who inherited the position when his mother died last year and who is still adjusting to the role. He is good-natured, slightly overwhelmed, and married to a woman — Carmela (age 42) — who is already doing most of the governing while Lucio tends his orchards. Their partnership works. Nobody mentions that it's Carmela who answers the door when the Valley-King's messengers arrive.
Kaltbach Canton — The northernmost valley, a narrow gorge cut by the Kaltbach River — the coldest, fastest waterway in Vallan. The canton's economy is built on trout fishing, timber, and the production of a unique hard cheese aged in the limestone caves that riddle the gorge walls. Kaltbach Cave-Cheese is Vallan's most famous export product: sharp, crystalline, with a mineral edge that cheese-lovers across the continent describe as "tasting like the mountain itself." The caves maintain a constant temperature year-round, producing aging conditions that cannot be replicated elsewhere. Attempts to produce Kaltbach-style cheese in the Heartlands have universally failed. The Kaltbach folk enjoy this.
Elder Marte Kaltbach (age 58) — Cheese-cave manager and canton elder. A woman of few words whose authority derives entirely from her cheese — she controls access to the aging caves, and anyone who wants to produce Kaltbach Cave-Cheese needs her approval. This gives her a quiet veto over the canton's economy that she exercises with a restraint that makes it more powerful, not less.

IV. BRYNVAAL — The Port City
Vallan's only city sits on a narrow shelf between the Bryn Stair's final descent and the eastern sea. It is not grand — Brynvaal has the population of a Heartlands market town and the ambitions of a fishing village — but it is beautifully made. The streets are stone-paved, stepped where necessary, lined with timber-and-stone buildings whose ground floors are workshops and shops and whose upper floors are homes. The port occupies a natural cove sheltered by a curved breakwater of stacked basalt. The harbor is small — room for perhaps thirty vessels — but deep, well-maintained, and served by a fleet of ferries that make the crossing to the Isle of Knowledge twice daily (weather permitting).
The Valenne Hall — The Valley-King's seat. Not a palace but a large farmhouse: heavy timber, stone foundations, a slate roof, and a great room with a fireplace large enough to warm a hundred people. The Hall sits on a hill above the port, overlooking the harbor and, on clear days, the dark shape of the Isle on the horizon. The building has been expanded over four centuries of Valenne rule but retains the proportions and character of a farmstead — deliberate humility, reinforced by every generation. The Hall's most notable feature: the Road Map Room, a chamber whose walls are covered with painted maps of every road, bridge, and waystone in Vallan, updated annually by the royal cartographer. The maps are works of art. They are also the most accurate infrastructure survey in existence.
The Bryn Stair Terminal — Where the switchback road from the interior valleys reaches the coast. A fortified gatehouse controlling access to the city — tolls are collected here, customs inspections conducted, and Vallan's modest border security enforced. The Terminal includes a caravanserai (a covered inn-yard where pack animals and wagon trains rest after the steep descent), a Harvest Bell depot (grain stores for the coast), and a Waystone chapel where travelers give thanks for surviving the descent. The Bryn Stair is not dangerous if you follow the road. The drop on the exposed outer edge is, however, vertigo-inducing, and mules that refuse to walk the final switchbacks are a recurring logistical problem.
The Ferry Dock — The port's most important structure: a stone pier with a covered waiting hall, a signal tower for communicating with the Isle, and the berthing slips for the three ferries that maintain the crossing. The ferries are Vallanaise-built — wide-beamed, shallow-drafted, designed for stability in the coastal chop rather than speed. Each ferry is named: The Scholar, The Keeper, and The Pilgrim. The Scholar is the oldest (built 1267 AF, rebuilt twice) and is said to be lucky. The Pilgrim is the newest and is said to be cursed (it ran aground on its maiden voyage; the hull was repaired but the reputation stuck). Ferry captains are Brynner family employees. The current senior captain, Harno Brynner (age 50) — Torben's brother — has made the crossing over four thousand times and can navigate the route in fog, at night, and in his sleep (which he has allegedly done once, during a crossing so calm that the crew let him nap at the wheel).
The Stonemarket — Brynvaal's commercial center. An open-air market built on a stone platform above the harbor, where mountain products (cheese, dried meat, wool, leather, obstler, preserved fruit) are traded for coastal and imported goods (salt, fish, wine, textiles, books from the Isle, volcanic stone from the Teeth). Market day is every third day. The Stonemarket's most famous vendor: Doña Pilar (age 65), a Sangrean expatriate who runs a food stall selling empanadas — dough pockets stuffed with spiced meat, cheese, or vegetables — that she adapted from Sangrean recipes to Vallanaise palates. Her cheese empanadas, made with Kaltbach Cave-Cheese and Sternmark llama-meat, are the most popular street food in Brynvaal and a minor diplomatic scandal (the Sangrean consul considers them a cultural crime; the Vallanaise consider them a national treasure).

V. MINOR SETTLEMENTS
Glyncoch (pop. ~1,500) — The western gateway town, built at the Heartlands-side entrance to the Glyncoch Pass. Fortified: stone walls, a gatehouse, and the famous Glyncoch Span bridge. The town exists to control access and collect tolls. Known for its bridge-builders' guild — the Spanneri — whose members wear a distinctive mason's apron marked with a keystone symbol and who consider bridge-building a sacred calling. A Brothers of the Open Road chapter maintains a hostel here for westbound travelers.
Hochdorf (pop. ~800) — A high-altitude village in Sternmark Canton, 7,000 feet above sea level. Accessible only by mule-track for six months of the year. Known for its weaving: Hochdorf textiles — llama-wool blankets and ponchos dyed with alpine wildflower pigments in deep reds, oranges, and purples — are prized across the continent. The weavers are exclusively women. The tradition passes mother to daughter. Men who attempt to learn are not prohibited but are mercilessly teased until they stop.
Steinbrunn (pop. ~600) — A village built around a natural hot spring in Daurvaal Canton. The spring — the Brunn — fills a stone-lined pool maintained by an Ashanite bathing-order called the Sisters of the Warm Stone (four members, all elderly, all convinced that hot mineral water cures everything from gout to heartbreak). The village's economy is split between mining support services and a small but growing pilgrim trade — word of the Brunn's healing properties has spread, and mainlanders with joint pain and bad backs make the trek to soak. Elder Kaspar tolerates this with the expression of a man watching tourists discover his backyard.
Soltera (pop. ~400) — A sun-terrace village in Sunvaal Canton. Built into a south-facing hillside with terraced andenes stepping down to the valley floor. Known for its golden apricots, its honey (the Soltera bees feed on alpine wildflowers and produce a pale, aromatic honey with a floral intensity that Sangrean chefs use in desserts), and its annual Fiesta del Sol — a harvest celebration combining Lovist liturgy with pre-imperial sun-worship elements that the Ashanite clergy tolerates because the food is excellent and the singing is sincere.
Kaltbach Village (pop. ~700) — The settlement at the mouth of the Kaltbach Gorge. The village exists because the cheese caves exist. Everything revolves around the cheese: production, aging, grading, packing, transport. The caves themselves extend roughly half a mile into the limestone, with over two hundred individual aging chambers maintained at precise temperatures by the cave system's natural ventilation. Access is restricted — only Kaltbach-family-approved cheese-makers may enter the aging chambers. Outsiders are permitted as far as the tasting room — a chamber near the cave entrance where samples are offered to potential buyers. The tasting room is also, by long tradition, where Kaltbach Canton's disputes are settled: the elder sits behind a table, the disputants stand before her, and the conversation happens over cheese and obstler. Resolution rates are high. The cheese may have something to do with it.
Puente Alto (pop. ~300) — A tiny settlement perched on a natural rock bridge over the Kaltbach River gorge. The bridge is natural but has been improved: stone railings, carved steps, a shrine to Alon-as-Builder at the midpoint. Puente Alto exists because the bridge exists — it is the only crossing of the Kaltbach Gorge for twenty miles in either direction. The settlement consists of an inn, a toll station, a blacksmith, and a Waystone chapel. The innkeeper, Gaspar (age 55), has been operating the crossing for thirty years and has developed a system for assessing bridge safety by pressing his ear to the stone and listening for stress fractures. He has closed the bridge twice on the basis of sounds only he could hear. Both times, inspection confirmed structural issues. Gaspar attributes this to experience. He may be mildly echo-sensitive.
Nebelheim (pop. ~250) — The most remote settlement in Vallan. A village in a high, fog-locked valley in Sternmark Canton, accessible by a single mule-track that is blocked by snow for five months of the year. Nebelheim's isolation has produced a population that is deeply inbred (everyone is related to everyone else within three generations), fiercely independent (they pay their road-tax grudgingly and consider the Valley-King a distant abstraction), and possessed of folk traditions that predate Loveism and have never been fully documented. The Nebelheim folk practice Waystone Animism with an openness that would alarm an Ayanite theologian: they make offerings at the waystones (milk, bread, flowers, small carved figures), address the stones by name, and claim that the stones "speak" — not in words, but in feelings. Whether this is superstition, cultural habit, or a remnant of genuine echo-sensitivity preserved by isolation is unknown. No Magos researcher has been willing to spend a winter in Nebelheim to find out.

VI. NATURAL FEATURES
The Hortakin Massif — The central mountain complex from which the seven valleys radiate. Peak elevation: ~12,000 feet. The massif is granite and limestone, glacially carved, with permanent snowfields above 10,000 feet and alpine meadows between 7,000 and 10,000. The passes between valleys range from 6,000 to 9,000 feet — manageable in summer, lethal in winter.
The Bryn Stair — The switchback road descending from the interior to the coast. Six miles of hairpin turns carved into a cliff face. The engineering is imperial-era at the base (massive basalt blocks, military-grade construction) and Vallanaise-era above (lighter limestone, more elegant curves, better drainage). The transition is visible as a change in stone color two-thirds of the way down.
The Kaltbach River — The fastest river in Vallan. Fed by glacial melt, running through a limestone gorge so narrow that the water fills the channel wall-to-wall during spring runoff, producing a roar audible a mile away. The Kaltbach is unnavigable, unfishable during high water, and beautiful in the terrifying way that powerful things are beautiful. In late summer, when the flow drops, the gorge reveals cave openings, fossil-bearing rock layers, and (according to local legend) the entrance to a tunnel system that connects to the Isle of Knowledge's underground vaults. No one has confirmed this. The Magos decline to comment.
The Dawnbreak Pass — The highest pass in Vallan (9,200 feet), connecting the Hortakin and Sternmark valleys. Named because the sunrise, viewed from the summit, arrives visibly earlier than in the valleys below — the first rays hitting the pass while the valleys are still in shadow. Vallanaise couples traditionally climb the Dawnbreak Pass together on the anniversary of their betrothal to watch the sunrise. The tradition is so old that the path to the summit has been worn smooth by generations of feet. An Ashanite waystone shrine at the top, carved with Vena's moon-symbol and Loreth's sun-symbol side by side, marks the spot where Aldric V proposed to Marisol.
Lake Esmeralda — A glacial lake in Sunvaal Canton, fed by snowmelt, impossibly green (glacial flour suspended in the water produces the color). The lake is sacred in local folk tradition — offerings are thrown in on midsummer, and swimming in it is considered both a blessing and a dare (the water is cold enough to stop your heart if you stay in too long). The lake's shores are terraced with andenes that produce the valley's finest potatoes — a purple-skinned, yellow-fleshed variety that Vallanaise cooks roast with herbs and serve with melted Kaltbach cheese.

VII. LEGENDS OF VALLAN
The Road That Walks — The oldest Vallanaise legend. A traveler, lost in fog, followed a road that led through a valley he didn't recognize. The road was perfectly maintained — waystone markers every mile, bridges in good repair, inns at regular intervals — but the inns were empty and the waystones had no names on them. He walked for three days. On the fourth day, the fog lifted and he was standing at his own front door. He had been walking the road in a circle. The road, the legend says, was walking too — testing whether he was worthy of reaching his destination. The lesson: the road serves those who trust it. The practical lesson: don't walk in fog without a map.
The Last Bridge-Builder — A folk tale. A bridge-builder was tasked with spanning a gorge so deep that the bottom couldn't be seen. He built the span over seven years, working alone (his apprentices had all quit, claiming the gorge "breathed"). When the bridge was complete, he walked to its center and looked down. He saw his own reflection looking up. The reflection waved. He waved back. He never came home. The bridge stood for three hundred years before an earthquake took it. When the rubble was cleared, they found two skeletons at the bottom of the gorge — one on top of the other, arms crossed as if in embrace.
The Cheese That Wouldn't Age — A Kaltbach legend. A cheese-maker, dissatisfied with the normal aging process, made a wheel of cheese and left it in the deepest cave chamber — a part of the system that the Kaltbach family doesn't normally use, because "the air tastes wrong." He returned a year later. The cheese was unchanged — not aged, not molded, not decayed. Perfectly fresh. He left it another year. Same result. Ten years. Twenty. The cheese sat in the dark, untouched by time, for sixty years. When the cheese-maker died, his granddaughter went to retrieve it. The cheese was still fresh. She ate a piece. It tasted, she said, "like standing in a field that hasn't been planted yet." She sealed the chamber. The family has not opened it since.
The Stone That Sings — In Nebelheim, a particular waystone — the third stone on the northern track — is said to produce a low, humming tone on nights when both moons are full (Concordance nights). The hum is below normal hearing range — you feel it in your chest rather than hear it with your ears. The Nebelheim folk leave offerings at this stone more frequently than any other. They call it the Grandfather. Visiting Ayanite missionaries have examined the stone and declared it "a natural acoustic phenomenon, of no theological significance." The Nebelheim folk smiled politely and continued their offerings.

THE ISLE OF KNOWLEDGE (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — The Memory of the World

I. THE ISLE AT A GLANCE
Population: ~800 (Magos scholars, staff, servants, and a small permanent support community) Location: Fifteen miles off the Vallanaise coast, accessible by ferry from Brynvaal Government: The Order of Magos, led by the Grand Magos (elected for a 20-year term) Economy: Maintained by charitable donations (primarily from Vallan, the Teeth, and wealthy mainland patrons), entry fees charged to visitors, revenue from Magos consulting services, and the hidden vaults' undisclosed resources Religion: Officially neutral. The Magos acknowledge Loveism but do not practice it institutionally. All faiths are welcome on the Isle under the Charter of the Pale Reed.

II. THE ORDER OF MAGOS — Structure and Law
The Hierarchy
The Order is organized into five Circles, each representing a stage of advancement and a corresponding set of privileges and obligations:
First Circle — The Novices (Pale Reeds) — New entrants to the Order. Any person may join regardless of origin, gender, faith, or social status. Upon entry, the novice surrenders their family name (they retain a personal name but are addressed as "Reed [Name]" — e.g., Reed Boh, for the character Boh Vaakor). Novices perform menial labor: shelving, copying, cleaning, maintenance. They attend lectures but cannot access the restricted collections. Duration: minimum five years. Many wash out. The work is tedious, the conditions are austere, and the Isle's isolation drives some novices to depression or madness. Those who endure are promoted to the Second Circle.
Second Circle — The Scribes (Grey Quills) — Working scholars. Scribes are assigned to a School (see below) based on aptitude and interest. They assist senior scholars, conduct supervised research, teach incoming novices, and begin contributing original work to the archive. Scribes may access most of the library's collections but not the restricted vaults. Duration: minimum ten years. Scribes are not permitted to leave the Isle — the restriction exists to ensure that partially trained scholars do not carry incomplete knowledge into the world where it could be misapplied. The rule is absolute and enforcement is exile from the Order.
Third Circle — The Keepers (Black Stoles) — Full scholars. Keepers have completed at least fifteen years of service and have produced a masterwork — an original contribution to knowledge judged by a panel of senior Keepers as worthy of permanent addition to the archive. Keepers may access all collections except the deepest restricted vaults. They may take on personal apprentices, form consulting contracts with outside parties, and — critically — they may leave the Isle with written permission from the Grand Magos. Permission is granted sparingly. A Keeper who leaves must return within one year or be declared apostate. At any given time, perhaps twenty Keepers are off-Island on authorized missions.
Fourth Circle — The Elders (Silver Chains) — Senior scholars who have served for thirty years or more and who have produced at least three masterworks. Elders form the Order's governing council — the Conclave — which advises the Grand Magos, adjudicates internal disputes, and votes on policy. Elders may access the restricted vaults. There are currently fourteen Elders. They range in age from fifty-five to ninety-two. They agree on almost nothing, which is considered a feature rather than a bug — the Order values dissent as a check on institutional orthodoxy.
Fifth Circle — The Grand Magos (Gold Reed) — The Order's leader. Elected by the Conclave from among the Elders for a twenty-year term. The term length is deliberate: long enough to provide institutional stability, short enough to prevent personal fiefdoms. The Grand Magos has executive authority over the Isle's operations, final say in disputes that the Conclave cannot resolve, and sole access to certain vault sections whose contents are shared with no one.
The Grand Magos may serve a maximum of one term. Re-election is prohibited. The current Grand Magos is nearing the end of her term.
The Schools
The Order's scholarship is organized into seven Schools — intellectual traditions that roughly correspond to academic disciplines but that, in the Magos tradition, overlap, compete, and frequently argue:
The School of the Record — Archivists, cataloguers, copyists. The Order's backbone. Record scholars maintain the Great Catalogue, preserve deteriorating documents, and conduct the painstaking work of cross-referencing, dating, and authenticating texts. They are the least glamorous and most essential scholars on the Isle.
The School of the Natural World — Naturalists, herbalists, geographers, cartographers. They study the physical world: flora, fauna, geology, weather, and the increasingly urgent question of why certain species are disappearing and certain landscapes are changing. The Natural World school maintains the Isle's specimen collections (fossils, pressed plants, preserved animal samples) and produces the continental maps that every government relies on.
The School of the Human Record — Historians. They compile, interpret, and argue about the past. The Human Record school is the most internally contentious — historians disagree about everything, and Magos historians disagree more loudly than most, because they have access to primary sources that allow them to prove each other wrong with devastating specificity.
The School of Numbers — Mathematicians, astronomers, engineers. They study the abstract: geometry, calculation, celestial mechanics, and the practical applications thereof (bridge design, navigation, calendar correction). The Numbers school maintains the Isle's observatory — a tower on the island's highest point, equipped with the best lenses on the continent.
The School of Languages — Linguists, translators, cipher-breakers. They study the continent's languages: living (Munnish, Xarian dialects, Frozen South clan-tongues), dead (pre-imperial Aethelian, Old Nionian, the untranslated script on certain Age of History artifacts), and constructed (the cipher systems used by various governments for secret communication). The Languages school is the Order's intelligence arm — a Magos who can read every language on the continent is a Magos who can read every government's mail.
The School of Substances — Alchemists, metallurgists, pharmacologists. They study materials: what things are made of, how they interact, and what happens when you combine them. The Substances school is the most practically profitable — their knowledge of medicinal compounds, metallurgical techniques, and preservation methods is in constant demand from outside clients. They are also the school most likely to blow something up. The Isle's eastern laboratory (the Smoke Hall) has been rebuilt four times.
The School of the Unseen — The most controversial school. The Unseen scholars study phenomena that don't fit the other categories: reports of prophecy, unexplained healings, the behavioral anomalies of certain animals and plants, the properties of materials that defy conventional alchemical explanation, and — quietly, cautiously, under the protection of the Charter's neutrality clause — the Logosian philosophical tradition that was expelled from the Ayanite order in 1038 AF. The Unseen school is small (perhaps thirty scholars), intellectually rigorous (they apply the same evidentiary standards as any other school), and regarded by the rest of the Order with a mixture of respect and suspicion. The Logosian texts in their collection are the only surviving copies. Their research into "echoes" — they use the Lovist term while rejecting the Lovist theology — is the closest thing on the continent to a scientific investigation of the magic system.
Election and Governance
The Grand Magos election is the Order's most important institutional event. The process:
Nomination — Any Elder may nominate themselves or be nominated by two other Elders. Typically three to five candidates stand.
Examination — Each candidate presents their vision for the Order's next twenty years in a public lecture attended by the entire community. Questions are permitted from all Circles. The lectures last hours. The questions can be brutal.
Deliberation — The Conclave debates in closed session for as long as necessary (the longest deliberation on record: seventeen days, in 1189 AF). The debate is secret. Its contents are never disclosed.
Consensus — The Conclave votes. A two-thirds majority is required. If no candidate achieves this, the field is narrowed and the process repeats. The result is announced by the ringing of the Isle's great bell — the Pale Bell — which is heard in Brynvaal across the water.

III. THE CURRENT MAGOS — Named Characters
Grand Magos Thessaly Vane (age 72) — The current leader. In the eighteenth year of her twenty-year term. A former School of the Human Record historian specializing in the Age of History — the deep past, the era of ziggurats and stone circles and technologies no one understands. Thessaly is small, sharp-eyed, and possessed of a memory that her colleagues describe as "archival" — she can recall specific passages from texts she read forty years ago, with page numbers. She has governed the Isle with a combination of intellectual authority and administrative cunning, maintaining the Order's neutrality during the Nionian civil war (Jous's agents attempted to recruit Magos scholars for the Pure Way; Thessaly politely declined and then quietly expelled the two Scribes who had been passing information to Domus Lux).
Her private concern: the vaults. Thessaly is one of three people alive who know the full extent of what the deepest vaults contain (the other two are Elder Magos of the Unseen school and the vault-keeper). The artifacts from the Age of History — objects whose function she can describe but whose mechanism she cannot explain — are showing signs of change. Instruments that have been inert for centuries are producing faint vibrations. Materials that have been stable are shifting color. Something is different. She suspects it is connected to reports from the Natural World school of ecological anomalies on the mainland — species appearing in unexpected locations, growth patterns accelerating in certain regions. She does not have the theoretical framework to connect these observations to the Eldra-Veil breach. She is looking for one.
Elder Corvath (age 81) — School of the Unseen. The Order's most controversial scholar. Corvath has spent fifty years studying the Logosian texts, the echo-theory, and the growing body of evidence that "unexplained" phenomena are actually manifestations of a measurable natural force. He has published seven masterworks, each more provocative than the last, and his current project — a systematic survey of "sensitive" individuals across the continent (folk healers, weather-predictors, beast-trackers with uncanny accuracy) — has produced data that he believes proves the existence of an ambient energy field that varies by geography and is declining over time. He is, without knowing it, the closest person on the mainland to understanding the echo-system. His colleagues consider him either a genius or a crank. Several consider him both.
Reed Boh Vaakor (age 19) — First Circle novice. Brilliant, reclusive, socially awkward in the way of someone whose interior life is far more vivid than their exterior one. Boh arrived at the Isle three years ago from the Heartlands — his family background is obscure, possibly minor gentry, possibly a lie. He was accepted on the basis of an entrance examination that the School of Substances proctor described as "the best I've seen in thirty years." He has been assigned to the Record school (standard for novices) but spends every free hour in the Smoke Hall, conducting unauthorized experiments with materials he shouldn't have access to. His interest: the boundary between life and death — what happens to consciousness at the moment of dying, whether it can be preserved, whether it can be recalled. He has read the Logosian texts (smuggled from the restricted shelf by an Unseen school sympathizer whose identity he protects) and the Bonekeepers' funeral liturgies (available in the general collection). He is combining the two in ways that neither tradition would approve of.
Boh's vault access is zero — he is a First Circle novice with no privileges. But the deep vaults are built into the Isle's echo-dense basalt bedrock, and Boh has been sleeping in a basement storage room (unauthorized, but the dormitory warden has stopped trying to enforce curfew on him) that is close enough to the vault level that he has begun experiencing vault-dreaming: vivid, detailed dreams featuring rooms he's never entered, objects he's never seen, and a recurring image of a door made of stone that has no handle. He does not know that the dreams are echo-phenomena. He thinks they are visions. He is keeping a journal. The journal is hidden inside a hollowed-out copy of a Harvest Bell agricultural manual that no one will ever voluntarily read.
Keeper Alenn (age 45) — School of Languages. The Isle's premier cipher-breaker and the Magos agent responsible for maintaining the secret vault on Emberstone in the Teeth. Alenn has made the crossing to Emberstone seventeen times in her career, each trip disguised as a trade visit or scholarly consultation. Since Morvayn's bridge coup in 1298 AF, her access has been disrupted — the bridge tolls make legitimate travel prohibitively expensive, and Morvayn's security apparatus makes covert travel risky. She has not visited the vault in three years. Her last report indicated that the vault's contents were stable. Grand Magos Thessaly is not confident that this remains true.
Elder Pashma (age 68) — School of the Natural World. Born on the Red Coast, dark-skinned, sharp-tongued, and the Order's foremost expert on continental ecology. Pashma has spent forty years documenting species distributions, habitat changes, and the slow but measurable decline in biodiversity that she calls "the Thinning" — a term she coined independently, without knowing that the Giants use a similar concept. Her maps of species range-contraction over the past three centuries are the most compelling visual evidence that something is wrong with the natural world, and they hang in her office like accusation. She does not know why the Thinning is happening. She suspects deforestation and over-hunting. She is partially right. She is mostly wrong. The real answer would terrify her.
Keeper Odo (age 55) — The Vault-Keeper. One of three people who know the full vault contents. Odo is a School of Substances scholar who was appointed Vault-Keeper twenty years ago by the previous Grand Magos and who has spent the intervening decades alone in the underground complex, cataloguing, maintaining, and monitoring artifacts that range from the obviously impressive (a metal alloy that has not corroded in four thousand years) to the deeply unsettling (a stone tablet that is warm to the touch regardless of ambient temperature and that produces, when held for more than a minute, a sensation of being observed). Odo is meticulous, lonely, and developing what his annual medical examination describes as "minor dissociative episodes consistent with prolonged isolation." What the medical report does not say: Odo has begun hearing sounds in the vault that are not produced by any catalogued object. The sounds are irregular, faint, and musical. They started approximately six months ago. Odo has not reported them. He is not sure they are real. He is not sure they aren't.

IV. THE ISLE — Landmarks and Features
The Pale Hall — The Order's administrative center and the Isle's largest building. A long, two-story stone structure built of the local grey-green basalt, with narrow windows, a steeply pitched slate roof, and an interior dominated by the Grand Reading Room — a chamber 150 feet long, lined floor-to-ceiling with bookshelves, lit by clerestory windows that admit light without allowing direct sun to touch the pages. The smell: old paper, lamp oil, stone dust, and the particular astringent tang of the preservation solutions the Record scholars use to protect deteriorating parchment. The sound: near-silence, broken by the rustle of pages, the scratch of quills, and the occasional muttered argument between scholars who have discovered that they disagree.
The Stacks — The library's deep storage: a multi-level underground complex carved into the island's basalt bedrock, accessible through a staircase at the rear of the Grand Reading Room. The Stacks descend seven levels. Each level is progressively more restricted: Level 1 (general collection, accessible to all Circles), Level 2 (specialized collections, Scribe and above), Level 3 (rare texts, Keeper and above), and so on down to Level 7, which is the restricted vault accessible only to the Grand Magos, the Vault-Keeper, and Elder Corvath (granted access by special dispensation for his Unseen research). The Stacks are cool, dry, and lit by oil lamps mounted in iron sconces that cast a warm, even light designed to minimize page damage. The air quality is maintained by a ventilation system of carved stone channels that the Natural World scholars believe was part of the island's original construction — Age of History engineering, still functioning.
The Smoke Hall — The School of Substances' laboratory complex on the Isle's eastern shore. A stone building with reinforced walls, blast shutters on the windows, and a ventilation tower that occasionally produces plumes of colored smoke visible from Brynvaal. The Smoke Hall has been rebuilt four times (1089 AF, 1167 AF, 1234 AF, and 1302 AF — the last after a Scribe named Vellen mixed something he shouldn't have with something else he shouldn't have and produced an explosion that shattered every glass vessel in the building). The current structure is built with extra-thick walls.
The Observatory — A tower on the island's highest point (approximately 300 feet above sea level), equipped with a rotating copper dome housing the Order's best lens — a ground-glass instrument of Heartlands manufacture that allows astronomers to observe the two suns, the two moons, and the stars with a clarity unavailable elsewhere on the continent. The Observatory doubles as a signal station: a mirror-flash system communicates with Brynvaal's Ferry Dock, transmitting weather reports, ferry schedules, and emergency messages.
The Pale Bell — A great bronze bell mounted in a stone belfry beside the Pale Hall. The Bell is rung only for three occasions: the election of a new Grand Magos, the death of an Elder, and the declaration of a Charter Emergency — a crisis severe enough to invoke the Isle's neutrality protections. The Bell has been rung for Charter Emergency exactly twice in history: once during the Nionian civil war (when Jous's agents attempted to seize the Isle's Nionian history archives), and once during a Teeth pirate raid in 1178 AF. The Bell's tone is deep, clear, and carries across the water to Brynvaal. When it rings, the Vallanaise know something has happened.
The Causeway — A natural rock formation connecting the Isle to a tiny satellite islet called Scholar's Rest — a flat, grassy rock where Magos take their rare leisure time. Fishing from the causeway, swimming in the sheltered cove, and sitting on the Rest's highest point watching the mainland coast are the Isle's primary recreational activities. The causeway is submerged at high tide, requiring timing for the crossing. Two Scribes have drowned over the centuries by misjudging the tide. A brass plaque on the Pale Hall reads: "The tide keeps its own schedule. So should you."
The Hidden Harbor — On the Isle's northern coast, opposite the main dock: a small, concealed cove accessible through a gap in the cliffs. The Hidden Harbor is known only to the Grand Magos, the Vault-Keeper, and a select number of Keepers. It is the access point for the vault's external supply route — materials too sensitive or too large for the main dock are landed here and carried to the vault through a tunnel cut into the bedrock. Keeper Alenn uses the Hidden Harbor when departing for Emberstone. Its existence is not recorded in any document that a novice could access.

V. LEGENDS OF THE ISLE
The Book That Writes Itself — The most famous Isle legend. In the deepest level of the Stacks, there is said to be a book — bound in pale leather, its pages blank — that writes itself. Words appear on the pages without human intervention: sometimes poetry, sometimes mathematics, sometimes passages in languages no living scholar can read. The book is never full — pages that have been written on go blank again after a time, and new text appears. No one knows who made the book. No one knows what it writes. The Record scholars consider the legend a metaphor for the archive's inexhaustibility. Elder Corvath, who has read the Logosian texts on residual consciousness, considers it a literal possibility: a sufficiently echo-dense artifact, saturated with the accumulated intellectual output of thousands of scholars over millennia, might develop emergent properties that mimic authorship. He has petitioned the Grand Magos for vault access to investigate. The petition has been declined. Three times.
The Drowned Scholar — A cautionary tale. A Scribe, obsessed with a text he was translating, refused to stop working when the archive's flooding alarm sounded (the lowest Stacks level occasionally floods during extreme tides). He continued translating as the water rose. He finished the translation as the water reached his chest. He drowned with the completed text held above his head. When the water receded, the text was found dry, undamaged, resting on a shelf above the tideline — as if someone had placed it there. The Scribe's body was found floating between the shelves, his quill still in his hand. The text he had been translating was a Xarian agricultural manual of no particular importance. The Magos buried him with full honors and installed a better flood-warning system.
The First Grand Magos's Promise — Elder Magos Kael, who oversaw the Isle's transition from imperial administration to independence, reportedly made a promise that has been passed down through every subsequent Grand Magos: "What is hidden here will outlast the world that hid it. Guard it. Do not use it. Do not understand it. Simply guard it." Whether this refers to the vault's contents, to the archive as a whole, or to something else entirely depends on which Elder you ask. The promise is not recorded in any official document. It is transmitted orally, Grand Magos to Grand Magos, on the night of their election.
The Tide Scholar — Recent lore, not yet legend. A Natural World Scribe named Maren (still living, age 28) has been conducting a long-term study of tidal patterns around the Isle. She has documented a gradual change in the tidal rhythm over the past three years — a shift of approximately four minutes per cycle that her mathematical models cannot explain. The shift correlates, she has noted, with the faint vibrations that Vault-Keeper Odo has been declining to report. Maren does not know about the vibrations. Odo does not know about the tidal shift. Neither knows about the Eldra-Veil breach. Grand Magos Thessaly, who reads all internal reports, has noticed both anomalies and is trying to connect them without sufficient theoretical framework. She has asked Elder Corvath for a consultation. The consultation is scheduled for next month.

XARIA — The Green Furnace (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — Gold, Blood, and the Canopy's Shadow

I. THE PENINSULA AT A GLANCE
Total Population: ~3,500,000 (including ~600,000 enslaved) Capital: Ix'Zaral — The Golden Seat (pop. ~1,000,000) Other Major Cities: Zari (~160,000), Canopolis (~105,000), Ix'Pal (~40,000), Porto das Plumas (~35,000), Bahia K'tharr (~20,000) Government: The Vizier (appointed by the Ix'Atani Dominion across the sea) governs the coast and delta. The interior jungle is governed by the temple-priesthoods. The two systems overlap, compete, and pretend to cooperate. Economy: Cacao, gold, jade, exotic hardwoods, spices, featherwork, slave labor, sacrificial economy, canal agriculture, and the tribute that flows across the ocean to the Dominion Religion: The Great Exchange — polytheistic, sacrificial, animistic. Loveism is unknown and would be incomprehensible. Provinces: Three recognized zones — the Coastal Dominion (Vizier's territory), Ix'baya (the river delta), K'thulon (the deep jungle interior)

II. THE PEOPLE
The Free
Xarians are dark-skinned — deep brown to blue-black — with broad features, strong builds, and the physical confidence of a people who consider themselves the center of the world. The Ix'Atani Dominion (the overseas empire that claims Xaria as a colony) is predominantly dark-skinned, and the local aristocracy mirrors this. Beauty standards prize deep color, height, symmetry, and elaborate personal adornment. A Xarian nobleman at court is a living artwork: facial scarification in geometric patterns (cut during coming-of-age, rubbed with pigment to produce raised colored scars), hair braided in architectures that take hours to construct, gold jewelry weighing pounds, and feathered garments of such complexity that a single cloak might represent a year of artisan labor.
Clothing is minimal in coverage and maximal in display. The heat makes layering absurd. The basic garment is a wrapped skirt or loincloth of dyed cotton, supplemented by shoulder-capes, chest-wraps, and the elaborate feathered mantles that indicate rank. Color is language: priests of K'tharr wear jaguar-gold and crimson. Priestesses of Ixchela wear serpent-green and black. Warriors wear the colors of their house. Merchants wear whatever they can afford. The poorest free Xarians still wear color — a strip of dyed cloth, a bead necklace, a flower in the hair. To be colorless is to be invisible.
The Bound — The Ashborn Caste
The slave population of Xaria is not a captured foreign people. They are native — a distinct ethnic group that the Ix'Atani theological framework classifies as Ashborn: people whose ancestors were "born from the ashes of a failed creation," a lesser humanity whose purpose is to serve the true-born. The theological justification is ancient, elaborate, and self-reinforcing.
The Ashborn are physically distinct: lighter skin ranging from olive to tawny brown, eyes that run hazel, amber, and green (colors vanishingly rare among the free population), and hair that is not the tight black coil of the Xarian majority but looser, wavier, with distinctive red-brown and ginger tones that catch the jungle light like copper wire. They are beautiful by any standard, and this beauty is part of their tragedy — Ashborn household slaves are selected for appearance, and the most striking serve as personal attendants, body-servants, and decorative presences in noble courts. The aesthetic is deliberate: the contrast between the deep-dark master and the copper-bright slave is a visual statement of hierarchy that every Xarian understands without explanation.
Treatment: The Ashborn are not, as a rule, treated with deliberate cruelty. The system is more insidious than that. They are treated as valuable property — fed adequately, housed acceptably, permitted family structures (within limits), and allowed personal possessions (within limits). An Ashborn household slave in a wealthy family lives better, materially, than a free Xarian peasant in the jungle villages. The poison is in the "within limits": they cannot leave. They cannot refuse. They cannot own land, bear arms, testify in temple courts, enter a teocalli above the second tier, or look a free person in the eyes during formal address. Their children are born Ashborn. Their grandchildren will be born Ashborn. The system has no exit.
Disobedience is where the gentleness ends. An Ashborn who defies a direct order, attempts escape, or commits violence against a free person is subject to the Brand — a red-hot copper seal pressed into the forehead that marks them permanently as defiant. Branded Ashborn are transferred to the canal-labor gangs or the quarry-crews where conditions are brutal and life expectancy drops to five years. A second offense is death — sacrifice on the temple altar, their blood offered to K'tharr as "the return of failed creation to the fire."
The Alonite Chain-Breakers — the mainland Lovist order dedicated to abolition — operate covertly on Xaria's western coast, smuggling escaped Ashborn to the mainland through Sangrea's Puerto Sombra. Their success rate is low. Their courage is extraordinary. The Xarian authorities consider them criminals and foreign provocateurs.

III. THE DOMINION — The Empire Across the Sea
The Ix'Atani Dominion is vast, wealthy, and distant. It occupies a continent across the eastern ocean — a landmass that no mainland person has ever visited and that the Xarians themselves describe in terms of hyperbolic grandeur: cities of gold, libraries of jade, armies of a million, a God-Emperor whose palace has ten thousand rooms. Whether any of this is true is unknowable from the mainland. What is known: the Dominion sends a new Vizier to Xaria every twenty years, collects annual tribute (gold, jade, cacao, feathers, slaves), and otherwise leaves the peninsula to govern itself. The Dominion's navy — the only force capable of crossing the eastern ocean — visits Xaria's ports twice yearly with the tribute fleet. The fleet is enormous: fifty to a hundred ships, crewed by Dominion sailors whose language, customs, and even physical appearance differ slightly from the colonial Xarians (taller, leaner, with elaborate full-body scarification that marks them as metropolitan citizens rather than colonials).
The Dominion does not interfere in Xarian internal politics unless tribute is threatened. This policy of benign neglect has allowed the peninsula to develop its own power dynamics — the Vizier's coastal authority versus the interior temple-priesthoods — without metropolitan correction. The current Vizier is the latest in a long line of distant administrators who govern through local proxies, collect their percentage, and focus their real attention on the Dominion's own internal politics (which are, by all reports, even more complex and violent than anything on the peninsula).
The Current Vizier: Lord-Governor Ix'Amara Zol (age ~55) — A Dominion aristocrat of the highest caste, sent to Xaria as either a reward (the post is lucrative) or a punishment (the post is remote). He is urbane, intelligent, fond of debate, generous with his hospitality, and genuinely curious about the mainland civilization that the Dominion has never bothered to contact. His relationship with Kaeo Argenhold — the Heartlands exile who spent eleven years as his guest — was one of genuine intellectual partnership: they debated governance, compared legal systems, shared smoke-leaf in the evenings, and developed a mutual respect that transcended the enormous cultural gap between them. Ix'Amara gave Kaeo gifts, slaves, and an education in power that no Heartlands court could have provided. He also showed Kaeo the machinery of exploitation — the canal-gangs, the tribute barges, the temple sacrifices — without apology or embarrassment, because in the Ix'Atani worldview, the system is not cruel. It is correct. The universe runs on exchange. Everything has a price. Everything is paid.

IV. THE HOUSES AND POWERS
THE COASTAL DOMINION — The Vizier's Territory
The Vizier's Court — Ix'Zaral
Ix'Zaral (The Golden Seat) is the peninsula's capital — a coastal city of 100,000 built on a natural harbor, its architecture a fusion of Dominion imperial style (massive stone platforms, broad ceremonial avenues, gold-leafed facades) and local jungle adaptation (elevated buildings on stone piles, open-air courtyards, canopy-shade engineering). The city is golden — not metaphorically but literally. Gold leaf covers every public building's upper surfaces. The afternoon sun hits Ix'Zaral and the city blazes like a second sun, visible from miles out to sea. The effect is deliberate: the Dominion's wealth made visible, made blinding, made inescapable.
The Vizier's Palace — the Ix'Amara Compound — occupies the city's highest ground: a complex of reception halls, administrative offices, private quarters, pleasure gardens, and the Hall of Tribute where the annual collection is weighed, recorded, and stored before the fleet carries it across the ocean. The Hall is the most secure building on the peninsula — stone walls, bronze doors, a guard force of Dominion-trained soldiers who answer only to the Vizier.
The Vizier's Household:
Lady Ix'Amara Tessai (age ~40) — The Vizier's wife. A Dominion noblewoman who considers Xaria a provincial backwater and makes no effort to conceal this opinion. She maintains a separate court of Dominion-born women who reproduce metropolitan fashions, speak metropolitan dialect, and regard the local population with well-bred disdain. She is sharp, bored, and dangerous in the way that intelligent people with too much power and too little purpose are dangerous.
Ix'Amara Kozel (age ~22) — The Vizier's eldest son. Born on Xaria, raised in both cultures, more comfortable in the colony than his mother would like. He has gone native in ways that alarm the metropolitan household: he speaks the local dialect fluently, wears local-style featherwork, and has taken an Ashborn concubine — a green-eyed woman named Yara — whose presence in his chambers is tolerated because Kozel is the Vizier's heir and heirs are indulged.
Captain Ix'Amara Djen (age ~35) — The Vizier's brother, commander of the palace guard. A professional soldier with no interest in politics and considerable interest in the local fighting traditions. He trains with House Ya'ax jungle warriors when he can arrange it, considers them the finest light infantry he's ever seen, and is quietly terrified of what would happen if the interior houses ever unified against the coast.
House Ix'za — The River Kings
Seat: Zari — the floating city of stilts and bridges (pop. ~60,000) Sigil: A golden caiman crowned with jade, on river-blue Words: "The River Remembers"
The Ix'za controlled the delta for centuries — managing trade, collecting tribute, maintaining the canal systems that turn the floodplain into the peninsula's breadbasket. Their power was built on water: whoever controls the canals controls the food supply. Their navy (river barges, not ocean-going ships) was the delta's military backbone.
Then came the Red Tide — the pirate fleet that swept in from the sea three years ago. The Ix'za navy responded late, fought poorly, and was crushed. The pirates sacked the outer delta. Zari nearly burned. Salvation came from the jungle interior — House Hok'ul's warriors descending the rivers in war-canoes, annihilating the pirates in a series of ambushes called the Red Tide Defiance.
The Ix'za have not recovered. Their navy is rebuilt (with Jade Cabal money) but their legitimacy is shattered. Everyone knows who actually saved the delta. The River Kings sit on their stilts and pretend to rule.
Lord Ix'za Pakal (age 60) — The River King. Once imposing, now diminished — a large man going soft, his court still dazzling (jade, silk, gold, the finest featherwork) but his authority hollow. He drinks cacao laced with fermented honey from dawn to midnight. His decisions are made by the Jade Cabal's representatives who sit beside his throne and whisper.
Lady Ix'za Ahau (age 45) — Pakal's wife. Smarter and harder than her husband, she has been conducting secret negotiations with House Hok'ul, attempting to arrange a marriage alliance that would preserve the Ix'za name inside whatever new order emerges. She is willing to sacrifice everything except her children's survival.
Prince Ix'za Balam (age 20) — Heir. Named for the ancient jungle house in a gesture of diplomatic flattery. Young, angry, aware that his inheritance is being hollowed out from beneath him. He has been training with House Ya'ax warriors against his father's wishes, learning jungle warfare from the people who humiliated his family. His motivation: if he can't beat them, he'll become them.
The Jade Cabal
Not a house but a guild — the gem traders who control the jade supply that is Xaria's second-most-valuable export (after gold). The Cabal operates from Zari's market district, maintaining jade-cutting workshops, trading offices, and a private security force of mercenaries who guard the jade caravans. They are the delta's real economic power — they fund the Ix'za court, bankroll the navy's reconstruction, and hold debt-bonds on half the delta's landowners.
Cabal Master Ix'Kaan (age 55) — Leader. A self-made merchant who rose from a minor trading family to control the Cabal through a combination of business acumen and the strategic elimination of competitors (three rival traders died in "accidents" during his ascent; none were investigated). He is calm, patient, and utterly transactional. He has no political ideology. He has balance sheets.

IX'BAYA — The Delta Heartland
The river delta: a world of brown water, green growth, and the slow, heavy heat of a landscape that is half land and half river. The canals are the streets. Barges are the vehicles. The architecture is stilts and platforms — buildings elevated above the floodline on hardwood pilings, connected by bridges and walkways. During the wet season, the delta floods and the villages become islands. During the dry season, the mud emerges and the canals shrink to channels.
House B'alam — The Ancient Ones
Seat: B'alam House, outer delta (a fortified compound on the highest ground in the delta — a natural hill that stays dry even during the worst floods) Sigil: A black jaguar on a field of stars Words: "Before the River, We Were"
The oldest noble house on the peninsula. The B'alam claim pre-Dominion ancestry — they were here before the Ix'Atani arrived, before the Great Exchange was formalized, before the temple-cities were built. Their lineage stretches into the Age of History. They are the traditional kingmakers — their endorsement legitimizes any ruler. Without B'alam recognition, no River King is truly king.
Elder Ix'B'alam Yax (age 75) — Patriarch. Ancient, blind in one eye, still sharp. He is the most respected voice in the delta and he has said nothing publicly about the Tribute Standoff. His silence is deafening. Both sides are courting him. He is waiting to see who offers more — not money (the B'alam have land-wealth that predates gold currency) but assurance that the old order will survive. He suspects it won't. He is deciding which version of the new order he can live with.
Ix'B'alam Kan (age 30) — Grandson and heir. A warrior-scholar who studied at the Vizier's court and who has the rare distinction of being respected by both the coastal elite and the interior priesthoods. He is being positioned by his grandfather as a compromise candidate — someone who could bridge the delta and the jungle if the current crisis boils over.

K'THULON — The Deep Interior
The jungle. Dense, ancient, echo-saturated, and governed by the temple-priesthoods who have been accumulating power for centuries while the coast grew fat and careless.
House Hok'ul — The Temple Keepers
Seat: Canopolis — the treetop city (pop. ~15,000, built in the canopy 80 feet above the forest floor) Sigil: A feathered serpent coiled around a pyramid, on deep green Words: "The Gods Hunger"
The ascendant power. House Hok'ul was a religious order that became a political dynasty — the keepers of the hidden temples, the maintainers of the sacrificial calendar, the interpreters of divine will. Their leader's charisma and the Red Tide Defiance have transformed them from interior mystics into the peninsula's most powerful military force.
High Priest Ix'Hok'ul Chaak (age 50) — The most dangerous man in Xaria. Charismatic, devout, brilliant, and possessed of a certainty that mirrors Jous Lorethian's (though in a completely different theological framework). Chaak believes the Great Exchange demands more than the coast is giving — that the Ix'za's corruption has weakened the sacrificial cycle, that K'tharr is hungry, that the world is fraying because the blood-debt is unpaid. His solution: purification. Increased sacrifice. Stricter observance. And the removal of any power that stands between the gods and their due.
Chaak's echo-sensitivity is high — the jungle interior's dense echo-field has produced a population of naturally sensitive individuals, and Chaak is among the most sensitive. He interprets his perceptions as divine communication (K'tharr speaks to him in dreams, in the movement of jaguars, in the pattern of rainfall). He is not a fraud. He genuinely experiences what he claims to experience. His interpretation of the experience is culturally determined and, by mainland standards, terrifying.
War-Chief Ya'ax Bol (age 35) — Commander of Hok'ul's military arm. House Ya'ax provides the warriors; Bol leads them. He is the man who planned and executed the Red Tide Defiance — the river ambushes that destroyed the pirate fleet. He is quiet, methodical, and capable of extraordinary violence delivered with extraordinary precision. He paints his face with jaguar-spots before battle (a Ya'ax tradition) and carries a macuahuitl — a wooden sword edged with obsidian blades — that he has named Ix'Chaak (K'tharr's Tooth).
Priestess Ix'chel Naia (age 40) — Head of House Ix'chel, the medicine-gatherers. She provides Hok'ul with the botanical knowledge that is the jungle's most valuable resource — poisons for warfare, medicines for the faithful, and the hallucinogenic preparations that the priests use for ritual communion with the gods. She is the only person in the interior whose authority rivals Chaak's, because she controls the pharmacopoeia and without her compounds, the ritual cycle cannot function. She is loyal to Chaak. She is also watching him with the careful attention of a woman who knows that holy men can become monsters.

V. ADDITIONAL HOUSES AND POWERS
House K'ay — The Story-Keepers — Oral historians, loremasters, the keepers of the peninsula's memory. Not warriors, not priests — bards, essentially, whose function is to remember and to narrate. They travel between settlements singing the histories, and their accounts are considered legally binding — a K'ay storyteller's recitation of a treaty's terms is admissible in temple court. Current Speaker: K'ay Itzam (age 60), a man who has memorized over two thousand songs and who is currently composing the epic of the Red Tide Defiance, which will become the definitive account of events and will, incidentally, be extremely favorable to House Hok'ul. He knows this. He is doing it anyway, because the Hok'ul won and history belongs to winners.
House T'zolk'in — The Calendar Priests — A minor priestly house that maintains the ritual calendar — the ten-count year, the festival schedule, the sacrificial timing. Not politically powerful but institutionally essential. The calendar determines when sacrifices occur, which determines when wars can be fought, which determines everything. Current Calendar-Keeper: T'zolk'in Ahau (age 70), a meticulous old priest who has been maintaining the calendar for forty years and who considers political power a distraction from the sacred mathematics of time.
House Kuk'ul — The Feather-Workers — Artisan house controlling the featherwork trade. Their products — cloaks, headdresses, ceremonial garments constructed from quetzal, macaw, and toucan plumage — are the peninsula's most valuable luxury export. A High Priest's feathered mantle can take five years to produce and is worth more than a Heartlands duchy. Current Master: Kuk'ul Ah'kin (age 45), a perfectionist whose workshop in Ix'Zaral produces work of such quality that the Dominion's metropolitan court has placed standing orders.
The Canal Guilds — The organizations that maintain the delta's irrigation infrastructure. Technically apolitical, practically essential. The guilds employ free Xarians and Ashborn labor in roughly equal numbers (the Ashborn do the dangerous underwater work — clearing blockages, repairing submerged walls — while the free workers manage and supervise). The guilds are the delta's working class and their collective action capability is significant: a canal strike would starve the cities within weeks. Current Guild-Master: Ix'Tun Batz (age 50), a pragmatist who has kept the guilds neutral during the Tribute Standoff and who is being courted by every faction.
The Scarlet Order — A priestly military order dedicated to K'tharr, functioning as the temple-cities' permanent garrison. Not as large as the Sons of Loreth but better trained for jungle warfare. Their warriors undergo a ritual scarification process — vertical cuts from forehead to chin, filled with red pigment — that gives them a permanently bleeding appearance. They are feared. Current Commander: Ix'Scarlet Votan (age 38), a zealot who considers Chaak a prophet and who has been advocating for a full military campaign against the Ix'za coast — not a standoff but a conquest. Chaak has restrained him. So far.

VI. MAJOR CITIES
Ix'Zaral (pop. ~100,000) — The Golden Seat. Described above. The coast's center of gravity — Dominion administration, international trade, the tribute fleet's home port. Districts: the Gold Quarter (Vizier's palace, administrative complex, Dominion military garrison), the Plume Market (the continent's largest marketplace for featherwork, jade, gold, and slaves), the Canal Quarter (residential, built on stilts over the coastal wetlands), and the Ash District (the Ashborn quarter — segregated, walled, patrolled, but internally self-governing under an appointed Ashborn headman).
Zari (pop. ~60,000) — The Floating City. Built entirely on stilts and platforms in the river delta, connected by bridges and walkways. No solid ground. Everything moves: the buildings sway in high winds, the platforms rise and fall with the water level, and the entire city drifts imperceptibly downstream over decades (the pilings are replaced in rotation, effectively rebuilding the city one post at a time). Districts: the Jade Court (Ix'za palace, Jade Cabal headquarters), the Barge Ring (commercial docks surrounding the city like a floating wall), the Weaver's Maze (artisan quarter, famously easy to get lost in), and the Under-City (the space beneath the platforms, accessible only by boat, where smugglers, fugitives, and escaped Ashborn hide in the shadows between the pilings).
Ix'Pal (pop. ~40,000) — The oldest temple-city on the peninsula. Built around a massive step-pyramid — the Great Teocalli of K'tharr — that rises 250 feet above the jungle canopy and is visible for twenty miles. Ix'Pal is the religious capital: the Great Exchange's highest ceremonies are performed here, the calendar is maintained here, and the most important sacrifices (including the annual Sun-Feeding, when captured warriors are offered to K'tharr at the summer solstice) take place on the Teocalli's summit platform. The city is ancient — its foundations are Age of History construction, echo-engineered stone that has not shifted in millennia. The priests know the foundations are special. They attribute the stability to K'tharr's blessing. They are wrong about the theology and right about the engineering.
Porto das Plumas (pop. ~35,000) — The Feather Port. Xaria's western trading city, the point of contact between the peninsula and the mainland. Named for the featherwork that is its primary export. The port is where mainland traders — Sangrean merchants, Horns sailors, the occasional Heartlands factor — come to buy Xarian goods. It is also where the Chain-Breakers operate, smuggling Ashborn escapees onto westbound ships. The city's culture is the most hybridized on the peninsula: mainland Munnish is spoken alongside Xarian dialect, Lovist chapels exist alongside Great Exchange shrines, and the food is a fusion of jungle ingredients and mainland cooking techniques that produces dishes found nowhere else.
Canopolis (pop. ~15,000) — The Treetop City. House Hok'ul's seat. Built in the jungle canopy — platforms, bridges, walkways, dwellings, and temple structures all suspended 60-100 feet above the forest floor. The engineering is remarkable: the Hok'ul builders work with the trees rather than against them, integrating living trunks into the structural framework so that the city and the forest are a single organism. Canopolis has no streets. It has branches.
Bahia K'tharr (pop. ~20,000) — A coastal temple-city on the peninsula's southern shore, dedicated to K'tharr's oceanic aspect (the Sun-Jaguar who dives into the sea each night to battle the darkness). Famous for its annual Festival of the Drowning Sun — a week-long celebration during which the entire city's population wades into the ocean at sunset, holding torches above their heads, and stands in waist-deep water until the sun disappears. The visual — 20,000 torches reflected in the black water — is reportedly the most beautiful sight on the peninsula.

VII. MINOR SETTLEMENTS — Concise Gazetteer
Coastal Dominion
Porto Ouro (~15,000) — Gold-processing port. Smelting works, refineries, the stench of hot metal. Aldeia das Correntes (~12,000) — "Village of Chains." Slave market town. Ashborn are bought and sold here. Chain-Breakers have tried to shut it down twice. Both times, fire. Praia Sagrada (~1,500) — Sacred Beach. Where the Dominion's tribute fleet lands twice yearly. For two weeks, the beach becomes a city of tents, warehouses, and the controlled chaos of loading a hundred ships. Mangalar (~3,000) — Mangrove town. Built on platforms in the coastal mangroves. Fishing, crab-trapping, and the production of mangrove salt — a smoky, mineral-rich salt that Xarian cuisine depends on. Forte Ix'Amara (~800) — The Vizier's coastal fortress. Military garrison, signal tower, the peninsula's primary defensive position against seaborne threats. Built after the Red Tide. Recife dos Mortos (~400) — Reef of the Dead. A fishing hamlet on a coral reef where, according to local legend, the spirits of drowned sailors gather on moonless nights. Fishermen leave offerings of rum and tobacco on the reef's highest rock.
Ix'baya (Delta)
Ix'Canal (~8,000) — The delta's largest non-Zari settlement. Canal junction, grain processing, barge repair. Aldeia do Lodo (~1,500) — Mud Village. Built on a mud flat that floods annually. The inhabitants rebuild every year. They have been doing this for three centuries. They refuse to relocate. Ponte B'alam (~2,500) — B'alam family's secondary holding. Bridge town controlling a critical canal crossing. Arrozal (~4,000) — Rice town. The delta's primary grain-producing settlement. Three harvests per year. The rice is fertilized with bone-ash from the temple sacrifices — a practice that the Ashanite clergy on the mainland would find theologically horrifying and agriculturally effective. Ix'Mercado (~3,000) — The delta's floating market — not a town but a permanent aggregation of trade-barges anchored at a canal junction, forming a commercial district that can relocate if the water levels change. Aldeias Cinzas (~1,000) — Ash Villages. A cluster of Ashborn settlements in the delta's least desirable territory — low ground, flood-prone, mosquito-infested. The Ashborn here are "field-bound" — attached to the rice paddies and canal-maintenance crews. Their headwoman, Ashborn Maela (age 40), is the closest thing the Ashborn have to a political leader and the person the Chain-Breakers contact when organizing escapes.
K'thulon (Interior)
Templo Verde (~5,000) — Green Temple. A temple-city in the mid-jungle, halfway between Canopolis and the delta. Dedicated to Ixchela. The priestesses here maintain the peninsula's largest medicinal garden — over five hundred plant species cultivated in a cleared area surrounding the temple pyramid. Cruce del Jaguar (~2,000) — Jaguar's Crossing. Where two jungle rivers meet. Ya'ax warrior training camp. Young warriors are brought here for their initiation — a three-day solo survival exercise in the jungle with only a knife and a gourd of water. Approximately one in twenty initiates dies. The deaths are considered acceptable. Aldeia Canora (~800) — Song Village. A K'ay settlement where the storytellers train their apprentices. The village's sound — constant singing, chanting, the rhythmic clap of hands keeping time — is audible from half a mile away. Raiz Negra (~500) — Black Root. The deepest permanent human settlement in the Xarian jungle. An Ix'chel gathering station where the rarest medicinal plants are collected. Accessible only by river. The journey from Canopolis takes five days by canoe. The plants gathered here include compounds for which the Cascabella of Sangrea would pay their weight in gold. Altar do Sangue (~1,000) — Blood Altar. A sacrificial site on a hilltop cleared from the jungle, where the annual Sun-Feeding's captives are gathered before being marched to Ix'Pal. The site is permanently staffed by Scarlet Order warriors. The hilltop clearing is the only place in the interior where you can see the sky without canopy interference. The view is spectacular. The purpose is terrible. Ponte das Serpentes (~1,200) — Bridge of Serpents. Named for the anaconda population that infests the river crossing. A Ya'ax garrison town that also serves as a border checkpoint between the delta and the interior.

VIII. NATURAL FEATURES
The Rio Ix'za (Great River) — The peninsula's central waterway. Broad, slow, brown, navigable for its entire length. The delta it creates is the agricultural engine of the peninsula. Caiman-infested. The river is sacred to Ixchela — offerings are thrown in at every crossing, every departure, every return.
The Selvaverde Interior — The jungle. The most echo-dense environment on the mainland. Ancient growth, never cleared, never cultivated (the Hok'ul practice canopy agriculture rather than ground-clearing). The echo-field here is strong enough that naturally sensitive individuals experience the "green attention" — the feeling of being watched, of the forest being aware. In the deepest interior, the sensation becomes overwhelming for mainland visitors. Kaeo Argenhold, during his eleven years, reportedly spent weeks in the deep jungle at the Vizier's invitation and returned "changed" — quieter, more watchful, with a habit of pausing mid-conversation to listen to something no one else could hear.
The Coral Coast — The peninsula's eastern shore. Warm, shallow water over a coral reef system that extends for two hundred miles. The reef produces the pearl, shell, and coral that supplement the peninsula's luxury trade. The reef is also the Dominion fleet's primary navigation hazard — the tribute ships must navigate a single deep-water channel through the reef, guided by local pilots whose knowledge is hereditary and closely guarded.
The Jade Mountains — A low mountain range in the peninsula's interior, source of the jade deposits that the Jade Cabal controls. The mountains are volcanic in origin (dormant, not active) and the jade occurs in veins within the basalt — exactly the geological conditions that produce echo-dense stone. The Jade Mountains are the peninsula's most echo-rich non-jungle environment. Miners report strange effects: tools that don't rust, wounds that heal faster than expected, and a persistent humming in the deep shafts that is below hearing range but felt in the bones. The miners attribute this to the jade itself. They are not entirely wrong.
The Mangrove Labyrinth — The coastal wetland between the delta and the open sea. A maze of mangrove channels, tidal flats, and mud islands. Navigable only by locals. The Labyrinth is where the Chain-Breakers hide their escape routes — the channels are too shallow and tangled for pursuit by the Vizier's naval vessels, and the mangroves provide cover from aerial observation. It is also home to the peninsula's largest caiman population and a mosquito density that can drive a person mad within hours.

IX. CUSTOMS AND PRACTICES
The Flower Wars — Ritual combat between temple-cities, fought not for territory but for sacrificial captives. The Flower Wars are scheduled, announced, and conducted according to strict rules: both sides send equal numbers of warriors, the fighting occurs on a designated field, and the objective is to capture (not kill) opponents for later sacrifice. The captured warriors are treated with honor before their death — fed the finest food, dressed in the finest garments, and given one night with any companion they choose. Their sacrifice is considered the highest honor the Great Exchange can bestow: they feed the sun.
The Mask Festival (H'uun's Madness) — Five days of chaos. The fifth count of the Xarian calendar is dedicated to H'uun, the Monkey-Trickster, and the festival that marks it is Xaria's carnival: masks, costumes, dance, music, role-reversal (masters serve slaves for one day — the Day of Reversal — a safety valve that the system tolerates because it prevents the pressure from building to explosion), public intoxication, and the competitive mask-dances in which performers wearing elaborate animal masks dance for hours, the last dancer standing winning prestige and prizes. The costumes are extraordinary — feathered, gilded, jeweled constructions that cost a year's wages and that their wearers consider money well spent.
The Canal Races — Barge races through the delta's canal system, held during the dry season when water levels are manageable. Teams of twelve paddlers race barges decorated in house colors through a course that winds through the delta's channels. The races are simultaneously athletic competition, gambling opportunity, and political theater — a house whose barge wins gains prestige. Ashborn crews are permitted to race (a rare arena where they compete equally with free Xarians), and an Ashborn victory is celebrated with complex emotions: pride from the Ashborn community, discomfort from the masters, and the unspoken acknowledgment that a people who can beat you in a fair race might eventually wonder why they can't beat you in other arenas.
The Smoke Circle — A social institution. Xarian nobles, priests, and intellectuals gather in the evenings to smoke green leaf (a mild narcotic herb — the substance Kaeo and the Vizier shared), drink cacao, and debate philosophy, politics, theology, and gossip. The Smoke Circle is Xaria's salon, its parliament, and its confessional combined. What is said in the Smoke Circle is technically confidential. In practice, everything leaks. The institution persists because the act of leaking is itself a form of communication — you reveal what you want revealed, and the Circle is the mechanism for controlled disclosure.

X. LEGENDS AND MYTHS
The First Exchange — The creation myth. Before the world existed, there was only darkness and two gods: K'tharr (the jaguar of fire) and Ix'Tza (the serpent of water). They fought. The fighting produced sparks (stars), blood (rivers), and fragments of their bodies (mountains, forests, the earth itself). Neither won. Both were diminished. The world exists because two gods destroyed each other making it. The lesson: creation requires sacrifice. Life requires death. The Exchange is not a choice. It is the structure of reality.
The Ashborn's Origin — The theological justification for slavery. After the world was created, K'tharr attempted to make humans from sunlight and earth. The first attempt failed — the creatures were pale, soft, wrong. K'tharr burned them, but the ashes retained a spark of incomplete life. From the ashes, the Ashborn emerged — lesser beings, half-made, marked by their pale skin and strange-colored eyes. The second attempt, made with blood and volcanic stone, succeeded: the true-born, dark and strong, fully alive. The Ashborn exist to serve the true-born because they are the remnants of a failed creation — not evil, not cursed, simply incomplete. The theology is elegant, self-serving, and has survived every challenge for millennia because the people it benefits have no incentive to question it.
The Feathered Serpent — Xaria's dragon. A creature described in the oldest K'ay songs as a serpent covered in iridescent plumage, capable of flight, dwelling in the deepest jungle where the canopy touches the clouds. The Feathered Serpent is not a god — it is something older, something that predates the Great Exchange, something that the gods themselves could not consume. It sleeps. If it wakes, the Exchange ends — not because the serpent is good or evil, but because it is outside the system. It does not give and it does not take. It simply is. The Feathered Serpent is the most echo-dense creature in Xarian mythology, and unlike most mythical creatures, the K'ay songs describe it with a specificity that suggests an actual animal: "its scales were green as new leaves, its feathers were every color the sky has ever been, its eyes were gold and looked at you as if you were the dream and it was the dreamer."
The River That Flows Backward — A legend about a section of the Rio Ix'za that, during certain tidal conditions, reverses its flow — the ocean pushes upstream, and the river runs backward for several hours. This is a real tidal bore phenomenon, but the legend attached to it is richer: the backward river is Ixchela mourning her dead children (the sacrificed), and the reversal is her attempt to undo what has been done — to take back the blood, to unflow the river of sacrifice. She fails every time. The river resumes its normal course. The dead stay dead. The Exchange continues. Xarian mothers stand on the riverbank during the bore and weep. Not because they are sad. Because Ixchela requires company in her grief.
The City That Sank — An Ix'za legend. A delta city — Ix'Zanab — once rivaled Zari in size and splendor. Its lord refused to pay tribute to the Dominion. One night, the ground beneath the city liquefied and Ix'Zanab sank into the mud. The entire population — 30,000 people — disappeared. The site is known: a patch of delta where the water is always warm, where plants grow faster than anywhere else in the marsh, and where, during the dry season when the water recedes, you can see the tops of buildings just below the surface. No one has ever dived to investigate. No one will. The city is considered a warning. The warm water and the fast-growing plants are considered the city's inhabitants, transformed — still alive, still building, still refusing to pay. The echo-theory explanation: an entire city's worth of echo-dense construction material, submerged in waterlogged soil, creating a localized echo-reservoir that accelerates biological processes in its vicinity. The Xarian explanation is better.
The Night of the Jaguar — Every Xarian child is told: once in a lifetime, K'tharr walks the earth in jaguar form. He visits every home. If the family has honored the Exchange — if they have sacrificed, if they have given blood, if they have fed the sun — K'tharr passes by and the family sleeps undisturbed. If the family has been stingy — if they have withheld, if they have refused the knife — K'tharr enters the house and takes one. Not the strongest. Not the weakest. The one the family loves most. The legend is enforcement. The fear is real. Every Xarian family, even the wealthiest, even the most skeptical, makes an offering before bed: a bowl of blood (animal blood, purchased from temple butchers) placed outside the door. The bowls are empty by morning. Cats, probably. Or jaguars. Or K'tharr.
The Mask That Speaks — An H'uun legend. During the Mask Festival, a mask-maker carved a mask so perfect that it became alive. The mask spoke to its wearer, whispering secrets — where treasure was buried, who was unfaithful, what the future held. The wearer became the richest person in Xaria. But the mask would not come off. It grew into the wearer's face, replacing their features, until the wearer was the mask and the mask was the wearer. They were last seen walking into the jungle, laughing in a voice that was not their own. During H'uun's Madness, mask-makers include a deliberate flaw in every mask — a crooked line, an asymmetrical eye, a missing tooth — to prevent the mask from becoming too perfect. Too perfect, in Xaria, is too dangerous. Perfection belongs to the gods. Humans survive by being incomplete.
The Ashborn's Song — Not told by the free Xarians. Told only among the Ashborn, in whispers, in the quarters, at night. The song says: the Ashborn are not the failed creation. They are the first creation — the original humans, made before K'tharr learned to be cruel. The true-born came second, made with blood because the gods had already used up all the gentleness on the Ashborn. The pale skin is not a mark of failure. It is the color of the world before violence. The green eyes are not wrong. They see things the dark eyes cannot — they see the world as it was before the Exchange began. The song is illegal. Singing it is punished by the Brand. It is sung anyway, every night, in every Ashborn quarter on the peninsula. The masters cannot stop it. They cannot hear it. The Ashborn sing it so softly that only Ashborn ears, tuned to the frequency of survival, can pick it up. This is not metaphor. The Ashborn have developed, over generations of enforced silence, a vocal register — a sub-whisper, a vibration more felt than heard — that carries between bodies in close proximity but does not project beyond a few feet. They call it the Hush. It is the most sophisticated communication technology on the peninsula, and no one who oppresses them knows it exists.

ROSLAND — The Iron Commons (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — The Republic That Forgot Itself

I. THE REGION AT A GLANCE
Total Population: ~3,200,000 Capital: Fairhaven (pop. ~160,000) Other Major Cities: Forgetown (~80,000), Twinbridges (~45,000), Karthold (~30,000), Blackridge (~20,000) Government: Republic under the Iron Codex. High Baron elected every 10 years by noble houses and guilds. Currently Vlado Ironside (term ends 1311 AF). The Long Vigil emergency powers have suspended key provisions. Economy: Iron mining, steel, timber, coal, grain, livestock, fur, arms manufacturing, road-tolls Religion: Orthodox Loveism with strong Alonite character. Pre-Lovist Aethelian folk traditions persist throughout the countryside. Provinces: The Greens, Fyrhold, Nordmarch, The Daudrwood March, The Western Shore

II. THE HOUSES
HOUSE IRONSIDE — The Iron Fist
Seat: Forgetown, Fyrhold | Sigil: Black iron hammer on grey stone | Words: "Strength Is Order"
High Baron Vlado Ironside (age 56) — Competent authoritarian. The Long Vigil has suspended guild voting, expanded appointment powers, created the Vigil Wardens. Each measure individually justified. Collectively, a noose. Physically imposing, forge-scarred hands, speaks rarely. His adopted heir Valo (age 22) has read the Iron Codex and privately understands what it means. He has not shared this doubt.
Inner circle: Marshal Gregor Stelev (age 50) — army commander, Fyrhold loyalist, brutal when required. Lady Katva Ironside (age 48) — Vlado's sister, runs the mines, harder than her brother, considers Valo weak. Vigil-Captain Drazen Morov (age 35) — head of the Vigil Wardens, most hated man in Rosland outside Fyrhold, talent for surveillance and quiet pressure.
HOUSE GREENHAND — The People's Shield
Seat: Greenhand Hall, Fairhaven | Sigil: Green open hand on golden wheat | Words: "For the Commons, Always"
Lord Aldric Greenhand (age 62) — Leader of the Commons' Cause, fighting the Long Vigil through legal channels. The legal channels are failing. Courts packed with Ironside appointees. Guild vote diluted. Pamphlets confiscated. Has not yet considered alternatives to legal resistance. His daughter has.
Mila Greenhand (age 28) — Impatient, confrontational, meeting with disaffected officers and House Riverblade representatives. Not planning a coup. Planning a contingency. Tomek Greenhand (age 25) — Scholar, poet, fire-song composer, gentle, the family member most likely to be sacrificed by events.
HOUSE RIVERBLADE — The Northern Watch
Seat: Riverblade Keep, Twinbridges | Sigil: Silver sword crossing a blue river | Words: "The Crossing Is Ours"
Lord Davor Riverblade (age 55) — Career soldier, thirty years on the northern frontier. Leans Ironside but distrusts Vlado's ambition. Politely freezing out the Vigil Wardens. Yelena Riverblade (age 30) — River navy commander, the person Mila Greenhand is courting. Has not committed. Listening. Ser Petrov Riverblade (age 22) — Garrison commander, young, eager, exploitable temper.
HOUSE DAURN — The Old Blood
Seat: Daurnkeep, Daudrwood March | Sigil: White stag on black forest | Words: "We Remember the Oath"
Lord Harren Daurn (age 65) — The White Stag. Moral authority of Rosland. Both factions court his endorsement. Has given neither. His silence is its own statement. Verra Daurn (age 35) — Frostguard commander. Rosland's most echo-sensitive person without knowing it. Senses weather, tracks by presence, avoids ambush by feeling hostility. Considers this normal. It is not. Old Marek Daurn (age 88) — Last link to the old Daudrwood. Tells stories from a tradition older than Loveism.
HOUSE BOROS — The New Forge
Seat: Boros Works, Fairhaven | Sigil: Golden gear on copper | Words: "Build Forward"
Lord Pavel Boros (age 48) — Engineer, Greenhand's financial backer. Supports democracy because stable governance is better for business. 3,000 workers. Irina Boros (age 24) — Engineer, developing water-powered hammer systems. Brilliant, socially awkward, uninterested in politics.
HOUSE GORBAN — The Southern Gate
Seat: Gorban Hold, Daudrwood March border | Sigil: Grey wolf on white snow | Words: "We Watch the Cold"
Lord Edrik Gorban (age 45) — Sending increasingly urgent reports about southern anomalies — Heartlands gold traders, Frozen South clansmen in new places, something enormous on the coast. Fairhaven isn't listening.
MINOR HOUSES
House Colov — Mining magnates, Fyrhold. Lord Branko (age 52) never enters his own mines. Son Yuri (age 28) has, came back changed. House Stelev — Master smiths, Forgetown. Matriarch Zora (age 68), Gregor's mother, forge-master fifty years. House Bridgestone — Nordmarch engineers. House Dulagn — River fishermen, Riverblade vassals. House Varn — Grain merchants, Greenhand allies. House Zelnik — Western Shore fishing fleet. House Drenov — Daudrwood charcoal-burners, Daurn vassals. House Karev — Coal miners, Colov rivals. House Stolk — Brewers. Stolk Dark beer. Politically neutral because everyone needs beer.

III. MAJOR CITIES
Fairhaven (pop. ~160,000) — The Free City. Three-river confluence. Timber and stone, heavy and practical. The Great Muster Field with Speaking Stone and Oath-Oak. The Guildhall Quarter. The Baron's Hall — conspicuously modest, except Vlado's new wing (the Greenhands call it "the creep"). Districts: Guildhall Quarter, River Market, The Smokes (industrial), Oldtown, Southbank (working-class, Greenhand-aligned), The Frostgate (southern road).
Forgetown (pop. ~80,000) — Half underground. Hundreds of forges. Permanent smoke. The Smith's Council Hall, the Greygold Syndicate Vault, Ironside's Iron Keep carved into the mountainside.
Twinbridges (pop. ~45,000) — Two bridges spanning the border river. Fortified southern bank, trade zone on the northern. Ferrymasters' Guild, Customs House.
Karthold (pop. ~30,000) — The Coal City. Grim. Rivers run black. But the worked-out mine shafts have been converted to taverns and performance halls. Annual Hammer Festival — three days of forge-beat competition in the deep shafts.
Blackridge (pop. ~20,000) — The Charcoal Capital. Daudrwood's northern edge. Currently neutral, leaning Daurn.

IV. MINOR SETTLEMENTS
The Greens
Holmgard (~8,000) — Grain hub, House Varn granary complex, annual Harvest Court. Millhaven (~5,000) — Twelve water-powered mills. Volksted (~3,000) — Livestock fair, sausage competition (47 varieties). Zeleny Most (~2,500) — Green Bridge, Ayanite courthouse, fair-minded Magistrate Oksana. Dubrava (~1,500) — Oak-grove, annual fire-song festival. The oldest pre-imperial songs performed here only. Pashkovo (~1,200) — Flax and linen, matrilineal weavers' guild. Staraya Polyana (~800) — Ancient village, domovoi shrines in every household. Brodava (~2,000) — Ford-town on the Tikhaya. Known for reed-thatch, mosquitoes, and rusalka sightings. Korchma (~1,500) — Inn-town on the main north-south road. Seven inns. Neutral ground where Ironside and Greenhand agents drink at separate tables. Medovka (~600) — Honey village. Apiaries producing the wildflower honey used in Roslandic mead. The bee-keeper, Babushka Zoya (age 72), knows every hive by temperament. Zhitnitsa (~3,500) — Grain-Barn. The Greens' second-largest grain storage facility. Brothers of the Open Road waystation.
Fyrhold
Ugleva (~6,000) — Copper and tin mines, Bronze Guild. Ruzhny (~4,000) — Weapons town, every household a workshop. Kamengrad (~3,000) — Quarry town, grey granite. Zheleznaya (~2,000) — Iron-Water mineral springs, Sisters of the Rust Ashanite hospice. Dymselo (~1,500) — Smoke Village, charcoal kilns. Gorny Klyuch (~800) — Mountain Key pass-town, Ironside garrison. Plotilnya (~2,500) — Sawmill town. Produces the timber frames for Rosland's construction industry. Rudnik (~1,800) — Raw-ore processing settlement. The smelters here run day and night during production season. The river downstream is permanently orange. Ognevka (~700) — Fire-Village. Named for the forge-fires visible from miles away. A Stelev family workshop produces the ceremonial blades awarded to graduating military officers. Kamenny Brod (~1,000) — Stone Ford. The only reliable crossing of the Fyrhold's central river. Ironside garrison controls the crossing.
Nordmarch
Plotina (~5,000) — Dam town, Boros-engineered, water-powered mills and smithies. Beregov (~3,000) — Riverbank fishing and trading, Dulagn Fleet base, smoked pike. Lesnoye (~1,500) — Forest-Edge, last Roslandic town before the Thornway. Pogranichny (~1,000) — Border customs station, Vigil Wardens since 1303 AF. Paromsk (~2,000) — Ferry-Town. Where the northern river widens enough for ferry service. Three ferries operate. The ferrymasters are Bridgestone family. Mokraya (~800) — Wet-Village. Marshland settlement, eel-fishing, perpetually muddy. The eels here are smoked over alder-wood and exported to Fairhaven. Storozhevoy (~1,200) — Watchtower. Military outpost overlooking the northern crossing. Riverblade garrison.
The Daudrwood March
Temnograd (~4,000) — Dark-Town. March's largest settlement, timber processing, Frostguard staging point. Bonekeepers' chapel for rangers who don't return. Volchiy Log (~1,500) — Wolf's Hollow. Unusually large, coordinated wolves. Ember Watch noted "behavioral anomalies consistent with elevated echo-density." Korengrad (~1,000) — Root-Town. Buildings constructed between trunks of 500-year-old trees. Residents consider the trees neighbors. Zyabrevo (~600) — Frost-Village. Southernmost permanent settlement, Gorban garrison, fur trade with southern clans. Omutovo (~400) — Deep-Pool. Dark, warm lake of unknown depth. Does not freeze. Unknown fish species. Sacred to locals. Offerings on the shore. Residents do not swim in it. Do not explain why. Medvezhya (~300) — Bear's Den. Named accurately. The Daudrwood's bear population is concentrated in this valley. Frostguard rangers based here specialize in bear management. Sosnovka (~500) — Pine-Village. Deep forest settlement. Resin-tappers and pitch-makers. The pitch produced here waterproofs Rosland's naval vessels. Glubinka (~200) — The Deep. The most remote settlement in Rosland. A Drenov charcoal camp so far into the Daudrwood that supply runs take four days. The workers rotate on three-month shifts. Nobody stays longer voluntarily. The forest this deep is not hostile, exactly. It is attentive.
The Western Shore
Primorsk (~8,000) — Largest coastal town. Fishing port, Zelnik fleet base. Cold, wind-battered, proud. Tumangrad (~3,000) — Fog-Town. Ship repair, naval base, five patrol vessels. Skalnaya (~1,200) — Cliff-Village. Seal-hunters, waterproof leather production. Utoplennik (~500) — Drowned-Village. Named for the frequency of deaths at sea. Bukhta (~2,000) — Bay-Town. Sheltered harbor, whaling station (small-scale — one or two whales per season, processed for oil and bone). Vetrovoy (~800) — Wind-Town. Exposed headland, lighthouse, weather-prediction station. The lighthouse keeper, Old Seva (age 70), has predicted every major storm for thirty years by watching the behavior of his cats. He has eleven cats. He trusts them more than instruments. Rybachiy (~1,500) — Fisher-Town. The Shore's most productive fishing settlement. Cod, herring, and the Western Eel — a large, oily species that Roslandic cooks smoke, pickle, and stew in quantities that other cultures find excessive.

V. NATURAL FEATURES
The Daudrwood — Ancient temperate rainforest. Trees 200 feet tall. Moss, fern, permanent twilight. Never fully mapped. Produces the Groaning — a low hum on still nights, source unknown. The Ember Watch attributed it to geology. Elder Corvath underlined "geology" and wrote "Or not."
The Fyrhold Range — Eastern mountains, 200 miles north-south, peak at Mount Kovac (~9,000 feet). Mines exceeding 1,000 feet deep. Anomalies in the deepest shafts: tools don't rust, water warmer than expected, persistent sub-audible humming.
The Three Rivers — Zelena (Green, largest, navigable), Bystrina (Swift, too fast above Millhaven), Tikhaya (Quiet, slow, deep, bordered by marshlands — rusalka territory).
Lake Omut — Near Omutovo. Circular, deep, volcanic origin probable. Does not freeze. Warm water. Unknown fish. Locally considered bottomless. Magos have not investigated.
The Deadwood Valley — Southern corridor to the Frozen South. Corbeau gold trade route. Gorban scouts reporting anomalies nobody in Fairhaven is reading.
The Tikhaya Marshes — Ancient peatland, undrained, ecologically dense. One of the Greens' most echo-rich environments. Home to the rusalka legends and a mosquito population that functions as a natural defense system.
The Iron Coast — Western seaboard. Rocky, fjord-cut, storm-battered. The coastal waters contain kelp forests, seal colonies, and a whale migration route that passes close enough to shore for the Bukhta whalers to reach from rowboats.
The Cracked Tooth — A geological formation in Fyrhold: a mountain peak split in half by an ancient earthquake, the two halves separated by a gap thirty feet wide and over five hundred feet deep. The gap produces a whistling sound in high wind that miners call the Tooth's Song. A Stelev-forged steel cable spans the gap at the narrowest point — a bridge that only the bravest (or drunkest) Fyrhold workers attempt to cross. Seventeen have. Fourteen survived.

VI. LEGENDS AND FOLKLORE
The Old Spirits
The Domovoi — House-spirits. Every household maintains a hearthside shrine. Fed bread and salt. Well-fed domovoi keeps the house warm, warns of fire, makes bread rise. Neglected domovoi: milk sours, tools break, nightmares. When moving house, carry a coal from the old hearth. If it dies, the family is cursed. The Ayanite clergy calls it superstition. Roslandic grandmothers call the clergy "men who've never baked bread."
The Leshy — Lord of the Forest. A presence in the Daudrwood — described as a bark-and-moss giant, a stag with human eyes, or simply a feeling. Frostguard rangers leave offerings at crossroads: bread, salt, zhivka. Rules: don't whistle in the forest. Don't cut a living tree without asking (knock three times; if you hear a creak, the tree agrees; if silence, find another). Don't enter after dark without fire. Never answer a voice calling your name from between the trees. The Leshy can mimic any voice. The Leshy's idea of hospitality is not yours.
The Rusalki — Water-spirits of the Tikhaya marshes. Pale women with green-tinged hair and cold hands. Ghosts of the drowned, or river-spirits older than humanity, or echo-manifestations from the marsh's dense biological activity. They appear at dusk, sit on the bank, sing. Follow the singing: you drown. Resist: they weep, and the sound makes loneliness so total that water looks like comfort. One teenager per decade doesn't come back. The drownings are attributed to poor swimming. The folk explanation is more consistent.
The Vodyanoy — The river-old-man. A spirit dwelling in the deepest pools of the Zelena and Bystrina — fat, green-bearded, covered in mud and slime. He drags down those who disrespect the river: those who fish without offering the first catch, those who piss in the water, those who swim at midnight during a new moon. Millers fear the Vodyanoy most — he can break a mill-dam overnight if insulted. The mill-owners of Millhaven leave a black rooster tied to the millwheel's axle on midsummer night. By morning, the rooster is gone. The mill keeps working. Nobody asks where the rooster went.
Koschei's Needle — A sorcerer removed his death and hid it in a needle, in an egg, in a duck, in a hare, in an iron chest, beneath an oak on an island in a lake. He wanders the world undying, searching for something he forgot. Every Roslandic region claims to know the lake. Vlado Ironside's secret search for immortality maps directly onto this legend. Whether Vlado considers himself Koschei is a question whose answer is obvious to everyone except Vlado.
The Firebird — A creature of light in the deepest Daudrwood. Golden-orange, feathers that glow for three days. Not destructive — it illuminates. Following it leads you to something you need — not want. Ranger Voron (1267 AF) followed one for three days. Emerged with a fever, unidentified seeds, and a memory of a cave containing non-corroding metal objects. Died of the fever. The seeds were planted at Daurnkeep. The plant that grew glows faintly in moonlight. It's the only one of its kind on the continent. Old Marek Daurn waters it personally.
Baba Vedma — The Crone of the Crossroads. An old woman who lives in a hut deep in the Daudrwood — the hut moves, appearing at different locations, always at a crossroads. She tests travelers: three questions. Answer truly and she helps — medicine, direction, prophecy. Lie and she eats you. The eating is not metaphorical. Frostguard rangers have found human bones at crossroad clearings deep in the forest — too deep for any civilian traveler to have reached. The bones are always clean, as if boiled. The Bonekeepers collect them and do not discuss the circumstances.
Morozko — Father Frost. An old man, white-bearded, blue-eyed, walking the roads on the coldest nights. He tests: "Are you warm, child?" Answer honestly: he wraps you in his cloak, you survive. Lie: you freeze where you stand, smiling. Bodies found frozen on Rosland's winter roads have smiles on their faces. The last thing they saw was Morozko's smile.
The Crying Stones — Certain Daudrwood boulders produce moisture on dry days. The folk explanation: the stones mourn, remembering deaths that occurred nearby. The echo explanation: old granite with elevated echo-density, moisture produced by echo-field/atmosphere interaction. Both correct. Neither complete.
The Night of the Twelve Fires — Winter solstice. Every household lights twelve candles in the windows. They must burn until dawn. If all twelve survive, the year will be good. If any go out, the number indicates which months bring hardship. Pre-Lovist tradition, repurposed by the church, understood by everyone to be older than the church. On solstice night, Rosland glows — thousands of windows lit against the longest dark. The most beautiful thing the republic produces. The one thing neither faction has tried to claim.
The Banya Oath — No weapons in the bathhouse. No lies in the steam. Agreements sealed in the banya are more binding than written contracts. The Iron Codex was negotiated in a bathhouse. Vlado Ironside has not entered a public banya since taking office. The Greenhands consider this revealing.
The Buried Tsar — A Fyrhold legend. Somewhere in the deepest mine-shafts, sealed behind rock falls and abandoned tunnels, a king from the Age of History sleeps in a chamber of gold. He is not dead — he is waiting. When Rosland's need is greatest, the mountain will open and the Tsar will walk out, armed in metal that doesn't rust, carrying a hammer that splits stone with a word. The legend is older than the republic, older than the empire, older than Loveism. The miners do not believe it literally. They believe it enough to leave a lamp burning at the entrance to every sealed shaft. "So he can find his way out."
The Forge-Ghost — In Forgetown, the oldest forge — the Stelev Ancestral — is haunted by the sound of hammering that occurs when no one is working. The hammering follows a rhythm: three strikes, a pause, three strikes. The Stelevs do not consider this unusual. They consider it the forge's first master — dead four hundred years — still working. When young Stelev smiths begin their apprenticeships, they are sent alone to the Ancestral forge at midnight to listen. If they hear the hammering, they are suited to the trade. If they hear silence, they are advised to find another profession. Every Stelev smith currently working heard the hammering. Whether this says something about the forge or about the psychology of teenagers alone in a dark room at midnight is debated.
The White Wolf — A Daudrwood legend. Every few decades, a wolf is born that is entirely white — not albino (its eyes are dark, not red) but white as snow, larger than its packmates, and possessed of a stillness that other animals respond to with deference. The White Wolf does not hunt. It does not need to — the pack brings it food. It does not lead. It does not follow. It simply exists, and the forest adjusts around it. The Frostguard considers a White Wolf sighting an omen — good or bad depending on the direction the wolf is traveling (toward you: fortune; away: danger approaching). The last confirmed sighting was 1302 AF, reported by Verra Daurn herself. The wolf was heading south. Toward the Frozen South. Toward whatever landed there.

THE RED COAST — Copper, Sand, and Hidden Water (Complete Regional Bible)
1308 AF — The Thirsty Crown

I. THE REGION AT A GLANCE
Total Population: ~2,400,000 Capital: Saravenna (pop. ~200,000) — the Red Crown's seat, the largest coastal city south of Puerto Luciente Other Major Cities: Alsiroth's Gate (~150,000), Qasr Ash'khor (~40,000), Madinat al-Nahr (~30,000), Porto Rubia (~25,000) Government: The Red Crown (House Cenizar). Originally a water-arbitration court, expanded over four centuries into a constitutional monarchy whose power is real on the coast and theoretical in the interior. The Crown arbitrates, the oasis lords obey when they feel like it. Economy: Copper mining, obsidian, salt, spice trade (overland caravans from Xaria and the Teeth), dates, goat-herding, geothermal mineral extraction, and the qanat water-engineering that makes everything else possible Religion: Orthodox Loveism with heavy Ashanite influence. The Sufi-analogous mystical tradition — the Tariqat al-Nur (Path of Light) — operates alongside orthodoxy, tolerated by the Ashanite order, distrusted by the Ayanites. Desert animism persists among the deep-desert clans. Provinces: Four — The Copper Coast (Cenizar territory), The Gate Lands (Alsiroth territory), The Ashlands (volcanic interior, Khorim and allied houses), The Deep Desert (nomadic clan territory, ungoverned)

II. THE LAND
The Red Coast occupies the continent's arid southeastern crescent — a sweep of desert, volcanic ridge, and sun-battered coastline that runs from the Vallanaise border in the north to the Teeth's nearest island in the east. The color red saturates everything: the sandstone cliffs, the iron-oxide soil, the native copper that veins the rock like exposed arteries, the henna in the people's hair and beards, the sunset that paints the desert in shades of blood and amber every evening for twenty minutes of beauty before the darkness falls like a door slamming.
The geography divides into bands running roughly parallel to the coast:
The Copper Coast — A narrow strip of habitable land between the Red Sea and the desert interior. The coast is cliffs, coves, and the occasional river-mouth where freshwater springs create green oases against the red rock. Saravenna sits at the coast's widest point, where a natural harbor and the continent's most reliable coastal spring have sustained a city for over a millennium.
The Caravan Corridor — The strip of semi-arid steppe between the coast and the desert proper, threaded by the overland trade routes connecting the Red Coast to Vallan, the Heartlands, and (via the Teeth) the eastern markets. The Corridor is where the oasis cities sit — pearls strung along the caravan routes, each one a bubble of green surrounded by infinite brown.
The Ashlands — The volcanic interior. A landscape of dormant and semi-active volcanic ridges, obsidian fields, geothermal vents, and the black-glass mountains that produce the Khorim obsidian trade. The Ashlands are sparsely populated but economically critical — the obsidian, the geothermal minerals, and the volcanic glass are worth more per pound than copper.
The Deep Desert — The Desierto de Ceniza (Ash Desert). The dead heart of the region. Sand seas, salt flats, wind-sculpted rock formations, and temperatures that kill the unprepared within hours. The Deep Desert is not empty — the Saffaren clans traverse it on routes known only to them — but it is ungovernable, and every Red Crown ruler who has tried to extend authority into the deep sand has failed.
Water
Water is the Red Coast's god, currency, and weapon. The qanat systems — underground aqueducts tapping deep aquifers and delivering water to the surface through gravity-fed tunnels — are the most important infrastructure on the continent. A single qanat can be thirty miles long, requiring decades to construct and constant maintenance to keep functional. The qanat-builders' guild — the Qanat-Khanan (literally "Water-Lords") — is the most powerful professional organization in the region, more influential than any noble house, because every house depends on them. A Qanat-Khanani engineer who refuses to maintain a lord's aqueduct has effectively sentenced that lord's city to death. This has happened. Twice.
The water politics are simple: whoever controls the water controls the people. House Cenizar controls the coast's springs. House Alsiroth controls the Gate Lands' deep wells. The oasis lords each control their local qanats. The Saffaren clans control the deep-desert wells that no outsider has ever mapped. The Red Crown's authority derives from its role as water-arbiter — the institution that prevents the water-lords from destroying each other's qanats (which they did during the Qanat Wars of 905-925 AF, killing thousands through thirst).

III. THE HOUSES
HOUSE CENIZAR — The Red Crown
Seat: The Crimson Palace, Saravenna Sigil: A copper crown over flowing water, on a field of deep red Words: "The Water Remembers Who Shared It" Founded: c. 930 AF
The Cenizars brokered the original water-sharing agreements that ended the Qanat Wars, and the copper crown they wore at the signing became the symbol of arbitration that became the symbol of governance. Four centuries later, the Crown is a constitutional monarchy — powerful on the coast where Cenizar controls the springs and the harbor, weaker in the interior where distance and tradition limit its reach.
Red King Tamir Cenizar (age 52) — The current crown. A careful, intelligent man who governs through consensus because he lacks the military force to govern through command. Tamir's authority is real in Saravenna and the coastal towns; in the interior, it operates through the Copper Courts — traveling judges who carry the Crown's seal and adjudicate disputes with the implied threat of water-access restrictions for non-compliance. Tamir is aware that this system works only as long as no interior lord calls his bluff. He is also aware that Lord Alsiroth is increasingly inclined to call it.
Tamir is physically unremarkable — medium height, lean, with the dark skin and sharp features common to the coast. What distinguishes him is his voice: a deep, resonant baritone that fills a room without effort and that he deploys in council sessions with the precision of a weapon. He does not shout. He does not need to. When Tamir speaks, the room listens — not because of his title but because the voice carries an authority that the title alone cannot provide.
Queen Zahra Cenizar (age 48) — Tamir's wife, born into House Ramad (the geothermal lords). A political marriage that has become, over twenty years, a genuine partnership. Zahra manages the Crown's diplomatic relationships with the interior houses — she is the person who travels to Alsiroth's Gate, drinks tea with Omar Sadiq, and returns with intelligence that Tamir's court spies couldn't obtain. She is trusted by the interior lords in a way that Tamir is not, because she is one of them by birth and understands the desert's customs in her bones.
Prince Idris Cenizar (age 24) — Heir. A naval officer commanding the Crown's coastal patrol — six warships and a dozen fast cutters that protect the Red Coast's sea trade from Teeth pirates and enforce the harbor tariffs that fund the Crown's operations. Idris is competent, restless, and frustrated by the Crown's limited military power. He has been advocating for a larger navy, funded by increased harbor taxes. The merchants are resisting. The merchants are also the people who pay for everything.
Princess Layla Cenizar (age 20) — Tamir's daughter. Studying at the Ayanite academy in Saravenna, training as a jurist. She is the sharpest legal mind in the royal family and the person most likely to strengthen the Copper Courts' authority — if she can survive the transition from student to practitioner in a system where every powerful family has reasons to resist judicial independence.

HOUSE ALSIROTH — The Mad Kings
Seat: Alsiroth's Gate (the continent's largest inland desert city, pop. ~150,000) Sigil: A black tower on a golden desert, surmounted by a copper mirror-sun Words: "We Need No Sea" Founded: Pre-imperial
The Alsiroths are the Red Coast's great contradiction: an ancient, proud dynasty whose territory controls the continent's most important inland caravan junction, whose deep wells make them independent of the qanat system, and whose ruling family has been intermittently insane for three centuries. The madness is not universal — not every Alsiroth is afflicted — but it recurs with enough frequency that the house's vassals and rivals factor it into their political calculations the way other regions factor in weather.
The current lord is not technically mad. He is eccentric in ways that may or may not be performance.
Lord Kasim Alsiroth IV (age 45) — The Gate Lord. Grandson of the mad king Yusef III (who built the tower of mirrors and the bone palace). Kasim inherited his grandfather's tendency toward grandiose projects but has, so far, directed the tendency toward infrastructure rather than insanity: he is building a canal from Alsiroth's Gate to the coast — an engineering project of staggering ambition that the Qanat-Khanan consider feasible and that everyone else considers a money pit. The canal, if completed, would transform the Gate into a seaport without a sea — eliminating the city's dependence on overland trade and threatening Saravenna's economic dominance. Tamir Cenizar is aware of this. The canal project is the Red Coast's slow-burning political crisis.
Kasim's personality: intense, visionary, prone to sleepless weeks during which he works obsessively on the canal plans, followed by depressive episodes during which he does not leave his chambers for days. His court physician attributes this to "constitutional temperament." The Sadiq family attributes it to hereditary instability. The truth is somewhere between — Kasim is brilliant, ambitious, and insufficiently stable to be trusted with the power he holds.
Lady Nesrin Alsiroth (age 40) — Kasim's wife. Born into a minor oasis house, married to Kasim for her family's water rights. She is the practical counterweight to her husband's visions — she manages the household, the city's grain reserves, and the complex diplomacy with the Sadiq merchants who are slowly buying the city from beneath the Alsiroth throne. She knows what the Sadiqs are doing. She cannot stop it without alienating the commercial class that keeps the city fed. She is playing a game she is losing.
Young Yusef Alsiroth (age 12) — Kasim's son, named for his notorious great-grandfather. Shows no signs of the family madness. Shows signs of something else: he is quiet, watchful, and has a habit of knowing things he shouldn't — the contents of sealed letters, the outcomes of negotiations before they conclude, the location of lost objects. His nursemaid attributes this to cleverness. The boy's tutor — a Tariqat al-Nur mystic named Dervish Arman — attributes it to something else and has been quietly training the boy in the Path's contemplative techniques without the family's knowledge. Young Yusef may be mildly echo-sensitive. The Alsiroth deep wells sit on geological formations that bring unprocessed stone close to the surface — exactly the conditions that sustain elevated echo-density.

HOUSE SADIQ — The Patient Merchants
Seat: The Grand Souk, Alsiroth's Gate (a fortified market district that is a city within the city) Sigil: Golden scales perfectly balanced, on sand-yellow Words: "The Deal Is the Deal"
The Sadiqs are not lords. They are merchants. This distinction is the foundation of their strategy: they don't want the Alsiroth throne. They want to own everything the throne depends on and let the Alsiroths keep the title while the Sadiqs keep the keys.
Merchant-Prince Omar Sadiq (age 50) — Third generation of the Sadiq strategy. His grandfather Rashid began buying Alsiroth assets during Yusef III's madness. His father continued. Omar is completing the acquisition. He controls the Grand Souk (the city's commercial heart), the primary grain-import contracts, three of the five major caravanserai, and the debt-bonds on approximately forty percent of the Gate Lands' agricultural estates. He funds Kasim's canal project — not because he believes in it, but because every gold piece Kasim spends on the canal is a gold piece borrowed from Omar, and every loan tightens the noose.
Omar is patient, courteous, and possessed of a business intelligence that makes the Jade Cabal of Xaria look amateurish. He has seven sons, each managing a sector: Rashid (spice trade), Farouk (grain imports), Hasan (the caravanserai network), Khalil (the slave markets — legal on the Red Coast, unlike Sangrea), Tariq (obsidian and metalwork), Salim (property and real estate), and Little Omar (intelligence — the family's spy network, operating under commercial cover). Omar's brother, Bahram Sadiq (age 45), runs the smuggling and covert logistics that the legitimate business depends on but cannot publicly acknowledge.

HOUSE KHORIM — The Obsidian Lords
Seat: Qasr Ash'khor — the Ash Fortress (pop. ~40,000, a city carved into a volcanic ridge) Sigil: A black obsidian blade on a field of volcanic red-orange Words: "Sharper Than Steel, Older Than Memory"
The Khorims control the Ashlands — the volcanic interior — and the obsidian trade that has been the region's most distinctive export for centuries. Khorim obsidian blades are sharper than any steel, though more brittle, and they are prized across the continent as both weapons and luxury goods. The Khorim also control the volcanic glass used in alchemical instruments, mirror-making, and the construction of the signal-mirrors that form the Red Coast's communication network.
Lord Vazir Khorim (age 55) — A hard, quiet man who rules the Ashlands from a fortress carved into a volcanic ridge whose obsidian walls catch the sunlight and blaze like black fire. Vazir is the Red Coast's most independent lord — his territory is too remote and too geologically hostile for the Crown to threaten, his obsidian monopoly is too valuable to sanction, and his personal army (small but equipped entirely with Khorim glass weapons and trained for volcanic terrain) is the one force on the Red Coast that no one wants to fight on its home ground.
Vazir's secret: the deepest obsidian mines in Qasr Ash'khor have been producing something unusual for the past decade. Mixed into the volcanic glass, in veins so thin they're barely visible, is a material that Khorim's smiths cannot identify — a dark, crystalline substance that resists every cutting tool, absorbs heat without conducting it, and produces a faint vibration when held in the hand. Vazir has sealed the affected shafts and told no one. He has sent samples to the Isle of Knowledge through intermediaries. The Magos have not responded. He is considering sending a second inquiry, more forcefully worded.
Sivara Khorim (age 28) — Vazir's daughter. The family's master glass-worker. She has been experimenting with the unknown mineral — incorporating trace amounts into obsidian blade alloys — and producing weapons of extraordinary quality: blades that hold an edge longer than any natural obsidian, that ring with a clear tone when struck, and that (she has noticed but not mentioned to her father) feel warm in the hand regardless of ambient temperature. She is, without knowing it, the Red Coast's first accidental echo-smith.

HOUSE RUKH AND HOUSE RAMAD — The Hot-Springs Lords
Two houses sharing the volcanic peninsula south of Qasr Ash'khor, bound by the Truce of Ash (1020 AF) that divided geothermal resources between them after four generations of feuding.
House Rukh controls the northern springs — the larger, hotter, more mineral-rich pools used for medicinal purposes. Lord Anwar Rukh (age 60) — A former warrior gone to fat and philosophy. He spends his days soaking in his private spring, receiving petitioners while neck-deep in steaming water, and dictating a memoir that no one has asked for and everyone dreads.
House Ramad controls the southern springs — cooler, cleaner, used for bathing and the extraction of mineral salts. Lady Safiya Ramad (age 42) — Queen Zahra Cenizar's cousin, a practical woman managing her house's mineral-export business. The salts produced from Ramad springs are used across the continent in alchemical preparations, food preservation, and the Copper Bowl healers' tinctures.
The Truce of Ash holds. Barely. The shared springs at the peninsula's center — the Hammam al-Kubra (the Great Bath), a natural hot spring the size of a small lake — are jointly administered and perpetually disputed.

THE SAFFAREN — The Desert Clans
Not a house but a confederation — dozens of nomadic clans who traverse the Deep Desert on routes that predate every settled civilization on the Red Coast. The Saffaren recognize no Crown, no court, no law except their own customary code (the Sand-Law), and they interact with settled society only at the desert's edge, where they trade salt, desert herbs, and the occasional intelligence report for grain, metalwork, and things the desert doesn't produce.
Sheik Makhtar al-Saffar (age 65) — The confederation's nominal leader (elected by a council of clan elders, authority limited to inter-clan disputes and collective defense). Makhtar is the person the Crown negotiates with when it needs something from the desert — safe passage for caravans, access to the deep-desert salt deposits, or information about what's moving in the sand. Makhtar provides these things at prices that the Crown considers extortionate and that Makhtar considers fair.
The Saffaren's religious practice is not Loveism. It is desert animism — the worship of wind, sand, sun, and the deep-desert wells that they consider portals to the underworld. The Ayanite clergy has been attempting to convert the Saffaren for three centuries. The Saffaren listen politely, accept the gifts, and continue praying to the wind. Their shamans — the Sand-Seers — are the Red Coast's most naturally echo-sensitive population, their sensitivity honed by a lifetime of exposure to the desert's vast, unprocessed geology. A Sand-Seer can find water underground by feeling it. The settled population considers this superstition. The settled population also pays Sand-Seers handsomely to locate new well sites.

HOUSE SAFFARSHAMS — The Sunken Fleet
Seat: The Ship-Graveyard, Alsiroth's Gate (a district of converted ship-hulls, stranded when the river dried up) Sigil: A golden sun setting into a blue sea Words: "The Sun Also Sets"
A family destroyed by geography. The Saffarshams were sea-traders — their fleet controlled the river trade between the Gate and the coast for centuries. Then the river shifted course (approximately 200 years ago), leaving their ships stranded in mud that hardened to stone. The fleet became tenements. The dynasty became a joke.
Captain Idris Saffarshams (age 48) — A brilliant, perpetually drunk shipwright designing a "sand-ship" — a vehicle that can cross the desert like a ship crosses the sea. Everyone considers this insane. Idris has been working on it for twenty years. His latest prototype — a wooden hull on metal runners, propelled by wind-sails — actually moved during trials. Sixty feet, before it tipped over. His wife Maryam (age 44) runs a tavern to keep the family alive. His daughter Hadiya (age 19) has secretly sold herself into the service of House Sadiq to pay debts. Three sons have left the city for foreign ships.

MINOR HOUSES AND POWERS
House Narimel — Oasis lords controlling the Ain Narimel, the largest inland oasis. Pop. ~12,000. Three qanats. The oasis produces dates, figs, and the aromatic Narimel Rose — a desert flower used in perfumery and medicine. Lord Bassam Narimel (age 50) — A quiet man whose power is entirely hydrological.
House Tarazin — Caravan lords. Not an oasis house but a transport dynasty — they own the camels, the drivers, and the route-knowledge that moves goods across the desert. Caravan-Master Dima Tarazin (age 55) — A woman (rare among the Red Coast's aristocracy) who inherited from her father and has expanded the family's caravan network into the largest private transport operation in the region.
House Qadir — Descendants of the alchemist who served the mad King Yusef III. The family retained the alchemical knowledge (if not the ethics) and now operates a network of apothecaries, mineral-dealers, and the occasional poison-for-hire service. Based in Alsiroth's Gate.
The Furnace-Holders — The copper-smelters' guild, based in Saravenna. Control the processing of raw copper ore into the finished products that the Red Coast exports. The guild is technically independent; in practice, they are Cenizar-aligned because the Crown controls their fuel supply (charcoal imported from Rosland via Vallan).
The Qanat-Khanan — The water-engineers' guild. The most powerful non-noble institution in the region. Maintain, build, and repair the qanat systems that sustain every city. Their authority supersedes noble privilege in water matters — a Qanat-Khanani engineer can order a lord to cease drawing from a qanat if the engineer determines the draw-rate threatens the system's integrity. This authority has been exercised. The lords complied. They had no choice.
The Tariqat al-Nur — The Path of Light. A mystical order operating alongside (not within) orthodox Loveism. The Tariqat teaches that divine truth is accessed through contemplation, movement, breath, and the systematic calming of the mind — practices that echo (without knowing it) the Venic Path's consciousness-altering techniques. The Tariqat's adepts — called dervishes — are recognizable by their white robes and their habit of spinning in place during meditation sessions, a practice that induces a trance state the dervishes describe as "stepping sideways into the light." The Ayanite clergy considers them harmless eccentrics. The Ashanite clergy recognizes them as genuine contemplatives. The Venic Path, if they knew about the Tariqat, would recognize them as cousins. Current Sheikh: Dervish Arman (age 60) — Also young Yusef Alsiroth's secret tutor.

IV. MAJOR CITIES
Saravenna (pop. ~200,000) — The Red Crown's seat. Built where the coast's largest freshwater spring meets the sea, Saravenna is a city of contrasts: blank, fortress-like exterior walls enclosing lush interior courtyards; crushing heat on the streets and cool shade inside; the poverty of the outer districts and the water-wealth of the Crimson Palace, whose seven fountains run day and night as a statement of power. Districts: the Crown Quarter (palace, Copper Courts, administrative complex), the Harbor (the coast's largest port — thirty deep-water berths, commercial docks, the naval base), the Copper Souk (the metalworkers' market — a labyrinth of workshops producing the filigree copperwork that is the Red Coast's most famous craft), the Garden District (the wealthy quarter, where the sound of running water is the sound of status), the Dust Quarter (the poor quarter, waterless, dust-choked, and the reason the Crown exists — to ensure even the Dust Quarter's cisterns are filled).
Alsiroth's Gate (pop. ~150,000) — The Grand Junction. Built at the crossroads where every major caravan route on the eastern continent converges. The city is a commercial organism — it exists because the routes exist, and the routes exist because the city exists, a self-reinforcing loop of trade and geography. The Grand Souk — the Sadiq family's domain — is the largest covered market on the continent: miles of vaulted arcades, specialized quarters (the Spice Road, the Copper Lane, the Silk Passage, the Shadow Market where the rules are different), and the complex wind-channeling architecture that keeps the interior tolerable in temperatures that would bake bread on the street outside. The Alsiroth Palace — the lord's seat — sits on the city's highest point, dominated by the Mirror Tower built by the mad King Yusef III. The tower still stands: a column of polished copper plates that catch the sun and flash signals visible for fifty miles. Whether Yusef intended it as a signal tower or genuinely believed he could "blind the sun" is debated. The tower works. The madness was productive.
Qasr Ash'khor (pop. ~40,000) — The Ash Fortress. Khorim's seat, carved into a volcanic ridge. The city's architecture is volcanic glass and basalt — dark, angular, gleaming. The obsidian workshops occupy an entire district: grinding, polishing, blade-smithing, the production of the alchemical instruments and mirror-glass that the continent depends on. The air smells of pumice dust and the sulfurous tang of the geothermal vents that heat the city's water supply. The vents also produce the mineral deposits that the Copper Bowl healers prize — the Order maintains a permanent station here, their copper bowls and volcanic tinctures the closest thing the Red Coast has to institutional medicine.
Madinat al-Nahr (pop. ~30,000) — River City. Built where the Red Coast's only permanent river (the Wadi Ahmar, Red Wash — a seasonal river that flows year-round in its lower reaches due to spring-fed tributaries) meets the coast. The city is the region's agricultural center: irrigated fields producing dates, figs, pomegranates, grain, and the spices (cumin, coriander, saffron, sumac) that define Red Coast cuisine. The Harvest Hall — an Ashanite granary-temple — distributes surplus to the inland oasis towns during drought.
Porto Rubia (pop. ~25,000) — The Red Port. The coast's secondary harbor, south of Saravenna, specializing in the Teeth trade. The port handles volcanic stone from Emberstone, timber from Verwhisper, and the miscellaneous goods that flow through the Teeth's Bridge. Since Morvayn's toll increases, Porto Rubia has been losing traffic — merchants who can't afford the Bridge tolls route through Vallan instead, bypassing the Red Coast entirely. The port's economy is contracting. The merchants are angry. Prince Idris Cenizar has proposed a naval expedition to break Morvayn's toll monopoly. His father has not approved it.

V. MINOR SETTLEMENTS
The Copper Coast
Ain Zahra (~8,000) — Spring of the Flower. Largest oasis town on the coast outside Saravenna. Known for its rose gardens — irrigated terraces producing the Red Coast Rose, whose petals are distilled into rose-water and rose-oil for perfumery, cooking, and the preparation of medicinal tinctures. Bab al-Bahr (~5,000) — Sea Gate. Fishing port, salt production, and the coastal terminus of the overland route from Alsiroth's Gate. The caravanserai here — the Khan al-Bahari — is the largest on the coast: 200 rooms, stabling for 500 camels, and a public hammam whose waters are heated by the sun and cooled by wind-channeling architecture. Minara (~3,000) — Tower-Town. Named for its lighthouse — a copper-clad signal tower that guides ships along the treacherous southern coast. The keeper, Lightwarden Tariq (age 55), maintains the mirror-flash communication with Saravenna. Sakhrat al-Hamra (~2,000) — Red Rock. A clifftop settlement built on a copper-rich promontory. The cliff face glows copper-green with verdigris. Mining and metalwork. Duvari (~1,500) — A fishing hamlet known for its pearls — small, irregular, tinted rose-gold by the copper in the water. Porto Obscura (~4,000) — Dark Port. The coast's smuggling capital. Where goods that can't pass Saravenna's customs arrive and distribute inland.
The Gate Lands
Ain Narimel (~12,000) — The great inland oasis. Three qanats, date palms, the Narimel Rose. The oasis is the Gate Lands' breadbasket. Wahaat al-Sirr (~3,000) — Oasis of Secrets. A small, isolated oasis that has been a Tariqat al-Nur retreat for two centuries. The dervishes here maintain a library of mystical texts, including works expelled from the Ayanite archives and manuscripts that the Magos have requested access to (the Tariqat declined — politely, firmly, permanently). Qasr al-Milh (~5,000) — Salt Fortress. Controls a massive salt deposit that supplies the caravan trade. Salt from Qasr al-Milh is the Deep Desert's currency — the Saffaren will trade anything for it. Birkhat al-Qamar (~1,000) — Moon Pool. An oasis whose spring fills a perfectly circular pool that reflects the moons with unusual clarity. Sacred to the Tariqat. Dervishes meditate at the pool's edge during Concordance (dual full moon) nights and report visions of "the world as it was before thirst." Echo phenomenon from the ancient spring's geological matrix. Suq al-Turab (~6,000) — Dust Market. A caravan stop halfway between Alsiroth's Gate and Saravenna. Famous for its annual camel fair — the largest livestock market on the Red Coast — and for the quality of its dried-meat vendors.
The Ashlands
Hammam al-Kubra (~2,000) — The Great Bath. The shared hot-spring complex at the center of the Rukh-Ramad disputed territory. Not a town so much as a permanent bathhouse with a village attached — lodging, restaurants, healers, and the Copper Bowl station that draws patients from across the region. Obsidian Gate (~3,000) — The Ashlands' primary commercial settlement, where obsidian is graded, packed, and loaded onto caravans for export. Vent-Town (~800) — A settlement built around a cluster of geothermal vents, producing the mineral-rich steam that the locals channel through stone pipes for heating, cooking, and the extraction of sulfur and other chemical compounds. The smell is horrific. The residents have lost their sense of smell. They consider this an advantage. Qasr al-Nar (~1,500) — Fire Fortress. A Khorim outpost on the Ashlands' southern edge, overlooking the Deep Desert. Signal tower. Garrison. The last settled point before the sand.
The Deep Desert
No permanent settlements. The Saffaren clans move between seasonal wells on routes that shift annually based on rainfall, wind patterns, and the Sand-Seers' echo-guided water-finding. The only fixed points are the wells themselves — some natural, some hand-dug, all jealously guarded. The largest: Bir al-Jinn (Well of the Spirits), a deep natural well in the desert's center that the Saffaren consider the most sacred site in the region. The water is warm, mineral-rich, and tastes of iron. The well shaft descends over 200 feet. The Saffaren say the shaft is bottomless. They say that if you drop a stone and listen, you never hear it hit. They say things live down there. They do not specify what things.

VI. NATURAL FEATURES
The Wadi Ahmar (Red Wash) — The coast's only permanent river. Seasonal in its upper reaches (a dry streambed for six months), year-round in the lower section where spring-fed tributaries sustain the flow. The water is red-tinted by iron oxide. The river's delta, where it meets the sea near Madinat al-Nahr, is the coast's most fertile zone.
The Desierto de Ceniza (Ash Desert) — The deep desert. Sand seas, salt flats, wind-sculpted rock. Temperatures: 120°F in summer, freezing at night. The salt flats — called the Mirror by the Saffaren — are so flat and reflective that on still days the sky is indistinguishable from the ground, producing a disorientation that the Saffaren call the Blur and that has killed more caravan travelers than thirst.
The Montañas de Cobre Rojo (Red Copper Mountains) — The volcanic range. Dormant peaks, obsidian fields, geothermal valleys. The mountains glow red at sunset — the copper in the rock catching the light. The deepest mines penetrate volcanic formations that have been sealed since the Age of History, and the miners' reports of anomalies (warmth, vibration, the unknown crystalline material in Khorim's shafts) all originate from these deep formations.
The Teeth Strait — The water between the Red Coast and the nearest Teeth island (Emberstone). Roughly thirty miles of open water, navigable but hazardous — strong currents, intermittent fog, and the submerged volcanic reef called the Grinder that has torn the bottoms from ships for centuries.
The Copper Veins — Not a single feature but a geological phenomenon: copper deposits that run through the Red Coast's bedrock in branching patterns that, seen from the cliffs above, look like a circulatory system — veins of green-patinated copper against red sandstone. The largest vein system — visible on the cliff face below Saravenna — is called the Arteries and is considered sacred by the Tariqat, who believe it represents Loreth's blood still flowing through the world's body.

VII. LEGENDS AND MYTHS
The Copper Djinn — The oldest Red Coast legend. When the world was young and the copper was still liquid fire beneath the earth, a spirit — a djinn — lived in the molten metal. The djinn was beautiful, terrible, and lonely. It loved the sun but could not reach it. It loved the water but could not touch it without dying. So it shaped itself a body from cooled copper — a figure that walked the desert at night, glowing with internal heat, leaving footprints of fused sand. The djinn is still walking. On nights when the desert is silent and the wind drops to nothing, the Saffaren say you can see a light moving on the horizon — not a campfire, not a star, but a figure of copper fire, walking toward the sunrise that it will never reach.
The Forty Wells — A Saffaren legend. The Deep Desert once had forty wells — enough to sustain a civilization. One by one, the wells dried up. Not from overuse — from grief. Each well had a spirit, and each spirit died when the last person who remembered its name forgot it. The wells dried because the names were forgotten. The Saffaren maintain a ritual called the Naming — a ceremony in which the clan elder recites the names of every known well, living and dead, to ensure that none are forgotten and none dry up. The ceremony takes three hours. The Sand-Seers say that when they find a new well, they can sometimes hear — in the water's echo-resonance — the faintest trace of an old name, spoken by a voice that has been silent for a very long time.
The Mirror King — A legend about the mad King Yusef III's Mirror Tower. Yusef built the tower to "blind the sun" — to force K'tharr (who the Xarians worship and the Red Coast traders have encountered through cultural contact) to look away. But the mirrors, when aligned correctly, do something else: they focus the sunlight into a point so intense that the air itself shimmers and bends, and for a moment — a fraction of a second — you can see through the shimmer to something on the other side. What is on the other side varies by account: another desert, a city of glass, a face looking back at you. The tower's mirrors have not been aligned since Yusef's death. Lord Kasim has considered re-aligning them. His wife has hidden the alignment instructions.
The Water Bride — A qanat legend. When a new qanat is dug, the tunnelers sometimes hear singing from ahead — a woman's voice, clear and sweet, coming from the darkness. If the tunnelers follow the singing, they find water. If they don't, the tunnel collapses. The singing is the qanat's bride — the spirit of the water source itself, calling the tunnel toward it. The Qanat-Khanan do not officially acknowledge this legend. Unofficially, every master tunneler leaves a small copper ring at the point where the tunnel first reaches water — a wedding gift for the bride. The rings accumulate. Some qanat junctions contain dozens of copper rings, green with age, piled in the dark. Nobody removes them.
Simurgh — The Red Coast's greatest mythical creature. A bird of immense size — larger than a storm-roc, older than the desert — whose plumage contains every color that exists and several that don't. The Simurgh lives on the highest peak of the Copper Mountains (a peak that no one has climbed because it is perpetually shrouded in volcanic haze). It is not a god. It is something that was here before the gods. The K'ay storytellers of Xaria have a Feathered Serpent; the Red Coast has the Simurgh. Both describe an echo-node so vast and so old that it predates human mythology — a creature that is not sustained by the echo-field but that is part of it, the way a river is part of the ocean. The Simurgh has been "sighted" approximately once per century, always at great distance, always in conditions that make confirmation impossible. The Ember Watch's records contain a single entry: "1089 AF. Ash'khor ridge. Multiple witnesses. Wingspan estimated 200+ feet. No approach attempted. Recommend awe."
The Thirst Oath — The most binding oath on the Red Coast. Two parties face each other across a bowl of water. Each places a hand in the bowl. The oath is spoken. The water is poured onto the sand. If either party breaks the oath, the legend says, they will never find water again — every well will dry as they approach, every spring will retreat, every qanat will collapse. The mechanism is pure superstition. The enforcement is social: a person known to have broken a Thirst Oath is considered dead by the desert's customary law. No one will sell them water. No one will share a fire. No one will say their name. In a desert, this is not a metaphorical death.
The City Beneath the Sand — The Saffaren's oldest legend. Somewhere in the Deep Desert, buried under centuries of sand, there is a city built in the Age of History — before the desert was a desert, when the Red Coast was green and rivers ran where now only dust moves. The city was abandoned when the water fled (or when the water was taken — accounts differ). Its buildings are intact beneath the sand, preserved by the dry conditions. Its treasures — copper, gold, jade, and objects made of materials that no living smith can identify — wait in sealed chambers for someone to dig them out. Sand-Seers report that when they walk certain areas of the Deep Desert, they feel foundations beneath their feet — stone structures under the sand, aligned in patterns that suggest streets, plazas, buildings. The feelings are strongest at dawn and dusk. The Saffaren do not dig. The Sand-Law forbids disturbing what the desert has chosen to bury. But the feelings persist. And every generation, a Sand-Seer draws a map of what they felt, adding it to the accumulated archive of subterranean impressions that the Saffaren have been compiling for centuries. The maps, laid over each other, show the outline of a city roughly the size of Saravenna.
The Night Market — In Alsiroth's Gate, there is a market that operates only between midnight and dawn, in a section of the Grand Souk that is empty during daylight. The Night Market sells things that the day-market doesn't: prophecies, curses, memories (sold by the elderly to buyers who want to experience someone else's youth), and a substance called Tears of the Copper Djinn — a liquid that, when dropped into the eyes, allows the user to see in total darkness for twelve hours but permanently changes the iris color from dark to copper-gold. The Night Market is technically illegal. The city guard patrols past its entrance every hour, on schedule, giving the vendors sixty minutes of operating time between passes. The schedule has not changed in forty years. Lord Kasim is aware of the Night Market. He has attended it, twice, in disguise. He purchased a prophecy. Its contents are unknown. He has not attended since.

THE FROZEN SOUTH — Complete Regional Chronicle
Gold, Ice, and Old Bone
Total Documented History: Approximately 50,000 years of continuous habitation (the longest unbroken human presence on the continent). The fire-songs claim longer. Nobody argues.
Defining Feature: The only region of Mundus where the land was never conquered — not by the republics, not by the empire, not by the Church. The Frozen South has been nominally tributary, theoretically subject, and practically untouchable for the entirety of recorded history. Geography is the reason. The Deadwood and the Kjölfoss Mountains form a double wall of petrified forest and vertical stone that has broken every army foolish enough to march through it. The cold finishes whatever the terrain doesn't. The south has never needed diplomacy because it has never needed to negotiate from weakness. This is about to change.

I. THE LAND
Geography
The Frozen South is a peninsula — a ragged, mountainous wedge of land that juts southward from the continental mass into the permanent grey of the southern ocean. It is roughly six hundred miles from the northern tree-line of the Deadwood to the southernmost cape, and perhaps three hundred miles across at its widest point. The total area is deceptive: measured flat, it would be a modest territory, smaller than the Heartlands, comparable to Sangrea. But the land is not flat. It is folded, buckled, shattered by tectonic violence into a landscape of such vertical extremity that a journey of twenty miles on the map might require four days of climbing, rappelling, and praying.
The spine of the peninsula is the Kjölfoss Range — a chain of young, sharp-peaked mountains that runs north-south like a broken blade, their summits lost in permanent cloud, their flanks streaked with the gold-bearing quartz veins that are the region's wealth and curse. The Kjölfoss are volcanic in origin — the same tectonic scar that produced the Heitdalr's active vents and Eldraholm's Urdrath far to the south. The mountains are still growing. Earthquakes are common, avalanches routine, and the hot springs that bubble up through fractured granite in a hundred hidden valleys are evidence of a planet that has not finished shaping this particular corner of itself.
West of the Kjölfoss, the land drops in terraces of glaciated rock toward the coastal fjords — deep, narrow inlets where the sea has invaded the land along ancient fault lines. The fjords are the highways of the Frozen South: too steep-sided for roads, too ice-choked for large ships, but navigable by the flat-bottomed longships that the coastal clans build from driftwood, seal-skin, and a carpenter's understanding of how ice behaves when you push against it. The western coast is a labyrinth of stone and water and fog, and men have drowned within sight of their own hearth-fires because the mist swallowed the distance between ship and shore.
East of the Kjölfoss, the land is harsher still. The eastern slope catches the full force of the polar wind that screams off the southern ocean, and the vegetation — sparse everywhere — gives up entirely above the tree-line, leaving a moonscape of scoured rock, ice-fields, and the occasional glacier-carved valley where a handful of musk-oxen graze on lichen in the brief, pale summers. The eastern coast is cliff, mostly — sheer drops into water so cold that a man who falls in has approximately four minutes before his muscles stop responding and approximately six before his heart does. The Raudbjorn clan calls the eastern sea the Beinsjór — the Bone-Sea. The name is not poetic. It is descriptive. The currents deposit the bones of whales, seals, and drowned men on the rocky beaches in quantities that make the shoreline look like a battlefield that never stops fighting.
The northern boundary is the Daudr-vidr — the Deadwood. A vast forest of petrified trees, some standing, some toppled into chaotic tangles of stone-wood, their mineral-white trunks and branches creating a landscape that looks like winter even in the brief southern summer. The Deadwood stretches roughly a hundred miles from north to south and runs the full width of the peninsula, forming a natural wall between the Frozen South and the rest of the continent. The petrification process is not fully understood — the Magos have theories involving mineral-rich groundwater and volcanic gases, but the Treetalkers say the forest simply grew tired of being alive and decided to become something harder. Both explanations are equally useful to someone trying to navigate the place.
South of everything — past the last fjord, past the last clan-hold, past the rocks where the southernmost seal-hunters beach their boats — there is only the southern ocean, thousands of miles of grey water stretching toward the volcanic hell of Eldraholm, from which the Giants have just arrived.
Climate
The Frozen South exists in a state of permanent negotiation with cold. The region experiences two seasons: winter and the memory of summer. True summer — meaning a period where snow does not fall, where the fjords are navigable without icebreakers, where a person can work outdoors without risking frostbite — lasts approximately eight weeks in the coastal lowlands and approximately four in the mountains. The rest is winter: long, dark, and defined by temperatures that can kill an unprotected human in under an hour.
The darkness is the part that breaks outsiders. At midwinter, the sun does not rise for roughly six weeks in the deep south. The sky transitions from black to a bruised grey twilight at midday and then returns to black. Life continues — the clans are adapted, their routines structured around tallow-light and fire-pit warmth — but the psychological weight of six weeks without dawn is not something that can be explained to someone who has never experienced it. It must be endured. Mainlanders who visit the south in winter describe a feeling of being swallowed — not by danger but by absence. The light is absent. The color is absent. The warmth is absent. What remains is the sound of wind and the smell of smoke and the company of people whose idea of comfort is a room where your breath doesn't freeze before it leaves your mouth.
The Heitdalr is the exception. The volcanic province's geothermal heat creates microclimates where the air is warm, the soil thawed, and greenhouses — crude but functional, their walls made of scraped seal-gut stretched over bone frames — produce root vegetables and herbs year-round. Hotstone, the Heitdalr's only city, sits in a valley where steam rises from the ground like the breath of something sleeping underground, and the temperature rarely drops below freezing even at midwinter. To the rest of the Frozen South, Hotstone is a miracle and an anomaly — proof that warmth exists, somewhere, for someone.

II. THE PEOPLE
Physical Description
The clans of the Frozen South are the largest humans on the continent. Men average six feet four inches; women six feet even. Bone structure is heavy — broad shoulders, thick wrists, dense skulls. A layer of subcutaneous fat that never fully disappears even in the lean months gives their bodies a barrel-shaped solidity that mainlanders find intimidating and that the clans consider normal. They are not fat. They are insulated. The difference is the difference between a walrus and a pig, and suggesting the latter comparison to a southern clansman is a reliable way to lose teeth.
Skin is pale, weather-damaged to a permanent wind-burned pink across the cheeks, nose, and knuckles. Hair is coarse and thick, ranging from white-blond to dark brown, worn long by both sexes and braided in elaborate styles that communicate clan, family, marital status, and personal achievement. A woman with three kill-braids in her hair has taken three lives in combat and is not to be trifled with. A man with his beard in a single braid has sworn an oath that remains unfulfilled. An unbraided beard on an adult male means he is either an outcast, an oath-breaker, or so dangerous that no one has dared to question his grooming.
Beards are sacred. Shaving a man's beard is the gravest insult short of killing him — reserved for oath-breakers, cowards, and men who have betrayed their clan. A shaved man is a man without identity, without history, without the right to speak at moot. The punishment is worse than exile because the exile at least keeps his face. The shaved man keeps his life but loses everything that makes it worth living.
Clothing
Functionality dictates fashion and fashion dictates status, but in the Frozen South these are the same conversation. Clothing is layered: a base of seal-skin worn fur-inward against the body, a middle layer of felted musk-ox wool, and an outer shell of bear-hide or heavy seal-leather oiled against wet and wind. Stitching is sinew. Dyes are mineral — iron-red, copper-green, charcoal-black — applied sparingly. Color is scarce and therefore meaningful.
The clan-marker is the single most important piece of clothing. A woven band of dyed wool in clan colors, worn at the upper arm, it serves the same identification function as a Heartlander's surcoat or a Sangrean house emblem. Removing your clan-marker in public is a declaration that you have left your clan — voluntarily or otherwise. Finding a clan-marker on the ground means someone is dead, exiled, or wishes to be considered both.
Boots are the masterwork of southern craftsmanship. Multi-layered, insulated with dried grass and caribou down, soled with mammoth-leather that grips ice, lined with rabbit fur. A person's boots are their most valuable possession. Good boots are inherited. Great boots are buried with their owner. A man with bad boots is a dead man who hasn't stopped walking yet.
Architecture
Semi-subterranean. The clan-holds are built into the landscape — longhouses half-buried in hillsides, their turf roofs blending into the terrain until a traveler might walk over a settlement without realizing it was there. The interiors are warm from communal body heat and peat-and-dung fires that burn day and night, filling the low-ceilinged rooms with a thick, sweet-acrid smoke that stains everything and everyone a faint amber. Windows do not exist in the conventional sense. Light enters through smoke-holes in the roof and through seal-gut panels set into the turf walls, which admit a pale, diffuse glow.
The great hall is the center of every clan-hold — a long, low-ceilinged room built around a central fire-pit, its walls hung with furs, weapons, and the ancestral gold-work that is the clan's treasure and identity. The gold-work is extraordinary. Frozen South smiths are the continent's finest goldsmiths, producing torcs, bracelets, brooches, and ceremonial weapons of interlocking knotwork and animal motifs — wolves, bears, eagles, the mythical aurora serpent — that make Heartlands silverwork look crude by comparison. The gold-work is never sold. It is gifted, inherited, raided, or buried with the dead. Selling gold-work to an outsider is treason. The gold itself is commodity. The work is sacred.
The Kjölfoss Deeps — Clan Aurax's primary gold mine — is the closest thing the Frozen South has to a city. A sprawling complex of mine shafts, smelting works, barracks, and the great underground hall where the Winter-Moot meets. Geothermal heat from the volcanic roots of the mountains keeps the deeps warm, and the walls are perpetually lit by tallow-lamps that give the gold-veined rock a liquid, breathing quality. Visitors describe it as stepping inside a living jewel box. The Deeps can house roughly three thousand people during the Winter-Moot — the largest permanent gathering in the region's history.
Food
Meat, fish, and fat. The Frozen South's cuisine is caloric by absolute necessity — the body burns fuel just staying warm. Seal meat is the staple: tough, oily, iron-rich, eaten raw when fresh (the blood provides vitamins that cooked meat loses), smoked when preserved. Whale blubber is rendered into oil for lamps and cooking, eaten in strips, or mixed with berries and dried fish into a dense traveling food called reistmatur that tastes approximately like what it sounds like and keeps a hunter alive for a week on a fistful. Smoked fish — trout from the mountain streams, cod from the coastal waters — is the closest thing to a universal food. Dried caribou from the interior herds. And blóðmör — blood sausage, made from sheep's blood, oat-substitute (ground lichen), and suet, packed into a stomach lining, boiled, and sliced. It is dense, crumbling, faintly sweet, and the single food item most likely to make a mainland visitor excuse themselves from the table.
Dairy comes from the shaggy musk-oxen: thick, sweet milk curdled into skyr — a yogurt-like substance eaten at every meal, mixed with honey when available, with seal-oil when not. Bread is rare. Grain doesn't grow this far south. The substitute is a flatcake made from ground lichen and rendered fat, cooked on hot stones. It tastes like the idea of bread as remembered by someone who hasn't eaten bread in years.
Mead is the luxury and the social currency. Fermented from the short summer's wildflower honey, hoarded through the winter like liquid gold. Mead is offered at moots, poured at funerals, exchanged at betrothals. The quality of a clan's mead is a direct index of their status. Clan Aurax's mead — made from mountain heather honey and aged in gold-leaf-lined barrels — is considered the finest on the continent by the handful of outsiders who have ever tasted it.
Music & Oral Tradition
The fire-song. The Frozen South's entire musical tradition, its history, its law, and its identity are encoded in fire-songs — multi-part choral pieces performed around the communal fire, voice only, no instruments. Fire-songs are the repositories of everything: genealogy, territorial claims, battle records, love stories, funeral rites, seasonal knowledge, navigational information, and the names of the dead. They are sung in the old southern dialect — a cousin of Munnish that has diverged so far from the mainland language that a Heartlander hearing a fire-song would recognize perhaps one word in ten.
Every clan has its own fire-songs. Every family has private fire-songs that are never sung outside the household. Children learn the fire-songs before they learn to walk, their mothers singing the clan's history into them at the breast. A clan without fire-songs is a clan without memory, without legitimacy, without existence. The destruction of Clan Hroth — whose fire-songs were ritually silenced after their absorption into Aurax in 940 AF — was not accomplished by the slaughter of their warriors or the seizure of their holds. It was accomplished by the prohibition of their songs. A dead clan can be remembered. A silenced clan cannot.
The fire-songs are not written down. They exist only in the throats of the people who sing them. This is deliberate. The clans believe that writing kills a song the way pinning kills a butterfly — the form is preserved but the life is gone. A fire-song must be sung to exist. It must be heard to matter. It must be remembered to survive. This makes the fire-singers — the men and women whose memories hold the complete songlines of their clan — the most important people in the Frozen South after the chiefs themselves. A fire-singer's murder is a crime worse than regicide. You can replace a chief. You cannot replace a memory.
Beyond fire-songs, the south has a percussion tradition — rhythmic stamping, bone-rattle, and the drumskin (a seal-hide stretched over a whale-rib frame, played with the flat of the hand). Drums accompany work, war-dances, and the whale-hunt. The rhythm is fast, syncopated, and physically demanding to play. A good drummer's hands are calloused to leather.
Religion & Spiritual Practice
The Frozen South is the only region of Mundus that Loveism has never penetrated. Not for lack of trying — the Brothers of the Open Road sent a mission in approximately 1020 AF that reached the edge of the Deadwood, discovered that the forest was impassable, and turned back. A second mission in 1085 AF actually made it through the Deadwood using Roslandic border-guides, reached the first Daudrguard outpost, and was killed to the last man. Their bones were woven into the walls of Grimbone as a warning. A third mission was never attempted.
The clans practice an animistic spirituality that predates the migrations — possibly the oldest continuous religious tradition on the continent. The core belief is simple: the world is alive. Not metaphorically. The mountains breathe. The glaciers think. The sea remembers. The gold in the earth is the earth's blood, and mining it is a wound that must be healed through ritual and offering. The fire in the hearth is a living guest that must be fed and spoken to. The wind is a messenger. The aurora — the shimmering lights that illuminate the winter sky — is the visible breath of the world-spirit, and reading its colors and patterns is the highest form of divination.
There is no priestly caste in the mainland sense — no hierarchy, no scripture, no orthodoxy. Instead, each province has developed its own shamanic tradition, each shaped by the landscape it serves:
The Auren Priests of the Aurheim are the closest thing to an organized clergy. They interpret the will of the mountain — its earthquakes, its eruptions, its moods — and their counsel determines when mines are opened, when shafts are abandoned, and when the mountain demands an offering of gold returned to the earth. They are advisors to the Aurax warlords, and their word carries enormous political weight. A chief who ignores the Auren Priests is a chief who ignores the mountain, and the mountain has a long memory.
The Whaletooth Priests of Is-rim are whale-shamans whose authority derives from the hunt. They bless the longships before they sail, read the whale's death-throes for omens, and perform the Rite of the First Cut — the ceremonial opening of the whale's belly that determines how the meat will be distributed among the clan. A hunt without a Whaletooth Priest's blessing is a blasphemy. A whale killed without the Rite is poisoned meat that will bring sickness to whoever eats it. This is not superstition — or rather, it is superstition that functions as food-safety regulation, because the Rite of the First Cut includes an inspection of the whale's organs for disease that has saved more lives than the priests' theology ever has.
The Treetalkers of the Deadwood commune with the petrified forest — pressing their palms against the stone trunks, listening to vibrations that they interpret as the voices of trees that have been dead for millennia but whose spirits remain imprisoned in the mineral that replaced their wood. The Treetalkers are isolationist, xenophobic, and deeply hostile to any presence they deem "spirit-blind" — which includes all mainlanders and most members of clans other than the Daudrguard. Their prophecies are cryptic, their rituals are disturbing (they swallow chips of petrified wood and claim to dream the forest's memories), and their political influence is absolute within the Deadwood and negligible outside it.
The Burned Priests of the Heitdalr are fire-shamans who practice ritual scarification — burning sacred symbols into their own skin using heated obsidian blades. The scars are a living text, a body-scripture that records the volcano's teachings. Each pattern corresponds to a specific prophecy, warning, or geological truth (the Burned Priests can predict eruptions with startling accuracy, which suggests their mysticism rests on a foundation of practical vulcanology). They are the sole interpreters of the volcano's will, and their word determines whether the Heitdalr's geothermal resources are shared, hoarded, or offered to visitors.
The Whaletooth Compact
The Frozen South's only pan-regional institution. Established in oral tradition long before the empire existed — the fire-songs place its origin "in the time before the ice remembered its own name," which is poetic and unhelpful.
The Compact is the agreement by which the clans coexist. Its terms are simple:
The Winter-Moot gathers once a year, at midwinter, in the Kjölfoss Deeps. Every clan sends its chief and its fire-singer. Attendance is mandatory. Absence is war.
The Pack Leader is named at the Moot to guide the clans for the coming year. The Pack Leader arbitrates disputes, coordinates hunts, allocates shared resources (particularly the Heitdalr's food production), and speaks for the south in any dealings with outsiders. The position is theoretically temporary and theoretically elective. In practice, Clan Aurax has held it for most of recorded memory, because gold buys loyalty and loyalty buys votes.
Disputes between clans are settled at the Moot by one of three methods: negotiation (talking), compensation (paying), or the Holmgang — a ritual single combat between champions of the disputing clans, fought on a marked circle of hide laid on the floor of the great hall. The Holmgang is fought to first blood, not to death (though deaths occur with regularity, because "first blood" from a gold-edged war-axe tends to be followed immediately by "all remaining blood"). The Holmgang's verdict is final. No appeal. No revenge. A clan that refuses to honor a Holmgang result is outcast — stricken from the fire-songs.
The Gold-Right. The Compact acknowledges Clan Aurax's control of the Kjölfoss gold deposits but requires that a portion of the annual yield — the Moot-share — be distributed to all clans in proportion to their size. This provision was the glue that held the system together for centuries. The Aurax paid, and the other clans tolerated Aurax dominance because the alternative — war for the gold — was worse than tribute. The system worked as long as gold remained the only currency that mattered. The arrival of mainland steel has broken that equation.
Fauna
The Frozen South's animal life is sparse, specialized, and dangerous.
Domesticated: The Auric-Horn Yak — a massive, shaggy bovine with horns that develop a golden patina from mineral deposits in the mountain graze, used for milk, meat, hide, and transport. Ice-Treader Reindeer — lighter, faster, used for sledge teams in the interior; their harnesses are hung with bead-bells that ward spirits and, more practically, alert other travelers to an approaching team on blind trails. Sealbulls — semi-domesticated pinnipeds kept in corralled coastal pools for blubber harvests and feast-slaughter.
Wild and predatory: The Glacier Bear — a white-furred giant that stands eight feet at the shoulder, whose claws can shear through ice like glass and through a man's ribcage like wet cloth. Solitary, territorial, and responsible for more deaths per year than all inter-clan violence combined. The Frost Vulpine — a ghost-white fox of unsettling intelligence that folklore says steals the breath of sleeping infants. In reality, it steals food caches and has been observed using coordinated tactics to distract guard dogs while pack-mates raid storage pits.
Messenger animals: The Ivorybeak Goose of Sorn — a fjord-courier trained to carry knotted strap-messages between coastal settlements; reliable in summer, useless in winter storms. The Snow-Kite — a high-pass raptor bred by the Beinsverd mountain clan, trained to fly whistle-code messages and, during the brief winter twilight, to carry small lanterns on their leg-straps to signal across distances that ground-messengers cannot cover in the dark. The Snow-Kites are one of the south's most closely guarded assets. Their breeding pairs are never sold and their training methods are clan secrets.
Cryptid and legendary: The Aurora Serpent — a sky-creature allegedly seen swimming through the northern lights during deep winter, its body a ribbon of luminescence that ripples and coils through the aurora's curtains. No physical evidence exists. Every clan has stories. The fire-songs treat it as real. The Gold Griffin — once supposedly native to the Kjölfoss peaks, its feathers and bones were ground into smithing compounds that gave Aurax goldwork its legendary warmth and luster. No living specimen has been seen in recorded history. Whether the Gold Griffin was a real creature, a misidentified raptor, or a retrospective myth invented to explain why Aurax gold is better than everyone else's is a question that only the Auren Priests claim to be able to answer, and they're not talking.

III. THE FOUR PROVINCES
AURHEIM — The Gold-Rich Mountain Province
Ruling Dynasty: Clan Aurax — Gold mining warlords Vassal/Rival Clan: Clan Beinsverd — Ice-touched mountain warriors Spiritual Authority: The Auren Priests — Shamans and wisemen of the clans Major Settlement: Auren — The golden tribal fortress, built into the Kjölfoss Deeps Population (estimated, 1308 AF): 8,000–10,000
The Aurheim is the roof of the south and the seat of its power. Everything about it is vertical — the mountains, the mine shafts, the social hierarchy. The Kjölfoss peaks are among the youngest mountains on the continent, sharp and jagged where older ranges are worn to rounded hills, their granite flanks shot through with quartz veins that carry gold in concentrations found nowhere else on Mundus. The gold is not hidden. It is visible — veins of yellow-white running through exposed cliff faces, glittering in stream-beds where erosion has washed nuggets downslope, catching the low winter sun and throwing it back as if the mountains themselves were showing off.
Clan Aurax controls the gold and has for as long as anyone can remember. The fire-songs trace the Aurax bloodline back to a figure called Aur-kyn — literally "gold-kin" — who the songs say was born inside the mountain, delivered from a crack in the rock during an earthquake, caked in gold dust, screaming. Whether this is myth, metaphor, or embellished memory of a mine-collapse survivor is immaterial. The Aurax believe it. Their right to rule derives from it. The mountain chose them. The gold is their birthright.
The current Aurax chief — Warlord Thane Eirikr Aurax — is approximately fifty years old, which in the Frozen South means he is entering the period of maximum authority. He has held the Pack Leader title for seven consecutive Moots. He is massive even by southern standards — six foot seven, two hundred and eighty pounds of muscle, scar tissue, and political calculation — and he is the first Aurax chief in generations who is genuinely trying to transform the Pack Leader position from a temporary appointment into a permanent throne.
Eirikr's strategy is simple: use the gold. He has expanded the Moot-share distributions, funding new longhouses for minor clans, commissioning gold-work for chiefs who show loyalty, and hosting feasts of unprecedented lavishness in the Kjölfoss Deeps. He has also begun secret trade with the mainland through House Corbeau, exchanging raw gold for steel weapons, grain, and mainland medicines. The steel has given Aurax warriors a decisive military advantage — their blades hold an edge in the extreme cold where obsidian shatters and bone-weapons chip. But the trade has also made Aurax dependent on a supply chain that runs through the Deadwood, which Clan Daudrguard controls, which means the trade that was supposed to cement Aurax independence has actually created a new vulnerability.
Clan Beinsverd are the Aurheim's other power — ice-touched mountain warriors who guard the high passes connecting the Aurheim to the rest of the peninsula. The Beinsverd are smaller than the Aurax, leaner, adapted to the thinner air of the extreme altitudes where they maintain their holds. They are called "ice-touched" because of a peculiar physiological trait: Beinsverd warriors can tolerate cold that would kill other clansmen. Their exposed skin turns a faint blue-white in extreme temperatures, a circulation adaptation that prevents frostbite at the cost of making them look, to outsiders, like walking corpses. Whether this is genetic adaptation, a result of the mineral-rich hot springs they bathe in from infancy, or — as the Beinsverd themselves claim — a gift from the mountain's spirit, is debated.
The Beinsverd chief — Thane Skaði Beinsverd — is a woman of forty-five, hard as the granite she was raised on, and she despises Eirikr Aurax with a cold, patient hatred that she has cultivated for twenty years. Her grievance is specific: in 1288 AF, during the Aurax Gold War, Eirikr promised the Beinsverd a greater share of the gold yield in exchange for military support. The Beinsverd fought. The Beinsverd bled. The promised gold never came. Skaði has never forgotten. She has also never said a word about it publicly, because the Beinsverd are outnumbered and outweighed and premature confrontation would be suicide. She is waiting. She is watching the Aurax chief build his throne out of foreign steel and mainland promises, and she is counting the cracks.
The Auren Priests are the wildcard. Their traditional role is advisory — they interpret the mountain's will and the clans obey. But the priesthood is splitting. The elder priests, led by the ancient Galdrekr the Stoneblind — a seer who blinded himself forty years ago in imitation of the mountain's darkness (or in imitation of the Ayanite Blind Daughters, though he would burn alive before admitting any mainland influence) — oppose the mainland trade as a spiritual contamination. Foreign metal in southern earth. Foreign grain in southern bellies. Foreign ideas in southern minds. Galdrekr has prophesied that the mountain will "cough gold and swallow blood" if the trade continues, and his prophecies have been accurate often enough that ignoring them is politically dangerous.
The younger priests, led by a sharp-minded opportunist named Kolgrimr, see the trade as the south's salvation. More gold means more offerings. More offerings means the mountain is pleased. Steel weapons mean fewer Aurax warriors die in the mines when tunnels collapse and fewer die in border skirmishes with Raudbjorn raiders. Kolgrimr has positioned himself as Eirikr's spiritual advisor and is whispering that the Pack Leader title should be made permanent — that the mountain itself demands a king.
The Auren Priests have never been this divided. The schism mirrors the larger fracture running through the entire Frozen South: tradition against adaptation, isolation against engagement, the old ways against a future that is arriving whether anyone invited it or not.

IS-RIM — The Frozen Coastal Lowlands
Ruling Dynasty: House Raudbjorn — Fierce coastal raiders Subjugated Rival: House Bearclaw — Ice fishers and seal hunters Spiritual Authority: Whaletooth Priests — Whale-hunting shamans Major Settlement: Iceharbor — The frozen port Population (estimated, 1308 AF): 46,000–60,000
Is-rim is the Frozen South's window to the sea and, increasingly, its doorway to the world. The province occupies the peninsula's western coast — a brutal landscape of deep fjords, grinding glaciers, and the frigid open ocean that stretches westward toward nothing anyone has ever returned from mapping. The air is thick with salt spray, rendered whale-oil smoke, and the iron scent of blood on ice that is the constant perfume of a whaling culture.
The coast is where the south's most ruthless people live, because the coast is where the south's most ruthless environment is. The fjord settlements cling to narrow ledges of habitable land between the water and the cliff, their longhouses built so close to the high-tide line that storm surges regularly flood the lower rooms. The response to flooding is not to move uphill — there is no uphill — but to build the sleeping platforms higher and to teach children to swim before they can walk. Is-rim children are in the water from infancy, their skin oiled against the cold, their lungs trained to hold breath for the long dives that are necessary for kelp-harvesting and under-ice fishing. By adulthood, a coastal clansman can swim in water that would kill a mainlander in minutes, and they consider this a basic life skill rather than an achievement worth mentioning.
House Raudbjorn — the "Red Bears" — have ruled Iceharbor since before the fire-songs can remember. They are raiders, whalers, and opportunists, and they have never pretended to be anything else. Where the Aurax buy loyalty with gold, the Raudbjorns take it with violence. Their longships — fast, shallow-drafted, crewed by warriors who row into battle singing the killing-songs that coordinate their stroke — have raided every settlement on the peninsula at least once and most of them repeatedly. The Raudbjorns do not apologize for this. Raiding is how a coast-clan survives when the fishing is bad and the seal herds have moved. It is economic policy conducted with axes.
The current Raudbjorn chief — Warlord Hreiðar Raudbjorn — is forty-two years old and the most dangerous man in the Frozen South, though few outside Is-rim realize it yet. Hreiðar is not the biggest Raudbjorn (his brother Tormund is larger) or the best fighter (his cousin Sigga has more Holmgang victories) or the most charismatic (his dead wife Yrsa was the one people followed). What Hreiðar is, uniquely and lethally, is patient. He can wait. He can plan. He can smile at a man he intends to kill and make the smile look genuine for years before the blade comes out.
Hreiðar's masterstroke was the Salt-Thaw Bargain — the event that has remade the Frozen South. In approximately 1300 AF, a Roslandic trading vessel, blown off course by a winter storm, washed up in the shallows of Iceharbor with a cargo of steel tools, grain, salted pork, and woolen cloth. The crew was terrified. The Raudbjorns were fascinated. Hreiðar — already chief, already thinking — did not slaughter the sailors. He fed them. He housed them. He learned enough of their language over four months of forced hospitality to understand what they carried and what they wanted. What they wanted was safe harbor, repairs, and to leave. What they carried was steel.
Hreiðar let them leave. He also made them a deal: come back with more steel, more grain, more mainland goods. In exchange, he would provide gold (taken from Aurax tribute), seal-fur, whale-oil, and safe harbor for Roslandic ships. The Roslandic captain — a man named Harken Goss, a minor agent of House Gorban, the Roslandic border wardens — agreed because he recognized the profit potential and because Hreiðar had made it clear, with tremendous politeness, that the alternative to agreement was a shallow grave in the permafrost.
The Salt-Thaw Bargain transformed Iceharbor. Within five years, Raudbjorn warriors were armed with mainland steel — swords, axes, spearheads, mail-shirts that turned the bone-tipped arrows of rival clans into irritants rather than killing blows. The effect was immediate and devastating. Hreiðar launched the Steel Tithe — a campaign of systematic conquest along the coast, demanding tribute from every lesser clan and subjugating those who refused. House Bearclaw — the patient, skilled ice-fishers and seal-hunters who had balanced Raudbjorn power for generations — were the first to fall. Their chief, an old man named Bjálki Bearclaw, surrendered after a single battle in which his bone-armed warriors were slaughtered by steel-clad Raudbjorn berserkers. Bjálki was allowed to live — shaved, humiliated, stripped of his clan-marker — as an object lesson. His people were absorbed into the Raudbjorn labor force, their fire-songs permitted only as addenda to Raudbjorn songs, their identity erased in everything but the memory of those old enough to remember what it meant.
The Whaletooth Priests are in chaos. Their authority has always derived from the whale-hunt — the ability to bless the ships, read the omens, and ensure that the hunt was conducted according to the ancient rituals. But Hreiðar's new power comes from steel, not whales. Some priests have aligned with the Raudbjorns, declaring their military success a divine sign — proof that the sea-gods favor the strong and the cunning. Others have fled to the minor clans, preaching that the Raudbjorns have sold the south's soul for foreign iron and that the whale-spirits will exact payment in blood. The schism in the priesthood mirrors the schism in the clans, and it is producing a theological crisis: if the gods favor strength, then do the gods favor the outsiders who forged the steel? If the sea blesses the hunt, does it also bless the trade that has made the hunt unnecessary?
Hreiðar's next move is the Winter-Moot. He is coming to Auren not to vote, not to negotiate, and not to bend the knee. He is coming to challenge Eirikr Aurax for the title of Pack Leader — and he is bringing an army clad in mainland steel to make the challenge meaningful. The Raudbjorns have never held the Pack Leader title. They have never wanted it. What Hreiðar wants is not the title but the precedent: proof that gold is no longer the only currency that matters. Proof that the Compact can be rewritten. Proof that the future belongs to whoever is willing to reach outside the south and grab it.
Iceharbor is no longer just a port. It is the beachhead of a revolution, and the wave it has unleashed is about to crash against the ancient mountains of the Aurheim.

DAUDR-VIDR (THE DEADWOOD) — The Petrified Forest Region
Ruling Dynasty: Clan Daudrguard — Wardens of the north Vassal Clans: Clan Vidrskjold — Wood harvesters and forest keepers; Clan Hvitfot — Rangers and scouts Spiritual Authority: The Treetalkers — Wood shamans Major Settlement: Grimbone — The fortress of ice and stone Population (estimated, 1308 AF): 24,000–35,000
The Deadwood is the Frozen South's shield, and Clan Daudrguard is its blade.
The Daudr-vidr is not a forest in any living sense. It is a cemetery of trees — hundreds of square miles of petrified trunks and branches, their wood replaced over millennia by silica and iron minerals until every trunk is stone, every branch is stone, every fallen needle is a tiny crystal spike that crunches underfoot like broken glass. The trees stand where they died, bone-white and rigid, their stone branches reaching toward a sky they will never feel again. In winter, when the ice accumulates on the petrified limbs and the wind moans through gaps that were once knotholes, the Deadwood sounds like an organ played by something that doesn't understand music.
The petrification process rendered the forest indestructible by fire, impenetrable by axe, and navigable only by people who have spent their lives learning its paths. The Deadwood has no roads. It has game-trails that shift when ice-storms topple petrified trunks, seasonal waterways that freeze into traversable corridors in winter and become impassable cataracts in the brief thaw, and the secret paths that the Hvitfot rangers maintain — routes marked by subtle signs (a chip in a trunk, a bone wedged in a fork, a pattern of lichen that is not natural lichen but cultivated marker-moss) that are invisible to anyone who doesn't know the code. An army entering the Deadwood without Daudrguard guides will get lost within a mile and die within a week.
Clan Daudrguard has been the Deadwood's Warden-clan since before the fire-songs differentiated between history and myth. Their legitimacy does not come from gold, from conquest, or from divine appointment. It comes from a single, unarguable fact: they have kept the south safe. Every invasion from the mainland — every imperial probing expedition, every Roslandic scouting party, every Church mission, every ambitious merchant — has died in the Deadwood, killed by the forest, the cold, or the Daudrguard warriors who know both intimately enough to weaponize them.
The current Warden-Chief — Thane Vigrún Daudrguard — is a woman of fifty-three who has personally killed more mainland intruders than any Warden in five generations. She is lean where most southerners are broad, wiry where they are thick, with the coiled, ready stillness of a woman who has spent her life ambushing people in terrain that the gods designed specifically for ambushes. Her face is scarred — a Roslandic scout's steel blade opened her left cheek from ear to jaw in 1297 AF, a wound she treats as a trophy rather than a disfigurement. The scar pulled her mouth into a permanent half-smile that makes her look amused even when she is furious, which is most of the time.
Vigrún's politics are simple: the south is for the south. Outsiders are contamination. The Aurax trade with House Corbeau is treason. The Raudbjorn trade with Roslandic merchants is treason. Any clan that brings foreign steel, foreign grain, or foreign ideas through the Deadwood is an enemy of every fire-song ever sung. She has enforced this position with lethal finality.
The Spear-Winter (1296–present) is Vigrún's ongoing campaign against mainland incursion. Roslandic scouts — sent by House Ironside to investigate rumors of southern gold — have been entering the Deadwood with increasing frequency since 1295 AF. Vigrún's response has been systematic and terrifying: every patrol that enters the forest vanishes. No survivors. No bodies. No messages sent back. The only sign that anything happened is the occasional steel spearhead left embedded in a petrified trunk at the forest's northern edge, point facing north — a message that requires no translation.
The disappearances have not gone unnoticed in Rosland. House Gorban, the border wardens, has filed reports. House Ironside, consumed with domestic politics, has filed them away. When they eventually read those reports, they will find that the Deadwood has swallowed approximately forty men in three years and that the forest is sending back their weapons as postcards.
Clan Vidrskjold — the wood-harvesters — are the Deadwood's artisans. They have developed techniques for working petrified wood that no other clan possesses: carving, grinding, and polishing the stone-timber into weapons, tools, building materials, and the hauntingly beautiful household objects (bowls, cups, figurines) that are the Deadwood's only export. Vidrskjold petrified-wood weapons are the Deadwood's answer to mainland steel — in extreme cold, the crystalline structure of the stone-wood becomes harder than iron, and a Vidrskjold war-club can shatter a steel blade if the temperature drops below a certain threshold. This is not reliable enough to be a true military advantage (the temperature has to be genuinely Arctic), but it is reliable enough to be terrifying.
Clan Hvitfot — the "White-Foot" rangers — are scouts, trackers, and the Deadwood's intelligence network. They move through the forest in near-silence, their feet wrapped in white seal-skin that blends with the ice and stone, their movements coordinated by a system of whistle-calls that mimic the wind sounds of the petrified branches. A Hvitfot scout can follow a target through the Deadwood for days without being detected, and their kill reports to Vigrún are delivered with a dispassionate precision that would impress a Magos archivist.
The Treetalkers are the Deadwood's spiritual authority and its most unsettling inhabitants. They believe the petrified trees are not dead but sleeping — that the minerals that replaced the wood also preserved the spirits of the trees, trapping them in stone prisons where they have dreamed for millennia. The Treetalkers claim to hear these dreams. They press their palms and ears against the petrified trunks, entering trance states that last hours or days, and emerge with pronouncements that the clan treats as prophecy. Their current prophecy is grim: the trees are dreaming of fire. Not the fire of the volcano — the fire of the forge. Foreign fire. Fire that reshapes the natural into the useful, that turns ore into blade, tree into plank, freedom into servitude.
Vigrún is marching to the Winter-Moot. She is not going to vote. She is not going to negotiate. She is going to deliver an ultimatum: expel every outsider from the Frozen South, destroy every piece of foreign steel, sever every trade connection with the mainland — or the Deadwood will close. Permanently. No gold will leave the south. No goods will enter. The Daudrguard will seal the border with blood and stone-wood, and the mountain clans can eat their gold while the coast clans can drink their seawater, and the Heitdalr can choose whose side it prefers to burn on.
It is not an empty threat. The Daudrguard control the only land route out of the peninsula. If they close the Deadwood, the south is cut off from the continent entirely.

HEITDALR — The Volcanic Coastal Region
Ruling Dynasty: Clan Eldblod — Lords of fire Allied Clan: Clan Svartselr — Masters of the volcanic coastal waters Spiritual Authority: The Burned Priests — Fire shamans Major Settlement: Hotstone — The warm city in the ice Population (estimated, 1308 AF): 13,000–24,000
The Heitdalr is a land that shouldn't exist — a volcanic province where rivers of molten rock flow into seas of ice and the air smells simultaneously of sulfur and snow. The landscape is a battlefield between geological forces: steam vents hissing through glacial moraine, hot springs bubbling in meadows ringed by permafrost, black basalt cliffs still warm from eruptions that happened centuries ago standing beside blue-white glaciers that have been grinding forward since before humans arrived. The Heitdalr is beautiful in the way that a knife is beautiful — the beauty is in the precision of its contradictions.
Hotstone sits in a geothermally heated valley where the ground temperature stays above freezing year-round. The city — if a settlement of three thousand souls can be called a city — is built around a network of hot springs that the Eldblod have channeled into a heating system of startling sophistication: stone-lined channels carry hot water beneath the floors of every building, warming them from below. The result is a settlement where breath doesn't fog indoors, where vegetables grow in greenhouses fed by volcanic steam, and where the daily bath — in a communal hot-spring pool that serves simultaneously as bathhouse, meeting hall, and social club — is the single most important ritual in Heitdalr life. Deals are struck in the pools. Feuds are settled in the pools. Children are named in the pools. A person who refuses to bathe communally is a person with something to hide, and the Heitdalr does not tolerate hidden things.
Clan Eldblod rules the Heitdalr not through military force — they are the smallest major clan — but through knowledge. They are the keepers of the warmth. They know which valleys are safe to build in, which volcanic vents are predictable and which are lethal, where to dig for obsidian without triggering a collapse, and how to read the mountain's moods in the color of its steam and the temperature of its springs. This knowledge is survival itself. A settlement built in the wrong valley will be buried in lava within a generation. A mine dug in the wrong direction will hit a gas pocket that kills everyone inside. The Eldblod have been getting these decisions right for centuries, and their record is their claim to power.
The current Eldblod chief — Thane Hrafnkel Eldblod — is sixty years old, gentle-voiced, and possibly the most politically intelligent person in the Frozen South. Where Eirikr Aurax thinks in terms of dominance and Hreiðar Raudbjorn thinks in terms of force, Hrafnkel thinks in terms of necessity. Every clan needs the Heitdalr's food. Every clan needs the Heitdalr's obsidian. Every clan needs the Heitdalr's warmth, even if that warmth is only the knowledge that warmth exists somewhere and that refuge is possible if winter turns truly murderous. This makes the Heitdalr the fulcrum on which the entire southern balance rests, and Hrafnkel has spent his life keeping that fulcrum level.
Neutrality has been the Heitdalr's policy since before Hrafnkel was born, and he has maintained it with a diplomat's skill and a survivor's ruthlessness. When the Aurax Gold War erupted in 1285, Hrafnkel supplied food to all sides — at a markup. When the Raudbjorn began their Steel Tithe, Hrafnkel offered shelter to refugees from the conquered Bearclaw clan — and charged them for it in labor. When the Daudrguard sealed the northern border, Hrafnkel sent a gift of obsidian blades to Vigrún with a note expressing admiration for her resolve — and simultaneously sent a gift of volcanic glass to Eirikr Aurax with a note expressing concern about Daudrguard aggression. He plays every side because he can afford to. Everyone needs what the Heitdalr has.
But the neutrality is fracturing. The three-way crisis — Aurax ambition, Raudbjorn militarism, Daudrguard isolationism — has created pressures that balance cannot withstand. The Aurax want Heitdalr food to feed their growing garrison of mainland mercenaries. The Raudbjorns want Heitdalr obsidian to arm the warriors who haven't yet received steel. The Daudrguard want a commitment: choose the south or be treated as a traitor. Hrafnkel cannot give all three what they want. He cannot give any of them what they want without antagonizing the other two. The careful neutrality that has protected the Heitdalr for generations has become a trap, and the walls are closing in.
Clan Svartselr — the "Black-Seal" sailors — are the Heitdalr's naval arm. They have mastered the volcanic coast's treacherous waters, where underwater vents create sudden temperature differentials that can crack a ship's hull, where sulfurous fog reduces visibility to nothing, and where the currents shift unpredictably as the seabed vents open and close. Svartselr sailors navigate by smell (the sulfur content of the air indicates proximity to active vents), by water temperature (hands trailed over the gunwale, feeling for the warm currents that mark safe channels), and by a kind of intuitive seamanship that cannot be taught and can only be developed through years of experience and the deaths of everyone who developed it wrong.
The Burned Priests are issuing warnings. The volcano — the Heitdalr's patron, protector, and potential destroyer — is "growing angry." The priests interpret this anger through the increasing frequency of minor tremors, the rising temperature of the deep springs, and the changing color of the summit steam from white to yellow. Whether this represents genuine volcanic activity or the priests' attempt to leverage geological anxiety into political influence is impossible to determine from the outside. From the inside, it doesn't matter. The Heitdalr believes its priests, because the last time the volcano was angry — approximately three hundred years ago — it buried an entire valley in ash and killed four hundred people.
Hrafnkel is going to the Winter-Moot as a man walking a razor's edge. He carries no army, no ultimatum, no challenge. He carries the one thing that every other chief in the south needs and none of them can produce: food that grows when everything else is frozen. His vote — for Aurax or Raudbjorn or Daudrguard or none of them — will likely determine the outcome of the Moot. And every faction knows it. And every faction is making offers. And every offer comes with a threat attached to its underside like a tick on a dog.

IV. COMPLETE HISTORY
The Deep Past (Before 903 AF)
The Frozen South's human history predates reliable chronology. The fire-songs — the oldest continuous oral tradition on the continent — claim an origin so ancient that the concept of "arrival" is absent from the lexicon. The songs say the southern people "were born from the mountain's breath," and the oldest genealogies do not begin with a migration or a landing but with a name: a person who was simply there, as if humanity in the south had always existed and merely needed to be noticed.
The Magos take this seriously. Archaeological evidence — stone tools found in glacial deposits that predate known migration patterns by millennia, cave paintings in the Kjölfoss that depict animals no living person has ever seen — suggests that the Frozen South's population may be indigenous in the fullest sense: people who were there before anyone else arrived, who absorbed later migrants so completely that the distinction between "original" and "arrived" dissolved into the gene pool and the fire-songs without a trace.
During the Age of Republics (roughly 3,000–500 BE), the Frozen South had no contact with mainland political developments. The Deadwood was impassable, the sea route around the peninsula was suicidal in the prevailing currents, and neither the republican city-states nor their successors had any reason to attempt the journey.
During the Age of Fire (the Nionic Empire), contact was marginally more substantial. Imperial scouts reached the Deadwood's northern edge during Nion IV's expansionist campaigns (approximately 400 AF) and reported "a forest of stone trees beyond which nothing lives." A single successful imperial expedition — during the reign of Nion IX (approximately 600 AF) — penetrated the Deadwood using a coastal route and reached Raudbjorn territory. The expedition's commander left a fragmentary account describing "men of great size who fish from boats made of skin and who wear gold ornaments of such artistry that our own jewelers could not replicate them." The expedition withdrew after the Raudbjorns made clear that visitors were welcome to leave or welcome to die.
The empire classified the Frozen South as "tributary in name, independent in fact" and collected no taxes, posted no garrisons, and exercised no authority.
The Age of Faith — Period by Period
The Shattering (903–950 AF):
The empire's dissolution was a non-event in the south. The only significant event was the Destruction of Clan Hroth (c. 940 AF). Clan Hroth — a mountain clan feuding with Aurax for generations over secondary gold deposits — was destroyed through deliberate starvation. Warlord Bjarn Aurax refused to share grain stores during a killing winter. Hroth starved. The survivors were absorbed into Aurax and their fire-songs ritually silenced — every Hroth name, deed, and memory erased from the oral record. The destruction of Hroth set the precedent that the Whaletooth Compact's protections were contingent on power, not principle.
The Age of Orders (950–1050 AF):
The Ice-Road Wars (c. 980–990 AF): Clan Raudbjorn attempted to establish winter trade routes across the frozen interior, bypassing Aurax-controlled mountain passes. Aurax raided the caravans, destroyed way-caches, and collapsed bridge-points. Ten years of seasonal skirmishing — brutal in winter when the ice-roads were usable, suspended in summer when the ice melted. Ended inconclusively. The ice-roads were abandoned. But the wars established the Raudbjorn-Aurax rivalry as the defining tension of southern politics.
The Lovist Church sent its first mission to the Deadwood in approximately 1020 AF. The Brothers of the Open Road reached the forest edge, discovered it was impassable, and turned back. A second mission in 1085 AF made it through with Roslandic guides, reached a Daudrguard outpost, and was killed to the last man. Their bones were woven into the walls of Grimbone.
The Century of Blood (1050–1150 AF):
The First Gold War (c. 1070–1080 AF): Clan Raudbjorn, under Chief Hreiðar the Elder (ancestor of the current Hreiðar), attempted to seize the Kjölfoss Deeps. The assault was bold, well-planned, and doomed. Coastal raiders operating in mountain terrain they did not understand were funneled into mine-shaft approaches where Aurax miners fought with hammers and picks in close quarters. Ten years of fighting in conditions that would make a Roslandic veteran weep — winter battles on ice-covered slopes, night ambushes in blizzard whiteouts, clashes in mine tunnels too low to stand in. Aurax won through attrition and terrain advantage. Raudbjorn was forced to pay tribute in whale-oil and seal-fur for a full generation. The defeat created a permanent grudge.
The Golden Century (1150–1250 AF):
Relative peace. Aurax dominance unchallenged. The Winter-Moot functioned. Cultural traditions crystallized. Goldsmithing reached its peak — the Aurax smiths of this century produced pieces no subsequent generation has equaled. The fire-song tradition was formalized.
The Beinsverd Oath (c. 1200 AF): Clan Beinsverd negotiated a formal compact with Aurax — military service for autonomy and a dedicated gold share. The arrangement worked for a century. It stopped working when Eirikr Aurax broke its terms.
The Long Peace and Its Cracks (1250–1308 AF):
The Wildwoman's Bargain (c. 1270 AF): Ser Edric Corbeau — a Heartlander knight patrolling the Deadwood borderlands — encountered Sinna, an Aurax clanwoman, in the northern Deadwood. They fell in love across the language barrier, meeting at a specific clearing, exchanging gifts (his steel knife, her gold torc), building shared vocabulary from gesture and repetition. Sinna returned to Clan Aurax and argued for trade with the mainland, presenting the steel knife as proof. Warlord Gunnar Aurax authorized a trial. The first gold-for-goods trade began c. 1272 AF — raw gold through the Deadwood to House Corbeau's trading posts, steel and grain flowing back. The trade was secret from other clans. It enriched both parties and gave Aurax a decisive military advantage.
The Aurax Gold War (c. 1285–1290 AF): The secret trade was discovered. Raudbjorn and Daudrguard declared war on Aurax. Five years of vicious winter warfare. Aurax won — steel weapons gave them a decisive edge. The turning point: the Battle of Frost-Hollow (1289 AF), where the young Eirikr Aurax led a steel-armed strike force through a blizzard to catch a Raudbjorn war-camp unprepared. The Raudbjorn chief — Hreiðar the Elder — was captured, shaved, and sent home on foot. He died within three months. The Winter-Moot of 1291 confirmed Aurax dominance.
The Spear-Winter (1296–present): Vigrún Daudrguard's campaign against Roslandic scouts entering the Deadwood. Approximately forty men killed in three years. Their weapons left as warnings.
The Salt-Thaw Bargain (c. 1300 AF): A Roslandic trading vessel washed up in Iceharbor. Hreiðar Raudbjorn recognized the opportunity, learned the crew's language, and struck a trade deal with Captain Harken Goss. Steel weapons flooded the coast.
The Steel Tithe (c. 1302–1307 AF): Hreiðar's conquest of the coastal clans using mainland steel. House Bearclaw subjugated. Chief Bjálki shaved and broken.
The Giants Arrive (1308 AF): Two Giants — Thyra of the Brúnaveld and Grevaan of the Gahlmarr — survived a shipwreck off the Frozen South's coast. One juvenile mammoth survived with them. They are in Raudbjorn territory. Hreiðar is keeping them secret.

V. CURRENT STATE OF AFFAIRS — 1308 AF
The Convergence
Everything is converging on the Winter-Moot.
Four chiefs are traveling to the Kjölfoss Deeps. Each brings a different weapon. Each intends a different outcome. None of them fully understands what the others are bringing.
Eirikr Aurax arrives as Pack Leader, expecting to be confirmed for life. His weapon is gold and the inertia of tradition. He believes the Moot is a coronation.
Hreiðar Raudbjorn arrives as a challenger, armed with mainland steel and the fury of a clan that has spent a generation nursing a blood-grudge. He intends to challenge Eirikr for the Pack Leader title through Holmgang — steel against gold-plated bone-weapons. Not a contest. An execution.
Vigrún Daudrguard arrives with her war-leaders and her ultimatum. Her weapon is geography — the Deadwood's impassability, the border she can seal with a word. She wants the south purged of foreign contamination. If the Moot refuses, she will close the Deadwood permanently.
Hrafnkel Eldblod arrives carrying no army, no challenge, and no ultimatum. His weapon is food — the Heitdalr's year-round agriculture. Whoever he supports will eat through the winter. Whoever he opposes will not. His vote is the deciding vote, and he has not yet decided how to cast it.
And somewhere on the coast, in a Raudbjorn camp that no one else knows about, two Giants are waiting. One of them is listening to the ground. The other is watching a mammoth calf eat snow. Neither of them knows what the Winter-Moot is. Neither of them knows that their presence — if revealed — would change everything.
The Frozen South has survived for millennia by being too cold, too remote, and too difficult to conquer. That era is ending. The mainland is coming — in the form of steel weapons, trade goods, scouting parties, and the insatiable hunger for gold that drives empires to the ends of the earth. The clans can adapt, resist, or destroy each other fighting about which option to choose.
The fire-songs will remember whatever happens next. That is the one certainty left.

VI. NAMED CHARACTERS (Reference)
Major Chiefs
Name
Age
Role
Province
Warlord Thane Eirikr Aurax
~50
Pack Leader, lord of Kjölfoss Deeps
Aurheim
Warlord Hreiðar Raudbjorn
~42
Chief of Is-rim, architect of Salt-Thaw Bargain
Is-rim
Warden-Chief Vigrún Daudrguard
~53
Warden of the Deadwood, executioner of Spear-Winter
Deadwood
Thane Hrafnkel Eldblod
~60
Lord of Hotstone, keeper of the warmth
Heitdalr
Thane Skaði Beinsverd
~45
Chief of ice-touched warriors, nursing 20-year grudge
Aurheim

Spiritual Leaders
Name
Role
Allegiance
Galdrekr the Stoneblind
Elder Auren Priest, self-blinded seer
Anti-trade, pro-tradition
Kolgrimr
Young Auren Priest, Eirikr's advisor
Pro-trade, pro-kingship
The Treetalkers (collective)
Wood shamans of the Deadwood
Daudrguard isolationism
The Burned Priests (collective)
Fire shamans of the Heitdalr
Warning of volcanic anger
Whaletooth Priests (divided)
Whale shamans of Is-rim
Split between pro/anti-Raudbjorn

Supporting Characters
Name
Role
Status
Tormund Raudbjorn
Hreiðar's brother, larger than the chief
Active, Is-rim
Sigga Raudbjorn
Hreiðar's cousin, best Holmgang fighter
Active, Is-rim
Yrsa Raudbjorn
Hreiðar's dead wife, the charismatic one
Deceased
Bjálki Bearclaw
Last independent Bearclaw chief
Alive, shaved, broken
Harken Goss
Roslandic captain, struck Salt-Thaw Bargain
Possibly still in Iceharbor

Historical Figures
Name
Date
Significance
Aur-kyn
Mythic
Legendary Aurax founder, "born from the mountain"
Bjarn Aurax
c. 940 AF
Destroyed Clan Hroth through starvation
Styrr Aurax
c. 980 AF
Fought the Ice-Road Wars against Raudbjorn
Hreiðar the Elder
d. c. 1290 AF
Raudbjorn chief, defeated and shaved at Frost-Hollow
Gunnar Aurax
d. c. 1288 AF
Authorized first mainland trade. Eirikr's father
Sinna of the South
c. 1270 AF
Brokered the Wildwoman's Bargain with Ser Edric Corbeau

Giants (Secret — Raudbjorn territory)
Name
Age
Description
Thyra of the Brúnaveld
~90 (Giant)
Mammoth-herder. Carries dead bondmate's consciousness. Keeper of last mammoth calf.
Grevaan of the Gahlmarr
~65 (Giant)
Tunnel-engineer, stone-reader. Senses echo-field through bedrock. Terrified by open sky.


VII. KEY LOCATIONS
Auren / The Kjölfoss Deeps — Aurax seat. Underground fortress-city. Site of the Winter-Moot. Gold-veined walls, geothermally heated, capacity ~3,000 during Moot.
Iceharbor — Raudbjorn seat. Coastal port. Now open to mainland traders. Hub of the Steel Tithe.
Grimbone — Daudrguard seat. Fortress built into the petrified forest. More scar than city.
Hotstone — Eldblod seat. Geothermally heated valley-town. Hot springs, greenhouses, the south's only year-round food production.
The Deadwood (Daudr-vidr) — Petrified forest. Natural barrier. Hundred miles deep. Impassable without guides.
The Kjölfoss Range — Mountain spine of the peninsula. Gold deposits. Volcanic roots. Young, sharp, still growing.
The Beinsjór (Bone-Sea) — Eastern coast. Cliff-drops, lethal currents, whale-bone beaches.
Frost-Hollow — Site of the 1289 AF massacre. Raudbjorn pilgrimage site for vengeance oaths.

VIII. KEY EVENTS TIMELINE
Date (AF)
Event
Deep past
Indigenous population. Fire-songs claim autochthonous origin.
c. 400 AF
Imperial scouts reach Deadwood edge. Report "stone forest, nothing beyond."
c. 600 AF
Single imperial expedition reaches Raudbjorn coast. Withdraws under threat.
903 AF
Empire dissolves. South unaffected.
c. 940 AF
Clan Hroth destroyed by Aurax starvation and fire-song erasure.
c. 980–990 AF
Ice-Road Wars. Raudbjorn vs. Aurax. Inconclusive.
c. 1020 AF
First Lovist mission reaches Deadwood. Turns back.
c. 1070–1080 AF
First Gold War. Raudbjorn attempt to seize Kjölfoss Deeps. Fail.
c. 1085 AF
Second Lovist mission enters Deadwood with guides. Killed by Daudrguard.
c. 1200 AF
Beinsverd Oath. Formal compact with Aurax for military service.
c. 1270 AF
Sinna and Ser Edric Corbeau meet in the Deadwood.
c. 1272 AF
First gold-for-goods trade with House Corbeau. Secret.
c. 1285–1290 AF
Aurax Gold War. Raudbjorn + Daudrguard vs. Aurax. Aurax victory. Battle of Frost-Hollow (1289).
1291 AF
Winter-Moot confirms Aurax dominance. Daudrguard seal border.
c. 1295 AF
Roslandic scouts begin entering Deadwood.
c. 1296–present
Spear-Winter. Daudrguard kill ~40 Roslandic scouts.
c. 1300 AF
Salt-Thaw Bargain. Hreiðar opens Iceharbor to mainland traders. Steel enters the south.
c. 1302–1307 AF
Steel Tithe. Raudbjorn conquer coastal clans. Bearclaw subjugated.
1308 AF
Giants arrive (Thyra and Grevaan). Raudbjorn secret.
1308 AF
Winter-Moot imminent. Four chiefs converge. Crisis point.


IX. THEMATIC TENSIONS (For Narrative Use)
Tradition vs. Adaptation. Can a culture survive contact with the outside world without losing the things that made it worth preserving? The Aurax say yes. The Daudrguard say no. The Raudbjorns say the question is irrelevant — power is what matters. The Heitdalr says all three are right and all three are wrong, and tries to keep everyone alive long enough to figure out which.
Gold vs. Steel. The old currency against the new. Gold is beautiful, portable, and spiritually significant — the earth's blood, the mountain's gift. Steel is ugly, functional, and overwhelmingly superior as a killing tool. The transition from a gold-based to a steel-based power structure is the Frozen South's version of the moment when everything changes and nothing can change back.
Memory vs. Power. The fire-songs are the south's memory, law, and identity. But fire-songs can be silenced. Clan Hroth proved that. If the Raudbjorns conquer the Aurheim, whose fire-songs will survive? Memory is a weapon, and the people who control the singing control the past, and the people who control the past control the legitimacy of whatever comes next.
Isolation vs. Empire. The mainland is coming. It is coming as traders, scouts, diplomats, armies. The question is not whether the south will be drawn into the continent's conflicts but how: as a partner, a vassal, a conquest, or a force that reshapes the continent on its own terms.
The Giants. Two survivors from a dying civilization, carrying the last mammoth on the continent, hidden in a coastal camp, unknown to anyone except the most dangerous man in the south. They are refugees. They are miracles. They are weapons waiting to be deployed. And their presence — when it is finally revealed — will shatter every calculation that every chief has made, because nobody in the Frozen South has ever seen anything like them, and nobody has a fire-song that tells them what to do when the impossible washes up on the beach.



THE TEETH — Four Islands, One Bridge, No Agreement
Complete Regional Bible — 1308 AF

I. THE ARCHIPELAGO AT A GLANCE
Total Population: ~950,000 Islands: Northwind (~180,000), Emberstone (~250,000), Verwhisper (~350,000), Shadowtide (~60,000, estimate — no census has ever succeeded) Government: None unified. Each island governs independently. The Bridge Council that once provided loose coordination was destroyed by Morvayn's coup in 1298 AF. The current state is the Whispering War — a cold conflict of espionage, economic strangulation, and carefully deniable assassination. Economy: Volcanic stone (Emberstone), timber and grain (Verwhisper), fishing and maritime services (Northwind), rare hardwoods and exotic goods (Shadowtide), and the bridge tolls that were once shared and are now Morvayn's personal revenue stream Religion: Orthodox Loveism on Verwhisper (deeply), nominal on Northwind and Emberstone, and something else entirely on Shadowtide

II. THE GREAT BRIDGE — The Spine of the World
Before the islands. Before the houses. Before any of it. The Bridge.
It connects the four islands in a chain — Northwind to Emberstone, Emberstone to Verwhisper, Verwhisper to Shadowtide — with branches linking to the mainland at the Red Coast's eastern shore. Its total span, including the branch connections and the junction towers, exceeds forty miles. It is the longest artificial structure on the continent. It is also the oldest. And no one knows who built it.
The Magos' best estimate places the Bridge's construction in the deep Age of History — thousands of years before the empire, before the republics, before written language. The engineering is impossible by current standards: arched spans of fitted stone, each block weighing tons, joined without mortar by a precision so exact that a knife blade cannot be inserted between the seams. The stone is not local — geological analysis identifies it as a basalt variant found nowhere in the archipelago and nowhere on the mainland. It was quarried somewhere else and transported here by methods that no living engineer can explain.
The Bridge does not decay. The stone does not weather. Seawater, salt spray, storm wind, centuries of foot traffic — the surface shows wear, but the structure beneath is unchanged. The repair work that every generation adds (mortar patches, iron reinforcements, replacement cobblestones) deteriorates normally around the original fabric, creating a visual record: crumbling human additions bolted to inhuman permanence. The contrast is unsettling. Maintenance crews report that the original stone is slightly warm to the touch, regardless of air temperature or time of day. The warmth is consistent across the entire span. No one has ever explained it. The Magos suspect echo-engineering — the stone was worked during the Age of History when the echo-field was dense enough to produce materials with properties that current science cannot replicate. If they are correct, the Great Bridge is the largest surviving echo-artifact on the continent.
The Towers
At each island junction, a tower rises from the Bridge — not an addition but an integral part of the original construction, grown from the same seamless basalt. The towers are eight-sided, roughly 120 feet tall, with internal staircases spiraling to observation platforms at their summits. There are five towers total: Northgate, Cinderpost, Thornwatch, Tideveil, and the central tower — the Keystone — which stands at the Bridge's midpoint, equidistant from all four islands, surrounded by open water on every side.
The Keystone is where Lord Borakin was murdered. It is where Morvayn now keeps his seat.
The Current Situation
Morvayn controls the Keystone and the two towers flanking it (Cinderpost and Thornwatch). His soldiers man the toll-gates. His tariffs are set at levels designed to maximize revenue while keeping trade just barely viable — the economic equivalent of bleeding a patient: enough to weaken, not enough to kill. The other two towers (Northgate and Tideveil) are held by the island lords — Stormglass at Northgate, an uneasy Verdane-aligned garrison at Tideveil. The Bridge itself is technically open. In practice, every crossing is an intelligence operation: Morvayn's tollmen record every traveler, every cargo, every conversation overheard at the gates. The Whispering War's primary battlefield is the Bridge itself — the forty miles of stone where everyone is visible and nothing is private.

III. NORTHWIND — The Storm's Anvil
The Island
The northernmost island. Rocky, treeless, wind-scoured, and possessed of a beauty that you have to earn through discomfort. Northwind is what happens when the sea decides to carve an island out of pure stubbornness — cliffs like the edges of broken plates, coves where the water churns white year-round, and a wind that blows constantly, shifting direction without warning, strong enough to knock a grown man sideways on an exposed ridge. The island has no trees because the wind kills them. The grass grows at an angle. The sheep grow their wool so thick they look like boulders.
The sky is the island's masterpiece. Nowhere else in the archipelago — nowhere else on the continent — does the sky perform like it does over Northwind. The lack of canopy, the absence of haze, the constant wind clearing the atmosphere — the result is a dome of color that stretches from horizon to horizon: silver, slate, pearl, and the sudden, heart-stopping blue that breaks through on the rare clear day and lasts just long enough to make you ache for it when it's gone. Northwind sunsets are the most photographed natural phenomenon on the continent (if photography existed). They are also the most lied about — every Northwinder claims theirs was the best, and no one can prove them wrong.
The City
Galehold (pop. ~70,000) — The Windhome. Built into the island's eastern cliff face — the leeward side, sheltered from the worst of the prevailing westerlies. Galehold is not built on the cliff. It is built in the cliff — a city of cave-homes, carved terraces, and protected courtyards that step down the rock face from the Stormglass fortress at the summit to the harbor at the base. The architecture is horizontal rather than vertical (tall buildings catch the wind and die), with thick stone walls, narrow windows, and the distinctive windcatchers — curved stone funnels mounted on rooftops that channel the constant wind through buildings for ventilation while blocking the worst of its force. The sound of Galehold is the sound of wind moving through stone — a permanent, low, musical hum that residents stop hearing after a month and visitors never forget.
The harbor is protected by a natural breakwater — a reef of volcanic rock extending from the cliff base — supplemented by a massive stone seawall that took three generations to build and that is Northwind's proudest engineering achievement. The harbor holds the island's fishing fleet (roughly 200 vessels), the merchant marine (40 trading ships), and the Stormglass war-fleet (12 warships — small by continental standards, but crewed by the finest sailors in the archipelago).
Districts:
The Perch — The Stormglass fortress and the noble quarter. Carved into the cliff's highest point, accessible by a single switchback road. The fortress's walls are original Bridge-stone — blocks salvaged (or stolen, depending on who you ask) from a collapsed Bridge section during the imperial era. The stone is warm to the touch. The fortress has never fallen.
The Warrens — Residential district. Hundreds of cave-homes carved into the middle cliff face, connected by tunnels, stairways, and the rope-and-pulley lifts that residents use to transport goods between levels. A newcomer can get lost in the Warrens for hours. A resident can cross the district in minutes through shortcuts that don't appear on any map.
The Keel — The harbor district. Docks, chandleries, rope-walks, fish-processing sheds, and the taverns where Northwind's maritime culture lives its loudest life. The Gale's Tooth — the island's most famous tavern — serves a black beer brewed with kelp-filtered seawater and a fish pie that visiting Horns sailors grudgingly admit rivals their own.
The Roost — The guildhall of the Windreaders — Northwind's weather-prediction specialists. Not a formal guild but a knowledge tradition passed through families: the ability to read wind, cloud, pressure, and the behavior of seabirds to predict weather with accuracy that mainlanders consider supernatural. It is not supernatural. It is the product of generations of observation refined into an intuitive science. The Windreaders sell their forecasts to every ship in the harbor. A Windreader who gets a forecast wrong loses their reputation. A Windreader who gets three wrong loses their seat in the Roost. The current Chief Windreader, Thyra Halcyon (age 55), has not been wrong in eleven years. She attributes this to experience. Her apprentices suspect something more — Thyra spends hours on the cliff-top in conditions that would hospitalize a lesser woman, and she describes what she feels in terms that sound less like meteorology and more like the echo-system's weather-sensing capacity.

House Stormglass — The Wind-Lords
Seat: The Perch, Galehold Sigil: A silver lightning bolt striking a black sea Words: "We Read the Storm"
Navigators, sailors, and the Teeth's oldest surviving dynasty. The Stormglass family served as imperial naval scouts — the specialists who charted the archipelago's treacherous waters and guided the empire's war-fleets through channels that would destroy anyone sailing blind. When the empire fell, the Stormglass kept the charts and the expertise. They have governed Northwind for four centuries with the pragmatic competence of people who understand that the sea doesn't care about your politics.
Lord Aedan Stormglass (age 48) — Head of house. A sailor before he was a lord — he captained merchant vessels for fifteen years before his father's death called him home. He resents the desk. He compensates by sailing personally on the quarterly patrol of the island's waters, a tradition that his court considers reckless and his sailors consider the only reason they respect him. Aedan is lean, salt-scarred, and possessed of a calm that comes from years of navigating storms that could kill him — the calm of a man who has accepted the worst and found it manageable.
Aedan wants Morvayn dead. Not removed, not negotiated with — dead. The Bridge coup killed Lord Borakin, who was Aedan's friend, and the toll increases are strangling Northwind's fishing trade. Aedan has proposed military action to the other island lords. Verdane demurred. Pyrmont is split. Shadowtide, as always, didn't respond. Aedan is now considering unilateral action — a naval assault on the Keystone tower. His admirals tell him it's feasible but costly. His wife tells him it's suicide.
Lady Maren Stormglass (age 45) — Aedan's wife. Born a Horns Dalgaard (salt merchant's daughter), she came to Northwind as a trade envoy and stayed because the island's wind reminded her of home and because Aedan reminded her of no one she'd ever met. She is the household's strategist — not military (she defers to Aedan's admirals) but political. She maintains back-channel communications with Verwhisper through Lampkeeper intermediaries, she manages the island's rationed trade through Porto Rubia on the Red Coast (bypassing Morvayn's tolls via sea route), and she has been quietly stockpiling grain in the Perch's deep cellars against the possibility of a full blockade.
Kael Stormglass (age 22) — Heir. A navigator prodigy — he passed the Stormglass certification at sixteen, the youngest in the family's history. He can read currents by watching wave patterns and predict tidal changes by the behavior of seabirds. He is also impulsive, hot-tempered, and has been running unauthorized intelligence operations against Morvayn's toll-stations — sending agents disguised as merchants to map guard rotations and identify weaknesses. His father doesn't know. His mother suspects. Kael is the most likely Stormglass to start the shooting war that everyone is trying to avoid.
Old Edda Stormglass (age 80) — Aedan's mother. The island's living memory. She remembers the Bridge Council before Morvayn, remembers Lord Borakin alive, remembers a time when crossing from island to island was an afternoon walk rather than an intelligence operation. She sits in the Perch's highest window — a chair positioned to face the Bridge's Northgate tower — and watches. She counts the soldiers on the ramparts. She notes shift changes. She has been compiling a log for ten years. The log is the most detailed surveillance record of Morvayn's military operations in existence. She has shared it with no one. She is waiting to be asked.

Minor Houses and Powers — Northwind
House Halcyon — The Windreaders' founding family. Not technically noble but functionally essential. Chief Windreader Thyra Halcyon's forecasts are more valuable than any lordship.
House Tern — Fishing fleet operators. Control roughly half the island's commercial fishing. Captain Bram Tern (age 50) — the fleet's commodore — is Aedan's most reliable naval asset in the event of war.
House Corwyn — Rope-makers. Their product is the best in the archipelago. A Corwyn rope holds when everything else fails. The family's matriarch, Old Britta Corwyn (age 72), has been making rope for sixty years and considers the entire political situation a distraction from her real work.
The Seal-Callers — Not a house but a tradition. A small number of Northwind fishermen (~30) who can apparently communicate with the grey seals that breed on the island's western shores. They use the seals as fish-finders — the seals dive, the fishermen follow, and the catch rates are consistently higher than those of conventional fishing crews. The Seal-Callers attribute this to "knowing the seal-speech." The mechanism is almost certainly echo-communication — the fishermen, raised in proximity to echo-rich marine mammals, have developed a rudimentary sensitivity that allows them to feel the seals' behavior-patterns. They do not know this. They know it works.

Settlements — Northwind
Cliffmere (~5,000) — Fishing town on the western coast. Exposed to the full force of the prevailing wind. Every building is roped to iron stakes driven into the bedrock — during the worst storms, the ropes are all that keeps the roofs on. Known for its storm-smoked fish — caught, gutted, and hung in the wind to cure without fire, producing a texture and flavor unique to the island.
Selkham (~3,000) — The Seal-Callers' home village. A cove settlement where the grey seal colony breeds. The village has an understanding with the seals that outsiders find eerie: the seals haul out on the village's beach, sleep among the boats, and allow themselves to be touched by the fishermen. They bite anyone else. The village pub is called The Barking Dog — a joke about the seals. The seals don't get it.
Windhollow (~1,500) — A hamlet in the island's interior valley — the only place on Northwind sheltered enough from wind to grow vegetables. The valley is Northwind's breadbasket: root crops, hardy greens, and the Northwind Turnip — a vegetable so tough and flavorless that it has become a symbol of the island's character. "Hard as a Northwind turnip" is a compliment.
Ravenscar (~800) — An abandoned fortress on the island's northern tip, now home to a colony of ravens so large and so old that the birds have become semi-domesticated — they accept food from the few families that shelter in the fortress's lee. The ravens are used by Stormglass scouts as message-carriers (slower than the Carvallo parrots but capable of flying in weather that would kill any tropical bird). Raven-Master Osric (age 60) maintains the flock and speaks to the birds in a low, clicking language he claims they understand. They seem to.
The Nail (~200) — A lighthouse station on a sea-stack off the island's western coast, accessible only by rope-bridge during low tide. The lighthouse keeper — Keeper Solvei (age 35) — lives alone with a cat, a library of navigational charts, and the conviction that the sea-stack is moving. She has been measuring. It is moving. Half an inch per year, toward the open ocean. She has reported this. Nobody cares. She keeps measuring.

IV. EMBERSTONE — The Forge Beneath
The Island
Volcanic. Two active cones — Mount Sova (the larger, southern peak, perpetually smoking) and Mount Vrek (the smaller, northern cone, more active but less consistent) — dominate an island of black basalt, red scoria, and the grey-green lichen that is the only thing hardy enough to colonize fresh lava flows. The air tastes of sulfur. The ground vibrates — a low, constant tremor that newcomers find alarming and residents describe as "the island breathing." Geothermal vents provide heating, mineral extraction, and the hot springs that Emberstone's culture revolves around. The quarries produce the volcanic basalt that is the continent's hardest building stone. And somewhere beneath the quarries, in a vault carved from the volcanic bedrock, the Magos' most dangerous secret waits in the dark.
The City
Ashenport (pop. ~80,000) — The island's capital and primary port, built on Emberstone's eastern coast where the lava flows have created a series of natural harbors protected by basalt headlands. The city is warm — geothermally heated streets, steam venting from grates, and the permanent sulfurous haze that gives the air a tang the residents call "the island's perfume." The architecture is volcanic stone — dark, heavy, built to withstand earthquakes — with the distinctive Emberstone feature: steam-channels carved into the walls of public buildings, carrying geothermal heat through the structure like stone veins. In the morning, when the air is cool, the buildings exhale visible steam from their facades. The effect is beautiful and slightly infernal.
Districts:
The Crownsmoke — The Pyrmont estate and the quarry-workers' guildhall quarter. Named for the permanent smoke plume from Mount Sova visible above the rooftops.
The Baths — Emberstone's social center. A district of public and private hot-spring bathhouses — the hammam tradition here predates Loveism and has outlasted every political change. The baths are where business is conducted, alliances formed, intelligence exchanged, and Morvayn's agents eavesdrop on everyone. The grandest bath — the Obsidian Pool — is a natural hot spring lined with polished volcanic glass that reflects the bathers' bodies in dark, distorted shapes. It is simultaneously the most luxurious and the most unsettling bathing experience in the archipelago.
The Quarry Steps — Working-class district. The quarry-workers' housing, terraced into the hillside above the quarry pits. Hard, functional, and the political base that Morvayn cultivated before his coup — the workers who felt Pyrmont had enriched itself at their expense and who supported Morvayn's promise of "fair shares."
The Steamworks — Industrial district. Forges, smelters, and the geothermal-powered workshops that produce Emberstone's metalwork and glass. The heat in the Steamworks is intense enough that workers rotate on four-hour shifts. Longer exposure risks heat-madness — a disorientation produced by sustained high temperatures that Ashenport's physicians treat with cold-water immersion and that Ashenport's tavern-keepers treat with chilled beer.

House Pyrmont — The Quarry-Kings
Seat: Pyrmont House, Ashenport (a fortress built from a single massive block of volcanic basalt, carved rather than constructed) Sigil: A red flame beneath a black mountain Words: "We Work the Fire"
The Pyrmonts were overseers. That's the truth they've spent four centuries trying to bury. When the empire fell and Nion XIII's edict freed the quarry slaves, the Pyrmont family — the head overseers who had administered the quarries for the empire — simply continued administering them, transitioning from enslaving the workers to employing them at wages that the workers' grandchildren are still trying to renegotiate.
Lord Hakon Pyrmont (age 55) — The current lord. Caught between Morvayn's ambition and his own island's fracture. Hakon opposed the Bridge coup — Lord Borakin was his ally, and Morvayn was a minor noble from his own island whose ambition Hakon had been too complacent to restrain. Now Morvayn controls the Bridge, half of Emberstone's quarry-workers support him, and Hakon is a lord whose authority extends as far as his fortress walls and not much further.
Hakon is not a weak man — he is a steady man in an unsteady situation. He maintains the quarry operations (the economy must function or everyone starves), he negotiates with Morvayn's agents (refusing entirely would trigger a blockade), and he quietly supports the intelligence network that Dalla Garrun of Westhorn has been building to undermine Morvayn's position. He sleeps badly. The island's tremors, which he never noticed before, now keep him awake.
Sera Pyrmont (age 28) — Hakon's daughter. The family's firebrand. She has been organizing the quarry-workers who oppose Morvayn — the ones who realized that "fair shares" meant "Morvayn's share" — into a resistance network operating in the quarry tunnels where Morvayn's agents can't follow. The network is small (~200 workers), poorly armed, and sustained by Sera's personal charisma and the workers' memory of broken promises. Sera does not know about the Magos vault beneath the quarries. She has, however, noticed that certain deep tunnels are warmer than they should be, that the stone in those tunnels has a different texture, and that sounds carry strangely — echoes that arrive before the sound that produced them.

Lord Morvayn — The Usurper
Seat: The Keystone Tower, Great Bridge (and a commandeered estate in Ashenport's Crownsmoke district) No formal sigil — Morvayn uses a plain black banner. The absence of heraldry is deliberate: he presents himself as a man of the people, not a dynast. No formal words — his followers use: "The Bridge Provides"
Lord-Warden Edvard Morvayn (age 42) — A minor Emberstone noble who became the most disruptive political force in the archipelago through a single act of perfectly calculated treachery. Morvayn is not a monster. He is something harder to fight: a man with a plausible grievance and the intelligence to exploit it. His argument — that the Bridge Council was a cartel of island lords enriching themselves through toll-revenue while the common people saw nothing — was not wrong. His solution — murder the Council chairman and seize the Bridge — was not justified. But the workers who support him don't care about justification. They care about the gold that Morvayn's tolls generate and that Morvayn distributes (selectively, strategically) into the quarry towns, the fishing villages, and the pockets of the people whose loyalty he needs.
Morvayn is tall, dark-haired, handsome in a sharp-edged way that reads as either distinguished or predatory depending on your politics. He speaks well — the measured, reasonable tone of a man explaining something obvious to people who should have understood it already. His personal courage is real — he killed Lord Borakin himself (the poison was a backup; Morvayn had a blade under the table if the wine didn't work). His administrative competence is genuine — the Bridge tolls are collected efficiently, the infrastructure is maintained, and the travelers who pay the extortionate fees are treated with professional courtesy.
His weakness: paranoia. Morvayn trusts no one completely. His inner circle rotates — advisors who get too close are reassigned to distant postings before they can accumulate enough knowledge to threaten him. He sleeps in a different room of the Keystone each night, selected at random. He employs three food-tasters. He has not left the Bridge in two years — the Keystone is his seat, his fortress, and his prison. He controls the most important structure on the continent. He cannot walk away from it.
Morvayn's People:
Captain Gheral (age 35) — Commander of the Keystone garrison. 200 soldiers, hand-picked, well-paid. Gheral is loyal to Morvayn because Morvayn pays better than anyone else and because Gheral, a former quarry-guard, genuinely believes the old order deserved to fall.
Toll-Master Venn (age 50) — Administers the toll system. A former merchant who switched sides during the coup because Morvayn's tolls, though high, are more consistently applied than the old Council's. Venn is efficient, incorruptible by anyone except Morvayn, and in possession of the most detailed trade-flow data in the archipelago — information that Morvayn uses to calibrate his economic pressure.
The Whisper — Morvayn's spymaster. No one knows the Whisper's real name, gender, or location. Communications arrive as unsigned notes in wax-sealed copper tubes — the same format the Carvallo parrots use, deliberately echoing a system that implies organizational sophistication. The Whisper may be one person or a network. Morvayn himself may not know. The intelligence the Whisper produces is accurate, timely, and the reason Morvayn has survived ten years of assassination attempts.

The Magos Vault
Beneath the quarries of Emberstone, in chambers carved from the volcanic bedrock at a depth of approximately 300 feet, the Order of Magos maintains a secret vault of artifacts from the Age of History. The vault has been operational for over a thousand years. Its existence is known to three people: Grand Magos Thessaly Vane, Vault-Keeper Odo on the Isle of Knowledge, and Keeper Alenn — the Magos agent responsible for maintaining the Emberstone installation.
Alenn has not visited the vault in three years. Morvayn's security makes covert access to the quarries extremely difficult. The vault's automated systems (such as they are — oil-lamp timers, ventilation channels, moisture-control mechanisms) were designed for regular maintenance, not three years of neglect. Alenn does not know what state the vault is in. She fears the worst.
What's in the vault: approximately 200 artifacts, ranging from small hand-tools to large structural components, all dating to the Age of History. The artifacts include metals that don't corrode, ceramic instruments of unknown purpose, stone tablets covered in the same untranslated script found at other Age of History sites, and — the vault's most significant holding — a section of the Great Bridge's original construction material, removed during a repair operation in 1067 AF and stored for study. The Bridge-stone section is the most echo-dense object in the vault. It is warm. It hums at a frequency below hearing. When Keeper Alenn last visited, she placed her hand on it and felt — for a fraction of a second — the sensation of standing on the Bridge during a storm, with the wind and the spray and the vast indifference of the sea. The sensation was not a memory. She had never stood on the Bridge during a storm. The stone was sharing.

V. VERWHISPER — The Green Cathedral
The Island
Everything Northwind is not. Where Northwind is bare, Verwhisper is clothed — in temperate hardwood forest so lush that the island looks, from the sea, like a green dome rising from the water. Where Northwind is wind-scoured, Verwhisper is sheltered — the island's mountainous interior breaks the prevailing weather, creating a mild, humid microclimate that supports the most productive agriculture in the archipelago. Where Northwind is spare, Verwhisper is abundant — orchards, terraced farmland, managed woodland, and the monastery gardens that the Order of the Green Thorn has been cultivating for three centuries.
Verwhisper smells like earth, rain, and growing things. The light filters through the canopy in shafts of green-gold. The birdsong is constant — not the screaming of parrots (wrong climate) but the layered, melodic calls of warblers, thrushes, and the Verwhisper nightingale, whose song is so beautiful that the Order of the Green Thorn has declared it a devotional instrument — "Vena's voice in feathered form."
The island's religious character is genuine, not performative. Verwhisper is the most devout polity in the Teeth — not in the rigid, punitive mode of Jous's Pure Way, but in the gentle, nature-reverencing tradition of the Ashanite order. The Order of the Green Thorn — the Ashanite sub-order dedicated to forest conservation — is not merely present on the island; it is the island's co-government, its educational system, its healthcare provider, and its moral compass. House Verdane rules in secular matters. The Green Thorn rules in everything else. The arrangement works because both sides believe, genuinely, in the same thing: the forest is sacred, and the people who live in it are its stewards, not its owners.
The City
Thornhaven (pop. ~65,000) — The island's capital. Built in a wide valley where the forest opens onto terraced farmland, Thornhaven is the Teeth's breadbasket city — the markets overflow with grain, fruit, vegetables, cured meat, honey, and the herbal medicines that the Green Thorn monasteries produce. The architecture is half-timbered — dark oak frames filled with white plaster, steep-pitched roofs of wooden shingle, and the carved lintels depicting intertwined leaves and branches that are Verwhisper's signature decorative tradition. Every building has a garden. Every garden has a shrine — a small stone alcove containing a carved image of Asha (patron of the Ashanite order, the prophet of feeling) surrounded by fresh flowers replaced daily.
The city's most distinctive feature: the Canopy Walk — a network of elevated walkways connecting the treetops above the city center, maintained by the Green Thorn as both a devotional path (walking the Canopy is considered a form of prayer) and a practical transport system (the walks provide a second level of circulation above the crowded streets). The Walk is beautiful — dappled light, birdsong, the green-gold shimmer of sun through leaves — and it is also the best intelligence-gathering platform on the island. Morvayn's agents use the Walk to observe the city from above. The Green Thorn's monks use it to observe Morvayn's agents.
Districts:
The Greensward — The Green Thorn's headquarters. A monastery complex surrounding the island's oldest tree — the Mother Oak, an ancient hardwood whose trunk is over thirty feet in diameter and whose canopy shades an acre. The Mother Oak is Verwhisper's most sacred site. Cutting it would be an act of war. Morvayn has never threatened it. Even he understands certain lines.
The Marketvale — Commercial district. Produce markets, artisan workshops (wood-carving, weaving, herbalism), and the trading posts where island goods are packed for export.
The Pilgrim Quarter — Hostels and chapels serving the small but steady stream of Lovist pilgrims who visit Verwhisper's monasteries.
The Rootwork — The old quarter, built around the Mother Oak's root system. The oldest buildings on the island — some dating to the early Age of Faith — with foundations that incorporate the oak's surface roots, creating structures that are literally anchored to the living tree.

House Verdane — The Timber-Lords
Seat: Verdane Hall, Thornhaven (a manor house whose walls incorporate three living oak trees, their trunks passing through the structure like columns) Sigil: A green leaf on a brown field, veined with gold Words: "The Forest Provides, the Forest Remembers"
The Verdanes are timber merchants who became lords by necessity — someone had to govern the secular side of life, and the Green Thorn monks had neither the inclination nor the institutional structure for it. The Verdanes filled the gap, providing judicial services, military defense, and commercial management while the Green Thorn provided spiritual authority, healthcare, and education. The partnership has lasted three centuries with remarkably little friction, primarily because both sides understand that Verwhisper's prosperity depends on the forest, and the forest doesn't care about political ego.
Lord Aldis Verdane (age 52) — A thoughtful, cautious man who governs Verwhisper with the steady pace of someone who has internalized the forest's tempo. He opposed Morvayn's coup through diplomatic channels — letters of protest, trade restrictions, appeals to the Magos for mediation. None of it worked. He is now the reluctant host of a cold war he never wanted, maintaining Verwhisper's neutrality while Stormglass pushes for military action and Morvayn pushes for recognition. His strategy: wait. Morvayn's position is strong but brittle — sustained by force and revenue, not by legitimacy. Aldis believes that time works against the usurper. He may be right. He may also be rationalizing inaction.
Ilva Verdane (age 25) — Aldis's daughter. A Green Thorn novice who has been training in the order's herbalism tradition and who is, of all the Verdane family, the most politically active — not through conventional channels but through the monastery network. The Green Thorn has chapters on every island. Ilva has been using the order's inter-island communications (carried by the monks who maintain forest-conservation stations on Emberstone and even Shadowtide) to coordinate intelligence-sharing between the anti-Morvayn factions. Her father doesn't know the extent of her activities. The Green Thorn's Prior does.
Prior Oaken (age 65) — Head of the Order of the Green Thorn on Verwhisper. Not a Verdane but as politically significant as any lord. Oaken is the island's spiritual authority — a quiet, deliberate man who has spent forty years in the forest and who has developed, through decades of contemplative practice, a sensitivity to the island's ecological rhythms that other monks consider saintly and that the echo-system codex would describe as genuine echo-perception. Oaken can feel the forest's health in his bones — when a grove is stressed, when a spring is faltering, when the balance of the ecosystem shifts. He has felt something new in the past year: a strengthening. The forest is growing faster than it should. The birdsong is louder. The Mother Oak's canopy has expanded by a measurable amount. Oaken does not know about the Eldra-Veil breach. He knows something is different. He is listening.

VI. SHADOWTIDE — The Unlit Island
The Island
Nobody governs Shadowtide. Several have tried. None have succeeded. The island is a dense tropical jungle — the southernmost, warmest, and wettest of the four — and it has resisted every attempt at centralized authority with the passive resistance of a landscape that eats infrastructure and digests ambition.
The jungle is thick enough that ground-level visibility drops to ten feet within fifty yards of the coast. The canopy is so dense that rainfall reaches the ground as a continuous drip rather than as drops — the forest filters the sky. The fauna is aggressive, diverse, and includes species found nowhere else in the archipelago: the twilight jaguar (a melanistic big cat that hunts at dusk), the crown viper (a canopy-dwelling snake with iridescent scales and a bite that produces vivid hallucinations before killing), and the web-spinner ape (a primate that constructs elaborate structures from vines and leaves, demonstrating a level of tool-use that the Magos Natural World school considers impossible for a non-human primate and that Shadowtide's human residents consider unremarkable — "the apes build. We build. The jungle builds. Everything builds.").
Shadowtide's human population is scattered, semi-nomadic, and organized into loose family groups rather than houses or clans. They fish the coast, forage the forest, and trade with the other islands through a handful of beach-markets where goods are exchanged without formal currency (barter, weighted by the quality of relationships). They do not fight wars. They do not pay taxes. They do not attend to the political affairs of the other islands. They have been offered "civilization" by every regime that has controlled the Bridge, and they have declined every time, not through defiance but through indifference — the jungle provides everything they need, and everything the other islands offer comes with obligations they don't want.
Settlements
There is no capital. There are no cities. There are places where people tend to gather:
Driftwood (~2,000) — The closest thing Shadowtide has to a port. A scatter of huts, lean-tos, and beached boats on the island's northern coast, where traders from the other islands come to exchange metalwork, cloth, and salt for Shadowtide's exports: rare hardwoods, exotic spices, medicinal plants, and the moonpearls — iridescent freshwater pearls found in the island's interior rivers that the Teeth's jewelers prize above any marine pearl.
The Rootmarket (~variable, 500-1,500 depending on season) — An inland trading post at the junction of three game trails, where the island's scattered families meet to exchange goods, arrange marriages, and share news. The Rootmarket operates on a lunar cycle — it opens on the new moon and closes on the full. Between markets, the site is empty. Except it isn't — the web-spinner apes use the Rootmarket's clearing during the off-weeks, and the structures they build (vine-bridges, leaf-shelters, elevated platforms) are sometimes incorporated by the humans when the market reopens. The collaboration is not planned. It simply happens.
The Hermitage (~50) — A Green Thorn conservation station deep in the island's interior. Three monks maintain a botanical survey of Shadowtide's unique flora. They are the only permanent non-native residents on the island. The locals tolerate them because the monks provide medical care and ask nothing in return. The monks' reports to Prior Oaken on Verwhisper include observations that the Prior files separately from the official records: plant growth rates that defy botanical models, animal behaviors that suggest interspecies coordination, and a persistent ambient sensation that the senior monk describes as "the feeling of standing inside a conversation that I cannot hear."

The Free Families
Shadowtide has no houses. It has families — kinship networks that expand, contract, merge, and split over generations without formal structure. Some names recur:
The Duskwalkers — A family of hunters who specialize in the twilight hours when the jungle's most dangerous predators are active. They are feared and respected by the other families because they go where others won't. The current family head, Grandmother Ashani (age ~70) — no one on Shadowtide tracks exact ages — is the island's closest thing to a political leader: when disputes arise that the families can't resolve internally, they bring them to Ashani. Her judgment is not binding. It is always followed.
The Rootweavers — A family of builders who construct the vine-and-wood structures that Shadowtide's residents live in. Their technique — weaving living vines into structural frameworks that continue growing after construction, strengthening over time — produces buildings that are alive in a literal sense. A Rootweaver house doesn't decay. It grows. The older houses are partially absorbed by the jungle, their walls thick with vine, their roofs canopied by trees that sprouted from seeds dropped by birds onto the living structure. The Rootweavers consider this ideal. A house that the jungle accepts is a house that belongs.
The Tidecallers — A family of fishermen on the western coast who claim the ability to "call" tides — to predict not just the timing but the strength and character of each tide. Their predictions are accurate enough that the other families plan their fishing and beach-market schedules around Tidecaller forecasts. The mechanism is weather-reading, tidal observation, and — probably — echo-sensitivity refined over generations of coastal living. The Tidecallers don't explain their methods. They don't need to. The tides come when they say they will.

VII. NATURAL FEATURES
The Great Bridge — Described above. The archipelago's defining feature. Echo-engineered, warm to the touch, indestructible by any method the current world possesses.
Mount Sova — Emberstone's primary volcano. Permanently smoking. Last major eruption: 1189 AF (destroyed the village of Ashfall, killed ~400, redirected a lava flow that created the current harbor configuration at Ashenport). The mountain's geological activity produces the geothermal energy that heats Emberstone's cities and the volcanic deposits that the quarries exploit. Deep within Sova's root system, the Magos vault sits in basalt chambers that have been stable for millennia — but the mountain's seismic profile has been changing in the past decade, producing tremors at frequencies that Ashenport's engineers haven't recorded before.
The Singing Reef — A coral formation between Northwind and Emberstone that produces, during certain tidal conditions, a harmonic resonance audible above and below water. The sound is low, rhythmic, and has been described by sailors as "a choir of drowned voices singing a hymn in a language no one has spoken in a thousand years." The phenomenon is well-documented. The explanation is not — the reef's coral structure has acoustic properties that marine naturalists at the Isle of Knowledge have been studying for decades without conclusive results. The coral itself is unusual: denser, harder, and more structurally complex than any other reef in the archipelago. The Magos suspect it is an echo-artifact — coral that grew in the Age of History's denser echo-field and that retains properties its modern descendants cannot replicate.
The Veil — A fog bank that forms between Verwhisper and Shadowtide with unusual regularity — approximately three days out of every ten, regardless of season or weather conditions. The fog is dense enough to reduce visibility to arm's length and persists for hours. Navigation through the Veil is dangerous; ships that enter it report compass anomalies, time distortions (a crossing that should take two hours takes six, or thirty minutes), and — in a handful of documented cases — visual phenomena: shapes in the fog that look like buildings, ships, or people but that dissolve when approached. The Magos attribute the fog to the temperature differential between Verwhisper's warm, humid microclimate and Shadowtide's cooler waters. The visual phenomena are attributed to pareidolia. The time distortions are attributed to navigational error. The compass anomalies are not attributed to anything because the Magos have no explanation for them.
Shadowtide's residents do not cross the Veil by boat. They wade through the shallows at a specific point where the strait between the islands narrows to a few hundred yards, timing their crossing to a window that the Tidecallers calculate. The crossing takes twenty minutes on foot. The Veil parts around the waders, they say, "like a curtain opening for someone expected." Whether this is physical (the shallow crossing creates a microclimate gap in the fog) or something else is unknown.
The Rootsea — Shadowtide's interior mangrove system. A vast network of interconnected swamp, river, and mangrove channel that extends across most of the island's lowland interior. The waterways are navigable by canoe. The Rootsea is home to the moonpearl-producing freshwater mussels, the web-spinner apes, and — according to the Duskwalkers — something larger. Something that moves through the deep channels at night, producing a wake but no sound. Something that has been there longer than the humans. The Duskwalkers don't hunt it. They leave offerings at certain channel junctions: fish, fruit, moonpearls. The offerings are always gone by morning. The Duskwalkers do not discuss this with outsiders.

VIII. LEGENDS AND MYTHS
The Bridge-Builders — Who built the Great Bridge? No one knows. The oldest legends across all four islands agree on only one thing: the builders were not human. The Northwind version: giants from beneath the sea, who raised the stone from the ocean floor. The Emberstone version: fire-spirits from the volcano's heart, who cooled the stone from liquid flame. The Verwhisper version: the forest itself, extending its roots across the water. The Shadowtide version: the Bridge was always there. The islands grew around it. The water came after. The Bridge is the oldest thing. Even the sea is younger. None of these are correct. All of them are closer to the truth than the Magos' geological surveys.
The Fenn Ghost — House Fenn was exterminated during the Bridge-Throat Massacre — Nion I's soldiers killing every man, woman, and child of the family that had controlled the Bridge before the conquest. The massacre site — the Throat, a narrow section of the Bridge between Emberstone and Verwhisper — is the only part of the original structure that shows visible damage: a dark stain in the basalt that cleaning has never removed. On certain nights — specifically the anniversary of the massacre, which oral tradition places during the autumn equinox — travelers on the Throat report hearing footsteps behind them. They turn. No one is there. The footsteps continue. They walk faster. The footsteps match their pace. They run. The footsteps stop. And then, in the silence, a child laughs. The laugh is not malicious. It is the laugh of a child playing a game — the game of following, of being close enough to touch but never quite touching. The Fenn family had children when they died. The youngest was three. The laugh sounds like a three-year-old.
The Obsidian Oracle — An Emberstone legend. Deep in the quarries, in a chamber that the miners sealed generations ago and that no current map records, there is a wall of natural obsidian — volcanic glass, black and flawless — that functions as a mirror. But the mirror does not show the present. It shows the future. Not clearly — the images are dark, fragmented, shifting — but consistently enough that the miners who discovered it (approximately 1150 AF) were terrified into silence. The chamber was sealed. The location was lost. The legend persists. Sera Pyrmont, exploring the deep tunnels, has found sealed passages that her quarry maps don't account for. She has not opened them. She is considering it.
The Mother Oak's Dream — A Verwhisper legend. The Mother Oak — the ancient tree at Thornhaven's heart — dreams. Not metaphorically. The Green Thorn monks who meditate at its base report, consistently across centuries, the experience of entering the oak's consciousness during deep contemplation. The experience is non-verbal: a vast, slow awareness of root and soil and water and light, a sense of time measured in centuries rather than hours, and — most disturbingly — an awareness of the other trees. The Mother Oak knows every tree on the island. It knows which ones are healthy and which are sick. It knows where the water table is dropping. It knows when the seasons are shifting. And it knows — this is the part that Prior Oaken has not shared publicly — that something is coming. The Oak cannot describe what. It has no language. But the feeling the monks bring back from their meditation has changed in the past year: from the slow, steady contentment of a healthy forest to a quality that Oaken can only describe as anticipation. The forest is waiting for something. The forest knows it's coming. The forest is glad.
The Creature in the Rootsea — Shadowtide's oldest legend and its most carefully guarded secret. In the deepest channel of the Rootsea, where the mangroves are ancient and the water is black and still, something lives. The Duskwalkers have been leaving it offerings since before their genealogies can trace. It has never been seen clearly — only the wake, the ripple of something enormous moving through water that should be too shallow for it. Once a generation, the Duskwalkers' eldest member performs a ritual: they wade into the deep channel alone, at midnight, carrying a moonpearl of exceptional quality. They stand in the water. They wait. Something approaches. They feel it — the displacement of water, a pressure against their legs, a warmth that has no source. They place the moonpearl in the water. It is taken. Not pulled — taken, by something gentle and precise, the way a parent takes a gift from a child. The Duskwalker returns to shore. They do not speak of what they felt. The ritual is called the Giving. It has been performed for as long as anyone can remember. The Creature has never harmed anyone. The Creature has never appeared in daylight. The Creature is, if the echo-system theory is correct, the last living echo-node in the Teeth — a being sustained by the Rootsea's ancient, undisturbed mangrove ecosystem, the final remnant of an age when such things were common. It is the Brinehold Leviathan's cousin, the Badlands Bestia's kin, and the proof that the Thinning was not total — that in the places the world forgot to drain, the old things are still alive, still waiting, still accepting gifts from the only humans wise enough to offer them.

IX. THE WHISPERING WAR — State of Play at 1308 AF
Morvayn controls: The Keystone, Cinderpost, and Thornwatch towers. The toll system. Approximately 500 soldiers. The loyalty of ~40% of Emberstone's quarry-workers. An intelligence network (the Whisper) that has penetrated all three opposing islands. Revenue from tolls that funds everything.
Stormglass controls: Northgate tower. The Teeth's most capable navy. Northwind's fishing economy (damaged by tolls but functional). The best weather intelligence. Old Edda's surveillance log. Kael's unauthorized operations.
Verdane controls: Tideveil tower (with a garrison of mixed loyalty). Verwhisper's agricultural surplus (the archipelago's food supply, a strategic weapon Aldis has not yet deployed). The Green Thorn's inter-island monastery network (communications that Morvayn cannot intercept). Prior Oaken's moral authority. Ilva Verdane's covert coordination.
Pyrmont controls: Emberstone's quarries (the archipelago's primary non-food export). The remainder of the quarry-workers. Sera Pyrmont's resistance network. Knowledge of the deep tunnels that Morvayn's forces cannot enter.
Shadowtide controls: Nothing. Wants nothing. Is watching with the detached interest of a jungle cat observing a dogfight. Grandmother Ashani, when asked her opinion of the Whispering War, said: "The Bridge is stone. Stone endures. Men do not. We will wait for the men to finish." She did not specify which men or which finishing.
The Magos are terrified — not of Morvayn, but of what Morvayn's disruption means for the Emberstone vault. Three years without maintenance. Artifacts that were stable may no longer be. The Bridge-stone fragment that shares is sitting in a sealed chamber whose environmental controls haven't been checked since 1305 AF. Grand Magos Thessaly has authorized Keeper Alenn to attempt access by any means necessary. Alenn is planning an infiltration through the deep quarry tunnels — the same tunnels where Sera Pyrmont's resistance operates. Neither knows about the other. Their collision is inevitable.

The Bridge hums in the dark. The islands listen. The war whispers. The forest waits. And in the Rootsea's deepest channel, something ancient accepts its offering and returns to the silence from which it came, carrying a moonpearl that glows faintly in the black water, the only light in a darkness that has lasted longer than human memory and that is, for the first time in centuries, beginning to change.


THE HEARTLANDS — Complete Regional Chronicle
Silver, River, and Old Stone
Total Documented History: Approximately 3,000 years of continuous political civilization, stretching from the pre-imperial Aethelian republics through the Nionic conquest and into the current Age of Faith. The ruins are older. The grudges are older still.
Defining Feature: The Heartlands are the continent's political, agricultural, and economic core — the grain-basket that feeds half of Mundus and the web of river trade that moves the other half's goods. They are also the continent's oldest argument. No region has produced more wars, more treaties, more betrayals, more constitutions, or more sophisticated mechanisms for committing violence while maintaining the appearance of civility. The Heartlands invented the ducal system, the Argenlord title, the elective monarchy, the guild table, and the art of poisoning an entire coronation feast without leaving a single witness alive to identify the cup that carried the dose.
Political System: The Argenlord — elected every three years by the heads of the major houses, each casting one vote. Theoretically a ceremonial figurehead with emergency powers in war or famine. In practice, the emergency powers have been invoked so often that the office has accumulated genuine authority. The title has been dominated by House Silverblood (~45 terms) and House Silverring (~40 terms), with House Argenhold (~20), House Beaumont (~15), and various minor houses splitting the remainder across 405 years. Currently held by Argenlord Theron Silverblood.

I. THE LAND
Geography
The Heartlands are big. Rolling plains of wheat and barley stretching to horizons that pull away from a rider as they gallop, interrupted by river valleys so fertile that the banks stay green even in winter, punctuated by ancient stone cities that sit at every major confluence like fat spiders in the centers of their webs. The Silver Mountains wall the southern edge, snow-capped and blue in the distance. The northern border bleeds into scrubby, drier grassland that transitions toward the Horns corridor and the ancient forests of Beaumont. The light is different here than anywhere else on the continent — wide, clear, and somehow deep, as if the sky has more layers than it does on the coast. Heartlanders talk about their sky the way Sangreans talk about their wine.
The rivers are the Heartlands' arteries. The Argen — the great central waterway, navigable for most of its length, the economic foundation of House Argenhold's wealth — cuts the region roughly in half. The Vorn — northern tributary, running through Silverblood territory, its banks lined with the granaries and mill-towns that turn plains wheat into the flour that feeds the continent. The Silvrenne — mountain-fed, cold, cutting through Silverring's mining country, its current strong enough to power the forge-bellows and stamp-mills that process the mountain's ore. Dozens of smaller waterways connect the plains towns to the river network in a capillary system so dense that no settlement of any size is more than a day's walk from navigable water.
Everything moves by barge. The barges are flat-bottomed, shallow-drafted, poled and sail-rigged, painted in house colors and stacked with grain, ore, wool, and gossip. The Bargemen's Guild is one of the most powerful organizations in the region — they carry cargo, but they also carry information, and a bargeman who has been up and down the Argen three times in a season knows more about the duchy's politics than most of the dukes.
The central plains — the Silver Flats — are treeless grassland, golden in summer, frost-white in winter, and the most fiercely contested farmland on the continent. Whoever controls the Flats feeds the Heartlands. Whoever feeds the Heartlands holds the Argenlord vote. This is not a metaphor. It is the foundational equation of Heartlander politics, and every house in the region has built its strategy around either controlling that grain or ensuring that nobody else does.
The southeastern frontier — Argen's End — dissolves into desert where the Heartlands meet the Red Coast's wasteland. It is a land of dust, rock, and hard men, where the edicts of the Argenlord mean little and the only authority is the sword. The eastern hills of Corvallis crumple into rocky crags that guard the passes to Rosland and the Frozen South — ambush country, rebellion country, the place where the continent's center bleeds into its wild edges. The western passes climb steeply into alpine territory, where the fortress-city of Grintall guards the only reliable route to the sea beyond.
Climate
Temperate, variable, and politically significant. The central plains experience hot, dry summers and cold, wet winters — a Mediterranean rhythm pushed slightly colder by the Silver Mountains' influence. The growing season is long enough for two harvests in good years, which makes the Heartlands the continent's breadbasket and makes bad harvest years political crises of the first order.
Near the Sangrean border, the climate warms into something subtropical — warm ten months of the year, humid, the kind of air that makes Heartlander wool-wearers strip to their linen and curse their tailor's ambition. Near the Silver Mountains, winter arrives early and stays late, with mountain passes closing under snow from late autumn through early spring. The western passes are worse — House Lockmere's territory is effectively inaccessible for four months of the year, which is partly why the Lockmeres have maintained their independence for so long. You cannot conquer a fortress you cannot reach.

II. THE PEOPLE
Physical Description
Heartlanders are varied — the region is too large and too old for any single ethnic profile. Northern Heartlanders tend toward lighter complexions, sandy or brown hair, and the angular bone structure that suggests pre-imperial Aethelian ancestry. Southern Heartlanders are darker, stockier, and show the mixed heritage of centuries of contact with Sangrea and the mountain peoples. What unites them is temperament: Heartlanders are formal, careful, and obsessed with precedent. They speak slowly and mean every word. A Heartlander's promise is either iron or nothing — the culture has no tolerance for casual oaths.
The eastern hill-folk of Corvallis are leaner, harder, with the weathered look of people who live on land that fights back. The mountain people of Silvermont and the western passes are pale, compact, built for altitude — broad chests, short legs, the kind of lung capacity that makes them formidable at high elevation and slightly ridiculous when they try to sprint on flat ground.
Clothing & Status
Clothing reflects status with surgical precision. The ducal houses wear silver — not just as ornament but as structural element: silver thread woven into wool and linen, silver clasps and buttons, silver belt-buckles engraved with house sigils. The wealthier the house, the more silver you see. A Silverblood lord at court glitters like a fish; a minor house retainer might manage a single silver pin on their cloak. The working class wears undyed wool in winter and linen in summer, with leather boots and wide-brimmed hats to keep off the plains sun.
The one universal garment across all classes is the surcoat — a sleeveless, open-fronted overgarment that displays the wearer's house colors or guild insignia. In the Heartlands, you are always wearing your allegiance. Removing your surcoat in public is either a deeply private act (you are off-duty, you are in mourning, you are between masters) or a deeply political one (you are changing sides). A man walking through Vornhold without a surcoat draws more attention than a man walking through Vornhold naked.
Architecture
River architecture. The Heartlands' cities are built at confluences, on riverbanks, around bridges — and the buildings reflect this: stone foundations rising from the waterline, wooden upper stories cantilevered over the current, and bridges that are as much market-street as crossing-point. The signature structure is the riverhall — a long, narrow building oriented perpendicular to the river, with a dock at one end and a street entrance at the other, serving as both warehouse and meeting hall. Riverhalls are the Heartlands' civic centers: disputes are arbitrated there, elections held there, feasts hosted there. The Argenhold Riverhall — the ducal seat — is the largest on the continent, with a vaulted stone ceiling and a dock large enough to berth six barges abreast.
The older architecture — pre-imperial Aethelian ruins, imperial fortifications, early Age of Faith churches — is heavy, blocky, and built to last. The newer construction is lighter, more decorated, influenced by two centuries of peace and trade: arched windows, carved lintels, the occasional Sangrean-style azulejo panel imported by a lord trying to seem cosmopolitan. The contrast between old stone and new ornament gives Heartlander cities a layered quality — the bones of empire visible beneath the skin of post-imperial prosperity.
The ancient standing stones that line every major road are the Heartlands' most distinctive landscape feature — grey, weathered, carved with markers that predate the empire and whose original meaning has been forgotten. They serve as mile-markers, property boundaries, and the occasional gallows. The Brothers of the Open Road maintain them. Travelers touch them for luck. Children dare each other to sleep beside them at night.
Food
The Heartlands eat their geography. The plains produce grain — wheat, barley, oats — and the bread culture is accordingly deep. Every town bakes differently: Vornhold's round, dark, sour loaves; Argenhold's flat river-cakes cooked on heated stones; Silvermont's braided white bread, sweet and rich with butter. Meat is beef and mutton from the plains herds, pork from the river-valley farms, and freshwater fish — pike, perch, and the enormous Argen catfish that river towns smoke over apple wood and trade downstream. Near the Sangrean border, the cuisine picks up heat and color: chili-rubbed beef, tomato-based stews, tropical fruit preserves. Near the Silver Mountains, it becomes sparser and heartier: root vegetables, dried sausage, hard cheese, and the fortified wine that miners drink to keep warm underground.
The Heartlands' signature culinary institution is the guild table — a communal meal hosted by the local guild chapter, open to any guild member and their family, featuring whatever the members contributed. The guild table is simultaneously a social event, a business meeting, and a political caucus. Deals are made over bread and salt. Alliances are forged over shared wine. Grudges are nursed over the quality of someone else's sausage. The saying goes: "You can learn more at a guild table than at a ducal court, and the food is better."
Music
Formal. The dominant form is the ballad — a narrative song performed by a solo singer with a fiddle or small harp, recounting historical events, dynastic achievements, or cautionary tales of betrayal and downfall. Ballads are long (some run over an hour), structured (verse-chorus-verse, with a bridge called "the turn" that introduces a moral or twist), and treated with the seriousness of legal documents. A ballad about a house's founding is considered a legitimate source of historical authority — courts have ruled on inheritance disputes based on which version of a ballad the local tradition preserved.
The counter-tradition is the river-song — informal, bawdy, sung by bargemen on the water and by drinkers in the riverside taverns. River-songs are topical (new verses are added constantly to comment on current events), irreverent (no duke, no bishop, no guild-master is safe from mockery), and enormously popular with the common people, who use them as a safe channel for political commentary that would get them hanged if spoken in prose. The Bargemen's Guild maintains an unofficial archive of river-songs that is, by some estimates, the most comprehensive record of popular opinion in the Heartlands.
Religion
The Heartlands are the most devoutly Lovist region on the continent after the Holy See itself. The great cathedrals of Vornhold, Argenhold, and Silvermont are among the finest architectural achievements of the Age of Faith, their stone vaulting paid for by ducal donations and their altars served by priests from all three major orders. The Ayanite presence is strongest — the Heartlands' formal, precedent-obsessed culture aligns naturally with the order of Truth and Law, and Ayanite scholars staff the region's courts, schools, and scribal offices.
The Holy See — the seat of the Council of the Holy Three, the supreme authority of the Lovist faith — is located within the Heartlands, in the cathedral-city of Faithir. This gives the region an outsized influence on continental religious politics and makes the Council of Three an unavoidable player in Heartlander power struggles. Both Silverblood and Silverring court the Council's endorsement, sending lavish donations and competing to appear as the faith's truest defender. The Council has so far refused to take sides, but the religious orders are not unanimous — some favor the traditionalist piety of Silverblood, others the "enlightened" patronage of Silverring. Should the Council be forced to choose, their declaration could turn the dynastic struggle into a holy war.

III. THE POLITICAL SYSTEM
The Argenlord
The Argenlord is the Heartlands' answer to the question: how do you unite a region too large for any single house to dominate, too proud for any house to submit, and too rich for anyone to leave alone?
The answer, devised by Daven Argenhold "the Peacemaker" in 919 AF after the devastating War of Five Dukes, is elegant and deliberately fragile. The Argenlord is elected every three years by the heads of the major houses — each house of renown gets one vote, cast by the head of the house. The Argenlord serves as a ceremonial leader with specific emergency powers: in times of war or famine, the Argenlord can bypass individual duchies' authority, requisition troops, commandeer grain stores, and issue binding decrees. In peacetime, the Argenlord arbitrates disputes, hosts the triennial moot, maintains the Argen road network, and represents the Heartlands to the other regions.
The system was designed to prevent tyranny. It has instead produced a different pathology: a permanent cold war between the houses that can afford to buy the title and a permanent resentment from the houses that cannot. The election itself has become the continent's most elaborate exercise in political theater — months of negotiation, bribery, threat, and counter-threat, conducted through intermediaries, sealed with oaths that everyone knows will be broken as soon as the political winds shift, and resolved in a single day of voting that has been predetermined by the preceding months of backroom deals.
The Silver Covenant and Its Collapse
For roughly 200 years (c. 960–1250 AF), the Heartlands operated under the Silver Covenant — a formal partnership between House Silverblood and House Silverring that divided the region into spheres of influence. Silverblood controlled the plains and agriculture. Silverring controlled the mountains and mining. They alternated the Argenlord title between them by agreement, with occasional compromise elections of candidates from neutral houses (Beaumont, Belorn) when direct alternation was politically inconvenient.
The Covenant was the foundation of Heartlands stability, and its collapse — the Argent Schism — is the defining political crisis of the present day.
The Schism did not begin with a single event. It accumulated, like silt in a river, until the channel was choked and the water found new paths. Silverblood expanded its agricultural holdings into territory that Silverring considered part of its sphere. Silverring's Vaultkeepers began extending loans to Silverblood-aligned houses at rates that amounted to economic warfare. Trade disputes over river tariffs became shouting matches at moot. The compromise elections stopped — each house demanded the title for itself, every time, and the minor houses were forced to choose sides rather than mediate.
By 1250 AF, the Covenant was dead in everything but name. By 1258 AF, the Raven's Fall — Silverring's puppet house, the Corbeaus, seizing Corvallis from the Silverblood-aligned Griffinwings — turned the cold war hot. By 1307 AF, the Feast of Poison obliterated the leadership of the neutral house that had held the region together for four centuries. And by 1308 AF, when the story begins, the Heartlands are a powder keg soaked in river-water and silver, waiting for a spark.
Who Gets a Vote
The Argenlord election is open to every "house of renown" — a deliberately vague category that has been argued about for 400 years. The original signatories of the Treaty of Five Bridges (Silverblood, Silverring, Beaumont, Belorn, Argenhold) each hold a vote by right. Houses elevated since then — Seeder, Lockmere, Corbeau, Sandsword, and others — hold votes granted by precedent, by purchase, or by the simple fact that they showed up at moot with enough armed men that denying them a seat was more trouble than it was worth.
At 1308 AF, approximately twelve houses hold recognized votes, though the exact number is disputed (House Belorn's vote is contested — the house still exists but has been so diminished that Silverblood argues it no longer qualifies as a "house of renown"). The voting houses, in approximate order of power:
House Silverblood — holds the title
House Silverring — the primary challenger
House Argenhold — the traditional neutral (currently vacant/contested)
House Beaumont — the forest princes, officially neutral
House Corbeau — Silverring's puppet in Corvallis
House Lockmere — the pass-keepers, fiercely independent
House Seeder — Silverblood's agricultural vassals
House Sandsword — the desert frontier wardens
House Valenti — river merchants, rising fast, Silverring-aligned
House Riverborne — river fleet, secretly Silverblood-aligned
House Belorn — diminished, vote contested
Various minor houses whose votes shift with the political winds

IV. THE PROVINCES
THE SILVER PLAINS — The Vast Central Grain Plains
Ruling Dynasty: House Silverblood — Claims ancient pre-imperial bloodline Key Vassal: House Seeder — Harvest masters and granary lords Major City: Vornhold — The continental trade hub Key Guild: The Marketborn Council — Merchant princes Population (estimated): 400,000–500,000
The Silver Plains are the vast, beating heart of the continent, a seemingly endless expanse of grain that ripples like a golden sea under a wide, open sky. The roads are ancient, marked by grey standing stones that have witnessed millennia of caravans and marching armies. The air is thick with the sweet, dusty scent of cut wheat and the rich smell of rain on fertile soil.
House Silverblood controls the plains and, through the grain, controls the Heartlands. Their claim to power is double-rooted: an ancient lineage that traces (they say) to pre-imperial Aethelian chieftains, and the brutal practical reality that their Vornhold silos contain enough grain to feed or starve half the continent. The family's founding legend says that Argen the Pale, a pre-imperial chieftain, made a pact with the land itself, shedding his own silver-touched blood into the soil to guarantee eternal fertility. More cynical histories claim he simply slaughtered his rivals and buried their bodies in his fields to serve as fertilizer. Both versions are probably partially true.
The current head is Argenlord Theron Silverblood (age 59), a man consumed by the power he seized. He is a master of political theater, projecting an image of pious authority while privately indulging in paranoia and excess. He suffers from a wasting sickness that leaves him perpetually weak and irritable, and he is obsessed with his legacy, terrified that the Schism he helped create will be his only epitaph. His eldest son Ser Kaelen Silverblood (34) is a cruel, arrogant warrior whose solution to any problem is a public execution. His daughter Lyra Silverblood (29) was married off to the head of House Seeder but is far more intelligent and ruthless than her brother — she manipulates her husband and uses Seeder resources to build her own power base. His acknowledged bastard Aric Silverblood (22) serves as captain of the household guard, fiercely loyal but tormented by his low birth. And his younger brother Maester Orin (65), who renounced his name to join the Magos, serves as the family's advisor — a broken man, haunted by ghosts and dependent on wine.
House Seeder is the Silverblood's essential ally — the family that actually runs the agricultural machinery. Founded by Old Man Hemlock, a common farmer whose crop rotation innovations saved the Silver Plains during the post-imperial famines, the Seeders now control the largest granary network on the continent. The current lord, Borin Seeder (32), is simple, brutish, and utterly besotted with his wife Lyra Silverblood — which is precisely the arrangement Lyra engineered.
Vornhold itself is the continent's largest inland city — a trade hub where goods from every region converge, governed by the powerful Marketborn Council, a consortium of merchant princes who value Silverblood stability above all else and fund the Argenlord's administration in exchange for favorable tariffs.
The plains are outwardly peaceful. The harvests have been good. But the taxes are high, and the Silverblood Argenlord's decrees carry the sharp edge of a tyrant, not a first among equals. Every farmer sharpening a scythe for the harvest is also whetting a blade for what comes next.

SILVERMONT — The Silver Mountain Borderlands
Ruling Dynasty: House Silverring — Mining dynasty of the southern mountains Key Vassals: House Argensword (silver refiners), House Greyrock (gem cutters) Major City: Silvermont — The shining mountain city Key Guild: The Vaultkeepers of Silvermont — Banking guild Population (estimated): 250,000–300,000
A stark contrast to the plains. Silvermont is a jagged frontier of snow-capped peaks and deep, shadow-filled valleys. The air is thin and crisp, smelling of pine and cold stone. The constant sound is the ring of hammers on steel from the mines and forges that cling to the mountainsides. The shining city of Silvermont is a testament to the wealth torn from these mountains — its towers plated in polished silver that reflects the harsh mountain sun.
House Silverring is the Heartlands' second power and its first grievance. Once sworn partners of House Silverblood in the Silver Covenant, they are now their most bitter rivals. The Argent Schism shattered their alliance, and Silverring views the current Argenlord as a usurper. Their immense wealth — managed by the Vaultkeepers of Silvermont, the continent's first formal banking guild (deposit accounts, letters of credit, commercial loans) — allows them to fund a vast network of alliances. Silverring's strategy is economic strangulation: they are forging what is known as the Iron Pact with disaffected houses, using their treasury to offer loans and support to any who would defy the Silverblood Argenlord. While the Plains control the food, Silvermont controls the money.
The current Silverring leadership includes Duchess Anya Silverring, a woman of formidable intelligence who communicates directly with her puppet lords and proxy agents across the Heartlands. The Vaultkeepers answer to her.
House Argensword — the silver refiners — and House Greyrock — the gem cutters — transform the raw mountain bounty into the treasures that buy loyalty and fund wars.

ARGENIA — The River Valley Between the Plains and the Mountains
Ruling Dynasty: House Argenhold — Founders of the river port Rival Dynasty: House Valenti — River merchant upstarts Loyal Vassals: House Hurth — Administrators and cupbearers Major City: Argenhold — The great river port Key Guild: The Bargemen — River transport guild Population (estimated): 300,000–350,000
Argenia is the great river valley, the fertile land that serves as the main artery of trade between the plains and the mountains. The slow, wide river dominates the landscape, its banks lined with bustling ports, prosperous towns, and the villas of wealthy merchants. The great river port of Argenhold is the nexus — a chaotic, vibrant city where fortunes are made and lost on the tides.
House Argenhold is the Heartlands' traditional neutral power — the dynasty founded by Daven the Peacemaker, whose entire identity has been built on mediation, bridge-building, and the refusal to take sides. For 400 years, the Argenholds held the region together by holding themselves apart from the Silverblood-Silverring rivalry. Their wealth came from trade, not land or mines, which made them dependent on both sides and beholden to neither.
That tradition died at the Feast of Poison (1307 AF). Duke Harros Argenhold — aging, weakened by drink — hosted the coronation feast for his son Darric at the castle of Argenhold. Every major figure in Argenian politics attended. By midnight, every guest was dead.
The victims: Darric Argenhold (the heir), Lady Marthys Argenhold (née Hurth, Kaeo's stepmother), Duke Harros himself, Lord Rynald Hurth, Ser Tovan Valenti, Lady Aevra Bargemont (patroness of the Bargemen's Guild), Lord Pelrin Redmarsh, Father Jorn of the Ayanite Concord, plus dozens of lesser nobles and servants. The massacre wiped out nearly every power-broker who might have balanced Kaeo's return.
The poisoner is unknown. Suspects: House Silverblood (seizing the opportunity to install a regency), Jous Lorethian's agents (destabilizing the Heartlands ahead of invasion), Lady Marthys's own enemies (she had many), and House Valenti (whose leader Damon was conspicuously absent from the feast).
House Silverblood moved immediately. Lord Athelric Silverblood declared a regency over Argenia "until a proper heir can be installed." A bird was sent to Kaeo in Xaria.
Duke Kaeo Argenhold (28) — the last surviving Argenhold — has returned after eleven years of exile in Xaria. He left at seventeen under murky circumstances (a falling-out with his stepmother, restlessness, political exile — probably all three). He spent a decade inside the Ix'Atani colonial apparatus and has returned with Xarian-trained servants, gifts from the Vizier, and the reputation of a man nobody truly knows. He arrives in 1308 AF to find Silverbloods sitting in his hall, the Bargemen's Guild fractured, the Valentis circling, the Church suspicious, and every faction in Argenia with a plan, a test, or a knife.
House Valenti is the threat from within. Lord Damon Valenti (40) — a charismatic, utterly ruthless merchant prince descended from a common bargeman who smuggled and pirated his way to a fortune — has been systematically eroding Argenhold authority for years, peeling away allies with bribery and blackmail. His wife Oliva (38), a former courtesan, runs the family's spy network. His son Ser Lucan (22) is a skilled swordsman and cruel bully. His daughter Lelia (19) is being groomed for marriage into the Silverring family. The Valentis are secretly funded by Silverring and represent the merchant-class ambition that the old nobility fears most: the possibility that money can simply buy the aristocracy out from under itself.
House Hurth — the Argenhold family's hereditary stewards and cupbearers — is represented by the aging Lord Gregor Hurth (70), a man of unshakeable integrity who has served three generations of Argenhold dukes and is deeply worried by his house's decline. His son Ser Jon Hurth (40) is more pragmatic and less loyal — he believes House Argenhold is doomed and is secretly preparing to offer his family's services to whoever wins the coming conflict.
The Bargemen's Guild — fractured since Lady Aevra Bargemont's death at the Feast — is split between her nephew Rhodin Bargemont (pro-Silverblood, wants stability) and Cella Bargemont (anti-Silverblood, open to Kaeo). Whoever wins the Bargemen controls the river, and whoever controls the river controls the Heartlands' jugular.

BEAUMONT — The Ancient Northwestern Forests
Ruling Dynasty: House Beaumont — Forest princes with ties to Sangrea and the Horns Key Vassals: House Redheart (border wardens toward Sangrea), House Hornborne (forest wardens toward the Horns) Major City: Beaumont — The forest capital Key Guild: The Crossroad Brotherhood — Carpenters, guides, and road-experts Population (estimated): 150,000–200,000
The ancient forests of Beaumont are a world apart — a sprawling, dappled realm of towering trees and quiet, moss-covered paths. The capital is less a city and more a collection of grand halls and timber keeps woven seamlessly into the woods. The people are woodsmen and carpenters, guides and wardens, their lives intertwined with forests that border the lands of Sangrea and the Horns.
House Beaumont is caught in the eye of the storm. Their loyalties are torn, their position perilous. As wardens of the northwestern frontier, their alliances are crucial to the security of the Heartlands. Both Silverblood and Silverring court their favor — control of Beaumont's forests means control of a vital strategic flank and a near-endless supply of timber for fleets and siege engines.
Lord Alaric Beaumont walks a razor's edge, offering platitudes to both sides while secretly trying to gauge which will prevail. His vassals are staunch traditionalists: Lord Corvin Redheart (60) — a grim, pious old warrior who has held the Sangrean border for decades and despises his liege lord's weakness — and Lord Borin Hornborne (48) — a massive, hirsute man more comfortable in the woods than in any hall, whose wife Gwen is rumored to be a witch and whose dozen wild children serve as the forest's scouts and hunters.
The Crossroad Brotherhood holds the true key to Beaumont — their knowledge of the forest's secret paths and hidden ways makes them indispensable. Whichever way the Brotherhood begins to guide supplies and messengers in greater numbers will signal where the Forest Princes have placed their bet.

CORVALLIS — The Eastern Hill Country
Ruling Dynasty (current): House Corbeau — Merchant-turned-lords, Silverring puppets Ruling Dynasty (deposed): House Griffinwing — Ancient dynasty, now rebels Major City: Griffinkeep — The garrison city guarding the passes to Rosland Key Guild: The Birdcallers — Signal masters loyal to Corbeau Population (estimated): 120,000–150,000
Corvallis is a fresh wound. A land of rolling hills and sharp, rocky crags, a buffer territory guarding the eastern passes to Rosland and the Frozen South. The wind carries the shrill calls of trained birds across the valleys — the communication network of the Birdcallers, whose loyalty House Corbeau purchased along with their services.
For centuries, this was Griffinwing territory — an ancient dynasty tracing pre-imperial roots, proud as their heraldic creature. But House Griffinwing grew stagnant. Resources depleted. No male heir. Their lord, Caelan Griffinwing, was vulnerable. In 1258 AF, House Corbeau — a merchant family funded and armed by House Silverring — launched a swift military takeover. The assault on Griffinkeep lasted three days. Lord Caelan was captured and exiled. Most of his household was killed or scattered. This was the Raven's Fall — the first open act of aggression in the Argent Schism.
The current Corbeau lord, Malakai Corbeau (42), is haunted by his father's crimes, dependent on milk-of-the-poppy to sleep, and terrified of the Griffinwing loyalists who plague his lands. His wife Lady Ava Corbeau (19) — a distant Silverring cousin married to seal the pact — is the true power behind the throne, cold and ambitious. His heir Joric (18) is sadistic. His bastard half-brother Ser Rolland Flowers (25) is the only person he trusts.
The deposed Lord Arion Griffinwing (22) — the last of his line, a charismatic and vengeful rebel leader — wages an insurgency from the eastern hills with his aunt Lady Elara Griffinwing (50), who escaped the massacre and serves as the rebellion's heart. The insurgency is active, violent, and funded by Silverblood gold. Corvallis is the Heartlands' proxy war — every raid on a Corbeau caravan is another blow in the larger struggle.
Critically, Corvallis controls the passes to both Rosland and the Deadwood Valley — the route through which southern gold has been flowing to House Corbeau's trading posts. Ser Edric Corbeau (Malakai's uncle) was the knight who met Sinna of the South and brokered the gold trade. The southern gold has enriched House Corbeau enormously, funding the infrastructure that won them grudging local acceptance even as the old nobility views them as usurpers.

THE WESTERN HEARTLANDS — The Mountain Pass Province
Nominal Ruler: House Silverblood Actual Ruler: House Lockmere — Keepers of the western passes Major City: Grintall — The fortress city in the pass Key Guild: The Alphorn Mining Clique — Mountain messengers Population (estimated): 50,000–80,000
The Western Heartlands are a formidable barrier of jagged mountains, a land of high, windswept passes and deep, shadowed valleys. The fortress city of Grintall clings to the mountainside, a grey stone sentinel guarding the only reliable passage to the west. The dominant sound is the lonely, echoing call of the alphorns used by the mountain messengers — coded calls that echo across the peaks, reporting every traveler and every approaching threat.
House Lockmere is the Heartlands' most stubbornly independent minor power. Founded by a Nionian legionary who was tasked with guarding the western pass and simply closed the gates when the empire fell, the Lockmeres have maintained their position through unyielding military discipline and the geographic reality that Grintall is essentially impregnable. Lord Torvin Lockmere (55) is as silent and unyielding as the mountains he guards — a stoic isolationist whose only law is the security of the pass.
Silverblood relies on Lockmere loyalty to protect its western flank. But the Lockmeres are fiercely independent, their loyalty sworn not to any Argenlord but to the pass itself. Silverring has been sending envoys and rich gifts, hoping to persuade the Keepers that their interests are better served by a new Argenlord. Should Lockmere bar the pass to Silverblood forces, the Argenlord's kingdom would be cut in half.

RIVERBEND — The Great River's Curve
Nominal Ruler: House Silverring Key Rivals: House Riverborne, House Waterborn, House Sturgeonhelm Major City: Hardstream Port — The crescent harbor city Population (estimated): 25,000–40,000
A province defined by the great river's sweeping curve, a fertile crescent where the water is wide, deep, and slow. Hardstream Port is the heart — a bustling hub of riverine trade. This is a land of ancient river nobility where power is measured by the size of one's fleet and the strength of one's grip on commerce.
This province is a hornet's nest. Officially ruled by House Silverring, their authority is fiercely contested by a web of ancient river houses. House Riverborne commands a formidable fleet and has deep-rooted claims. House Waterborn rules Hardstream Port itself, allied with Riverborne. House Sturgeonhelm — the fishing fleet owners — are a pragmatic bloc whose loyalty shifts to whoever can guarantee the best prices.
The wrinkle: House Riverborne is secretly funded by Silverblood to act as their agents on the river, smuggling weapons and spies while maintaining the public facade of a simple shipping magnate. Lord Arryk Riverborne (39) plays this double game with cunning and nerve. Riverbend is where the Argent Schism's cold war is fought on the water — every barge that sinks, every cargo that goes missing, every customs officer who looks the other way is a move in the larger game.

ARGEN'S END — The Southeastern Desert Frontier
Nominal Ruler: House Silverblood Actual Ruler: House Sandsword — Desert march wardens Major City: Ashgate — The last city before the desert Key Force: Hashreds Mercenary Company Population (estimated): 18,000–25,000
The harsh, sun-scorched southeastern frontier, where the fertile lands give way to an endless desert. Ashgate is the last bastion — a walled city of hardened soldiers, desperate refugees, and opportunistic mercenaries. The Silverblood Argenlord's authority is a fiction here. The true power is Lord Kaelen Sandsword (48), a grim, sun-burnt warrior who was born in the saddle and rules the frontier as his personal fiefdom. His daughter Zara (20) leads the desert patrols and is more respected by the soldiers than her cowardly brother Roric (21). His sister Asha (40), captured by desert tribes as a young woman and held for a decade before escaping, lives as a recluse in the highest tower, said to possess "sand-sight" — the ability to see visions in shifting dunes.
This is the frontier where the Giant's third ship landed. Venania Sarko, a hunter's daughter from the Sandsword holding near Ashgate, was the first human to spot the Giants — a giantess named Sëdhra of the Velthari, an elder root-listener who washed ashore alone and spent her first days pressing her ear to the ground, desperately searching for the underground root-network that had been the foundation of her entire sensory world. The Heartlands' encounter with the Giants has begun here, in the desert, witnessed by a girl whose father works for a house that answers to no one.

THE HOLY SEE — Faithir and Its Environs
Ruling Authority: The Council of the Holy Three Key Orders: Ayanite, Ashanite, Alonite — and their hundreds of sub-orders Major City: Faithir — The Great Cathedral Population (estimated): 100,000–120,000 (including religious communities)
The seat of the Lovist faith sits within the Heartlands' borders, a patchwork of territories controlled by various devout religious orders, each with its own traditions and allegiances. The Council of Three's primary goal is maintaining the unity of the faith and preventing the secular conflicts from spilling into the divine realm.
The Argent Schism has placed the Council in an impossible position. Both Silverblood and Silverring claim to be the true defenders of the faith and send lavish donations, seeking the Council's endorsement. The Council has refused to take sides, but the religious orders are fractured — some favor Silverblood's traditionalist piety, others Silverring's "enlightened" patronage. Should the Council be forced to choose, their declaration could turn the dynastic struggle into a full-blown holy war.
The murder of Father Jorn of the Ayanite Concord at the Feast of Poison has outraged the Council. They may dispatch inquisitors to investigate — and those inquisitors will inevitably encounter Kaeo's Xarian servants, his foreign manners, and the uncomfortable question of whether a man who spent eleven years inside a pagan empire can be trusted to rule a Lovist duchy.

V. COMPLETE HISTORY
Pre-Imperial Period
The Heartlands' political traditions predate the empire by centuries. The Aethelian republics — informal gatherings of thinkers who debated in public plazas — produced the first systematic investigations of natural phenomena, ethical theory, and political science on the continent. Their work survives only in fragments, but the fragments are extraordinary: a treatise on celestial mechanics, an ethical framework arguing that justice is a social contract requiring constant renegotiation, a political analysis of tyranny that reads, twelve centuries later, as a precise diagnosis of the disease that would kill the republics themselves.
The Heartlands built levee systems that tamed their rivers for irrigation and transport. They developed the guild system that still underpins the region's economy. And they produced the bread culture, the river-song tradition, and the ballad form that define Heartlander identity to this day.
The Shattering (903–950 AF)
The most chaotic transition of any region. No single house could dominate the plains after the empire's fall.
The Grain Riots (904–908 AF) established the basic power dynamics: House Silverblood hoarded grain and sold at extortionate prices. House Silverring, less affected by crop failures in the mountains, sent grain caravans south to buy loyalty from starving plains towns. This was the origin of the rivalry — charity as conquest, generosity as investment.
The War of Five Dukes (912–919 AF) — Silverblood, Silverring, Beaumont, Belorn, and Argenhold each declaring sovereignty — was inconclusive. No house could conquer the others. The fighting destroyed bridges, burned granaries, killed 40,000 people, and proved the fundamental theorem of Heartlander politics: the region is too big to unite by force and too interconnected to govern by isolation.
Daven Argenhold brokered the Treaty of Five Bridges (919 AF) and established the Argenlord system. He was elected first Argenlord unanimously. The ducal titles were adopted. House Seeder was elevated.
The Age of Orders (950–1050 AF)
The Argenlord system stabilized. The Silver Covenant (c. 960 AF) divided the Heartlands between Silverblood and Silverring and established alternation of the Argenlord title. House Lockmere consolidated the western passes. Stonebridge became a market town and pilgrimage site.
The Century of Blood (1050–1150 AF)
The Blight of 1087 — grain fungus devastating the Silver Plains for three consecutive harvests — tested the Covenant. The Argenlord (Silverblood) invoked emergency powers and commandeered Silverring grain stores. Silverring complied but resented it — the first visible crack. House Belorn declined through poor management and incompetent heirs.
The Golden Century (1150–1250 AF)
Peak of the Silver Covenant. Cooperation, prosperity, the ducal courts as centers of art. The Vaultkeepers established the continent's first banking system. The city of Argenhold became the premier river port. The Bargemen's Guild became a powerhouse.
The Long Peace and Its Cracks (1250–1308 AF)
The Argent Schism. The Raven's Fall (1258 AF) — Corbeau seizing Corvallis from Griffinwing, funded by Silverring. The Wildwoman's Bargain (1270 AF) — Sinna and Ser Edric Corbeau opening the southern gold trade. The Argenhold Exile (1290 AF) — Kaeo departing for Xaria. The Feast of Poison (1307 AF) — the massacre that destroyed Argenhold's leadership. The Giants' Arrival (1308 AF) — Sëdhra washing ashore near Ashgate.

VI. CURRENT STATE OF AFFAIRS — 1308 AF
The Nest of Knives
When Kaeo Argenhold rides through the gates of the city his family built, he will find:
Silverbloods sitting in his hall. Lord Athelric Silverblood holds the castle under a regency declared the moment the feast victims' bodies cooled. His staff — Dame Rehana Silverblood (logistics), Ser Darion Krell (castle guard), Master Huld Verren (chamberlain), Sister-Justiciar Ivelle Coran (Ayanite examiner), and the physician Edrik Pall (who is quietly investigating the poison) — have turned Argenhold into a Silverblood administrative center in all but name. The regency is polite occupation. Athelric will offer Kaeo a joint-rule charter that leaves the real levers — river tariffs, road security, military levies — in Silverblood hands for three years.
Guilds and houses fractured. The Bargemen's Guild is split between Rhodin Bargemont (pro-Silverblood stability) and Cella Bargemont (anti-Silverblood, open to Kaeo). House Valenti is circling, its leader Damon conspicuously alive while everyone else at the Feast is conspicuously dead. House Hurth is divided — old Gregor is loyal but his son Jon is already hedging.
The Faith watching. Father Jorn's murder has brought the Council of Three's attention. An Ayanite inquisitor is already in the castle. Kaeo's Xarian servants, his foreign manners, his untouched slave-girl gift from the Vizier — all of it will be scrutinized for heresy, and the first accusation of impropriety will be weaponized by whichever faction finds it useful.
The Schism ready to ignite. Silverring is funding proxies. The Griffinwing insurgency bleeds Corbeau territory. House Lockmere's pass-loyalty is being bid upon. Beaumont's Brotherhood is being watched for signals. Riverbend's river-war is escalating. The desert frontier is being ignored while Giants walk its sand.
The great question: who poisoned the Feast? Every faction has a theory. Every theory implicates someone. The truth — whatever it is — will reshape the Heartlands' power structure when it emerges. And Kaeo, the man who spent eleven years learning how to survive inside an empire that practices human sacrifice, may be the only person in the room calculating clearly enough to find it.
The Argent Schism — Strategic Positions
House Silverblood's position: Controls the Argenlord title, the grain supply, the regency of Argenia, and the loyalty of House Seeder, House Sandsword (nominally), and the Marketborn Council. Weakness: the Argenlord is dying, his heir is stupid, his daughter has her own agenda, and the Schism is draining resources.
House Silverring's position: Controls the money (Vaultkeepers), the mountain passes, the puppet lordship of Corvallis, the alliance with House Valenti, and a growing network of bought loyalties (the Iron Pact). Weakness: they are perceived as the aggressor (the Raven's Fall is not forgotten), their puppet Corbeau is fragile, and the Church hasn't endorsed them.
House Argenhold's position: One man. No army. No allies he can trust. No money. A castle full of strangers wearing his enemy's silver. But: the name. The river. The tradition of four centuries of neutrality. And whatever Kaeo learned in Xaria that made the Ix'Atani governor treat him as an equal.
The Church's position: The Council of Three wants peace, stability, and continued tithing revenue. The Feast of Poison killed one of their bishops. They will investigate. Their investigation will create leverage. Their leverage will be used — the question is by whom.
The Wild Cards: The Griffinwing insurgency. House Lockmere's pass-loyalty. House Beaumont's choice of side. The Giants on the southeastern frontier. And Jous Lorethian, whose agents may have poisoned the Feast and whose invasion fleet is being assembled on Nionia — the threat that no one in the Heartlands is taking seriously enough because they're too busy fighting each other.

VII. NAMED CHARACTERS (Reference)
Great Houses — Current Leaders
Name
Age
House
Role
Argenlord Theron Silverblood
59
Silverblood
Current Argenlord, wasting sickness
Lord Athelric Silverblood
~55
Silverblood
Regent of Argenia
Duchess Anya Silverring
~50
Silverring
Silverring head, spymaster
Duke Kaeo Argenhold
28
Argenhold
Returning exile, last of his line
Lord Alaric Beaumont
~45
Beaumont
Forest prince, desperately neutral
Lord Malakai Corbeau
42
Corbeau
Haunted puppet lord of Corvallis
Lord Torvin Lockmere
55
Lockmere
Keeper of the Pass, immovable
Lord Borin Seeder
32
Seeder
Silverblood vassal, Lyra's pawn
Lord Damon Valenti
40
Valenti
Ruthless merchant prince, Silverring-funded
Lord Kaelen Sandsword
48
Sandsword
Desert warden, frontier lord
Lord Arryk Riverborne
39
Riverborne
Secret Silverblood agent on the river
Lord Arion Griffinwing
22
Griffinwing
Rebel leader, exiled prince

Supporting Characters
Name
Age
Allegiance
Role
Ser Kaelen Silverblood
34
Silverblood
Heir, cruel and dim
Lyra Silverblood
29
Silverblood/herself
The real power, married to Seeder
Aric Silverblood
22
Silverblood
Bastard son, guard captain
Maester Orin
65
Silverblood/Magos
Broken advisor, alcoholic
Oliva Valenti
38
Valenti
Spymaster, former courtesan
Ser Lucan Valenti
22
Valenti
Swordsman, bully
Lelia Valenti
19
Valenti
Marriage pawn for Silverring
Lord Gregor Hurth
70
Argenhold
Ancient steward, loyal
Ser Jon Hurth
40
Undecided
Gregor's pragmatic son
Lady Ava Corbeau
19
Silverring
True power behind Malakai
Lady Elara Griffinwing
50
Griffinwing
Rebel heart, Arion's anchor
Zara Sandsword
20
Sandsword
Desert warrior, respected
Roric Sandsword
21
Sandsword
Coward heir, disappointment
Lord Corvin Redheart
60
Beaumont
Grim border warden
Lord Borin Hornborne
48
Beaumont
Wild forest lord
Rhodin Bargemont
~35
Pro-Silverblood
Bargemen faction leader
Cella Bargemont
~30
Pro-Kaeo
Bargemen faction leader
Venania Sarko
~18
Sandsword
Hunter's daughter, first Giant witness

Kaeo's Retinue
Name
Role
Sir Caldus Merrowayne
Knight companion, exile of Silverblood blood, most trusted guard
Xarian household slaves
Scribes, attendants, merchants — foreign and suspicious
The Vizier's Gift
An untouched slave-girl — political vulnerability and Xarian bond

Giants in the Heartlands
Name
Age
Description
Sëdhra of the Velthari
~140 (Giant)
Root-listener, elder. Washed ashore near Ashgate. Can sense echo-fields. Found humans "profoundly sad" — lit candles immediately snuffed.


VIII. KEY LOCATIONS
Vornhold — Silverblood seat. Continental trade hub. Largest inland city. Massive granaries.
Silvermont — Silverring seat. Mountain city, towers plated in polished silver. Banking center.
Argenhold — Argenhold seat. Great river port, largest riverhall on the continent. Currently under Silverblood regency.
Faithir — Holy See. Seat of the Council of the Holy Three. Cathedral-city.
Griffinkeep — Corbeau seat (formerly Griffinwing). Garrison city guarding eastern passes.
Grintall — Lockmere seat. Fortress city in the western pass. Essentially impregnable.
Beaumont — Forest capital. Timber halls woven into the woods.
Hardstream Port — Riverbend's crescent harbor. Contested between multiple river houses.
Ashgate — Sandsword seat. Frontier fortress at the desert's edge. Where the Giant landed.
Stonebridge — Pilgrimage site and market town, maintained by the Brothers of the Open Road.

IX. KEY EVENTS TIMELINE
Date (AF)
Event
Pre-imperial
Aethelian republics, guild system, river trade networks established
903 AF
Empire dissolves. Heartlands plunge into chaos
904–908 AF
Grain Riots. Silverblood hoards; Silverring buys loyalty with charity
912–919 AF
War of Five Dukes. Inconclusive. 40,000 dead
919 AF
Treaty of Five Bridges. Daven Argenhold creates Argenlord system
c. 960 AF
Silver Covenant established. Silverblood/Silverring power-sharing
1087 AF
The Blight. Grain fungus, famine, emergency powers invoked. First crack in Covenant
1150–1250 AF
Golden Century. Peak Covenant. Vaultkeepers establish banking. Culture flourishes
c. 1250 AF
Argent Schism begins. Covenant collapses through accumulated grievances
1258 AF
The Raven's Fall. Corbeau seizes Corvallis from Griffinwing, funded by Silverring
c. 1270 AF
Wildwoman's Bargain. Sinna and Ser Edric Corbeau open southern gold trade
1290 AF
Kaeo Argenhold departs for Xaria
1307 AF
Feast of Poison. Argenhold leadership massacred. Silverblood declares regency
1308 AF
Kaeo returns. Giants arrive near Ashgate. Story begins


X. THEMATIC TENSIONS (For Narrative Use)
Legitimacy vs. Power. The Heartlands' central question: what makes a ruler legitimate? Blood? Election? Wealth? Competence? The Argenlord system was designed to answer this question through process, but the process has been corrupted by the very houses it was meant to restrain. Kaeo returns with the legitimate name but no power. Silverblood holds the power but their legitimacy is eroding. Silverring has the money to buy either but cannot buy both.
Tradition vs. Ambition. House Argenhold represents 400 years of neutrality and mediation — a tradition that served the Heartlands well but could not survive the pressures of the Schism. Kaeo must decide whether to restore his house's tradition or adapt it. The Valentis represent the opposite: ambition unmoored from tradition, money as the only qualification for power. The clash between these philosophies will determine whether the Heartlands' political system survives or is replaced by something rawer and more honest.
The Holy Roman Empire Problem. The Heartlands' fundamental structural weakness is the same as the HRE's: an elective monarchy surrounded by princes who are too powerful to be commanded and too proud to cooperate. The Argenlord can ask for troops but cannot compel them. The election can be bought but cannot be guaranteed. The emergency powers are real but invoking them creates the resentment that makes the next emergency worse. The system works only as long as everyone agrees to pretend it works — and the pretense is failing.
Faith and State. The Church's presence in the Heartlands — the physical seat of the Council of Three at Faithir — makes every political struggle a potential religious crisis. The Feast of Poison killed a bishop. The returning duke spent eleven years in a pagan empire. The rival houses each claim divine favor. If the Church chooses a side, the Argent Schism becomes a crusade. If the Church doesn't choose, it becomes irrelevant. Neither outcome serves the Council's interests.
The Unknown Threat. While the Heartlands tear themselves apart over grain tariffs and river tolls, Jous Lorethian is building a fleet on Nionia. Giants are walking the southeastern desert. Southern gold is flowing through passes that the Daudrguard are about to close permanently. And the only person in the Heartlands who has been trained to think about threats from outside the system is a twenty-eight-year-old duke who just arrived home to find his family dead and his enemies sitting in his chair.
The Heartlands have survived for four centuries on compromise, negotiation, and the willingness to treat politics as a game where everyone agrees to the rules even when they cheat. That era is ending. The rules are breaking. The game is becoming a war. And the man who inherits the board has been playing a completely different game for eleven years in a place none of them have ever seen.

DIVINE VEINS — MATERIAL WORLD CODEX
Ores · Military · Trade · Flora · Fauna
Reference Document — 1308 AF

PART ONE: ORES, MINERALS & GEMSTONES

THE HEARTLANDS
Primary Ore: Silver
Argencia — deepest Silverring shafts; purest grade; used for coinage, architectural cladding, silver-threaded cloth
Cindrum — surface deposits; lower purity; tools, secondary jewelry, military fittings
Fluval — placer deposits in Argen tributaries; fine particles panned by homesteaders; the source of the "silver rivers" that strangers mistake for legend
Argentite — quartz with natural silver inclusions; semi-precious; decorative inlay in noble furniture and doorframes
Secondary Minerals
Plumbis — grey-white lead ore from minor seams; tomb sealing, pipe-work, roofing
Rivea — soft white limestone along river cliffs; mortar, road-marking, working-class plaster
Terraspa — dark nodules from river gravels; fire-starting, militia arrowheads, cheap tools
Molindra — pale quartz near Silverring foothills; millstones, glass-making, optical instruments
Cúspide — deep red gemstone from Silverring mine walls; semi-precious; signet rings and seal-wax color
Aetherite — the alloyed product of Silverring smelting; silver-bright steel of unusual hardness; the Vaultkeepers treat the technique as a trade secret

ROSLAND
Primary Ore: Iron
Rubrum — surface deposits; iron-oxide rich; reddish tint when worked; common grade for tools and militia equipment
Nyxir — deep Fyrhold veins; extremely pure; coal-dark; premium weapons and the finest tools
Caldris — mid-grade; the standard working metal; armor, construction fittings, agricultural implements
Veinore — found alongside every major iron deposit; fuel for every forge in Rosland; the continent's primary industrial fuel export
Secondary Minerals
Ferrik — trace deposits in iron formations; used for bronze alloys and weatherproof roofing
Cinere — Fyrhold secondary mineral; bronze-making, food vessels, mirror-backing
Magnos — magnetic iron particles in river sediment; specialized blade-hardening technique used only by the oldest Stelev family smiths
Glacian — blue-grey slate of the northern mountains; roofing, flagstones, the distinctive gravestones of Roslandic cemeteries

THE FROZEN SOUTH
Primary Ore: Gold
Oroval — pure Kjölfoss vein gold; dense, cold-yellow; the Aurax clan's foundational resource
Aurien — placer deposits in mountain melt-streams; panned by minor clans, traded at the Winter-Moot
Ignus — Heitdalr volcanic origin; trace orange tint from mineral contamination; used specifically in Burned Priest ritual objects
Krysol — deepest Kjölfoss shafts; sometimes with crystal inclusions; most prized; the material of the finest southern goldsmithing
Secondary Minerals
Ossea — white volcanic pumice from the Heitdalr; insulation, soap-making, lightweight tool handles
Glaceon — dark volcanic glass from extinct vents in the Kjölfoss range; crude tools and cutting edges for clans without steel access
Salis — coastal evaporation flats; food preservation; only modest export value
Therman — geothermal mineral salts from hot spring deposits; medicinal, alchemical; the Copper Bowl's most reliable source for volcanic compounds

THE RED COAST
Primary Ore: Copper
Veridris — abundant; heavily oxidized green patina; cheap grade for coins, cookware, roofing
Cuprum — denser, less oxidized; premium grade for filigree and alchemical instruments
Sanguine — rare; naturally reddish without processing; used specifically in Copper Bowl medical instruments where color indicates origin
Resona — volcanic interface deposits; resonates distinctly when struck; used in bells and alchemical bowls; the sound is part of the formula
Secondary Minerals
Obsius — black volcanic glass from the Ashlands; the finest cutting material on the continent; sharper than any steel
Venae — iron-oxide inclusions create red streaks through black; the most prized blade material; small quantities only
Noxlum — Khorim's recent discovery in the deepest shafts; black, warm to the touch, unknown properties; Vazir has sealed the affected section
Malachite — green copper carbonate; pigment, decoration, minor alchemical use
Azurite — blue copper carbonate; pigment, textile dye, alchemical ingredient
Carnelian — desert formation semi-precious stone; standard Red Coast jewelry material
Rubis — iron-oxide-tinted rock salt from the deep desert; used in curing and preservation; also a modest trade good

SANGREA
Primary Mineral: Sunstone
Solaria — warm orange-gold; most common grade; decorative construction, luxury export
Cinderis — darker, almost red; high-status jewelry and fine optical instruments
Luxia — near-transparent; used in lenses, the finest glazing work, and the signal-mirrors the Campaneros maintain
Quartum — uncut from the quarry; cheapest trade form; sold in rough blocks to mainland craftsmen
Secondary Minerals
Tinto — abundant in Fuentarossa province; ceramics, the basis for all azulejo tile production
Cáliz — the pale stone of most Castesol construction; also exported for mortar production
Deltis — from Sangra and Fuente tributaries; glassmaking and construction aggregate

NIONIA
Primary: Iron + Marble
Albast — purest Cassian grade; the most prestigious building stone on the continent
Tostana — warm-tinted; second-grade construction and monumental sculpture
Nigrassa — white with dark mineral inclusions; highly decorative; used for noble interiors and the floors of the Great Dome
Lumina — Cassia Cassian's sealed discovery; glows faintly in total darkness; origin and mechanism unknown
Cassian — from the Marchia Ferrus; solid quality but not Rosland-grade; used locally for construction fittings and basic tools

VALLAN
Stannus — Daurvaal canton primary ore; the continent's most reliable tin source; exported for bronze-making
Cuprina — minor secondary mineral; local tools and cookware
Alta — rock salt deposits in the Kaltbach gorge area; supplementary to the Red Coast supply chain
Glacite — clear quartz from the high passes; optical instruments, alchemical glasswork, the finest grinding wheels

THE TEETH
Primary: Volcanic Stone
Volcanix — Emberstone standard grade; the hardest non-Bridge building stone on the continent
Pyroclast — slightly warmer tone, highest quality; the premium construction export
Espuma — lighter volcanic variety; building insulation and acoustic treatment in cathedral construction
Pontus — the original Great Bridge material; not quarriable, not reproducible; slightly warm to the touch in all temperatures
Shadowtide / Verwhisper
Selenite — freshwater pearl from Rootsea mussels; iridescent rose-gold tint; the Teeth's luxury gemstone
Sylva — fossilized resin from Verwhisper old-growth; semi-precious; rare; contains sometimes-intact insects from before the imperial era

XARIA
Primary: Gold + Jade
Virdis — the primary Jade Mountain green jade; Xaria's second-most-valuable export after gold
Tlalli — volcanic origin; very rare; ritual use only; never traded outside the peninsula
Albaia — extremely rare; associated with Ashborn caste in ritual contexts; its trade is technically illegal under the Dominion
Fluvia — water-polished smaller pieces; more accessible, lighter trade form; what most mainland merchants actually handle
Aztlan — placer and vein deposits throughout the Jade Mountains; high purity; much of it never leaves as it feeds the Dominion's tribute appetite

PART TWO: MILITARY SYSTEMS

CONTINENTAL OVERVIEW
Warfare in 1308 AF operates without gunpowder. The dominant technologies are iron and steel weapons, heavy cavalry, naval vessels, siege engines, and the tactical doctrines of four centuries of post-imperial state formation. The imperial road network — maintained by the Brothers of the Open Road — functions simultaneously as trade infrastructure and military logistics. Whoever feeds their army through the roads fastest usually wins. Every major region's military reflects its terrain, its economy, and the specific trauma that formed it.

NIONIA — The Theocratic Navy
Military Character: Naval supremacy, fire-weapons, religious enforcement, invasion preparation
Unit Types
Mareska — naval marines; boarding-action specialists; descendants of Nion I's original Nionian sailors
Albatra — standard line infantry; Ferronus-funded conscript-heavy force; white-lacquered kite shields
Karnax — Marchia Ferrus heavy infantry; stone-worker builds; extremely effective at siege and tunnel work
Ignifex — fire-weapon specialists; small elite unit stationed per vessel; handle Pyre-Seed
Vinculum — internal patrol and enforcement; former slave-catching units adapted for political policing
Malletus — dockyard militia; Navarrus-aligned; fight with shipwright tools (boarding mallets, iron spikes, rigging-hooks)
Lucentra — Domus Lux field soldiers; distinct from the Pale House interrogators; armored religious enforcement
Naval Vessels
Ignirapta — the fire-weapon warship; primary offensive vessel; clay-pot projectors fore and aft
Rostrum — iron-prow ramming galley; close-quarters ship-killing; also used as a boarding assault platform
Marmorin — fast courier vessel; marble ballast makes it extremely stable in rough water
Umbranaut — shallow-draft covert insertion craft; dark-hulled; Domus Lux intelligence operations
Farrago — flat-bottomed logistics vessel; the invasion fleet's backbone
Weapons
Ignifer — long pole with Pyre-Seed clay pot at the tip; single-use; deployed in naval boarding and siege assaults
Lithos — mining pick adapted as a weapon; extremely effective against armor joints in close quarters
Lucentus — the standard Domus Lux short sword; single-edge; white-lacquered sheath
Ora-Bolt — heavy shipboard crossbow; shorter range than a land arbalest but devastating in boarding range
Armor
Albaferrum — Domus Lux; white-lacquered steel over chain; the most recognizable military uniform on the continent
Marmorix — Karnax; overlapping marble-chip scales on boiled leather; heavy; effective against blunt weapons
Haloskin — standard naval issue; salt-hardened, waterproofed, lightweight
Tactical Doctrine: Naval supremacy. Fire-weapons at range. Boarding when close. Pyre-Seed deployed on enemy decks. Shore fortifications over field maneuver. Blockade as strategic weapon. Almost no cavalry tradition.

THE HORNS — Maritime Opportunists
Military Character: Amphibious raiding, maritime chokepoint control, terrain exploitation
Unit Types
Tempestra — Stormglass naval marines; trained in extreme-weather seamanship and boarding combat
Brinax — Brinehold dockyard militia; fight with any tool at hand; ferocious in enclosed spaces
Silvenar — Lampkeepers' armed branch; patrol the Thornway; trained for forest ambush
Nodus — Nightspike shipwright-soldiers; boarding hooks, ship-hammers, weighted knotted rope as weapons
Scopulus — Sheerwater cliff fighters; rope-and-spike vertical combat specialists
Maritor — crossbowmen who travel on every Pilots' Guild vessel; considered neutral but armed
Naval Vessels
Tempestia — Stormglass fast war-galley; low-profile, high-speed; twelve oars to a side
Saltergus — Brinehold heavy transport that doubles as a weapons platform
Covenaut — small covert raiding skiff; Westhorn-built; inter-port espionage operations
Noxmaris — dark-painted, no lanterns; coastal infiltration; used extensively in the Whispering War
Weapons
Vectus — heavy crossbow designed for narrow bridge and dock combat platforms
Halitus — iron-reinforced arbalest; Brinehold standard infantry; one of the continent's better crossbows
Uncinus — iron hook on chain; pulls enemy vessels close; also disables rigging
Fissura — driven into planking to immobilize boarding parties; also thrown at range
Cordeus — weighted fighting rope with iron hooks; for climbing and close-quarters strangling
Armor
Haloskin — standard Horns issue; same principle as Nionian but heavier stitching
Thalassus — worn underneath Haloskin; impact absorption; slightly buoyant in water
Tactical Doctrine: Amphibious harassment. Use tidal knowledge as a weapon — the Pilots' Guild can route ships through channels that will kill an enemy fleet. Never fight in open field. Bottleneck and bridge defense.

SANGREA — Cavalry and Bells
Military Character: Cavalry shock, signal-bell coordination, economic siege, proxy war
Unit Types
Casalance — noble cavalry of all major houses; the dominant force on Sangrean plains terrain
Solari — Solé light cavalry; speed-focused, silk-weight armor; coastal and road terrain
Sanguis — Terrarossa heavy infantry; shield-bearing, pike-wielding; the premier siege defenders in the region
Vindicti — vineyard territory militia; Serratum and round shield; local defense only
Echolux — Campanero military arm; relay tactical orders via bell code; invaluable in battles spanning multiple valleys
Carmosina — Bellacorte cavalry; cliff-terrain trained; medium armor; the finest unit money can buy in Sangrea
Aviscor — fast message-carriers in battle; unarmed but indispensable; Carvallo military application
Selvadors — Selvaverde frontier force; Botano-funded; machete and blowpipe specialists
Weapons
Dominion — fifteen-foot hardwood cavalry lance with a forged iron head; noble-standard
Serratum — curved pruning-blade adapted as cavalry sidearm; Sangrea's regional signature weapon
Ardor — light cavalry javelin thrown from horseback; Solé specialty; three per rider
Clamor — bell-ringer's heavy mallet adapted as a weapon; devastating against armored cavalry
Sibilus — short-range; Cascabella-compound tipped darts; jungle warfare standard
Armor
Dominia — noble cavalry; full plate in house colors; ceremonially painted before battle
Aureus — Solé light cavalry; overlapping silk-over-metal scales; heat-appropriate
Sanguimail — Terrarossa standard; heavy chain over boiled leather; built to last years of Sunstone War conditions
Caaiman — Botano frontier; lacquered hardwood plates on cotton backing; insect-proof and sword-resistant
Tactical Doctrine: Cavalry shock charge as primary assault. Bell-code maintains coordination over large distances — the Riverbell Alarm system can transmit a full muster order across the Vallesangre in minutes. Information warfare via Carvallo parrot network. Economic siege (destroy vineyards, cut irrigation, burn granaries) preferred over pitched battle.

THE HEARTLANDS — River and Ridge
Military Character: River logistics, heavy cavalry, grain-denial, siege emphasis
Unit Types
Argentus — Silverblood professional soldiers; the largest standing force in the region; four thousand strong in peacetime
Argentine — elite Silverblood heavy cavalry; silver-traced armor; the pride of Vornhold
Rivenos — barge-mounted soldiers; fight from the water; pole-arms and crossbows; cross-trained as sappers
Pontifex — heavy cavalry stationed at major river crossings; also function as customs enforcement
Farrador — Silver Flats militia; farmers with spears; enormous numbers; unpredictable quality
Montanar — Silverring infantry; tunnel-warfare trained from mine work; compact and powerful in enclosed spaces
Argenmarch — Argenhold's dissolved house guard; formerly the continent's most respected neutral soldiers; scattered since the Feast of Poison
Corvus — Corvallis cavalry; hill-terrain trained; fast and lightly armed; know the eastern passes intimately
Sylvadeath — border rangers; Corvallis/Corbeau territory; monitor the Frozen South passes
River / Naval Vessels
Bellica — flat-bottomed combat vessel; houses crossbow companies and a mounted ballista
Arieto — shallow-draft ramming vessel; river sieges and bridge-breaking
Carro — grain transport that functions as floating logistics base in campaign
Pharus — fast courier barge; messenger relay throughout the river network
Weapons
Flumecutter — broad short blade designed for barge combat; good in tight quarters
Ageros — sixteen-foot iron-headed pike; Heartlands infantry standard
Platador — Silverblood house weapon; silver-treated steel; elongated cross-guard
Montis — Silverring infantry weapon; short and thick; designed for tunnel fighting
Nautichook — river-combat tool; pulls enemies off barges; also used for boarding action
Armor
Silveus — Silverblood elite; limestone-white enamel over steel; the most recognizable cavalry armor in the Heartlands
Argentmail — standard Heartlands house guard; silver-alloyed chain; lighter than iron mail
Aquaskin — Rivenos issue; waterproofed studded leather; conscious of buoyancy
Tactical Doctrine: River logistics as force multiplier. Control waterways, control grain, control the campaign. Deny bridge crossings. Siege emphasis. Barge-mounted siege engines for river-fortress assault. Grain-denial as primary strategic weapon.

ROSLAND — Iron and Cohort
Military Character: Disciplined professional infantry, shield-wall doctrine, mine and forest warfare
Unit Types
Ferrosc — professional soldiers; the direct descendant of the stratocratic tradition; the continent's most disciplined infantry
Fyrhold — Fyrhold heavy infantry; partial plate, mine-trained, claustrophobia-immune; fight as well underground as on the surface
Glacis — Daudrwood rangers; established; the closest thing on the mainland to naturally echo-sensitive soldiers
Augeo — Ironside's political soldiers; intelligence, suppression, internal control
Minarii — armed mine-workers; tunnel combat specialists; fight with unconventional improvised weapons
Tiberis — western shore coastal defense; small fast boats and crossbows; counter-piracy function
Weapons
Ferrunda — long iron pike with hexagonal cross-section; the Roslandic standard infantry weapon
Aetnos — two-handed fighting hammer derived from mine-tool tradition; devastating against plate armor
Lithax — short-handled iron axe; also a genuine mining tool; the Fyrhold's standard sidearm
Stelev — heavy crossbow manufactured in Karthold; arguably the best crossbow on the continent
Betula — long wooden staff with iron caps; cheap; the standard militia weapon for settlements without forge access
Armor
Siderum — Rosland standard; overlapping iron scales on boiled leather
Claustrus — Fyrhold specialty; reinforced at joints and vulnerable points; designed specifically for narrow-passage fighting
Lupinex — Glacis rangers; wolf-hide over chain; superior cold-weather performance
Tactical Doctrine: Shield-wall defensive doctrine. Absorb the enemy charge. Counter-attack when the enemy exhausts itself. Forest and mountain warfare as home terrain advantage. Tunnel and mine warfare as specialty. Logistics through an excellent road and river-barge network inherited from the imperial era.

VALLAN — The Impassable
Military Character: Pass control, structural sabotage, avalanche warfare, making terrain the weapon
Unit Types
Gorgeus — gorge and pass defenders; rope-and-spike vertical combat specialists; can fight on cliff faces
Structors — bridge-builder soldiers; structural sabotage experts; can destroy any bridge ever built
Custos — one per canton; variable quality; best in their own valleys
Sonarus — battlefield communication; translates the mountain messenger system into military signal orders
Weapons
Apexus — the Vallan standard; long-hafted and excellent in chokepoint fighting
Gorgebolt — shorter range than a plains crossbow; extremely accurate; designed for narrow-angle firing positions
Ruinus — specifically for structural sabotage; dense iron head; the Structors' signature tool-weapon
Harpuia — harpoon-style throwing weapon with retrieval rope; used against cliff defenders and bridge-crossers
Armor
Granitus — matte grey finish; designed to be invisible against granite
Tecta — cheaper militia armor; felted wool padding under a stone-chip vest; cheap to make and replace
Tactical Doctrine: Make the terrain the weapon. Pass control equals functional invincibility. Demolish your own bridges if necessary — Aldric Valenne II threatened this and was believed. Avalanche-triggering as an offensive weapon. Never accept battle in open ground.

THE RED COAST — Desert and Denial
Military Character: Desert endurance, water denial, light cavalry, volcanic terrain fighting
Unit Types
Arenos — Saffaren desert cavalry; Copper-Camel mounted; the fastest force on the continent in desert terrain
Cenizar — Cenizar coastal guard; professional; primarily counter-piracy and harbor security
Portalis — Alsiroth's Gate professional army; well-equipped; urban and caravan-route trained
Qanati — qanat protection force; the most critical military function in the region; armed engineers who also serve as sappers
Obsidianos — Khorim mountain fighters; volcanic terrain specialists; glass-weapon fighting doctrine
Qanatari — the water-engineers' fighting arm; will destroy their own systems before surrendering them
Weapons
Khopesh — curved cavalry blade; one-and-a-half-handed; the Red Coast signature weapon
Voxblade — Khorim obsidian long-knife; audible hum when swung fast; sharper than any steel; brittle in cold
Dromedus — longer than a standard cavalry lance; accounts for camel height above the target
Aquadril — water-engineer tool adapted as a weapon; designed to puncture stone; effective at armor joints
Arenabola — Saffaren primary ranged weapon
Armor
Vermilion — ceremonial and functional hybrid; lightweight copper on leather; also serves as status display
Simuma — Saffaren; no rigid armor; layered desert robes that dissipate sword energy through fabric resistance
Vulcani — Khorim; leather vest with obsidian plate inserts at vital points; effective specifically in volcanic rock terrain
Tactical Doctrine: Water denial as the primary weapon of war. Cut enemy qanat access before any engagement. Desert endurance superiority. Light cavalry harassment and withdrawal. Never accept pitched battle in open terrain unless the odds are overwhelming. Obsidian weapons are harder in cold; the Red Coast fights better in heat.

THE FROZEN SOUTH — Ice and Steel
Military Character: Winter warfare, ambush, attrition, recently upgraded with mainland steel
Unit Types
Raudbjorn — Raudbjorn combat ship warriors; now partially equipped with mainland steel; the most lethal recent military development on the continent
Kjolfoss — Aurax mountain defenders; mixed traditional and steel equipment; mine-entrance specialists
Lignamort — established; Daudrguard rangers; petrified-wood weapon specialists
Beinsverd — Beinsverd ice-adapted fighters; can operate in temperatures that effectively paralyze other soldiers
Thundrekk-Tradition — cross-tribal martial specialists; the old institution; rarer than historically but still active among the major clans
Synodus — ceremonial honor guard at the Winter-Moot; each clan contributes fighters; also a genuine military force
Naval Vessels
Fjordfang — the Frozen South longship; flat-bottomed for fjord navigation; equipped for ramming; can be portaged over ice
Nivius — shallow-draft; portaged over ice sheets; fjord-hopping raids
Focalon — small, fast; seal-skin construction; near-silent in water; scouting and assassination operations
Weapons
Bersekir — the southern signature weapon; single or double-headed; scale appropriate for killing Glacier Bears
Nivalis — heavy metal-headed club; effective through the thick clothing and hide armor that everyone in the south wears
Ossus — pre-steel weapon; whale-bone spike; still used by clans without mainland trade access
Sylvalith — Lignamort weapon; sharpened petrified wood from the Deadwood; at extreme cold, harder than iron
Vrekblade — volcanic glass from Mount Vrek; secondary and ritual blades
Armor
Aurochs — multi-layered musk-ox and glacier bear hide; extraordinary cold protection; poor against steel
Ossius — pre-steel; articulated whale-bone; still used by remote clans without trade access
Aurumail — the new development; mainland steel mail over traditional hide base; the weapon that won the Gold War
Tactical Doctrine: Winter warfare as primary advantage. Use cold as a weapon — force the enemy to fight in conditions that degrade their performance while familiar to southern fighters. Ambush from impossible terrain. Never accept pitched battle on open ground. Exploit mine-tunnel expertise in siege contexts.

THE TEETH — Bridge and Island
Military Character: Bridge chokepoint control, multi-island naval coordination (currently broken)
Unit Types
Pontine — Morvayn's garrison; two hundred professional soldiers; the most strategically placed force on the continent
Galeus — Stormglass naval fighters; cliff-combat experience from Northwind
Lapidus — Emberstone militia; heavy volcanic stone-worker builds; fight well in rubble and industrial terrain
Viridia — Verwhisper; lightly armed; forest patrol; primarily an intelligence function
Weapons
Arctus — iron hook on chain; bridge-combat standard; pulls enemies off the span or over the railing
Pumex — Emberstone volcanic mining tool adapted as a weapon; heavy and blunt
Pyrolith — obsidian/basalt composite blade; Emberstone specialty; heavy but devastating at full swing
Armor
Volcanium — volcanic stone arm guards; standard addition to Haloskin for Lapidus; extremely hard but brittle against sustained impact

XARIA — Ritual War and Jungle
Military Character: Jungle ambush, canal warfare, psychological terror, ritual combat doctrine
Unit Types
Sanguinor — K'tharr warrior-priests; the temple-cities' permanent military garrison; full-time professional soldiers
Ya'axal — House Ya'ax jungle fighters; the best light infantry on the continent; the Red Tide Defiance proved this
Xochitl — ritual combat specialists; capture-focused in Flower Wars; equipped for restraint not killing
Aquareos — Ix'za delta military; barge-fighters and delta water-warfare experts
Oceanus — the Vizier's naval force; Dominion-trained; best-equipped force on the peninsula
Carmina — temple messenger and scout force; painted for psychological impact; armed with atlatls
Naval Vessels
Aguabarca — flat-bottomed war-barge; the Ya'ax adapted version for jungle river assault
Cacique — Ya'ax river-assault vessel; fast; carved from single jungle hardwood; silent in water
Imperia — the Vizier's ocean fleet; large; no analog on the mainland
Weapons
Macuahuitl — obsidian-edged wooden club; can decapitate with a full swing; the Xarian signature weapon
Atlatl — spear-thrower; dramatically extends effective range; very lightweight; can be used on horseback analog (canoe)
Selvabora — fabric sling with jade or obsidian shot; silent; accurate at medium range
Captura — knotted cord for Flower War captures; weighted edges; thrown over multiple enemies
Blowpipe — poison-dart delivery; Ix'chel compound tipped; completely silent; effective at fifteen yards
Armor
Vitrosca — obsidian plates on woven-cotton backing; Sanguinor elite armor
Caimanes — lacquered hardwood panels shaped like caiman scale; delta fighters' standard
Plumaria — Flower Warriors; more intimidation than protection; works precisely as intended
Tactical Doctrine: Jungle ambush above all. Psychological terror as a genuine tactical weapon — the Flower War display of painted faces and ritual screaming has broken enemy formations before contact. River and canal warfare. Isolation of enemy in terrain they cannot navigate. Capture over kill in ritual warfare; kill without mercy in territorial defense.

SIEGE WEAPONS (CONTINENTAL)
Standard across multiple regions:
Lithobolos — the continent's standard trebuchet; counterweight design; refined over four centuries
The Ballista — tension bolt-thrower; Nionian naval version most refined; used for ship-to-ship at medium range
Ignicatus — clay-pot projector for incendiaries; Nionian Pyre-Seed version most dangerous; others use burning oil
Ariete — suspended iron-headed ram; standard across all major powers
Turrix — wheeled assault platform; Heartlands most common user given their city-fortress culture
Specialized:
Bellista — Heartlands Bellica mounted; swivels 180 degrees; for river-fortress assault
Hydrola — Red Coast; projects water (often poisoned or mixed with salt) to flood underground qanat access
Delvenge — Rosland/Frozen South; tunneling beneath walls, then collapsing the tunnel; no explosive, pure structural demolition
Nivarus — Vallan/Frozen South; controlled snow and rock release down mountain approaches; not a machine but a tactical system

PART THREE: TRADE ROUTES AND ECONOMICS

THE MAJOR NAMED TRADE ROUTES
The Inner Sea Necklace Maritime loop: Nionia → Westhorn (Horns) → Brinehold → Nightspike → Red Coast Porto Rubia → Teeth → Nionia. The continent's primary naval commercial circuit. Carries: marble, iron tools, salt cod, volcanic stone, spices, featherwork, copper goods, medicinal compounds.
The Great Grainway Overland: Vornhold → Beaumont Forest → Horns junction → western cities. The continent's food supply line. Controlled by Silverblood at the eastern end. Beaumont charges passage in the middle. Garrun takes toll at the Horns junction. The most contested route on the continent.
The Copper Road Red Coast → Vallan passes → Heartlands manufacturing centers. Raw and worked copper moving northwest. Silver, iron goods, and grain moving southeast. Passes through Vallan toll stations. Vallan's primary road-tax income source.
The Silver Road Heartlands → Sangrean border via southern mountain passes. Silver and silver goods moving south. Sangrean wine, spice, and luxury goods moving north. Competes with river routes for merchant preference.
The Jungle Road Sangrea (Muroverde gateway) → Xaria. The most dangerous land route on the continent. Perhaps a hundred caravans per year. Carries cacao, jade, featherwork, exotic hardwoods, vanilla, medicinal plants north. Returns grain, tools, cloth, metalwork south.
The Vallan Corridor Mainland → Teeth and Isle of Knowledge via Hortakin passes. The safest overland route on the continent. Preferred for high-value, low-weight trade: alchemical supplies, books, fine instruments, scholarly correspondence.
The Deadwood Track Heartlands (Corvallis territory) → Frozen South. Currently irregular; controlled effectively by Corbeau and Silverring. Carries Frozen South gold south; returns mainland steel and grain north. The route that is breaking the Whaletooth Compact.
The Fjord Lane Frozen South coastal maritime route; connects the coastal clans internally. Carries gold, furs, and whale products. Not used by mainland merchants — conditions make it fatal without local knowledge.
The Teeth Bridge Route The Great Bridge. Continental connector between the northern and southern halves. Currently strangled by Morvayn's tolls. Everything passes through it; the toll revenue makes Morvayn wealthy.
The Pilgrims' Road Multiple routes converging on Faithir. Enormous commercial traffic follows the pilgrims. Brothers of the Open Road maintain it. The Church's economic lifeblood.
The Obsidian Path Red Coast (Khorim) → Vallan → Heartlands. Khorim obsidian, alchemical instruments, Red Coast spices moving inland. Iron tools and grain returning.
The Ice-Shore Road Coastal Rosland → Frozen South (overland and maritime hybrid). Roslandic iron tools and grain going south; Frozen South gold dust and fur going north. Operated by House Zelnik's fishing fleet.

REGIONAL EXPORTS (Primary and Notable Secondary)
Nionia: White Marble, Nionian Iron, Olive Oil (Ferrovan), Nionian Wine, Whale Oil, Nionian Rope (Corwyn-branded), Naval Construction and Expertise
The Horns: Salt (Brinehold evaporation), Ships (finest hulls on the continent), Blue-Herring (salted and smoked), Thornway Timber (Span-Elm), Navigation Services (Pilots' Guild), Knotwork Jewelry, Kelp Products
Sangrea: Sangrean Wine (multiple grades), Terrarossa Reserva (the finest on the continent), Sunstone (raw and worked), Tobacco (Cigarral), Spices (Xarian border trade), Cacao (Selvaverde), Sangrean Ceramics (Loma azulejo tiles), Featherwork, Múrex Dye (the most expensive textile dye available), Cascabella Compounds (technically illegal; traded everywhere)
The Heartlands: Grain (wheat, barley, oats — the continental food supply), Silver (raw and worked), River Transport Services (Bargemen's Guild), Heartlands-Hemp, Horses (Heartlands-Destrier bloodline), Banking Services (Vaultkeepers)
Rosland: Iron (raw and worked — finest steel on the continent), Black Iron Weapons, Coal, Roslandic Timber, Furs, Roslandic Arbalest, Forge-Scale Armor
Vallan: Kaltbach Cave-Cheese, Obstler (apple brandy), Transit Services (road-tax, safest passes), Golden Apricots, Bridge Engineering Expertise, Alpine Honey, Alpine-Thyme (dried herb, continent-wide cooking ingredient)
Red Coast: Copper (raw and worked — filigree), Khorim Obsidian (blades and instruments), Red Salt, Spices (cumin, coriander, saffron, sumac), Dates and Dried Fruit, Copper Bowl Tinctures (standardized medicinal preparations), Carnelian, Camel Transport Services, Desert Guidance (Saffaren)
Isle of Knowledge: Maps (the most precise cartography available), Scholarly Services, Archival Access, Arbitration Services
Frozen South: Gold (refined and raw — extraordinary quality), Furs (Glacier-Bear, Frost-Vulpine, Ice-Treader-Reindeer), Whale Oil, Southern Mead (tiny supply; enormous prestige), Goldsmithing (finest quality on the continent)
The Teeth: Ember-Basalt (hardest building stone), Verwhisper Hardwood (ship timber, fine furniture), Verwhisper Grain and Produce, Moonpearls, Shadowtide Rare Hardwoods, Shadowtide Medicinal Plants
Xaria: Cacao, Gold, Jade, Featherwork, Exotic Hardwoods, Spices, Vanilla, Black-Vanilla (the deep jungle variety), Ixchela-Root (medicinal), Poison-Dart Frogs (live, for alchemists), Dreamroot Compounds

CURRENCIES
The White Disc — Nionia; marble-dust-infused silver coin; the cleanest minting on the continent; increasingly associated with Jous's regime
The Silver Weight — Heartlands; pure silver ingot system; denominations by size and official Vaultkeeper stamp; the most trusted currency on the continent
The Sun-Piece — Sangrea; gold coin with sunstone inlay; House Solé mint; high face value; used for large transactions and diplomatic gifts
The Iron Round — Rosland; iron and silver alloy; the working-class currency of the continent's most productive metalworking region; heavy and honest
The Copper Scale — Red Coast; the most widely produced small-denomination currency; used from the Red Coast to Heartlands market towns
Gold-by-Weight — Frozen South; no coinage; weighed gold dust and nuggets against certified stone counterweights at the Winter-Moot
The Salt Mark — Horns (Dalgaard-issued); technically a salt-backed currency note promising delivery of standardized salt quantity; the continent's only paper money
The Road-Key — Vallan; small bronze coin with a key impression; modest value but universally trusted for transit; also used by Brothers of the Open Road as toll receipts
Bridge-Tokens — Teeth (Morvayn-issued); wooden tokens obligatory for Bridge transit; now function as general archipelago currency; deeply resented
Cacao Count — Xaria; dried cacao beans in standardized bundles of one hundred; jade pieces for large transactions; no precious metal coinage

BANKING AND FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
Silvend — the continent's oldest formal bank; deposit accounts, letters of credit, commercial loans; branches in Vornhold, Argenhold, Castesol, Faithir, Brynvaal
Xalcil (Xaria) — gem-backed financial instruments; primarily for inter-colonial Dominion trade
Thalassa (Brinehold) — trade finance for Horns maritime commerce; the original collective lending institution
Qalifa (Red Coast) — debt-bond issuance; the de facto banking system of the Gate Lands; insidious and expanding
Glaciem (Brinehold) — the continent's only paper currency; limited circulation; only accepted by merchants who know and trust Dalgaard
Ferros (Nionia) — industrial financing; currently funding the invasion fleet and Jous's military build-up
Fluvius (Heartlands) — informal river-trade credit; clearing-house for barge cargo transactions
Amalca (Xaria) — the Vizier's tribute management; not a public institution but the peninsula's central financial function

PART FOUR: FLORA
Format: Name — region; brief descriptor; primary use categories

NIONIA
Ferrusolea — drought-resistant quarry-edge tree; bitter oil for lamps and cooking; the island's primary agricultural product
Cinerea — grey-green shrub; mild relaxant; pipe-smoking; the most common personal narcotic on the continent
Albasol — Convent grove only; slightly luminescent; sacred under Pure Way; echo-dense, never harvested
Mármora — quarry crack plant; purple-flowered; cooking and wound treatment
Rupecil — coastal grey-green; wound treatment; cooking; grows where nothing else will
Mariscus — rocky coast; anise-scented; preserved in salt; the Nionian kitchen's standard flavoring
Claryx — ceremonial; used in Pure Way wreaths, coronations, and funerals
Sángrida — coastal garden; deep red; politically charged to display under the Pure Way; pre-Jous symbol of the Republic
Basaltus — basalt-growing; tincture base; Copper Bowl ingredient; also used in quarry-workers' skin treatment
Cítrica — the single stubborn citrus in Saltmere; planted against a south-facing wall; squeezed over everything

THE HORNS
Tempestus — large marine algae; bread-making, beer-brewing, fertilizer; the Horns' most abundant food supplement
Acúlea — 200+ foot Thornway hardwood; ship timber, the Lampkeepers' sacred material, the finest furniture in the western continent
Naviwood — enormous shipbuilding timber; Thornway forest; the Stormglass fleet's primary construction wood
Ferroza — dense coastal; building insulation; wound packing in the field
Ossinia — white-flowered; mead-making; also produces a pale grey dye
Acuamar — blue flowers; grave planting; minor wound treatment
Rizomar — tidal plant; edible when dried; sailor emergency food; tastes of salt and fish
Nocturna — white flower; blooms only in darkness; strung at harbor entrances as a navigational marker and a blessing
Maranúmen — tidal algae; changes color before storms; the Pilots' Guild uses it as a weather indicator
Mortifera — large coastal fern; antler-shaped spread; named for the extinct creature that used to eat it; no practical use, only memory

SANGREA
Selvargia — bright red berries; primary food for Carvallo parrots; also mildly intoxicating for humans
Somniar — blue-purple flower; mild narcotic; Venic Path sacrament; also a genuine commercial painkiller
Vipertina — jungle creeper; paralyzing alkaloid in stem sap; the Orden's primary source plant
Solsar — aromatic golden-petaled; cooking, perfume, cosmetics; grown in every Sangrean courtyard garden
Umbrana — dark purple to black; the Viña Oscura black wine source; grows only on the valley's shadowed northern slopes
Vetrovina — the ancient Vallesangre grape; the Reserva source; the oldest cultivated grape variety on the continent
Selvatl — wild Selvaverde cacao; more bitter and more potent than cultivated varieties; ritual use
Alcanfor — strong camphor scent; respiratory treatment and fever management; Botano's most exported medicinal
Sanguifex — small fiery chili from Selvaverde border; deep red; essential in Sangrean and Xarian cooking
Caldena — orange-fleshed root; temperature regulation; Botano healing standard; also exported to Red Coast
Tóxica — highly toxic creeper; the Cascabella's most dangerous source; paradoxically analgesic at controlled micro-doses
Serpmus — grows in Cascabella-active jungle areas; used to identify Cascabella territory by rangers

THE HEARTLANDS
Lúmina — primary plains grain; chaff develops faint luminescence in silver-mineral-rich fields near the Silver Mountains
Flúvius — river reed; paper-making, basket-weaving, thatching; the most abundant wild plant in the region
Cervisia — shorter than wheat, drought-resistant; the primary brewing grain
Mólina — yellow-white meadow flower; always orients east; used as a natural compass by travelers
Lágrima — river margins; funeral rites; basket-weaving; the tree planted at every Argen crossing
Conclave — large native hardwood; associated with the Argenhold neutral-meeting tradition; acorns for pig-feed
Petranal — grey lichen on ancient markers; mild analgesic properties when ground into poultice
Menthus — Argen tributaries; strong flavor; cooking and medicines; exported in dried bundles continent-wide
Cordela — essential industrial crop; rope, sailcloth, paper, rough clothing
Puentea — ivy on the Stonebridge pillars; turns red-orange in autumn from iron pigment in the stone; locals say it is the blood of the Marvoss sons

ROSLAND
Sylvanus — enormous conifers; resin for pitch and lamp-fuel; the Roslandic forest's defining tree
Roslan — hardwood of the Greens; construction and fire-song ceremony fuel; the tree under which elections are sworn
Fénixia — unique; near Daurnkeep only; luminescent in moonlight; likely echo-dense; the only known specimen on the continent
Ferropluma — grows near mine outflows; dark green; indicator species for iron contamination; no practical use
Nigramus — mine waste heaps; black-grey; indicator species for coal deposits; useful for locating new seams
Profunda — Daudrwood deepest groves only; prized eating; mildly hallucinogenic at high doses
Gélida — blue-white berry; high altitude; very sour; zhivka distillation's primary source ingredient
Cinabrus — western shore; extremely flexible; basket-making, furniture, wicker armor backing
Ironweed — Fyrhold lower slopes; highly nutritious grass; the primary mine animal fodder
Sanguina — Nordmarch; deep red autumn coloring; bark essential for leather tanning

VALLAN
Alpestre — Hortakin valley aromatic; the defining flavor of Vallan cuisine; also wound treatment
Cumina — Sternmark high pastures; the fungal component used in kumja fermentation
Aurorae — blooms only near the Dawnbreak Pass summit; pale purple; given at betrothals
Láctea — Kaltbach cheese caves specifically; the culture that gives the cheese its character
Dórea — Sunvaal variety; small and intensely flavored; Vallan's most valuable food export
Melífera — Sternmark high pastures; the primary honey-source plant; gives Vallan honey its particular floral intensity
Bacul — Sunvaal; the specific variety used for brandy distillation; not good eating
Pétrea — limestone crevice plant; wound healing and mild sedative; the Vallanaise hedge-medicine foundation
Glacialis — Sternmark high altitude; winter-hardy; Ridge-Llama primary food; also used as emergency thatching

THE RED COAST
Aquaducto — freshwater spring outlets; basket-weaving, building material, water quality indicator (dies when the water is contaminated)
Cupricil — copper-veined soil; grey-green with copper tint; Copper Bowl primary alchemical ingredient
Narícea — large pink; intensely aromatic; rose-water, perfumery, cooking; the Red Coast's luxury plant export
Datilia — primary oasis food and shade tree; dates, palm-sugar, woven leaves, trunk timber
Salmarga — red-tinted desert margin shrub; animal fodder; fire-resistant windbreak
Arenaria — deep-rooted desert plant; edible root; Saffaren emergency travel food
Geniea — rare; blooms only at night in the deep desert; bioluminescent; Saffaren sacred plant; mildly hallucinogenic pollen
Cuprispina — thorned volcanic-margin shrub; bark is the Copperthorn-Oil source used in Copper Bowl tinctures
Vespertina — desert margins; analgesic gum; Copper Bowl pain management; also a mild narcotic at high doses

THE FROZEN SOUTH
Terminus — geothermally heated ground cover; the only winter green in the south; edible; Hotstone's basic vegetable
Cragum — Kjölfoss slopes; the source of the continent's finest mead honey
Frígida — lowland fjord; extremely flexible; longship ribs, weaving, wicker furniture
Criomare — southern ocean; massive marine algae; dried and ground as a mineral supplement in an otherwise mineral-poor diet
Véntil — geothermal vents; harvested for medicinal compounds; the Burned Priests' ceremonial preparation source
Ártica — small summer red berry; primary vitamin source in an otherwise meat-heavy diet
Ossivox — coastal tundra; pale; makes characteristic sound in wind; weaving and thatching
Bloodwort — Heitdalr hot-spring margins; blood-red flowers; medicinal and ritual use by Burned Priests
Crísola — Kjölfoss gold-vein areas only; yellow-gold petals; absorbs gold particles from soil; used by Auren Priests to locate new gold deposits

THE TEETH
Susrura — primary island forest species; mild-humid adapted; Green Thorn's sacred material
Viriácea — the Order's namesake; trained into living structural walls; fast-growing; can fortify a building over a decade
Emberia — Emberstone; grows in volcanic soil; used for building insulation in Ashenport
Umbrisa — tropical canopy; medicinal; extremely rare; Botano standing orders for any supply available
Telária — Shadowtide; the web-spinner apes' primary construction material; extraordinary tensile strength when dried
Neptúlica — between Verwhisper and Shadowtide; largest kelp forest in the archipelago; unknown properties related to the Veil fog phenomenon

XARIA
K'taris — large red flower; sacrificial ceremonies; also found in Sangrea's Selvaverde border region
Plumaria — tall jungle fern; ceremonial garments and building construction material
Sanael — Naia's primary healing compound; bitter orange root; the Botano order's most-sought import
Tigrisel — deep jungle only; intensely hot; Ya'ax warriors eat it before battle; also genuine culinary use
Teotl — grows on teocalli stone; phosphorescent; used for ritual lighting; also indicates healthy structural stone
Deltaflora — Ix'za delta; sacred to Ixchela; petals used in healing preparations and ceremonial water-blessing
Jadela — near jade deposits; green-tinted flowers from mineral absorption; sold to mainland collectors
Sopor — the Bonewater-source plant; deep jungle only; powerful hallucinogen; the Cascabella's most dangerous compound base
Nígrava — wild deep Selvaverde variety; more potent than cultivated; extraordinary culinary and alchemical use

PART FIVE: FAUNA
Format: Name — region; descriptor; status and role

NIONIA
Stone-Trout — quarry-stream adapted; bony, bland; slightly copper-tinged flesh; eaten by mine-workers; food
Marble-Pigeon — grey-white; quarry nesting; unusually large for the species; kept by Cassian family for sport; messenger use
Forum-Cat — Vellium street cat; semi-feral; treated as sacred under the Old Way; now tolerated; pest control
Pale-Hound — bred hunting dog; white coat; patrician-class standard; excellent scent-tracking; war and hunt
Quarry-Gecko — small; lives on warm marble faces; feeds on insects; slightly warm to the touch (echo effect from the stone); pest control
Olive-Bee — specific to Ferrovan Iron-Olive pollination; slightly larger than mainland bees; produces oil-flavored honey

THE HORNS
Grey-Seal — coastal and Pilot's Rock colony; semi-domesticated by the Seal-Callers; fish-locating companions; bites strangers
Gale-Kestrel — large storm-prediction raptor; sea-stack nesting; treated as sacred by sailors; harming one is considered catastrophic bad luck
Thornway-Wolf — forest wolves; larger than mainland variety; organized pack hunting with unusual coordination; last formal sighting near Deepshade Station 1302 AF
Blue-Herring — coastal commercial fish; slight blue-silver coloration distinguishes it; excellent salting quality; Horns primary food export
Forest-Boar — Thornway; long-tusked; aggressive; hunted for sport by Garrun lords; tusks used in knotwork jewelry
Storm-Petrel — small seabird; the most reliable storm-prediction animal in the Horns; sailors will not put to sea if the petrels are flying inland

SANGREA
Toro Bravo — the Sangrean fighting bull; thousand-year breeding program; a thousand-plus pounds of aggression; the corrida's reason for being
Selvaverde-Jaguar — jungle apex predator; used in Flower War psychological warfare; actual danger to Selvaverde travelers at night
Rivercat — large semi-aquatic felid; Sangra river margins; not jaguar-sized but aggressive; hunted for its spotted pelt
Vine-Snake — non-venomous; arboreal; vineyard-dwelling; considered good luck; kills vermin in the grape-rows
Badlands-Lizard — large monitor; Sunstone Badlands; feeds on carrion; considered an omen of the dead before a battle
Campanero-Finch — collects near bell towers; its own call mimics bell tones; local legend says it was trained generations ago; now wild

THE HEARTLANDS
Argen-Pike — large freshwater predator; up to four feet; prized eating; smoked over apple wood; the Heartlands' signature fish
Silver-Hare — silver-grey; very fast; folk symbol of the plains; breeds explosively in warm years; indicator of good grain yield
Heartlands-Destrier — heavy warhorse; bred for plains terrain; the continent's most expensive military animal; four years to train
Plains-Hawk — common raptor; falconry standard for minor nobility; also used as a messenger in some noble houses
River-Otter — Argen system; considered a good-trade omen by bargemen; informally protected by Bargemen's Guild tradition
Vornhold-Pigeon — domesticated; inter-house message carrying; House Silverblood's primary short-range communication animal
Marsh-Crane — large wading bird; Tikhaya marshes; called "Rusalka's Companion" in folk tradition; actually considered lucky

ROSLAND
Daudrwood-Bear — massive white-brown; Roslandic forest apex land predator; significantly larger than continental brown bears
White-Wolf — the legendary completely-white Daudrwood wolf; one confirmed sighting per decade; powerful omen; one sighting by Verra Daurn in 1302 AF
Rock-Marten — small predator in the Fyrhold mines; feeds on Millstone-Mice; miners keep them as pest control
River-Salmon — Zelena and Bystrina seasonal run; major regional food source; the annual salmon run is a festival
Forest-Lynx — Daudrwood; grey-spotted; solitary; hunted for its extraordinary spotted pelt; the most expensive fur in Rosland
Mine-Bat — large cave bat; Fyrhold worked-out shafts; colonies of thousands; guano used as fertilizer; kept for insect control
Western-Eel — large oily coastal eel; smoked, pickled, stewed; the western shore's defining protein; exported extensively

VALLAN
Valenne-Ridge-Llama — highland camelid; wool and pack-carrying; Sternmark Canton's defining animal; produces the finest wool in the region
Marmot — alpine; alarm-caller; Sternmark shepherds use its whistle as a danger signal; also eaten in lean years
Kaltbach-Trout — cold gorge water; spotted; prized eating; caught only in the narrow channels of the gorge
Snow-Finch — high altitude; white-grey; nests in rock crevices; appears reliably before the last snows melt
Chamois — mountain goat; hunted by Vallanaise climbers; extraordinarily sure-footed on vertical terrain
Ice-Viper — small venomous snake; high passes; grey-patterned; bites painful but rarely fatal; respected
Bridge-Swallow — nests specifically in bridge undersides; all Vallan bridges have colonies; absence means structural problems in the stone

THE RED COAST
Copper-Camel — the Red Coast's transport animal; copper-red coat distinct from standard brown camels; superior desert endurance and heat tolerance
Desert-Cat — small wild spotted felid; virtually impossible to domesticate; trades at high prices to exotic collectors
Khorim-Scorpion — large volcanic ridge scorpion; venom used in Copper Bowl preparations; also a genuine hazard in the Ashlands
Sand-Adder — deep desert snake; perfectly sand-colored; ambush predator; causes more caravan deaths than any other single animal
Desert-Ibis — white wading bird; oasis springs; sacred in some local traditions; indicator of clean, deep water
Djinn-Moth — large; attracted to Djinn-Flower's bioluminescence; itself faintly luminescent; collected by alchemists for the wing-powder
Qanat-Crab — small freshwater crab; lives in qanat tunnels; presence indicates clean water; absence indicates contamination — the Water-Guards' living quality sensor
Red-Coast-Falcon — primary hunting bird; House Cenizar falconers breed the finest specimens; also used for message-carrying in the open desert

THE FROZEN SOUTH
Glacier-Bear — white; eight feet at shoulder; the continent's most lethal land predator; eight confirmed kills of fully armed southern warriors in the past decade
Auric-Horn-Yak — domesticated; copper-mineral-tinted horns; wool, milk, meat, transport; the southern clans' most important domestic animal
Ice-Treader-Reindeer — domesticated sledge animal; winter transportation on frozen ground; the Frozen South's road system on four legs
Sealbull — semi-domesticated coastal pinniped; kept in corralled coastal pools; primary source of blubber and waterproof leather
Frost-Vulpine — white fox; extremely clever; food-cache theft; produces the most delicate fur on the continent
Snow-Kite — message-carrying raptor; bred for mountain pass communication; the Beinsverd clan's specialized animal
Southern-Whale — the great southern ocean whale; hunted seasonally by Is-rim clans; the hunt is the central ritual of Raudbjorn culture
Ice-Leviathan — deep southern waters; confirmed by bone deposits on beaches; something very large; never seen complete; possibly the same creature as the Brinehold Leviathan legend
Kjölfoss-Goat — wild mountain goat of the gold peaks; not domesticated; hunted for meat and hide
Heit-Salamander — small; geothermal vent adapted; pink-fleshed; lives in Hotstone's hot springs; slightly luminescent in complete darkness

THE TEETH
Web-Spinner-Ape — Shadowtide; tool-using; constructs elaborate structures from vine and leaf; cooperates with human settlements
Twilight-Jaguar — Shadowtide; melanistic; hunts specifically at dusk; the reason Shadowtide's settlements are dispersed
Crown-Viper — Shadowtide and deep Selvaverde canopy; iridescent scales; hallucinogenic bite; two to three days of vivid visions, then death if untreated
Ember-Lizard — Emberstone volcanic gecko; bioluminescent spots; heat-adapted; extremely fast; miners swear they predict eruptions
Reef-Serpent — Singing Reef; large non-venomous sea snake; up to twelve feet; feeds on fish; often mistaken for something more dangerous
Mud-Eel — Shadowtide Rootsea; large; produces electric charge; the primary reason watermen use poles rather than reaching into the water
Rootsea-Creature — Shadowtide deep channels; large water displacement; never fully observed; accepts offerings from the Duskwalkers; the island's deepest secret

XARIA
Selvaverde-Jaguar — jungle apex predator; used in Xarian military psychological warfare; the Ya'ax warriors' patron animal
Caiman — large freshwater crocodilian; Ix'za delta; sacred to Ixchela; semi-tolerated in canal city spaces; genuinely dangerous
Quetzal — the most prized featherwork bird; green and red; approaching practical extinction due to feather-trade demand; Kuk'ul guild attempts to regulate harvest
River-Dolphin — pink freshwater dolphin; Ix'za river; sacred; killing one requires full ritual purification; fishermen who accidentally kill them face social ostracism
Poison-Dart-Frog — multiple species; Cascabella primary venom source; also traded live to mainland alchemists
Ix'za-Iguana — large arboreal; sacred in Zari; kept in the Vizier's gardens; considered a minor river deity incarnation
Harpy-Eagle — massive jungle raptor; featherwork use; also used by House Hok'ul's ritual warriors for psychological warfare
Howler-Monkey — territorial; loud; Ya'ax warriors use monkey alarm calls as jungle early-warning systems for approaching enemies
Wild-Boar — feral; introduced during colonial era; now part of the jungle ecology; hunted as food

EXTINCT AND LEGENDARY FAUNA
Confirmed Extinct (documented during the Age of Fire)
Sun-Basilisk — found dead at Altavista, ~20 AF; echo-node for stasis; paralysis-field emission; fossil bones occasionally unearthed
Stoneback-Beasts — extinct ~200 AF; armored quadrupeds; Nion III's war elephants may have been the last; carvings in Heartlands foundations
Bone-Tusks — extinct ~300 AF; giant boars with ivory ridges; driven to extinction through arena hunting under Nion V
Glass-Serpents — extinct ~345 AF; translucent venomous snakes; Nion VI's pets, killed in a drunken rage
Marrow-Bats — extinct ~400 AF; acidic guano dissolved ink in archives; hunted to extinction by Septimus I
Ash-Hounds — extinct ~650 AF; fire-breathing canids from volcanic regions; Lycian I ate the last ones
Storm-Roc — last use in warfare ~490 AF; giant migratory bird; echo-node for atmospheric currents; fossil bones still emerge from Heartlands cliff formations; the most mourned extinction on the continent
Possibly Surviving (unconfirmed, occasional credible sightings)
Grave-Stag — bone-plated skull cervid; last confirmed Thornway sighting 1287 AF; possibly alive in the deepest forest sections
Bone-Leviathan / Ice-Leviathan — large ocean creature; Brinehold legend and Frozen South bone evidence; possibly the same species
Gold-Griffin — Frozen South Kjölfoss legend; the Ember Watch found feathers in 1189 AF that matched no known bird; unresolved
Forum-Griffin — Nionian heraldic creature; Old Aemilia Torr's naval history contains a footnote: "The Griffin's skull is in the deep archive. I have seen it. It is not what you expect."
The Giants' Animals (arrived 1308 AF, unique)
White-Mammoth (calf) — one juvenile surviving; with Thyra in the Frozen South; profound echo-density; plants within half a mile grow measurably faster near it
Ashland Fire-Salamander (two) — with Sëdhra in the Heartlands; bioluminescent echo-patterns; living echo-amplifiers; unique to Eldraholm
Thornwood Canopy-Hawk (one) — with Sëdhra; color-shifting feathers react to ambient echo-field; acts as a living broadcast antenna
Deep Mythology (unverified, pan-regional)
Simurgh — Red Coast; every-color plumage; possibly related to the Storm-Roc; Ember Watch record: 1089 AF, Ash'khor ridge, estimated 200+ foot wingspan; "Recommend awe"
Feathered Serpent — Xaria; canopy-dwelling; pre-Dominion; the oldest Xarian oral tradition; described in the K'ay songs with specificity suggesting an actual creature
Aurora Serpent — Frozen South; seen swimming through the northern lights; no physical evidence; present in every clan's fire-songs regardless of how isolated
The Beast of the Badlands — Sangrean Sunstone Badlands; four-legged, plated in "living stone"; amber-glowing eyes; last credible tracks 1245 AF; likely the last echo-node predator on the southern continent

Document ends — Divine Veins Material World Codex, 1308 AF Compiled for worldbuilding reference. No plot, story, or protagonist content included.

DIVINE VEINS — THE LIVING WORLD CODEX
Language · Daily Life · Visual Culture · Echo Registry
Kaeo's Xaria · Jous's Invasion · The Tribute Standoff
Church Mechanics · Minor Courts · The World in Motion
Reference Document — 1308 AF

PART ONE: LANGUAGE AND THE VOICE OF MUNDUS

MUNNISH — THE CONTINENTAL TONGUE
Munnish is the dead empire's longest-running ghost. Derived from Nionian court dialect, it shed its original inflection over nine centuries of conquest until what remained was a stripped-down trade language with a vocabulary wide enough to discuss grain prices, a grammar simple enough that a Frozen South clansman and a Xarian delta merchant can haggle without an interpreter, and a beauty of roughly zero. The literate class hates it. The merchant class loves it. Everyone uses it.
Three registers exist:
Velanthi — the formal register; still largely Nionian in structure; used in courts, contracts, Church services, the Ayanite judiciary; long periodic sentences; honorifics front-loaded; passive voice preferred (the passive voice assigns no agent, which is useful when no one wants to be assigned responsibility)
Mercado — the trade register; the most-spoken version; direct, noun-heavy, minimal conjugation; numbers and weights still use Nionian counting system (most merchants can count to a thousand in Old Nionian and nothing else)
Vern — street speech; wildly regional; each city's vern has its own grammar drift, loan-words, and sounds that don't exist in formal Munnish; a Westhorn dockworker's vern and a Vornhold bargeman's vern are mutually intelligible only about 70% of the time, which is enough for argument

OATHS, BLASPHEMY, AND WHAT PEOPLE ACTUALLY SAY
Nionian (Under the Pure Way)
Surviving Vethori oaths (underground, seditious to use publicly):
"Fortia's scar" — invoking courage; admiration for someone who held under pressure
"Thalvex take it" — something lost, unrecoverable, given to the hostile sea
"By Kemvar's empty cup" — a drinking toast that also implies "I know this will end badly and I'm doing it anyway"
"Meravon's door" — a death threat; also used for any situation of no return
"Pyrantha's burn" — something well-made but at cost; admiration with acknowledgment of sacrifice
Pure Way approved expressions:
"The Way holds" — approval; everything is as it should be
"Against the Way" — accusation; catch-all condemnation
"The light has not yet reached it" — diplomatic way of calling something primitive, wrong, or damned
"In the Sacrifice's name" — invocation before any serious action; the more seriously Jous's followers say it, the more hollow it sounds to everyone else
What Nionians actually say when not being observed:
"That's the old marble" — something is as it has always been; not praise, not condemnation; acceptance
"Running out of stone" — near the end of resources, patience, time
"The quarry knows" — the truth will emerge; everything surfaces eventually; also: things have been happening underground that will matter

Roslandic
The language piles consonants at the front of words and drops terminal vowels. An insult loses half its syllables. A term of endearment gains none.
Common expressions:
"Kholodnoye zhelezo" — "cold iron"; a firm refusal; something settled and done; also an absolute rejection of someone's argument
"Mertvaya kuznitsa" — "dead forge"; something irreparably broken; applied to relationships, governments, hopes
"Moot nichego ne skazal" — "the Moot said nothing"; nobody will validate your position; you are alone with your problem
"Sheveli sam" — "stoke it yourself"; you made this, deal with it; the Roslandic version of "not my problem"
"Zhivkov udar" — "Zhivka hit"; a bad decision made while drinking that seemed reasonable at the time; an unavoidable consequence of indulgence
Profanity routing through the spirit tradition:
"Leshi tebya voz'met" — "may the Leshy take you"; forest-curse; fairly mild
"Rusalka tebe ulybayetsya" — "may the Rusalka smile at you"; far worse; a drowning-curse; used only in genuine anger
"Domovoy ushyol" — "the Domovoy left"; something catastrophic is about to happen to someone's household; also used as pure insult — "your Domovoy abandoned you" means "your household is cursed and your choices drove it away"
"Koschei zdes" — "Koschei is here"; something deathless and indestructible has found you; said with dread, sometimes resignation
Guild-specific:
"Sveta ne vidit" — "sees no light"; a miner working a dead seam; extended to mean someone pursuing something with nothing in it
"Skvazhina chitayet" — "the shaft reads"; the mine is communicating something; an intuition worth following; safety language that has become general use

Sangrean
Warm, rounded, trailing downward at the end of sentences. Everything sounds like a song slowing toward its final chord. Even the insults have melody.
Common expressions:
"La corrida no para" — "the fight doesn't stop"; something inevitable; fatalism framed as beauty
"Huele el corcho" — "smells the cork"; to sense trouble before you can prove it; the wine-master's skill extended to all perception
"Sangre vieja" — "old blood"; a Terrarossa partisan; said mockingly by Solé people, proudly by Terrarossa
"Pájaro de oro" — "golden bird"; a spy or informant; the Carvallo parrot reference is deliberate; calling someone pájaro without de oro is a different and more vulgar suggestion
"Última copa" — "last cup"; a situation about to end badly; used with a kind of resigned elegance
"La vid sabe" — "the vine knows"; everything reaches the light eventually; things grow toward truth; agricultural fatalism
Profanity:
"Que te lleve el toro" — "may the bull take you"; serious curse; invoking the corrida's death in the bad way
"Manos de piedra" — "stone hands"; someone who has no delicacy, no feeling; the worst insult to a craftsperson
"Corcho seco" — "dry cork"; a dried-up person, emotionally or financially; someone who has nothing left to give
Bell-related expressions (a whole register unique to Sangrea):
"La campana no miente" — "the bell doesn't lie"; what is announced publicly is true; used to shame people who deny public knowledge
"Fuera del repique" — "outside the peal"; someone not included in the network; not receiving the messages others are; political exclusion expressed as bell-code exclusion

Heartlandic
Formal precision, latinate loan-words still in common circulation, a tendency toward sentences that establish all the qualifications before stating the point. Outsiders experience this as evasiveness. Heartlanders experience outsiders' directness as aggression.
Common expressions:
"The grain counts" — what matters is what actually produces results; productivity over pedigree; a Silverblood expression that Silverring has appropriated ironically
"Bridge-weight" — the true measure of something's worth; you know what a bridge can hold when you put real weight on it; leadership measured the same way
"Against the current" — doing something dangerous or foolish; also used admiringly (they went against the current and survived)
"Argen's blessing" — good trade luck; falling into alignment with the river's logic
"Silver-tongue" — originally admiring; now politically charged; implies Silverblood alignment; not safe to use casually
Class markers in speech:
Noble houses use full Old Nionian title sequences when addressing equals; dropping a title marker is a deliberate slight
Guild members use occupational address sequences — master/journeyman/apprentice maintained in speech patterns even outside work context
A man who earns a living by the river addresses water as she (Ixchela's grammar bleeds north through generations of canal trade with the Xarian border); a man from the mountain districts uses neutral gender for water; this marks origin instantly

Red Coast
Arabic-patterned Munnish: long vowels extended, doubled adjectives for emphasis, very formal address registers that are the minimum courtesy, tripling something makes it sacred, quadrupling it makes it dangerous.
Common expressions:
"Al-qanat yajri" — "the qanat flows"; everything is working; peace, function, normalcy
"Al-rimal tatdhakkar" — "the sands remember"; nothing is truly forgotten in the desert; a warning against assuming time erases
"Rabi' al-thani" — "the second spring"; something unexpectedly good after hardship; a survivor's idiom
"Lisan al-nahas" — "copper tongue"; a flattering liar; precise and beautiful on the surface, the wrong composition underneath
"Thirst oath" — the most serious oath possible; sworn over water; breaking a thirst oath is the one sin the desert communities believe the desert itself punishes
Regional variants:
Oasis communities say "bismillah al-qanat" ("in the name of the qanat") as a work-beginning phrase; the Lovist missionaries tried to replace this with Lovist invocations and failed; the phrase is now so embedded in canal-work practice it functions as safety protocol rather than theology
Gate Lands merchant class uses "Sadiq's measure" for anything not quite honest but not quite dishonest; the Sadiq family name has become a common noun meaning "within the letter but against the spirit"

Frozen South
Deliberate. Slow. Silence is not the absence of speech but a speech act in itself. The clans communicate in layers: surface speech for outsiders, fire-song fragments for clan members, and a third layer of significance in pauses, body positioning, and the specific words chosen from multiple valid synonyms, which the fire-song tradition trains people to hear.
Common expressions:
"Gullblind" — "gold-blind"; corrupted by wealth; a serious accusation; the Aurax are frequently called this by the other clans
"Isen hugsar" — "the ice remembers"; a grudge that won't die; something done in this generation that will be answered in the next
"Vetrsvarið" — "winter-sworn"; an absolute commitment; more binding than any written contract
"Undir beinsjó" — "below the bone-sea"; beyond the worst possible outcome; the place where bones accumulate on the eastern coast's cold floor
"Eld-blindr" — "fire-blind"; unable to see because you're sitting too close to your own fire; insularity; refusing to perceive the world outside your clan
The silence vocabulary: The fire-song tradition trains listeners to extract meaning from pauses of different lengths within a sentence. A single-breath pause after a name means the name is being honored. A two-breath pause after a name means the name is being invoked for judgment. A pause before responding to a question means the question is serious. No pause before responding means the answer required no thought, which implies it's either obvious or a lie.

Horns
Clipped, functional, maritime technical vocabulary bleeds into daily speech until the division between work and life has the same quality as the division between sea and harbor: not a wall, just a change in depth.
Common expressions:
"The knot holds" — approval; reliability confirmed; something that will bear weight
"Running out of rope" — nearing the end; resources, patience, options
"Storm-sense" — intuition; premonition; the Windreaders' specific skill extended as a general term for knowing something before the evidence arrives
"Reading the fog" — interpreting ambiguous information; making decisions when visibility is reduced
"Deader than Fenn" — utterly finished; the Fenn house exterminated in the Bridge-Throat Massacre; their name survives only as the continent's most complete example of total erasure
Inter-port vocabulary: Between cities, specific Horns words have loaded meanings:
"Westhorn" as a verb means to overcharge with politeness; the Garrun reputation for guilded extortion
"Brinehold" as an adjective means brine-preserved, i.e., old, reliable, slightly pickled, not going bad but not fresh
"Nightspike price" means the real cost underneath the quoted cost; what you'll actually pay once the salvage fees and the docking surcharges are added

THE ASHBORN HUSH — XARIA'S INVISIBLE LANGUAGE
The Hush is a sub-audible communication register developed over centuries of necessity. It is not whispering; it is a distinct system.
Physical mechanics: Tapped patterns against surfaces within reach (wall, floor, another person's arm or hand). Short-range vocalization at frequencies below the audible threshold that free Xarians cannot perceive but that Ashborn ears have been trained from childhood to detect. Specific body orientations that encode grammatical structure — facing someone directly means indicative mood; a three-quarter turn means conditional; facing away entirely means hypothetical or dangerous.
Vocabulary range: Approximately 4,000 distinct concepts; full Hush literacy requires eight to ten years of childhood immersion; partial Hush (enough for safety communication) can be learned by adults in approximately six months; the full expressive register, including metaphorical and emotional nuance, takes a lifetime
What the Hush can do that speech cannot:
Lie about the surface speech while telling truth in the Hush simultaneously; Ashborn in free Xarian company often have two conversations running at once
Express emotional register underneath diplomatic content; "yes" in Munnish while "this is dangerous and I am afraid but we have no other option" in the Hush
Reference the Hush-Truth theological tradition in ways that are theological text to Reformation members and ambient noise to everyone else
What the dominant caste knows: They know it exists. They cannot perceive it. Three generations of Dominion scholars have attempted to document and decode it. Their work is incomplete; the Hush evolves faster than the scholarship. Oya-Nua has said privately: "They think we cannot change our language. They think we have what we were given. They have not understood that necessity is a teacher who never stops."

PART TWO: DAILY LIFE ACROSS THE WORLD

NIONIA UNDER THE PURE WAY
Patrician Household (morning):
The private bath is a survival of the Old Way social bath; pure white stone basins, heated water carried by household staff before dawn; the bath is where real conversation still happens because Domus Lux enforcement focuses on public spaces
Household prayers at the family shrine — formerly Vethori icons, now Pure Way ones; the transition required whitewashing the old icons rather than removing them; several patrician households retain the original underneath
Account review with the household steward; the most important business is conducted standing at a lectern, never sitting — sitting is for leisure and leisure is now somewhat politically fraught under the Pure Way's productivity theology
The morning letter: patrician culture has elaborate letter-writing conventions; the opening line of a letter signals its urgency by the specific honorific used for the recipient; seventeen gradations from "most sovereign" (the Vizier of Xaria, technically) to "friend" (genuine intimacy) to deliberate omission of honorific (a calculated insult)
Common Nionian household (one room in the Terraces):
Four to six people per room; shift workers sleep in the same beds in rotation, which means the bed is never cold and never unoccupied
The teglia pot — a communal clay pot kept on a shared landing fire; everyone contributes scraps; what comes out is different every day and occasionally remarkable; a neighborhood is partly defined by whose teglia pot you eat from
The whale-oil lamp burns on the landing; the Pure Way's decree about darkness has paradoxically made ordinary domestic life slightly brighter, because the street lamps work; but the lamp oil costs money, and the cost has risen since the decree, and this is noted with bitter humor
The canto della scala — "staircase song" — the tradition of humming lamento melodies while climbing tenement stairs; technically legal because no words are sung; technically subversive because everyone knows the words; the Domus Lux has twice tried to ban staircase humming and given up twice because the enforcement would require a white-cloak stationed at every staircase in Vellium

ROSLAND — THE MINER'S DAY (Fyrhold)
Before the shaft:
The kolpak inspection: partners check each other's coats; a torn liner is grounds to refuse the shift; this is law since the Gordost Collapse of 1189 AF when twelve men died because two of them couldn't move freely in their damaged gear
The zhalost' — "the pity" — the small offering left at the mine-shrine figure (Saint Dretha or Alon, usually, or something older that no one has a name for); the gesture is a touching of the figure's base with the knuckle, not the palm; touching with the palm is reserved for the living
The foreman's count: names spoken aloud; every miner must respond; entering uncounted means you're not in the count when you come out
In the shaft:
The knock-code: percussive communication through rock; learned in two years of apprenticeship; carries identity, status (well/hurt/needs-help/danger/all-clear), and navigation; the full code has approximately 200 distinct sequences; most miners know 60-80; the foreman knows all of them
The pipe rest: twice per shift, ten minutes; absolute quiet; mine-gossip happens here; this is also where the partner exchange happens — small objects passed between shift partners; nothing prescribed; just the gesture of acknowledgment; a miner who stops exchanging objects with their partner is understood to be in some kind of trouble
The Rock-Marten: semi-feral small predators that live in worked-out shafts and kill the Millstone-Mice that eat stored supplies; not pets but greeted by name when visible; a dead Rock-Marten in your section is considered a sign to leave early; no miner who has worked underground for ten years ignores this
After the shaft:
The zhivka ration: not a celebration, a protocol; one measure per shift per miner, administered in the changing area; the alcohol reduces the carbon-accumulation symptoms from extended underground exposure; the physicians who wrote the dosage guidelines did not include this in the official rationale; the miners know what it's for
The guild-hall fire: every mining settlement has a central firepit that burns continuously during working seasons; it is tended by whoever is off-shift; the tending is not assigned but it is not neglected; a town whose guild-fire goes out has deeper problems than fuel
The fire-song hour: on Velisday evenings, the shift that has off-time sings; not a performance, not a celebration; a recitation; the songs that week reflect what happened that week; a collapse that killed no one gets a different song than a week of nothing significant; the songs are never dramatic in proportion to their real weight

SANGREA — VINEYARD WORKER AND LORD (Vallesangre)
The worker's day changes entirely by season:
Winter (pruning): Cold, methodical, silent work. The coplas for pruning are slow and old and everyone knows them. The evening meal is communal at the hacienda — worker's table separate from the lord's table but using the same kitchen, which is considered the key dignity in the arrangement. Once a week: the noche de los cuentos, story-night; the oldest worker present tells a story; no interrupting; thanks expressed by silence rather than applause.
Spring (training): Tactile work done by hand; the vine-trainers develop characteristic calluses in patterns that identify their trade. The tradition of speaking to the vines is observed by every experienced worker; the reasoning is practical and unexplained: the vines respond to sustained presence; workers who talk to them consistently produce measurably better yields; no one has a good theory and no one needs one.
Harvest: Everyone available; children pick; grandparents direct; the youngest and oldest work together while the middle generation carries. The first pressed grapes: poured into the soil with a specific phrase that varies by house and that most workers don't know the translation of; the phrases are in Old Sangrean that predates Munnish and in many cases predates the noble houses that now own the land. After the last cart: la noche libre — the free night; no lord present by tradition; the workers run their own table; the music is different, older, rawer.
The lord's day (minor Sangrean noble, three steps below Solé):
The morning audience: any vassal, tenant, or free citizen may request time; it is not refused without grave reason; the audience chamber smell is deliberate — fresh-cut flowers from the garden, not incense, not the smell of administration
The azulejo consultation: before any significant decision, a minor Sangrean lord of the traditional type will commission a new tile or consult an existing one; the tiles in the receiving hall encode family history in a way that only family members can read fully; bringing a matter to the tile room means invoking the family's accumulated judgment
The afternoon siesta is not optional; it is the time when the lord's household does its actual work, the correspondence and account-keeping and intelligence-gathering that cannot happen when the lord is present
The evening: the roof. The roof is everything. Who is on whose roof and when and how late is the newspaper that has no editor

HEARTLANDS — GUILD TABLE AND MARKET (Minor Noble Household)
The surcoat politics at a minor Heartlander court:
House colors on the surcoat, quality of thread signaling position within the house
A guest's surcoat is assessed the moment they enter; to receive a good seat before your surcoat is seen means the host already knows who you are
A man in traveling clothes with no surcoat visible is either a pilgrim (shown immediately to the Lovist guest-room), a Starveling Church member (shown to the door), or someone between allegiances (watched until clarified)
The guild insignia at the hem rather than the chest: the master-journeyman-apprentice distinction visible in garment position, not just quality
The Guild Table ritual:
The host places salt and bread at the center first; the first guest to pass them to someone else rather than taking first is demonstrating a specific deference (if lower-status) or a specific courtesy (if higher-status); misreading which it is can destroy a relationship before the first course
The challenge tradition: a point left unchallenged at guild table is either obviously true or the challenger is a coward; the room knows which; a man who lets too much pass unchallenged is not known for his peaceable nature but for his lack of one
Buying a round: contributing a dish; the quality is noted; a house that consistently contributes poor quality has a problem that the guild table makes public in the most socially efficient way possible

RED COAST — MERCHANT CLASS AND DESERT TRAVELER
The merchant's day (Alsiroth's Gate):
Before the heat:
The Dawn Market: every transaction requiring careful inspection of goods; done in natural light before heat distorts; contracts signed before the sun rises above the eastern ridge
The morning tea: three cups minimum with any trading partner; first bitter, second sweet, third sweetest; each cup represents a different quality of trust; refusing the third cup ends the relationship gracefully; refusing the first cup is an insult with no graceful interpretation
Letters by courier; the Carvallo parrot network's mainland reach doesn't extend to the Red Coast, so correspondence travels by human messenger; the fastest message in the Gate Lands is a Sand-Seer carrying an urgent verbal communication on camelback; they charge accordingly
Midday:
Mandatory; the city closes; anyone who breaks midday rest is either desperate or dangerous; worth knowing which
The hammam: Hammam al-Kubra's public bath; this is where alliances are actually made; the formal negotiations happen in offices, the real agreements happen in steam; a deal sealed at the hammam is more durable than a deal sealed at a desk because it was made in a context that excluded performance
Evening:
The Souk reopens; the specific merchant arcades in specific sequence; the spice quarter at sixteenth hour, the metalwork quarter at seventeenth, the carpet and textile quarter at eighteenth; the sequencing evolved from practical reasons (odor, dust, weight of foot traffic) and now encodes a commerce hierarchy that is a source of constant low-level argument
The roof culture: Red Coast wealthy households live on their roofs in the evening; a view across the rooftops of Alsiroth's Gate is a view of the city's real political map in real-time
The caravan traveler:
Route-knots: the Saffaren tradition of leaving knotted cords on specific rocks at specific angles to communicate route conditions; a two-loop knot at the eastern angle of a certain class of rock means "water in this direction, two hours"; a broken cord means danger ahead; the system has approximately 80 distinct signals and predates any current civilization by an unknown margin
The munaqqar — "the cleared rock" — a flat stone near each Saffaren well that is kept swept clean; any traveler finding the rock swept is safe to approach the well; any traveler finding it covered with sand has received a warning that the well is either depleted, contaminated, or controlled by someone unfriendly
The sand-prayer: not Lovist; not theologically organized; simply a specific posture facing the setting sun that every desert traveler learns and performs regardless of faith because it has been performed at this hour in this direction since before any current faith existed

THE FROZEN SOUTH — CLAN LIFE (Aurheim)
The communal longhouse:
The central fire is never extinguished; when a new longhouse is built, fire from the old one is carried to start it; a fire-lineage extends back to a founding fire that the fire-songs trace to a specific named moment; the oldest fire-line in the south is Clan Aurax's; it is fifteen generations old
Sleeping arrangements are functional rather than familial; you sleep nearest to who you are bonded to in work; a warrior sleeps near his partner; a druid-equivalent (Auren Priest) sleeps alone, near the walls, facing out
The morning mead-cup: small, warm, the first of the day; passed in order of age from eldest to youngest; each person holds the cup for exactly as long as they choose before passing it; the length of time signals mood in a language the entire longhouse reads fluently
The bone-carving hour: during the long winter dark when outdoor work is impossible; everyone carves; the objects made during this time are the most personal objects a southerner possesses; a bone-carved object given to someone else is more intimate than any spoken declaration
The Hunt:
The full preparation is two days; the second day is silence; the third day is the hunt itself
Kjörval — "the hunting blood-call" — a specific vocalization made immediately before separating into hunting positions; half sound, half breath; carries exactly as far as the hunting party and no further; its acoustic properties in cold air are calibrated to this function; outsiders have heard it reported as "a sound that appears behind you even when you know the source is ahead"
The Whaletooth Priest's attendance is mandatory; the first cut of the catch is the Priest's and is cast back into the sea with a formula no one outside the priesthood knows completely; the second cut is the hunt leader's and is shared with the oldest member of the party; the sequence continues hierarchically until everyone has received a portion; there is always a portion left; this portion is left on the beach

XARIA — DAILY LIFE (Temple City and Canal Delta)
The temple-city priest's day:
The sacrificial calendar governs everything. On a T'zol'kin observation day, the priest's entire day is organized around the ceremony. On a non-ceremony day:
Dawn: the ix'avar — "the first offering" — a small personal blood offering made at a household shrine; a pinprick on the left thumb; a drop on the stone; this is not the major sacrifice; this is the daily acknowledgment that the accounting exists
Morning: administrative duties in the temple bureaucracy; the temple-cities run on extraordinary administrative precision; grain inventories, tribute calculations, labor allocations
Midday: the public teaching hour; the teocalli steps serve as lecture space; anyone may attend; the K'ay storyteller tradition shares the hour with the priestly teaching
Evening: the restricted ceremonies; only initiates; the higher-register rituals whose form the public does not see
The Ashborn laborer's day (delta canal work):
Before dawn: the Hush-gathering; a brief assembly of workers at the canal section's junction point; nothing is said in audible speech; the Hush carries the day's real information — which supervisor to watch, what the quota enforcement mood is, whether anyone needs covering
The canal work itself: knee-deep in water for most of the day; the primary health risk is parasite infection from the delta water, which the temple authorities are aware of and the Canal Guild manages through rotation schedules that are not adequately enforced
The midday break: workers are technically entitled to a full meal; in practice, the meal is provided in proportion to quota performance; this is the primary enforcement mechanism
Evening: the household altar; Amara-Utu's portion left before eating; whatever was learned or witnessed today offered to the Hush-record maintained by the community's eldest member, who keeps the running oral history of the community in memory
The Hush-hour: before sleep; the community's emotional accounting; the day processed communally in the sub-audible register; what was seen, what was felt, what requires response

PART THREE: VISUAL CULTURE

NIONIAN ART UNDER TWO TRADITIONS
The Vethori Hieratic (now suppressed): Frontal-pose god-figures, strict iconographic rules (which god appears in which posture with which symbol, deviation from which is heresy), the specific purple-black of imperial sacred pigment. The mosaic tradition survives in architecture even where the theological content has been whitewashed — the floor structures in patrician homes still show the compositional mathematics of Vethori sacred geometry even with Lovist images replacing the gods. The bones of the old religion in the floors of the new.
The Pure Way Visual Language: The single isolated figure. Illuminated from no visible source. Looking toward something out of frame. Always Jous. The deliberate visual theology of radical uniqueness — every other human being appears as crowd, as "the before," as the era awaiting the figure. This is the most recognizable new visual tradition on the continent in 1308 AF and the most obviously political: you cannot look at it without understanding its argument.
The Underground Aesthetic: The lamento singer tradition has a parallel visual culture: the tavoletta — small wooden panels painted with scenes from everyday life, often containing embedded visual jokes, political commentary, and encoded Vethori references that only the initiated read. They are kept in private rooms. They are technically still legal under the Pure Way because their surface content is domestic. Their actual content is not.

SANGREAN VISUAL TRADITIONS
The Azulejo: Geometric at foundation, increasingly naturalistic through Xarian contact. The most ambitious contemporary azulejo masters incorporate simplified jungle imagery — specific Xarian birds and plants translated into tile geometry. A master tile from a major house's receiving hall: 60cm square, 4,000 individual tile pieces, laid over six months, worth more than a skilled laborer earns in a year. The best ones are not silent when you look at them. They continue.
Corrida Art: Not documentation but theology. The specific frozen moment: the final pass, the cape extended, the bull's momentum not yet redirected. Always the instant before the kill — the maximum compression of grace and danger. The theory of the suspended moment — Sangrean aesthetic philosophy argues that this specific configuration of body, cape, and animal represents the furthest extension of human physical meaning; past it, the meaning resolves and is therefore over. Before it, the meaning has not yet arrived. At this precise moment, both are present simultaneously.
Cantaor Portraiture: The only tradition of genuine individual portraiture on the continent. Lords are depicted ceremonially and impersonally. Cantaores are painted mid-performance — face fully expressive, body in the posture of a specific performance, often mid-sound. The technique: not painted from observation but from memory immediately after the performance, because the performance posture cannot be re-created and the memory is therefore the most accurate document available. The best cantaor portraits are considered to contain something the subject cannot access themselves — the external shape of an internal act.

ROSLANDIC CARVING AND THE KNOT TRADITION
The Lintel Language: Every significant Roslandic building has a carved lintel above its entrance. The carving is not decorative in the sense of being arbitrary. It encodes: family history (in knot patterns derived from fire-song mnemonic structures), the building's primary function (specific tool symbols for guildhalls, specific postures for hospices), and the date of construction in a calendar notation that uses the twelve months as symbols rather than numbers. A master carver can read a lintel history in ten minutes. An outsider sees beautiful wood.
Bone-Work: The mine-workers' intimate tradition. Animal bone, occasionally human bone (always with permission, always formalized, the bone of significant dead given to the craftsperson who will carry their presence forward). Carved objects are intimate-scale, held and handled rather than displayed. The best bone-carvers describe the process as removing what shouldn't be there — revealing the figure the bone already contained. The objects are passed between shift partners as the primary language of the partnership: a new carving given to your partner on Monday morning without explanation means more than any words you could have said.
The Grief-Post: In significant Roslandic communities, a standing carved post at the settlement's edge; added to after every significant death; the carvings for each death are specific to the individual, not generic mourning symbols; the oldest grief-posts in the deep Greens are ten feet tall and three centuries old. The fire-songs and the grief-posts together constitute the community's externalised memory — two parallel archives, one ephemeral and living, one permanent and silent.

FROZEN SOUTH GOLD-WORK
The Silence Objects: Made by Auren Priests from the Kjölfoss's deep-vein gold using techniques predating the current tradition by at least 1,000 years. Observable difference from normal goldsmithing: warm to the touch in any temperature. Echo-dense in the way the Great Bridge-stone is echo-dense. They do not leave the south. The Magos have requested access to examine one four times. Each time the request has been declined with elaborate courtesy and zero concession. The most recent response, from the current Auren Priest leadership, was: "The gold is still warm because it is still ours. You may see it when it has cooled."
The Speaking Torc: The chief's neck-torc is not a symbol of office. It is a document. The knot patterns encode the chief's genealogy, military history, significant decisions, and the fire-song fragments his rule is associated with. A torc taken from a dead chief in battle is taken to the opposing clan's fire-singer, who reads it aloud to both communities — the victor's and the defeated's. This is how the Compact's Holmgang tradition ensures the defeated clan's history is not erased: it is read by the community that beat them.

XARIAN FEATHERWORK
The Codex-Mantle: A garment-length featherwork piece incorporating hundreds of bird species in patterns that encode cosmological knowledge, genealogy, historical events, and prophetic interpretation. A master codex-reader interprets one for days. Manufacture: three to five years. Approximately forty complete codex-mantles in existence. None have ever been traded to the mainland; the few in Dominion hands were acquired through dynastic inheritance.
The Temple Reliefs: Not decoration. Not primarily history. Instructions. The specific sequences of carved imagery on teocalli surfaces describe ritual procedures, sacrificial timings, and ceremonial protocols with the precision of a technical manual. They are also, secondarily, history. But the purpose was operational first. A K'ay storyteller reads a relief the same way a Brothers of the Open Road master reads a waystone: for practical guidance first, meaning second.



Divine veins cosmology religion · MD
Copy
DIVINE VEINS — COSMOLOGY, CALENDAR & THEOLOGY
The Heavens · The Reckoning of Days · The Faiths of Mundus
Reference Document — 1308 AF

PART ONE: THE HEAVENS AND THE SEAS

THE TWO SUNS
The sky of Mundus holds two suns — a fact so fundamental that the oldest Heartlander word for "obvious" is velosi, meaning "clear as both suns."
Velos — the Elder Sun. A yellow-white star, the primary source of light and heat. Larger and steadier in the sky. Velos drives the seasons, marks the year, and is the cosmological anchor of all calendar systems on the continent. When people say "the sun," they mean Velos.
Keth — the Young Sun. A smaller, orange-red star in close binary orbit with Velos. From the surface of Mundus, Keth appears roughly a third the apparent size of Velos, tinted warm amber against the sky's blue. During midday the two are often perceived as a single intensified light. At dawn and dusk, when Keth's different color becomes distinct, a pair of suns is visible — one yellow, one orange — rising or setting in close formation. Artists across every culture have painted this moment. No one has ever successfully described it in words.
The binary orbit means Keth periodically passes behind Velos (a secondary eclipse: an eerie dimming of approximately twenty minutes in which the sky greys and animals grow briefly confused) or transits in front (an extremely rare event: a tiny orange disc moving across Velos's face over several hours, visible to the naked eye as a dark point). A full transit has occurred three documented times in Mundane history. Each was treated as an omen of civilizational consequence, and history has obliged each time.
The Absence — the window of approximately forty minutes that occurs, on certain days, between Keth setting and Velos rising independently. Not darkness, exactly — more like a deepening of late twilight, the color of cooling embers. The Venic Path practitioners prize the Absence for meditation. Sailors avoid beginning any voyage during it. In Nionian superstition, children born during the Absence are said to "belong to neither light."

THE TWO MOONS
Aura — the Great Moon. Silver-white, approximately the apparent size of our moon. Orbital period of twenty-nine days. Full Aura is the primary reference point for monthly calendar divisions. In clear weather, Aura at fullness is bright enough to cast distinct shadows. The Tariqat al-Nur and the Sisters of the Veil in Nionia both structure their contemplative practices around Aura's cycle. In Lovist theology, Aura is "Vena's open hand" — the hand that gives.
Teln — the Runner. Smaller, faster, with a faintly gold-warm tint to its light (warmer albedo from mineral composition, per the Magos). Orbital period of eleven days — it moves fast enough that attentive observers can watch it shift position night to night. Teln waxes and wanes nearly three times for every Aura cycle. Navigators use Teln's position for fine-grained reckoning. In Lovist theology, Teln is "Vena's closed fist" — the hand that holds back.
Concordance — when both Aura and Teln are simultaneously full. Because Aura's cycle is twenty-nine days and Teln's eleven days (both prime numbers), the full alignment repeats every 319 days — roughly once each year. Concordance is among the most important events in both the Lovist religious calendar and the regional folk traditions of every culture on the continent. The tides during Concordance are dramatically amplified.
The Tidal Consequence — two moons with different orbital periods create tidal interference of spectacular complexity. On a normal night, Mundus experiences between three and five tidal peaks, depending on the relative positions of Aura and Teln. When they oppose each other, the interference can create zones of unnaturally flat water surrounded by turbulent standing waves. When they align toward full simultaneously, tidal forces compound — during Concordance, coastal flooding is routine and expected; low-lying settlements prepare weeks in advance. This lunar chaos is the primary reason the Pilots' Guild, the Horns navigators, and the Frozen South's Dyrholmar tradition all developed sophisticated tidal prediction systems that remain closely guarded professional secrets.

WHY THE OCEANS ARE UNMASTERABLE
The seas of Mundus are not merely dangerous by weather. They are structurally, mechanically hostile to long-distance sailing, and have been since before recorded history.
The Tidal Wars — the technical term used by the Magos for the deep-ocean current systems created by competing tidal forces. Where coastal seas have predictable (if complex) tidal rhythms, the open ocean accumulates these forces across thousands of miles of water. The result: vast slow-moving zones of circular counter-current — eddies the size of island chains — that rotate through the ocean in a multi-year cycle. A ship entering a Tidal War zone is pulled in multiple directions simultaneously, driven off course, dismasted by crosswinds, and has historically broken apart. The Tidal Wars are why no fleet has ever circumnavigated the continent.
The Twin-Sun Tide — the binary star system adds a solar tidal component to the lunar one. When both Velos and Keth are roughly aligned with one or both moons (a full triple alignment), tidal forces reach catastrophic levels. These events are rare — perhaps once per generation — and cannot be predicted with current instruments. The Magos' records contain descriptions of "Valos events" (named for a harbor city destroyed by an anomalous surge circa 800 AF, no survivors) that are consistent with triple-alignment tidal amplification. The Tide Scholar Maren's recent work, unconnected to any known cause in 1308 AF, is beginning to document subtle shifts in the Tidal War pattern cycle — the first measurable change in four centuries.
The Grey Curtain — beyond approximately 200 miles from the continental shelf, permanent storm belts form. The interaction between the complex tidal forcing and the atmospheric effects of a binary star system creates storm systems in the deep ocean that do not dissipate. Sailors who have glimpsed the Grey Curtain from elevated coastal headlands describe it as a wall of cloud extending from horizon to horizon. In the Nionian Old Way, it was the domain of Thalvex, the hostile sea-god who built the storms to keep mortals from knowing what lay beyond. In Lovist theology, it is "the boundary of grief" — where the ocean of Loreth's sacrifice is too deep for living things to traverse. The Saffaren of the Red Coast, who have perhaps the most prosaic view of celestial mechanics on the continent, call it "the place where T'zal begins" — T'zal being the Xarian concept of an ocean so vast it has stopped being a place and become simply a condition.
The Eldra-Veil (now breached) — in the deep southern ocean, the echo-density of Eldraholm produced a navigational barrier of a different kind: the chaotic echo-emissions at the Veil boundary caused disorientation, panic, and dissociative breakdown in any traveler not adapted to it. This barrier is now compromised. The echo-field is bleeding northward through the breach. The tidal pattern around the southern ocean is subtly shifting as a result — one of the anomalies the Magos are beginning to notice.
The Throat, the Galewater, the Teeth Straits — even short crossings are hazardous because tidal interference is amplified by coastal geometry. The Throat (Nionia to mainland: seven miles) channels the tidal forces of both moons through a narrow passage between two different geological shelves, creating tidal surges that reverse direction unpredictably during a crossing. The Galewater (Horns to Northwind: forty miles) sits at the precise latitude where the dominant Tidal War circulation creates permanent crosswind conditions that change direction on no predictable schedule. The Teeth Straits are navigable only because local pilots have memorized the tidal windows — the two or three hours per day, per strait, when the competing currents temporarily align.

THE COSMOLOGICAL SHAPE OF THE WORLD (As Understood in 1308 AF)
The educated class accepts that the world is spherical — the Magos confirmed this through astronomical observation, the curvature of the horizon, and the behavior of lunar eclipses during Concordance. This knowledge is approximately 300 years old and has been absorbed into educated culture without significant resistance.
What lies across the oceans is genuinely unknown. The theories:
The Ix'Atani Dominion exists across the eastern ocean (Xarian colonial fact)
Eldraholm exists in the deep south (the Giants have now confirmed this)
The Frozen South clans believe the southern ocean leads to the Under-World (the realm of the honored dead)
The Red Coast's deep-desert Saffaren believe T'zal — the oceanic void — simply extends forever, that the world has no other shore
The Magos' private position, held by Grand Magos Thessaly and perhaps six senior scholars: Mundus is one of possibly several inhabited landmasses, separated by ocean that is — for current technology — impassable. The Giants' arrival confirms this. The Dominion confirms this. The question of what else exists is one that Thessaly expects will begin to answer itself within her lifetime.

PART TWO: THE VELOSI CALENDAR

THE OFFICIAL RECKONING
The Velosi Calendar — named for Velos, the Elder Sun, and codified by Nionian imperial astronomers circa 200 AF. Adopted continent-wide during the imperial consolidation and maintained into the Age of Faith by institutional inertia. Every region uses its own local names for months and festivals, but the underlying structure is universal among the literate class.
Structure:
12 months × 30 days = 360 days
5 Velindra Days (the Days Between) outside any month; added at the end of the year
Leap adjustment every 6 years: 6 Velindra Days instead of 5
The Velindra Days are legal and commercial dead time — no contracts signed, no courts open, no debt collected; in practice, the largest informal markets of the year
The year begins with Velos reaching its winter solstice low-point and beginning its return
Days of the Week (7 days, Nionian-Munnish names):
Velisday — day of the Elder Sun; rest day for clergy in orthodox Loveism
Kethisday — day of the Young Sun; travelers' day; considered auspicious for beginning journeys
Aurisday — day of Aura-moon; market day in most Heartlander towns
Telnaday — day of Teln-moon; guild meetings traditionally scheduled here
Vethday — day of the turning; the major agricultural and trade day
Morvday — day of the deep sea; sailors call it lucky; landlocked cultures think it ill-omened for beginnings
Umbraday — day of shadow; cleaning day; preparation for Velisday; the week's quiet day

THE TWELVE MONTHS
1. VELORIM — The Return Winter to early spring. 30 days. The year's first month. Named for Velos's return to strength after the solstice low-point. The Nionian New Year falls on Velorim 1 — the most important civil holiday across all former imperial regions, celebrated for three days with markets, public feasts, and the settling of the previous year's debts.
Regional names: Sorvost (Roslandic), Retorno (Sangrean), Al-Awda (Red Coast), Frostbreak (Horns)
2. KETHARA — The Twin Fire Late winter. When Keth (Young Sun) is most distinctly visible alongside Velos in the morning sky, its orange light clearly separate from Velos's yellow-white. A cold month everywhere except Xaria and the Selvaverde border. The domestic holiday of the Twin Candles falls in Kethara — families light two candles at different heights, one yellow, one orange, and eat together.
Regional names: Grenosk (Roslandic), Fuegonado (Sangrean), Nar-Thani (Red Coast)
3. AURANIS — The Gold Rising Early spring. Named for Aura-moon, which is near its closest approach and appears largest and most golden. Both moons are often visible together in the early Auranis evening sky. The Night of Offering falls in this month. Planting preparations begin.
Regional names: Thalvor (Roslandic), Doramar (Sangrean), Qamar-Kabir (Red Coast, "Great Moon")
4. SOLVANE — The Open Days Spring equinox month. Named for the equal light — Solvane is derived from the Munnish root for "balanced" and "vault" together (the sky-vault balanced). The pilgrimage season opens on Solvane 1 with the Lovist holiday Velithara. The continent's largest inland trade fair, the Stonebridge Market, runs from Solvane 15 for three weeks.
Regional names: Grebend (Roslandic), Largavida (Sangrean)
5. TELNAVAR — The Runner Mid-spring. Named for Teln-moon at perigee (closest approach), visibly faster across the sky than usual. Associated with messengers, travelers, quick decisions. The Silver Moot falls in Telnavar during election years. The Saffaren Trade Moon fair occurs on the first Telnavar full-Teln.
Regional names: Rychel (Roslandic), Correndero (Sangrean), Barq-Waqt (Red Coast, "Lightning Time")
6. MORDAEN — The Deep Early summer. The one month when the ocean is least hostile — the Tidal Wars reach a temporary equilibrium, the Grey Curtain retreats slightly. The Pilots' Guild processes the year's largest fleet movements through Mordaen. The continent-wide Water Festival of the Red Coast falls here. Mordaen markets are the largest commercial events of the year for coastal cities.
Regional names: Zlakmir (Roslandic), Profundis (Sangrean), Madd-Bahr (Red Coast, "The Flood's Rest")
7. CONCORDIS — The Meeting High summer. The month most likely to contain a Concordance night (both moons full simultaneously), though the true Concordance follows its own 319-day cycle rather than adhering to the calendar. When a Concordance falls in Concordis, it is treated as a double blessing. The three-day Concordance Festival is the Lovist church's most important observance. The Red Coast's Night Market week is traditionally held here.
Regional names: Dvusvet (Roslandic, "Double Light"), Encuentro (Sangrean), Al-Liqaa (Red Coast)
8. VETHAROS — The Turning Late summer. Harvest season begins across the continent's temperate zones. Named for the perceptible turning of light — the days grow shorter in Vetharos, and even in Sangrea's heat there is a quality to the late-afternoon sun that people describe as "Vetharos gold" — richer, more amber, faintly melancholic. The Festival of the Red Grape spans Vetharos's first two weeks in Castesol.
Regional names: Ozhav (Roslandic), Girando (Sangrean), Kharf (Red Coast)
9. AURAVAL — The Great Moon Walk Autumn. Aura reaches its apparent largest size and is visible most nights on clear skies. The harvest continues. Moonlit nights in the grain fields are an aesthetic fact of Heartlander life. The Guild Tables of the Heartlands open in Auraval's first week.
Regional names: Mechtal (Roslandic), Lunagrande (Sangrean), Badr-Kabir (Red Coast)
10. KETHMIR — The Dying Fire Autumn deepening. Keth becomes hard to distinguish from Velos in the morning sky — the days feel more monochromatic, the orange warmth fading. The Broken Chalice Day falls on Kethmir 12 in Sangrea. The approach to the Lovist fasting month creates a quiet, sobering quality to the month. Freezing nights arrive in the Frozen South.
Regional names: Gruzhen (Roslandic), Cenizante (Sangrean), Al-Khamud (Red Coast)
11. SORVAEL — The Long Coming The Lovist fasting month. Thirty days of daily observance — dawn prayers, reduced meals, almsgiving. The full fast (all day without food or water) is only obligatory for clergy; laypeople typically observe a single daylight fast per week during Sorvael plus charitable acts. The month ends with the Breaking Fast holiday Kethiran, the largest communal feast of the year.
Regional names: Dolgach (Roslandic), Nochilarga (Sangrean), Al-Sawm (Red Coast, "The Fast")
12. UMBRANIS — The Dark Deepest winter. The shortest days. The Day of Founding (Triavar) falls on Umbranis 7. The Night of the Twelve Fires is the solstice night in Rosland. The Winter-Moot of the Frozen South occurs during Umbranis. The Velindra Days follow Umbranis 30, before the year turns to Velorim again.
Regional names: Korvast (Roslandic, "Crow-Cold"), Sombranoche (Sangrean), Al-Zalam (Red Coast)

MAJOR LOVIST HOLIDAYS
(observed across all former imperial regions)
CONCORDANCE FESTIVAL — Concordis, when both moons align Three days. The Church's most significant religious event. Celebrates the moment of the Great Sacrifice — Loreth and Vena's union before becoming the world. The only major ceremony where mixed-gender participation is mandatory. Cities light double-flame lanterns (one white for Aura, one gold for Teln). The ceremony at the Great Cathedral of Faithir draws up to 80,000 pilgrims when the alignment falls in Concordis. If the true Concordance falls outside this month, the observance is still held in Concordis but called "the Memorial Concordance" — acknowledged as a commemoration rather than a true celebration.
ORANTARA — The Night of Offering (Auranis 15) Sundown to sundown — a full day's vigil. No food or drink until the second sundown, when a small communal meal is shared with strangers. The Bonekeepers process through every major city listing the names of the dead from the previous year; citizens light candles in windows for the deceased. In coastal cities, names of the drowned are written on dried kelp or salt-paper and floated to sea. The dead are said to walk close during Orantara. In practice, the holiday has developed regional carnival-adjacent traditions — Sangrea's Procesión de las Ánimas is partly this.
VELITHARA — The Long Walk Opening (Solvane 1) The official opening of the pilgrimage season. The Brothers of the Open Road plant a flowering Argen-Rush reed at every major waystone on the continent simultaneously at dawn — a logistical feat requiring months of advance coordination. Pilgrims who pass a waystone on Velithara take the reed-flower and press it into their prayer-codex; this is considered a minor blessing. In cities, a procession of the previous year's pilgrims walks the central streets to mark their return.
KETHIRAN — The Breaking Fast (last day of Sorvael) The largest communal feast of the year. Every household opens its doors; strangers are fed; debts are considered forgiven (the Church forbids debt-collection for three days around Kethiran; this is one of its few legally enforceable directives in post-imperial regions). The feast begins at sundown on Sorvael 30 and continues until the following evening. This is the most universally observed holiday on the continent — including among people who observe nothing else Lovist. In the Heartlands, the phrase "even at Kethiran" is used to mean something that happens without exception.
TRIAVAR — The Day of Founding (Umbranis 7) The anniversary of the three prophets' deaths — all three died within seven days of each other in the grove at Faithir, and Umbranis 7 is the central date around which the tradition crystallized. Each order observes it differently:
Ayanites: Public recitation of Aya's Scrolls in the central plaza of every city with an Ayanite court; the reading is open to all; any citizen may ask a question and receive a public answer
Ashanites: A healing vigil — Ashanite hospices open their doors completely, offering free treatment to anyone who arrives; donations are neither solicited nor refused
Alonites: A full day of public labor; roads repaired, streets cleaned, wells dug, water hauled for the elderly; no ceremony, only action
In former imperial cities, Triavar is the most visibly religious day of the year. Even in regions with complicated relationships with the Church (post-conquest resentment in Rosland, doctrinal disagreements in the Heartlands), the practical service of the Alonites on Triavar is broadly appreciated.

REGIONAL HOLIDAYS (Selected)
NIONIA
Vellium Founding Day (Velorim 12) — officially "the Day of Illumination"; the Pure Way's premier civil holiday; attendance at the Great Dome service is strongly implied; under Jous's regime, increasingly mandatory for public servants
The Marble Feast (Mordaen 3) — quarry workers' annual festival in the Marchia Ferrus; officially sanctioned but the Church is uncomfortable with its pagan roots (involves pouring wine on millstones and singing the Old Way quarry-songs — hymns to Pyrantha the craft-goddess that predate Loveism by centuries); the Cassian family funds it regardless
Twin Candles Night (Kethara 1) — domestic; families eat together with two candles burning at different heights; no formal religious content; persists in every class
THE HORNS
Storm-Sing (Umbranis, during the first winter storm — no fixed date) — the competitive singing festival; taverns compete for best performance; the champions hold informal cultural authority for the year; the storm that triggers it can be as early as Kethmir, as late as Velorim in mild years
The Bone Walk (Auranis 15, the Orantara tradition) — specifically the coastal version: names of the drowned written on salt-paper and floated with the outgoing tide at dawn; harbor lamps burn all night; fishing boats ring their bells on the hour
Pilot's Day (Telnavar 20) — the Pilots' Guild founding anniversary; all harbor fees waived for the day; the Guild's senior active pilot makes a ceremonial solo crossing of the main strait; enormous crowds; the day's only dangerous tradition is that young sailors traditionally attempt to follow the senior pilot's route in their own craft, with predictable results
SANGREA
Festival of the Red Grape (Vetharos 1-14) — the continent's largest annual festival; fourteen days in Castesol; corrida season; copla competitions; the House Solé opening gala; the tournament sponsored by House Terrarossa; enormous numbers of pilgrims
La Noche de los Campaneros (Mordaen 21) — midsummer bell night; every bell in Sangrea rung at midnight simultaneously for sixty seconds; the sound is reportedly audible fifty miles away when conditions are right; tradition holds that on this night you can hear bells from cities that no longer have bell towers — Fuentarossa's bell (destroyed in the Sunstone War) is said to ring from below the river
El Silencio de Sangreverde (Kethmir, anniversary of the Butcher's hanging) — one day per year in Sangreverde: no one speaks; not a Lovist observance, predating it; the one wholly secular regional tradition that even the Church declines to comment on
THE HEARTLANDS
The Silver Moot (Telnavar, election years) — three days of markets, fairs, and political theater surrounding the Argenlord election period; the busiest commercial stretch of the year; the famous saying "you can lie at the Silver Moot but the price still finds you" refers to the way false trade information during the Moot inevitably affects real contracts for the following year
Stonebridge Market (Solvane 15-Telnavar 8) — three weeks; the continent's largest inland trade fair; pilgrims, merchants, and pickpockets from every region; the Brothers of the Open Road maintain a permanent waystation here for medical emergencies; the most traded commodity is Heartlands grain futures
The Guild Tables (Auraval 1-7) — guild chapter feasts open simultaneously across every Heartlander city; foreign merchants are formally invited; the combination of alcohol, music, and favorable trade terms makes this the most efficient commercial week of the year
ROSLAND
The Night of the Twelve Fires (Umbranis solstice) — deepest winter solstice; twelve candles in every window; already established; the most beloved purely Roslandic tradition; older than Loveism, older than the empire, possibly older than the republic
Election Days (Velorim, every ten years) — the High Baron election period; muster-field gatherings at every town's Speaking Stone; fire-song vigils the night before the vote; a serious occasion that has developed its own festival character, particularly in Fairhaven where the election itself is public theater
First Salmon (Rychel/Telnavar, when the run begins) — no fixed date; when the first River-Salmon of the season are caught, the river-town that catches them flies a white banner, and the news travels by fire-song relay; the run's arrival is greeted by communal feasting; a pre-Lovist tradition the Church has never successfully claimed
RED COAST
The Water Festival (Mordaen solstice) — all qanat intake chambers opened simultaneously at dawn; the water flows higher and faster for that day; celebrations involve bathing in qanat-fed fountains and leaving copper offerings at water sources
Night Market Week (Concordis) — the one week per year when the Night Market of Alsiroth's Gate is openly acknowledged; even the city guard participates; Omar Sadiq traditionally makes it the year's most spectacular
Saffaren Trade Moon (Telnavar, full Teln night) — the Saffaren approach the desert edge for trade; no fixed location; the gathering migrates between known sites on a cycle that outsiders cannot predict; merchants who want access follow desert-guides or simply find nothing
THE FROZEN SOUTH
The Winter-Moot (Umbranis, Kjölfoss Deeps) — political, social, and religious simultaneously; the Auren Priests open and close with ceremony; already extensively documented
First Kill (Mordaen) — when the whale hunt season opens; each clan's first successful hunt; the Whaletooth Priests perform the Rite of First Cut; the entire community participates in the processing and receives a share
The Fire-Naming (Velorim, first Velisday) — children born in the previous year receive their true names sung into the fire-songs by their parents; the fire-singer witnesses; the name becomes part of the clan's living record at this moment
XARIA
Flower Wars Season (Solvane through Mordaen) — ritual combat season; governed by the T'zolk'in Calendar (see separate section); the mainland Velosi calendar is officially used for tributary purposes but internally the Xarian ten-count cycles take precedence
H'uun's Madness (five-day period in Concordis) — already established; carnival; the one time the Ashborn Day of Reversal is permitted
The Drowning Sun (Kethmir solstice) — already established; the wading-into-the-ocean festival at Bahia K'tharr
THE ISLE OF KNOWLEDGE
The Pale Bell Day (whenever a Grand Magos election is announced) — not a fixed date; when the Pale Bell rings, all work on the Isle ceases for the day; reading rooms close; the entire community gathers in the great hall; the election process begins the following morning
Charter Day (Velorim 20) — anniversary of the Charter of the Pale Reed (the Isle's founding document); a scholars' holiday with no religious content; the Deep Stacks are opened to all Circles; the Vault-Keeper is the only member of the Order excused from the general opening
PART FOUR: THE VETHORI — THE OLD NIONIAN GODS

THE PANTHEON OVERVIEW
The Vethori — "the Bright Ones" or "the Sovereign Powers" — were the gods of the Nionic Empire and, before it, the gods of the old Nionian city-states. They were not invented by the empire; the oldest Vethori hymns predate Nion I by at least six centuries. The empire formalized and codified them, deified Nion I into the pantheon (creating the awkward theology of a mortal who became divine in historical memory), and exported the religion to every conquered territory.
The Vethori were transactional gods. You did not pray to them for personal salvation; you traded with them. Sacrifice a white bull to Fortia before a battle, and Fortia's favor was yours until the next battle. Forget the offering, and you deserved what you got. This transactional theology made the Vethori popular with merchants, soldiers, and emperors — and made them incapable of competing with Loveism when Loveism promised something the Vethori never had: unconditional love.
By 1308 AF, the Old Way is formally extinct in the former imperial regions (outlawed by Nion XIII, physically destroyed by the Church). But remnants persist:
The quarry-songs of Nionia (hymns to Pyrantha that predate the empire by 300 years)
The road-offerings at mile-markers (old Viam habit that the Brothers of the Open Road haven't fully eliminated)
The harvest prayers to Copia in the Heartlander river communities
The sailor's private observances to Thalvex (hedging their bets; the Church turns a blind eye)

THE MAJOR VETHORI
NIONUS AXKE — Lord of Law, Empire, and the Sealed Road He was the chief god before he was also the deified Nion I. The original Nionus was a god of law-by-force — the law that comes not from consensus but from the power to enforce. His symbols: the iron wheel (the wheel of governance), the crossroads marker (all roads lead through him), the eagle clutching a law-scroll. His sacred color was deep imperial purple — the exact pigment that gave Nionian senatorial robes their distinctive look.
The theological awkwardness of deifying an actual historical figure into an existing deity was resolved by imperial theological decree: Nion I had not become Nionus Axke, but rather Nionus Axke had always been partially incarnate in the Nion bloodline, and the Conqueror's achievements were proof of divine will made visible. This reasoning satisfied no serious theologian and was never questioned by anyone with power, which is the characteristic quality of state religion.
His temple in Vellium — the Axkaren, the Hall of the Bound Law — was the largest building on Nionia before the Great Dome. Its ruins still exist; Jous used the foundation for the Pale House extension.
FORTIA — Goddess of War, Glory, and the Worthy Death Not a death goddess — Meravon held that position — but the goddess of war's glory specifically. Her concern was the quality of combat: courage shown, enemies met equally, the choice to stand when flight was possible. Cowardice was a theological offense to Fortia. Dying well in her service was the highest grace the Vethori offered.
Her symbols: the throwing spear (not the defensive pike — she was interested in aggression), the burning torch held downward (the torch that lights the way into battle, not home from it), the Gale-Kestrel (before the Horns sailors adopted it as a weather omen, it was Fortia's sacred animal — a bird that flies into storms).
She was painted with a scar across her left cheek in every depiction — not wound, but mark. The scar was present before any battle she appeared in. The theological interpretation: the worthy scar is one you have before you need it. Preparation over luck.
Her major festival was on Mordaen 6 — midsummer, the height of campaigning season. Gladiatorial games were officially her rites. Nion XIII abolished them.
COPIA — Goddess of Abundance, Commerce, and the Generous Sea Originally a sea deity — the benevolent ocean, the fish-bringing tide, the profitable voyage returned safely. Over centuries she expanded to encompass all abundance, and by the empire's peak she was as much a god of the marketplace as the harbor. Merchants swore by Copia when closing deals. Her temple was traditionally located at the waterfront's busiest point.
Her symbols: the cornucopia (specifically rendered in gold, not the agricultural produce inside it — Copia's gift was the vessel, not the contents, meaning the capacity to receive rather than the receiving itself), the diving pelican, the merchant's scale balanced perfectly. Unlike most of the Vethori, Copia was depicted smiling.
The phrase "Copia willing" for good commercial fortune persists in the Horns and Red Coast even in 1308 AF, where technically it should have been replaced by Lovist equivalents. The Brothers of the Open Road use it unself-consciously, which is a source of ongoing minor friction with the Ayanite order.
VIAM — God of Roads, Travelers, and the Safe Return A trickster-heretic figure by modern standards — but to the Nionian culture that produced him, he was simply the most practically useful of the gods. He protected travelers, but in a specific way: he did not protect them from danger; he made sure they knew where the danger was and had the speed to navigate around it. He was associated with cunning rather than power.
His symbols: the stone waymarker (every imperial mile-marker was technically his altar), sandals specifically (not boots, not bare feet — sandals, the traveler's footwear, the shoe that covers without enclosing), the written message. He was the god of accurate information.
The road-warden tradition — which predated the Brothers of the Open Road and gave them their institutional template — was a Viam cult in origin. The road-wardens left offerings at their mile-markers: oil, grain, a copper coin. The Brothers of the Open Road continued this practice for approximately 200 years after officially converting to Loveism, attributing it to "respect for the road's history" rather than theological persistence. By 1308 AF, only a handful of the oldest active Brothers still perform the offering, and they do it alone, before dawn.
MERAVON — God of the Honored Dead and the Dark Archive Not a frightening god — not threatening, not capricious. Meravon was the god of proper death: the death that was honored, recorded, and remembered. His concern was not dying but the treatment of the dead. A warrior killed in battle and properly buried was under Meravon's protection and care. A warrior killed and left unburied — or buried without ceremony, or denied last rites — was a theological catastrophe. Not for the dead man's soul, but for the living who had failed him.
His symbols: the black mirror (a mirror in which you can see the dead but not yourself), the sealed clay urn (properly closed, properly marked), the locked door. He was never depicted facing forward — all Meravon statues faced away, looking inward toward something visible only to him.
The Nionian funerary tradition — full record-keeping of the dead, proper ceremony, clan genealogies maintained — was a Meravon practice in origin. The Bonekeepers' tradition, which ostensibly operates within Loveism, preserves almost every element of Meravon's rites while replacing his theology with Lovist language. The Ashanite order quietly encourages this.
THALVEX — God of the Hostile Sea and the Unacceptable Horizon The dark mirror of Copia. Thalvex governed the ocean as it genuinely was — indifferent, violent, unconcerned with human survival. He was not evil; he simply did not care. The Grey Curtain was called "Thalvex's Breath" by Nionian sailors, and the description is more respectful than accusatory: this is simply what Thalvex does.
His symbols: the spiral shell (the nautilus — a form that draws inward to infinity), the anchor chain without an anchor (the chain that holds you but never reaches bottom), the drowned man (depicted not horribly but thoughtfully — a man descending through clear water, eyes open, not struggling). He was appeased rather than worshipped. Offerings before difficult crossings: wine poured off the stern, a piece of the ship's own timber burned on a small brazier and the ash scattered on the water.
Sailors who observe nothing else Lovist still pour wine off the stern. The Church has tried to rename this "an offering to Vena's deep waters" with limited success.
PYRANTHA — Goddess of Fire, Craft, and Transformation by Forge The goddess of making things. Her domain was any transformation by fire — forging, cooking, burning, illumination, purification. She was particularly associated with the moment when raw material became something else: iron becoming a blade, clay becoming a vessel, ore becoming metal. The transformation itself was sacred to her, not the finished object.
Her symbols: the double flame (two fires side by side — one to melt, one to shape), the hammer, the bellows. She was depicted with burns on her forearms — not wounds, but the casual marks of a craftsperson who works close to the fire and doesn't flinch from the occasional cost of that proximity.
The quarry-songs of Nionia are Pyrantha hymns that predate the empire by centuries. They survived the Nionic conquest, the imperial religious codification, the Age of Faith's conversion, and Jous Lorethian's Pure Way purge, because the quarry-workers simply kept singing them while officially converting to whatever religion was currently mandatory. They are work-songs. They match the rhythm of the hammer. Theology has nothing to do with it.
SELINDRA — Goddess of the Hunt, the Wild, and Aura-Moon She ran. In every depiction: running. Through forest, through night, through snow, through rain — she was always in motion and the motion was always away from cities. She was the god of the untamed, the unoccupied, the wilderness that the empire was always displacing.
Her symbols: the short recurve bow (not a war bow — a hunting bow, a single-purpose tool), the crescent shape of Aura-moon in its first quarter, the wolf. She was worshipped primarily in the frontier regions — Rosland, the mountains, the forest communities — long after the coastal cities had converted to Loveism or moved on to other things. The Frozen South has vestigial Selindra-adjacent traditions (the Frostguard's wolf-hide armor is partly a Selindra reference) though the southern clans would not recognize the name.
VELARAS — God of the Elder Sun and the Sovereign Light The male twin of Selindra in the oldest mythology, though they diverged significantly by the imperial period. Velaras was Velos's divine embodiment — the steady, organizing, warming sun-god. He was associated with clarity, with predictability, with the agricultural cycle's reliability. Not warm in the personal sense; warm in the way that sunshine is warm — impersonal, consistent, fundamentally indifferent to individual fate but structurally necessary for all life.
His symbols: the sunwheel (a circle divided into eight equal sections), the gold circlet (not a crown — a circlet, a ring of authority without a point of dominance), the rooster (because it announces Velos's arrival without fail). By the late empire, Velaras had been largely absorbed into the Nionus Axke theology — the steady administrative sun merged with the god of imperial law. The older temples to Velaras are architecturally distinct from imperial-era temples precisely because they predate the merger.
KEMVAR — God of Wine, Excess, Dream, and Creative Destruction The problematic one. The Vethori did not have an evil god, but they had a dangerous one. Kemvar was not malicious — but he was utterly uninterested in consequences. He was associated with wine, but more broadly with any altered state: intoxication, dream, artistic vision, madness, the dangerous edge of inspiration. The Venic Path mystics, who predate the ban and persist underground in 1308 AF, have deep folk-religion roots in Kemvar even though they frame their practice in Lovist language.
His symbols: the serpent eating its own tail (the Ouroboros — a symbol of recursion without progress, which was how the conservative Vethori clergy understood Kemvar's influence), the empty cup (drained, not yet refilled), the grapevine specifically in autumn (the harvest that must be crushed to become something else).
He was simultaneously the most popular god among common people and the most suppressed by the aristocracy. The Festival of Kemvar's Wake — a three-day carnival that preceded the grape harvest — was abolished by imperial decree approximately four times. It kept returning. In 1308 AF, elements of it survive in Sangrea's Festival of the Red Grape without anyone formally acknowledging the connection.
VORATH AND NETHIS — The Twin Serpents, Chaos and Order Not full deities but divine principles. Vorath and Nethis are depicted as two serpents coiled around each other — one black (Vorath, chaos, the unpredictable), one white (Nethis, order, the predictable). They are used primarily in oath-taking: to swear "by Vorath" means swearing that you will not betray (invoking chaos's witness against chaos); to swear "by Nethis" means swearing to honor an agreement (invoking order's witness for order). The paradox was intentional — Nionian oath theology held that the most trustworthy oaths invoke the principle that your violation would offend.
In the theological treatises of the later empire, Vorath and Nethis are described as the fundamental tension that preceded the creation of the gods themselves. Neither one wins; neither one can win. The world exists in the space between them.

PART FIVE: THE XARIAN FAITH

THE GREAT EXCHANGE
Everything has a price. Life is borrowed from the gods, used for its span, and returned. The return is the sacrifice. The sacrifice is not death — it is completion. K'tharr made the sun from his own blood; Ixchela made the river from her tears; the first humans were made from the blood of dead gods. To sacrifice is to participate in the mechanism that created the world. To refuse is to take without giving, which is the only true sin in the Xarian worldview.
This is not a metaphor. It is a description of how the world works.
The Ix'Atani Dominion has theologians who can argue the Great Exchange in any of seventeen intellectual frameworks. The temple-cities of Xaria have priests who can recite the Exchange's principles in seven formal registers. The Ya'ax warriors have a version that fits in three words. The Ashborn have a version they sing in the Hush that turns the theology completely inside out. All of them are, in some sense, correct.

THE IX'NAVAR — THOSE WHO WERE BEFORE THE RIVER
K'THARR — The Jaguar-Fire, Lord of the Sun's Hunger The primary god. He made the sun from his own burning body — tore himself open, placed his heart in the sky, and now the heart burns there. This is why the sun requires blood: because K'tharr is still alive in the sky, still giving, and the sacrifice is the acknowledgment that you understand this and that you reciprocate.
He is depicted as a jaguar made of fire — not metaphorically, but literally; every representation of K'tharr shows the form of a jaguar whose substance is flame. His spots are not spots but darker flames. He has no eyes in the conventional sense; where a jaguar's eyes would be, there are two points of white light.
He has two aspects: the Ascending K'tharr (rising sun, creative, generous, warmth-giving) and the Descending K'tharr (setting sun, destructive, demanding, diver-into-darkness). The transition between these aspects each day is the theological crux — the sun sets because K'tharr descends into the underworld to fight Amara-Utu's shadow-forces each night and rises again because he wins. The sacrifice fuels his strength for this battle. If the sacrifice stops, the sun does not rise one morning.
His priests wear jaguar-gold and crimson. His sacred animal is the jaguar. His sacrificial day is the summer solstice. His stone is black jade. The Scarlet Order are his warriors. His temple is the great Teocalli of Ix'Pal.
IXCHELA — The River-Mother, Lady of Healing and Transformation She did not make the river. She is the river. Ixchela wept when the world was made — at the beauty of it, at the cost of it, at all three simultaneously — and her tears became the Ix'za and the tributaries and all fresh water on the peninsula. This is why fresh water heals: because it is grief turned useful.
She is depicted as a woman with a serpent's lower body — not a monster, but an integration. The upper body is human and warm; the lower body is river-current, always moving, impossible to stop. She cannot be fully still. Even her statues are carved in motion.
She governs healing specifically in the sense of transformation: not restoration of what was but transformation into what can survive the loss. A healed wound does not look like the original skin; a grief worked through does not look like happiness; a river after a flood does not run the same channel. Ixchela is not interested in restoration. She is interested in continuation.
Her priests wear serpent-green and black. Her sacred animals are the river dolphin and the caiman. Her major observance is the River-Lotus ceremony at each new year of the T'zolk'in count. Her stone is white jade.
H'UUN — The Monkey-Trickster, Lord of the Crossroads Between H'uun made language. Before H'uun, the gods understood each other directly — thought to thought, necessity to necessity. H'uun introduced words, which meant he introduced the gap between meaning and expression, between intention and interpretation, between truth and performance. Every misunderstanding in the world traces back to H'uun's gift.
He is not apologetic about this. He finds it hilarious.
He is depicted as a spider-monkey in mid-leap — not sitting, never sitting, always in the moment between one branch and the next. His expression is always partially obscured: one hand often covers part of his face, one eye winking, or the image slightly blurred as if he moved just as it was drawn.
The five-day Madness Festival (H'uun's Madness, in Concordis) is his primary observance: masks, role-reversal, the Day of Inversion when Ashborn serve their masters and masters serve them. H'uun invented masks because he understood that the performance of a role sometimes reveals more truth than the role itself. He is the patron of performers, liars, diplomats, and anyone who navigates between two positions without fully committing to either.
No formal priesthood — those who practice trickery in sacred contexts are considered his servants by action rather than appointment. His sacred animal is the spider-monkey. His stone is obsidian that catches light unexpectedly.
AMARA-UTU — The Smoke-Between-Worlds, Lady of Memory and the Honored Dead She tends the dead between sacrifices. Not a death goddess — death is K'tharr's domain in the descent. Amara-Utu is the waiting: the space between dying and being received, between sacrifice and acknowledgment, between one incarnation and the next.
She is depicted as a vast serpent coiled around the world-tree — not threatening, not constricting, simply present. She is the permanence that the living achieve only temporarily. She remembers everything, which is her gift and her burden. She cannot forget. She holds the memory of every dead person, every dead creature, every dead moment. This is why she is also the god of grief: grief is the living's attempt to keep pace with what Amara-Utu holds always.
Her cult is the most intimate of the Xarian religions — practiced at the household level, in the domestic shrine, in the early morning before sunrise. Her offerings are not blood but food: the first portion of every meal is Amara-Utu's. She is fed before the living eat.
Her priests are always women. Her sacred animal is the anaconda. Her color is indigo — the deepest blue before black. Her stone is the dark core of bloodwood.
T'ZAL — The Deep Current, That Which Is Not Named T'zal is not worshipped. T'zal is acknowledged. The distinction is significant.
T'zal is the ocean beyond the reach of the Great Exchange — the open water where no sacrifice reaches, where K'tharr's light grows too thin to sustain the sacrificial economy, where Ixchela's tears have diluted past recognition into saltwater that cannot heal. T'zal is simply what exists beyond the gods' concern, which is not indifference on T'zal's part but a difference in kind. T'zal is not a person; T'zal is a condition.
Xarian sailors acknowledge T'zal before any deep-water voyage with a formula that translates roughly as: "We go where you are. We know it is not ours. We ask only that you notice us passing, not that you care." No offering is made; T'zal does not receive offerings. The acknowledgment is the entire ritual.
No priests, no temples, no images. Sailors know the acknowledgment formula. That is the entire religion of T'zal.
IX'CHA-KAN — The Corn-Blood, Lady of Agriculture and the Debt of Growth She is the reason food requires sacrifice. In Xarian cosmogony, the first crops grew from the blood of the dead — literally, the blood that fell from K'tharr's descent into the underworld nourished the first seeds. The soil still requires this. Every harvest has a component of return — the first fruits burned, a small blood offering at planting, the ash of sacrifice mixed into the seed-corn.
She is depicted as a woman carrying a bundle of maize that bleeds instead of being cut at the stalk. The blood feeds the earth. She is not a violent god — her expression is always one of deep calm, of someone performing a necessary task that must be done with acceptance rather than grief.
The Canal Guild's agricultural rites in the Ix'za delta are technically Ix'cha-Kan rites repurposed for hydraulic farming: the water is the blood, the qanat is the ritual vessel, the harvest acknowledges the offering.
Her priests are of all genders. Her sacred plant is maize. Her sacred animal is the heron — which stands in fields after harvest, eating what was left, completing the cycle. Her stone is blood-red obsidian.
VOROVAK — The Hunter's Debt, Lord of Necessary Violence K'tharr is war's glory; Vorovak is war's reality. He is the god of the hunt, of practical violence, of taking life in order to continue living. He is not celebrated. He is honored in the specific, serious way you honor a tool you depend on. Before every Ya'ax raiding party, before every hunt, Vorovak receives an acknowledgment: "We take what we need. We offer what we must. We do not take more." The last clause is binding. Taking more than necessary is offensive to Vorovak specifically — he is concerned with proportionality, not just acknowledgment.
He is depicted as a warrior with no face — or rather, with a different face on each image. The point: he looks like whoever is holding the weapon.
No formal temples — shrines at hunting grounds and battle preparation areas. His sacred animal is the black caiman. His stone is iron-red obsidian.
NEN-XIBAL — The Dream-Walker, Lord of the Space Between Sleeping and Waking He governs the threshold — not sleep itself (that is Ixchela's waters, where the dreaming body flows) but the specific moment of passing through, the hypnagogic threshold, the place where the waking self has not yet become the dreaming self. Nen-Xibal inhabits that gap. He communicates from it.
The Cascabella's patron deity. Their use of Dreamroot and the deeper Bonewater compounds is not recreational — it is an attempt to extend the threshold state, to widen the gap where Nen-Xibal is available. The Cascabella's intelligence operations, their poison-making, and their oracular practice are all Nen-Xibal rites in origin.
He is depicted as a figure that is partially transparent — you can see the room behind him through his chest. One eye is open; one is closed. He is always shown in profile, never fully visible.
His priests are called dream-keepers. His sacred plant is Dreamroot. His sacred animal is the owl. His stone is moonstone — specifically the milky kind that seems to glow from inside.
THE UNNAMED ONE — Supreme, Unknowable, Beyond the Exchange The Ix'Atani Dominion's highest theological concept — not worshipped, not acknowledged (that's T'zal's territory), not named (because naming is H'uun's domain and implies something knowable). The Unnamed One is the totality from which the IX'Navar emerged. The other gods exist because the Unnamed One is too large to be approached directly; the gods are, in Dominion theology, the aspects of the Unnamed One that have become small enough to negotiate with.
The Dominion's metropolitan high priests alone hold doctrines about the Unnamed One's nature, transmitted orally, never written. The Vizier of Xaria knows the first three doctrines (standard for Dominion nobility). The Xarian peninsula's temple-priests know only that the Unnamed One exists and that everything they do is in its broad awareness, which is sufficient for the practical management of the Great Exchange.
No symbols, no animal, no stone, no ritual, no prayer. Simply: it is there. The sacrifice ultimately goes to it, passing through K'tharr, Ixchela, and the others on the way.

THE T'ZOL'KIN PARALLEL CALENDAR
The Xarian peninsula operates on a parallel calendar system inherited from the Ix'Atani Dominion — the T'zol'kin, a 260-day ritual count that runs simultaneously with and independently of the 360-day Velosi year. Each day in the T'zol'kin has a specific deity association, a sacrificial requirement, and an omen quality. The two calendars converge on the same starting day once every 52 years — the Calendar Round completion, which is the most significant event in Xarian religious time.
The T'zol'kin governs:
When Flower Wars may be fought (specific T'zol'kin days only)
When major sacrificial cycles begin and end
When children are named (name-day determines which deity's qualities they carry)
When rulers may take or leave office
When specific crops may be planted
The continental Velosi calendar is used for tributary reporting to the Dominion and for communication with mainland merchants. Internally, the T'zol'kin governs everything. The disconnect between the two systems is a persistent administrative headache for the Vizier's court, which operates in both simultaneously.

Document ends — Divine Veins Cosmology, Calendar, and Theology, 1308 AF Compiled for worldbuilding reference. No plot, story, or protagonist content included.

DIVINE VEINS — THE LIVING WORLD CODEX
Language · Daily Life · Economics · Minor Courts · Art & Song · Law
Reference Document — 1308 AF · Part One: Language and Daily Life

PART ONE: LANGUAGE AND REGIONAL VOICE

MUNNISH — THE CONTINENTAL TONGUE
The imperial lingua franca, derived from Nionian dialect and spread by conquest. By 1308 AF it is the only language for commerce, law, scholarship, and formal correspondence across the former empire. Every educated person speaks it. Every common person who trades speaks it. Underneath it, in every household and every village and every back-alley argument, regional languages and dialects persist — sometimes as dying tongues, sometimes as living parallel systems.
The neutral register — a simplified, accent-reduced Munnish developed by merchants for cross-regional trading — has its own character: shorter sentences, verb-initial constructions for clarity, number-focus, minimal subjunctive, no honorifics. A Heartlander grain-factor and a Red Coast copper-merchant using neutral register sound like the same flat instrument played in different tunings.

NIONIA
Speech patterns:
Formal subjunctive maintained even in casual speech: "Were it the case that you needed..." / "Should you find occasion..."
Sentence-final declarative particles: sì vedi (yes, you see) — filler that means the speaker is pausing to gauge whether the listener understands
Emotional states described through their physical effects, not named: "my chest became heavy when he said it" rather than "I was sad"
Questions phrased as observations: "One supposes the deliveries have been delayed" rather than "Have the deliveries been delayed?"
Under the Pure Way, the word puro (pure) has been politically contaminated; Nionians who want to say something is genuine now use chiaro (clear) instead; a small but legible resistance signal
Numbers in market speech rounded toward whole units: never "fourteen coppers" but "a dozen and the rest" — precision feels anxious, approximation feels confident
Past heroism referenced with present tense: "Nion walks into the Senate chamber and locks the doors" — history made immediate
Oaths and profanity:
Thal'fondo — "Thalvex's depths" — panic, deep trouble; a sailor's curse
Per Mera — "by Meravon" — a genuine oath about death and proper burial; taken seriously even by people who've converted
Kemvar te prenda — "may Kemvar take you" — someone whose loose tongue caused problems
Mani bianche — "white hands" — someone who performs Pure Way compliance for social gain; deeply contemptuous
La Luce non ti conosce — "the Light does not know you" — the Domus Lux formal execution declaration, now used sarcastically among resisters to mean someone is irrelevant
Figlio della pietra — "son of the stone" — quarry insult; means someone hard-headed and unyielding to reason (can be positive depending on tone)
Voce di Kemvar — "Kemvar's voice" — someone talking nonsense, drunk-philosophizing
Idioms and sayings:
"Il marmo ricorda" — "the marble remembers" — nothing is truly erased; used when someone thinks their actions have been forgotten
"Aspetta il secondo sole" — "wait for the second sun" — be patient; Keth rises after Velos
"Chiaro come l'Albara" — "clear as the Albara" — the river is perpetually chalky from quarry runoff; this means not clear at all; ironic
"Costruire sul vivo" — "building on the living" — doing something that will outlast you
"La pietra buona non chiede il coltello" — "good stone doesn't need the chisel" — people of quality reveal themselves without being cut open
"Canta il marmo, piange il ferro" — "marble sings, iron weeps" — Nionia and Rosland; the old rivalry expressed in material
"Pesare le parole" — "to weigh your words" — speak carefully; a warning
"Il porto non chiede il tuo nome" — "the harbor doesn't ask your name" — the docks are neutral; you can start over
What they call outsiders:
Terraschi — mainlanders (from terra, land); neutral, slightly diminishing
Asciutti — "the drys" — people who don't understand the sea
Grigi — "the greys" — Roslandic iron-workers; skin color connotation from forge-soot

THE HORNS
Speech patterns:
Sentences cut to minimum: "Wind's east. Not sailing today." Full stops are economical.
Weather used as verb: "It's weathering in" — trouble is coming; "weathered through" — survived something
Directions are cardinal/harbor-relative, never left/right: "harbor-side of the building," "wind-side door"
Insults delivered as matter-of-fact observations: not "you're an idiot" but "that's a pilot's error from a man who's never piloted" — devastating because specific
Diminutives to indicate contempt: "the little captain" said to someone who commanded a vessel badly
Long silences mid-conversation are comfortable; the Horns regard filling silence as a kind of social weakness
Information exchanged in exchange: answering a question with a question is not evasion, it's establishing whether you're owed the information
Oaths and profanity:
"Gale take it" — mild frustration
"Thalvex's fucking Galewater" — severe frustration; invokes the most hostile sea passage
"Knotless" — someone incompetent; a sailor who can't tie knots is useless
"Fog-blind" — someone who can't see what's obvious; also used as "you're fogged" for confusion
"The Reef has you" — you're in serious trouble with no good exit; from the Corsair's Teeth
"Bone Walk weather" — a day when everything goes wrong; from the storm conditions during the Bone Walk ceremony
"Three-knot work" — something done badly; a rope secured with only three knots is not secured
Idioms and sayings:
"Reads the tide or reads the ruin" — you either understand your situation or suffer for it; no middle position
"Salt earns salt" — you get what you put in; also specifically: work earns pay, don't expect charity
"The pilot doesn't ask who built the ship" — do your job; the cause of a problem is less important than solving it
"Fathoms below the charter" — far outside acceptable behavior; also used approvingly: "he drinks fathoms below the charter" — heroically
"Knotted right" — done correctly, with care; the highest compliment for practical work
"Light at Garrun Keep" — something reliable; the Garrun Lantern has never gone out
"Brinehold advice" — advice that benefits the advisor more than the advised
"The tide doesn't beg" — inevitability; also: don't waste time arguing with facts
What they call outsiders:
Drylanders — all non-Horns people; universal, slightly contemptuous
Stone-eaters — inland people who don't understand the sea (from imagining they eat rock)
Soft-knotters — specifically Heartlanders; their rope and knotwork is considered inferior

SANGREA
Speech patterns:
Present tense for past narrative: "So the man walks in, right? He says nothing. He just stands there." History told as if happening now
Precise geographic reference even in casual speech: not "somewhere in the valley" but "third terrace of the Velazco side, the one facing the sunrise"
Hombre / mujer as universal address, then immediate first-name informality; no middle register
End-of-statement uptalk that invites confirmation: "It's nothing, isn't it? Nothing at all."
Anger expressed through becoming quieter and more specific; shouting is considered common
Gossip in third person even about the speaker: "A person hears things in certain houses—"
Con sangre (with blood) = something done with genuine effort and cost: "He built that hacienda with blood"
The word peso (weight) for anything with serious consequence: "that marriage has real peso"
Oaths and profanity:
"Que te lleve el río" — "may the river take you" — serious curse; the river is Ixchela's and this invokes death by sacred water
"Sangre vieja" — "old blood" — insult; too traditional, inflexible, refusing progress
"Campanas corriendo" — "bells running" — someone talking too much and giving away information
"Cagada de loro" — "parrot shit" — something worthless or annoying; mild
"Cascabella en el vino" — "Cascabella in the wine" — something hidden and deadly in something pleasant
"Por el río rojo" — "by the red river" — a genuine oath; invoking the Fuente's color carries weight
"El toro no perdona" — "the bull doesn't forgive" — consequence is coming regardless of regret
Idioms and sayings:
"El loro repite, el maestro piensa" — "the parrot repeats, the master thinks" — about the difference between information and wisdom
"Cada campana tiene su lengua" — "every bell has its tongue" — everyone has their own way of saying things; also: you can identify the campanero by how they ring
"La vid no crece hacia el cielo" — "the vine doesn't grow toward the sky" — ambition needs to be grounded; also used to mean: what you want won't come if you only look up
"Cuentas claras, amistad larga" — "clear accounts, long friendship" — settle debts promptly; combining commerce and relationship
"El sol no pide permiso" — "the sun doesn't ask permission" — truth arrives on its own schedule
"Sangre caliente, pie frío" — "hot blood, cold feet" — someone passionate but afraid to act
"Sombra de casa ajena" — "shade from someone else's house" — living off others' work or protection; contemptuous
What they call outsiders:
Los Grises — "the Greys" — Roslandic and Heartlanders; colorless, too serious
Norteños — "northerners" — anyone north of the Silver Mountains; all the same to a Sangrean
Piedra-Fría — "cold stone" — specifically Heartlanders; reference to the Silver Mountains' color

THE HEARTLANDS
Speech patterns:
Formal register maintained in all public speech; dropping formality is a deliberate signal of intimacy or insult
"It is said" / "the record holds" for inherited knowledge vs. personal observation; the distinction matters legally
Silver metaphors saturate the language: "pure silver" = something genuine; "grey silver" = adequate; "river silver" = barely worth having
Conditional politeness in requests: "Should you find it convenient..." / "Were you inclined to consider..."
Merchant class uses trade-pidgin influence: shorter sentences, verb-initial for clarity
"The bridge holds" — this is stable, you can trust it
Class is legible in grammar: the laboring poor speak direct declarative; minor merchants speak conditional; nobility speak subjunctive and elaborate
Emotional content delivered through administrative language: "The situation has become difficult" = something is breaking my heart
Oaths and profanity:
"Stonebridge toll" — paying an unexpected, unfair cost
"Marvoss-work" — something done that will be punished; betrayal building; from the family drowned at the bridge
"By the Argen's mouth" — a genuine oath; the Argen meeting the sea is where things end
"Silver-blind" — someone who can't think past wealth and status; someone whose greed is their whole personality
"Grain-rot" — something that seemed good but is corrupting from inside
"Below the Vaultkeeper's ledger" — not worth accounting for; worthless
"Unbridge it" — fix the damage you've caused; rebuild what you destroyed
Idioms and sayings:
"Grain before silver" — practical survival before prestige; also: don't invest what you need to eat
"The barge went through before you asked" — you missed the opportunity through hesitation
"Even the Argen floods once" — even reliable things have limits; also: even patient people reach their end
"Compact hands, empty stomach" — bureaucratic competence that doesn't deliver results; the specific failure of the Argenlord system
"Count the rings before you cut" — understand what you're dealing with before you commit
"Silver thread in common cloth" — something of genuine quality in an ordinary context; a surprise worth noting
"Written in the river" — already decided, not reversible; like writing in water it will disappear but the decision is made
What they call outsiders:
Edgefolk — people from the periphery regions (Rosland, Horns, Red Coast); not contemptuous, slightly patronizing
Saltborn — coastal people; anyone whose primary orientation is the sea
Stone-blooded — mountain people (Roslandic, Vallan)

ROSLAND
Speech patterns:
States the negative: "It isn't bad" rather than "it's good"; "he doesn't lie much" rather than "he's honest"
Time is seasonal, not calendrical: "since before last harvest" / "two winters past" / "when the First Salmon ran"
Names not used in direct address among equals; you learn someone's name but don't use it to their face except in exceptional intimacy or exceptional insult
Very direct about death and illness; circumlocution about dying is considered a childish insult
"He carried his weight" — did their share; the highest compliment
Emotional declarations are private; expressing feeling in public is a kind of nakedness; content delivered through action
Sentence rhythm often ends on the verb, surviving from older grammar: "The iron, when the cold bites, harder it gets"
Collective nouns for actions: "the cohort went to work" even when talking about one person; individual accomplishment framed as group effort
Oaths and profanity:
"Daudr-vás" — "dead-wood" — something useless, petrified, no longer living; also a person who refuses to change
"Down the shaft" — into serious trouble; from mining
"Koschei's nail" — something impossibly hard to find or fix
"The wolf doesn't know your name" — you're nothing; you don't matter
"Morozko's smile" — something that looks pleasant but will kill you; frozen danger
"Zhivka's burning" — pushed past your limit; the grain-spirit burning your throat as metaphor
"Broken fire-song" — a fundamental betrayal; the worst possible insult
Idioms and sayings:
"The forge doesn't care about the ore's feelings" — the process demands what it demands
"A kolpak for every weather" — be prepared; also: practical concerns first
"The banya doesn't keep secrets" — whatever happens in the bathhouse will be known; gossip always circulates
"Iron at the core, wood at the face" — tough inside, presentable outside; how a good Roslandic person presents
"Even Fairhaven sleeps" — even busy places have quiet moments; wait for the right time
"Count your fire-songs before winter" — know your resources before you need them
"The Daudrwood doesn't negotiate" — some forces don't respond to reason; flee or fight
"He sang Maren's verse at the end" — he resisted at great cost; from the Maren of the Broken Cup legend
What they call outsiders:
Softers — anyone from a warmer climate; mild contempt; too comfortable
The Silver Folk — Heartlanders; reference to the silver rivers
Sun-Kissed — Sangrean; not always contemptuous; sometimes envious

VALLAN
Speech patterns:
Precision as cultural default: not "across the valley" but "four leagues by the eastern road past the Kaltbach junction"
Hospitality performed with specific required phrases: "The road is behind you now" on arrival; "may the pass hold" on departure; skipping these is a serious breach
Fourteen words for grades of mountain pass and road quality; casual speech references these constantly
Questions answered in full: half-answers are considered rude; if you ask a Vallanaise what time it is, they'll tell you the time, the weather affecting the journey, and whether the pass will be open
Strong silence tradition around the dead; a death is acknowledged with a hand placed briefly on the nearest person's arm; no words
The word ordnung (borrowed from Alpine-adjacent dialect) for the specific feeling of things being correctly arranged; used as both noun and adjective
Oaths and profanity:
"Kaltbach-cold" — someone who feels no warmth, no connection; the coldest thing in Vallan is the gorge water
"The pass is closed" — this conversation is over; a very final statement
"Bridge-belly" — someone who collects tolls and gives nothing back; a parasite; pointed relevance regarding Morvayn
"Llama-stubborn" — someone who absolutely will not move on a position; the Sternmark llamas are legendary for this
"Schlechtes Fundament" — "bad foundation" — something built incorrectly from the start; also a person with bad values
"By the Dawnbreak" — a genuine oath taken at altitude; the most serious Vallanaise oath
Idioms and sayings:
"The road-tax is fair; the avalanche is not" — you can work with human-made systems; you cannot negotiate with natural disaster
"A good bridge needs no sign" — quality speaks for itself
"Obstler for the summit, water for the road" — celebration is for achievement, not anticipation
"The llama knows the weather better than the shepherd" — trust those who are directly affected; listen to the one with more to lose
"Kaltbach cheese gets better with darkness" — some things require patience and isolation to become what they should be
"Vallan keeps its roads; Vallan keeps its soul" — infrastructure as cultural identity
"The mountain doesn't care if you're tired" — external demands are indifferent to your state; irrelevant to argue
What they call outsiders:
Talleute — "valley people" — lowlanders who don't understand altitude
Flachdenker — "flat-thinkers" — people without mountains in their mental landscape
Weglosige — "roadless ones" — people who don't maintain their infrastructure

THE RED COAST
Speech patterns:
Proverbs delivered as self-evident facts, not quotations: "Water finds its level" said the way mainlanders say "obviously"
Hospitality formulae are not optional: "Beitak beitak / Ma'ak ma'ak" (My house is your house / My water is your water) on entry; "Sharraftani" (You have honored me) on departure
Past tense in blessings and curses to make them accomplished: "May you have found water" = I bless your journey; "May your wells have run dry before you found me" = serious curse
The word al-maa' (the water) appears in metaphors constantly: "his word has water" = trustworthy; "dry counsel" = advice from someone who doesn't understand
Indirect approach to personal questions about finances: direct questions about wealth are rude; you learn what someone has by what they offer
Age and experience acknowledged publicly before any substantive conversation: "I speak as one who has traveled this route four times" is required framing, not boasting
Oaths and profanity:
"T'zal take you east" — deep water and no return; the worst direction
"May your well go dry" — the worst curse; can ruin a relationship permanently
"Sand in your eyes" — you're not seeing things clearly; mild dismissal
"Qanat-blind" — someone who doesn't understand the systems they depend on; used for political naïveté
"Your salt has turned" — you've become worthless or corrupted; can't be used for what you were meant for
"Khorim's edge" — sharp but brittle; brilliance that will break; not always an insult
Idioms and sayings:
"The deepest qanat is dug by the thirstiest hands" — necessity produces effort
"Copper in the eye, iron in the fist" — look beautiful, act decisively
"The desert remembers every footstep" — nothing is truly private or forgotten in a desert community
"Even the Saffaren rest at the well" — everyone has their limits
"One share of water, one share of decision" — authority should track contribution and risk equally
"A mirror-flash lasts a second; the message lasts a generation" — the medium is brief; the content matters
"Red salt, red knowledge" — the things of the desert are harsh but real
What they call outsiders:
Al-Bakhariyya — "the sea people" — anyone coastal or maritime; used for Nionians and Horns folk
Al-Farandj — "the distant ones" — a generic term for mainlanders unfamiliar with desert customs; from an old Dominion-era trade term
Ghurabaʼ — "the strangers" — travelers with no established relationship; neutral to contemptuous depending on context

THE FROZEN SOUTH
Speech patterns:
Staccato rhythm; complex emotion in few words; "The hunt was good. Twelve years since a hunt that good." is a speech about grief and joy and mortality
Animal comparisons: fox-clever, bear-stubborn, glacier-patient, seal-fat (comfortable, well-fed; not an insult)
Second person avoided: "one does" rather than "you do"; "a person might find" rather than "you'll find"
Boasting as understatement: "I've seen a few Glacier Bears" from someone with seventeen kills
Emotional declarations private; public emotional content delivered through action; if you want to say you love someone in the Frozen South, you bring them the best portion of the whale-kill for six consecutive hunts
Fire-song cadence bleeds into everyday speech: three-beat rhythm in narrative, preserved from a lifetime of singing
The word skál (used before drinking) carries enough meaning to count as an entire speech of respect and acknowledgment
Oaths and profanity:
"Broken fire-song" — borrowed into their speech; fundamental betrayal
"Ice in the marrow" — cowardice; the coldest kind
"Gold and gravel" — something that looks valuable but isn't; a fraud
"The mountain doesn't hear you" — your threats mean nothing; scale comparison
"Bjálki's beard" — humiliation; from the shaved Bearclaw chief; to be Bjálki-faced is to have lost everything
"Winter-dead" — someone who should have been cut loose but wasn't; a burden that's been kept too long
"Aurax-soft" — ironic; someone who uses gold where iron is needed; too reliant on wealth
Idioms and sayings:
"The fire-songs know what the fire-singer has forgotten" — tradition preserves things the individual loses
"A glacier moves" — even the slowest things move; patience will be rewarded
"The seal doesn't ask the bear for permission" — act; don't wait for those who would stop you to agree
"One fire-song, one grave" — each person matters; also used as a threat: I will remember what you did
"The whale knows the ocean better than the ship" — trust the creature adapted to the environment
"Gold is heavy" — wealth is a burden as well as a resource; the Aurax are heavy
"First kill, full moot" — early action establishes position; the first to strike in negotiation sets the terms
What they call outsiders:
Mainwalkers — anyone who lives on the flat land beyond the mountains
Softground — specifically Roslandic border people; contemptuous but also slightly nervous; they have iron
The Warm — Sangrean and Red Coast people; not contemptuous; the cold-tolerance is a source of subtle pride

XARIA
Speech patterns:
Multiple honorific registers carried into Munnish as a habit; formality signals simultaneous social calculation
Numbers in multiples of twenty from vigesimal heritage: "four-score and five" rather than "eighty-five"
The prefix ix' (sacred weight of) added to anything of genuine significance: ix'truth, ix'debt, ix'name
Colors as adjectives borrowed from Xarian vocabulary: jade-true = something of genuine value; blood-bright = something whose beauty masks danger
Death discussed directly; Xarians find mainland euphemisms for dying slightly amusing
Questions answered with questions first: "Why would you need to know that?" is not evasion; it's establishing what context you're owed
First person rarely used in formal speech; the self is spoken of obliquely: "One finds oneself" rather than "I find myself"
Oaths and profanity:
"K'tharr unlit" — the sun failing; the worst possible thing
"Ashborn-blind" — someone who can't see what's in front of them; also quietly used as a compliment within Ashborn communities (to be unseen is to be safe)
"The Exchange is broken" — something is fundamentally wrong; a relationship, a deal, a principle
"Hollow sacrifice" — an act performed without genuine intention; hypocrisy; the worst thing you can call someone's devotion
"H'uun's gift" — a lie told so well it became true; ambivalent; can be a compliment or a condemnation
"River-dry" — Ixchela's absence; said of someone without compassion or tears
Idioms and sayings:
"The caiman sleeps where the river fattens" — prosperity breeds complacency breeds danger
"Every sacrifice feeds something" — nothing is wasted; suffering has meaning if you're paying attention to what it feeds
"The feather falls last, the stone first" — the powerful are immediately affected; the subtle linger
"H'uun made language; the rest is H'uun's fault" — all misunderstandings trace to the same source
"A jade face and an obsidian heart" — beautiful on the outside, deadly within; highest-level insult
"The temple grows from the same earth as the grave" — sacred and dangerous are the same ground
What they call outsiders:
Ix'menos — "the uncounted" — people outside the Great Exchange; those who don't sacrifice; mainland Lovist types
Sal-boca — "salt-mouths" — people who eat preserved food rather than fresh; an old contempt for mainland diet
K'aak'al — "those without colors" — people who wear drab clothing; a genuine aesthetic judgment

PART TWO: DAILY LIFE BY CLASS AND REGION

CONTINENTAL CLASS FRAMEWORK
The Laboring Poor — farmhands, mine-workers, dockworkers, quarry-crews, river-laborers. Earn 3-6 Copper Scales per day. Own clothes, tools, perhaps bedding. Rent everything else.
The Skilled Craftsperson / Guild Member — smiths, weavers, carpenters, rope-makers, pilots, apothecaries. Earn 12-25 Scales per day. Own house, tools, small savings. Political rights in Rosland; guild voice elsewhere.
The Merchant Middle — ship captains, factors, successful traders, inn-keepers with multiple properties. Net worth 200-2000 Silver Weights. Own property; employ staff. No hereditary title; enormous practical power.
The Minor Court — lesser noble houses, estate managers (mayorazgo, capostrada), master-guild dynasties. Net worth 1000-8000 Silver Weights. Small households, local authority, marriages into and out of the lower nobility.
The Major Nobility — ducal houses, lord-patrons, great houses. Income 2000-10,000 Silver Weights annually. Dozens to hundreds in household. Armies, courts, institutional power.
Clergy — radically variable; a wandering Alonite mute owns nothing and sleeps where hospitality offers; a cathedral-chapter Ayanite lives like minor nobility; a senior Ashanite hospice administrator lives like a merchant middle.

NIONIAN DAILY LIFE
The Laboring Poor — Quarry-Worker, Dockhand, Terraces-Fisher
Before dawn: woken by the Pure Way cantus from the Great Dome, which carries across the city at dawn. This is not comfortable. Attendance at the dawn prayer is officially encouraged; practically mandatory for public employees; deliberately ignored by dock-workers who start work before the prayer ends.
Morning meal: bianco stagno — white bean stew with salt cod, eaten from an earthenware bowl with a hunk of dark bread. In the Marchia Ferrus, krovany pane (blood-and-grain cake) from the Roslandic migrant tradition has crossed over into quarry-worker diet. Water from the nearest cistern. Ashleaf pipe if you have one; the cheapest personal luxury on the island.
Work: marble quarry shifts run from dawn to two hours before sunset. Mine shifts are different — underground light is artificial, so Marchia Ferrus miners work six-hour rotations. Dock-work follows the tides. The Pure Way's new labor regulations require a mid-day prayer break of thirty minutes; this has been incorporated into shift schedules as unpaid time, which has not improved the regime's popularity.
Evening: teglia from a street vendor — 3-4 Scales for the basic; 5-6 for the version with anchovy and onion, which is the one worth eating. Eaten standing up or seated on steps. The taverns open at dusk: La Foschia and Tre Marmi in the Colonnade district for the higher-end crowd; Il Tempo Vuoto near the Pale House for people waiting for family members to be released from detention.
Leisure: Palla Rossa in alleys and squares — the street ball game; officially restricted by the Pure Way but enforcement is uneven; a game in progress in a narrow Terraces alley is one of the island's persistent small acts of resistance. Dice. The lamento singers start after midnight in certain dockyard taverns — uncensored songs, old songs, songs the Pure Way doesn't allow in daylight.
Sleeping: shared rooms of four to eight in tenement blocks. The buildings lean. The walls are thin. Everyone knows their neighbors' business.
The Merchant Middle — Factors, Ship-Agents, Minor Dealers
Home: a three-or-four-room apartment in the upper Colonnade fringe or above a warehouse. Stone floors, whitewashed walls, one good piece of furniture — usually an imported wood table or a shelf of colored glass panels from the Antheon glass-blowers, which cast warm light in the evenings and signal that you are doing well.
Social life: the tavola della piazza — a specific table at a specific café or tavern that a merchant effectively rents by showing up every day at the same time. This is where business happens. The Pure Way has complicated this because tavole della piazza became informal resistance spaces; some have been explicitly broken up; others have relocated to private homes.
Dress: white fabric where possible but not ostentatious; the line between demonstrating compliance with Pure Way aesthetic and performing it like a convert-for-status is legible to everyone on the island. A simple white-trimmed linen collar says "I'm being reasonable." An entirely white outfit says "I want something from someone in authority."
The Noble Household — Minor House, Colonnade
The courtyard: the heart of any Nionian patrician home. A marble fountain that is the household's most visible status object — the sound of running water as wealth-signal. Bougainvillea trained along walls, a lemon tree in the corner, cats that belong to everyone and no one. This is where morning correspondence is handled, where guests are received, where the family eats in good weather.
Meals: three courses at minimum; the first always involves something from the sea (anchovy paste, pickled octopus, small fish in oil); the second is the main protein (lamb, pork, or the expensive fish — sea bass, gilt-head bream); the third is sweet (honey pastry, fresh fruit, the marmara dolce that the patricians serve to show they can afford even stones made delicious). Wine mixed with water; drinking it straight is done only to demonstrate that you've reached a level of comfort where appearances no longer matter.
Under the Pure Way: the patrician household performs compliance while maintaining private non-compliance. The old portraits (realistic, republican, depicting senators who are now officially unpeople) are turned to face the wall but not burned — that would be too final a surrender. The lamento singers still perform in the inner courtyards after the Domus Lux shift changes.

SANGREAN DAILY LIFE
The Laboring Poor — Vineyard Worker, Field Hand, Canal Laborer
Rhythm: nothing important happens between noon and late afternoon. This is physiological as much as cultural — the heat in the valleys during high summer genuinely prevents sustained outdoor work. Dawn to noon: field work, harvest, irrigation. Noon to late afternoon: shelter, sleep, the children's lesson if there's an Alonite school nearby. Late afternoon until dark: more work, or market, or the plaza.
Morning: migas — fried stale breadcrumbs with garlic, olive oil, and whatever vegetable scraps are available. Served in the same iron pan it was made in. Eaten quickly. Strong, dark coffee if there's a trader nearby; otherwise the local herb infusion.
The plaza: every Sangrean village has one. The actual living room. Disputes resolved here, gossip traded here, the campanero announces the time here, children play here, old men sit and watch everything here. The social life of the village is conducted in the open because closing your door means you're hiding something.
Evening: late, by mainland standards. Dinner rarely before two hours after dark. The family meal is the event of the day — everything consumed together, talking constantly. The food is the occasion; the occasion is not the food.
Entertainment: the corrida season means nothing in the laboring class except the free day when the hacienda lord pays for the corrida seats. The copla tradition is genuine here — working songs during the harvest, courtship songs at the plaza, the political coplas circulated on folded paper that the campaneros officially don't deliver but sometimes do.
The Minor Nobility — Provincial Lord, Second-House Vassal
The hacienda: a manor surrounded by working land. The distinction between the family's living quarters and the working infrastructure is porous — you hear the wine-press from the dining room; you smell the barn in the east wing on a warm night. This is not considered unpleasant; it means the estate is functional.
The mayorazgo: the estate manager, not a noble, not a servant. Knows the land better than the lord. Manages the actual operations. The relationship between lord and mayorazgo is complex — dependency flows both ways; the mayorazgo could ruin a lord by going to a rival house, and the lord could destroy a mayorazgo's family by accusation. Most of these relationships are functional because both parties understand the mutual leverage.
Entertainment: the regional lord's court is the entertainment. Tournaments, which are partly martial practice and partly theatrical performance and partly political positioning. Card games — La Sombra Dorada, played with painted sunstone-colored tiles. Patronage of a copla singer, which is a status marker almost as significant as tower-height.

ROSLANDIC DAILY LIFE
The Laboring Poor — Miner, Charcoal-Burner, Forest-Worker
Dawn: krovny khleb — dark rye bread with rendered fat and a scraping of smoked fish. Zhivka-kasha if it's cold enough — porridge made with a small amount of grain spirit instead of water; this is genuinely warming and slightly intoxicating first thing in the morning, which the mine-owners have decided to stop caring about because the alternative is workers who can't function in subzero temperatures.
The mine shift: six-hour rotations underground; the Forge-Guard keeps shift order. Coming up from the shaft into winter air is physically brutal — the temperature difference can cause coughing fits that last minutes. Veteran miners learn to come up slowly, lingering in the shaft's warmth.
The banya: the communal bathhouse is not a luxury, it is an institution. A proper banya visit (steam room, cool plunge, repeat) happens at minimum once a week for every Roslandic person who can access one. More significant: business is conducted in the banya. The tradition that no weapons enter means the banya is neutral ground. Minor agreements are made, disputes resolved, and information exchanged in the steam.
Evening entertainment: fire-song practice. This is not formal — it's the same way other cultures might hum or sing idly; Roslandic people maintain their fire-song repertoire as casual habit, not ceremony. The communal hall at the mine-camp or village center hosts guild-meeting evenings that look like card games (Zhelezko, the iron disc game) but are also political caucuses.
The domovoi shrine: every Roslandic home, however poor, has one — a small carved wooden figure, or a stone, or simply a marked space near the hearth. The first portion of any meal set aside for the domovoi. Not religious in any Lovist sense; the Church has tried to absorb it; it remains stubbornly itself.
The Skilled Craftsperson — Master Smith, Guild Member
Guild-mark pride: every master craftsperson in Rosland stamps their work with their personal mark. The collection and identification of master-marks is a genuine art-appreciation tradition — a collector might have a shelf of small objects specifically chosen for the quality and rarity of their maker's mark. A smith whose mark is collected is a smith who has arrived.
The guild hall: stone, heavy-timbered, heated by a central forge that is also the building's functional heart. The main room is simultaneously a social club, a labor exchange, a political caucus, and an occasional court. Guild elections are held here. Work disputes are mediated here. The best and most important conversations happen here over Stolk Dark, the local beer.
Dress: functional and deliberate. The kolpak is universal — quality signals itself through the thickness of the weave, the treatment of the leather, the state of the iron clasps. A Forgetown master smith's kolpak is recognizable to another craftsperson from thirty feet by its material alone. Cheap imported imitations are contemptible.

HEARTLANDS DAILY LIFE
The Laboring Poor — Grain-Worker, River-Laborer, Mill-Tender
The harvest calendar: everything in the grain-farming community is organized around two harvests. The spring harvest (barley, early wheat) determines whether the summer will be lean or comfortable. The autumn harvest (main wheat, oats) determines whether the winter will be survivable. Between harvests: maintenance, animal care, the slow work of keeping the levees functional.
Food: bread, always. The Silver Loaf is the prestige version for noble tables. Working people eat the second-milling bread — denser, darker, slightly sour, lasts a week without going completely inedible. Argen-Pickle — river fish pickled in mineral water — served alongside. The metallic taste is an acquired one that Heartlanders defend vigorously.
The Guild Table: the communal meal hosted by the local guild chapter, open to all guild members and their families. Not charity — contribution is expected; you bring what you have. The Guild Table is the social event of the week, the political forum, and the information exchange. A Heartlander without guild membership is isolated from this structure in a way that matters enormously.
Leisure: The Argenhold Circuit — a board game modeling trade routes; children learn basic economics from it by age eight. River swimming in summer; the Argen is cold, fast, and beautiful. Ballads — the Heartlander ballad tradition is formal and long but deeply embedded; people will sit through a forty-minute ballad about a historical dispute as entertainment.
The Merchant Middle — Factor, Ship-Agent, Vaultkeeper Client
The silver table: informal private dining clubs in Vornhold and Argenhold where Vaultkeeper clients meet. Not advertised; entry by introduction only. The food is better than most restaurants; the conversation is confidential; the business conducted here moves more grain than any single ducal court.
Appearance anxiety: the merchant class wears silver but carefully — enough to signal success, not enough to invite the accusation of pretension. The precise calibration of silver ornament (how much, what quality, where worn) is a legible social code that Heartlanders read instinctively and that outsiders miss entirely.

THE HORNS DAILY LIFE
The Laboring Poor — Dockhand, Salt-Raker, Fishing-Crew
The tide structures everything: meals happen between tides, not at fixed hours. A dockhand who works the outgoing tide eats before dawn; a fishing-crew on the incoming tide eats when they return. Schedules are anchored to the Pilots' Guild signal flags, not to the sun.
Food: Storm-Stew — whatever fish was caught, whatever vegetables available, simmered in seawater with stormkelp — this is the meal. Technically different every time; emotionally constant. Blue-Herring Smoked with black bread is the lunchpail standard. The Brinehold Knotcake (a dense sweet flatcake twisted in each family's distinctive knot-pattern) is made weekly and distributed to the household.
The Knotmaster tradition: in Horns working families, one person in each generation becomes the household's knotmaster — keeps and passes down the family's distinctive knotwork patterns. The family-knot appears on the knotcake, on the knot-jewelry, on the prow of any vessel the family owns. A family without a distinctive knot is a family without history.
Leisure: Storm-Sing competition in winter. Scrimshaw — engraving bone, tooth, whale-material — during long voyages or winter evenings. Knut-Wrestle at festivals. Significant amounts of beer — the Horns brew is dark, heavy, minerally; visitors either love it or find it undrinkable; locals don't notice the taste anymore because it's what water tastes like to them.

RED COAST DAILY LIFE
The Laboring Poor — Qanat-Worker, Caravan-Hand, Oasis-Farmer
The heat calendar: nothing important happens outdoors between the late-morning and mid-afternoon hours from late spring through early autumn. This is not laziness; it is survival. The working hours are dawn-to-late-morning and late-afternoon-to-dusk, with a hot midday rest that is actually sleep.
Water ritual: every morning begins with the water-offering — a small cup poured for the household's luck, into a copper bowl placed near the threshold. The bowl is cleaned daily. The water is real (not token). A household that skips this practice is considered cursed; a household that performs it with dirty water or an uncleaned bowl is considered careless in ways that extend beyond the religious.
Food: Qasr Bread — flat, hard, keeps indefinitely in dry conditions; the caravan staple. Dates. Sharab al-Nahar — cold herb-water, served before any substantive conversation; declining it is a social error. The evening meal is the elaborate one: slow-cooked stew with spices, served communally, everyone from the bowl.
The caravanserai: the physical center of social life for any Red Coast settlement of size. Not just travelers — locals gather here, traders meet here, news arrives here. The caravanserai owner is one of the most socially significant people in any town, because they know who came through, when, and carrying what.

FROZEN SOUTH DAILY LIFE
The Laboring Poor — Seal-Hunter, Mine-Worker, Coastal Fisher
The dark months: six weeks each winter with no sunlight above the southern horizon. Life continues but the rhythm shifts completely. Sleep is longer and less structured — the fire is the only clock. Fire-song evenings that stretch for hours. The great-hall becomes the entire world; every interaction for six weeks happens with the same small group of people in the same firelit space.
Food: seal meat (raw when fresh, smoked when not). Blod-Graut — blood porridge, eaten before whale hunts; you can taste the iron. Dried caribou for the journey. Tundra-Berry — the small red berry, eaten by the handful during the brief summer, dried and hoarded through winter. The Glacier-Honey is rationed — available only at specific events (Fire-Naming, funerals, the Winter-Moot itself); eating honey outside these contexts would be considered almost obscene in its excess.
Oral culture: the fire-songs are not performed for an audience; they are performed by everyone present. A fire-song evening means everyone sings, or no one. Children learn the songs before words — the rhythm before the meaning, the melody before the text. The fire-singer (the person who holds the most complete repertoire) occupies a special social position; they are not performers, they are repositories.
Death: direct, undisguised. A dying person says what they need to say. The family gathers but does not pretend. After death, the body is prepared by the family (not specialists, unless a Ysvari-influenced priest is nearby, which in 1308 AF is unlikely outside the Heitdalr). The fire-songs for the dead are sung immediately, then periodically for a year.

XARIAN DAILY LIFE
The Free Poor — Canal-Worker, River-Fisher, Plantation Hand
The Exchange rhythm: every day begins with acknowledgment — the small offering, the brief prayer, the moment of conscious participation in the cycle. This is as automatic as breathing and as essential; Xarians who miss it feel genuinely anxious rather than guilty.
The canal-boat: many working Xarians live primarily on water — flat-bottomed boats that serve as home, transportation, and workspace simultaneously. The boat is deeply personal; its quality signals its owner's status; decorative carved-wood prow pieces are one of the few personal luxury items the laboring poor can aspire to.
Food: the tamale is the staple — masa dough wrapped around filling, steamed in banana leaves. Eaten at breakfast, at midday, carried as travel food. Cacao is drunk black and bitter — adding sugar is considered either barbaric (by the upper class) or aspirationally mainland-influenced (by those who want to seem sophisticated to traders). The communal cooking tradition: large shared pots at the canal-junction settlements, everyone contributing, everyone eating.
The Ashborn — The Bound
A separate section because their daily life is fundamentally different from that of any free person anywhere on the continent.
The Hush: the sub-audible tactile communication register that functions below any master's detection. Ashborn who live in the same household develop their Hush-fluency to the point where entire conversations pass across shared surfaces — a hand on a table, a foot touching another foot under the mat, the back of a hand against an arm while serving food. Masters who notice unusual stillness occasionally attribute it to stupidity; this is the most important misreading in Xaria.
The night room: Ashborn household slaves have a designated sleeping space that is, by law, minimally adequate. In practice, the night room is the Ashborn household's actual home — the space where the Hush-Truth is rehearsed, where the children are taught to read the pattern-language, where the small rituals of the Reformation are observed. The door faces away from the main house when this is architecturally possible. When it isn't, everyone who sleeps there keeps their back to the door.
Ix'Orath children: born approximately once per generation in any active Reformation community; fully green-eyed, not hazel, not tinted. They are hidden within days of birth — sometimes literally, in arrangements that require the master's household to believe the child died. The network that manages this is the most impressive operational security on the peninsula.

DIVINE VEINS — THE LIVING WORLD CODEX
Part Two: Economics · Minor Courts · Art & Song · Law

PART THREE: PRICE GUIDES AND ECONOMIC GRANULARITY

THE COPPER SCALE REFERENCE TABLE
The Copper Scale is the continental small denomination — produced by Red Coast mints, widely accepted everywhere. All prices below in Scales unless otherwise noted.
1 Sun-Piece (Sangrean gold) = 20 Silver Weights (Heartlands) = 100 Copper Scales = 200 Iron Rounds (Rosland)

Food and Drink
Item
Price
Notes
Loaf of dark rye bread
1-2
Standard working-class bread
White bread loaf
3-4
Refined flour; aspirational
Bowl of stew with bread
3-5
Tavern standard
Storm-Stew (Horns)
2-3
Whatever was caught
Teglia Nera (Nionia)
4-6
The squid-ink version
A pig's worth of meat at market
18-25
Whole, butchered
Pound of salt (coast)
2
Red Coast or Horns production
Pound of salt (inland)
5-8
Transport premium
Pound of Black Iron pepper (Heartlands)
15-25
Sangrean import
Pound of cacao (mainland)
40-60
Xarian import; luxury
Pound of Terrarossa Reserva wine
8-12
Best Sangrean vintage
Pound of common wine
2-3
Whatever's local
Kaltbach Cave-Cheese (per wheel, ~3 lbs)
35-50
Most expensive common food
Cup of sharab al-nahar
1
Red Coast herb-water; socially required
Night's drinking at a common tavern
8-15
Variable wildly
Glacier-Honey (Frozen South, per jar)
80-120
If you can even find it


Lodging and Transit
Item
Price
Notes
Floor space at a waystation
2
Alonite-maintained; no frills
Shared bed (common inn)
4-6
Two strangers in one bed; normal
Private room, basic inn
12-18
Your own door
Private room, decent inn
25-40
Actual comfort
Private room, notable inn
60-100
Where merchants sleep
Stabling a horse (per night)
3-5
Feed extra
Ferry crossing, short (Vallan to Isle)
8-12


The Throat crossing, Nionia to mainland
15-25
Weather premium; danger premium
Bridge-Token (Morvayn's toll, per person)
18
Current extortion rate; pre-coup: 5
Bridge-Token (per loaded cart)
45-80
Variable by cargo
Pilots' Guild crossing fee
20-30
Per vessel, not per person
Caravan spot, Red Coast to Heartlands
200-400
Per person per route
Vallan road-tax
3 per person per passage
Honest; worth every Scale


Weapons and Armor
Item
Price
Notes
Basic knife
6-10
Any market
Good knife
30-50
Forged, balanced
Short sword, generic
35-60
Militia grade
Short sword, good
120-180
Serviceable military
Long sword, Roslandic-made
300-500
Finest on the continent
Zhelezna Klyatva ceremonial blade
600-900
Named Stelev-house smithing
Khorim Obsidian blade (long)
350-600
Sharper than steel; brittle in cold
Crossbow, basic
25-40
Wood and sinew
Roslandic Arbalest
200-350
The best available
Pyre-Seed fire-weapon (Nionia, single use)
Not sold
Military asset; state-controlled
Shield, wood
15-25


Shield, iron-rimmed
40-70


Leather armor, basic
30-50


Forge-Scale (Rosland standard)
150-220
Iron scales on leather
Chain-mail, good
300-500


Full plate (minor noble grade)
800-1500


Full plate (Domus Lux pure-white)
2000+
Only made for them


Animals
Item
Price
Notes
Pig
18-25


Sheep
8-15


Cow (dairy)
70-100


Mule
60-90
Working standard
Riding horse (adequate)
150-250


Riding horse (good)
300-500


Heartlands-Destrier (war horse)
1500-4000
Trained; rare; prized
Copper-Camel (Red Coast)
90-140
Desert transport
Valenne Ridge-Llama
25-40
Pack animal; wool
Snow-Kite (Frozen South, trained)
800-1200
Message raptor; price if ever sold
Gale-Kestrel (dead)
Illegal


Trained Carvallo parrot (Sangrea)
200-350
Basic messenger training
Trained Carvallo parrot (encrypted)
600-900
Full relay-system training


Property and Construction
Item
Price
Notes
Simple village house (one room)
400-600
Often inherited or built by family
Craftsperson's house, village
800-1200
Two rooms, stone
Craftsperson's house, city
1800-3500
City premium; multiple rooms
Merchant's townhouse
6000-20,000
Street frontage; multiple stories
Caravanserai (small)
40,000-80,000
Operational value; Red Coast
A Sangrean tower (Los Torrebrava standard)
60,000-200,000
Status construction
A hacienda (moderate, Sangrea)
150,000-400,000
Land and manor included


Services
Item
Price
Notes
Day labor, unskilled
3-5
Per day
Day labor, skilled
12-20
Per day
Master craftsperson's day
25-50
Per day
Physician's consultation
8-15
Per visit
Ashanite hospice treatment
0-5
Sliding scale; the point is you're treated
Copper Bowl tincture (basic)
10-20
Per preparation
Cascabella consultation
50-200
Entry price; actual cost opaque
Ayanite court filing fee
15-25
Per case
The Night Market (Alsiroth)
Variable
Nothing is priced honestly
Carvallo message, basic vocal
3-8
Per relay segment
Carvallo message, encrypted
25-50
Per relay segment
Letter of credit (Vaultkeepers)
1% of value
For drafts over 50 Silver Weights


Restricted, Rare, or Black Market Goods
Item
Price
Notes
Dreamroot (per dose)
25-40
Red Coast; controlled; illegal in most jurisdictions
Sun-Dust (per dose)
60-120
Dangerous; heavily restricted; black market only
Bonewater (Xarian, per vial)
80-150
Not sold openly anywhere
La Verdad de la Sangre (written copy)
15-30
Contraband in some territories
The Cogitant Letters (copy)
40-80
Officially banned everywhere
Khorim Unknown Crystal (fragment)
Unknown
Vazir hasn't sold a single piece
Luminous Marble (Nionia, fragment)
Unknown
Cassian sealed the section
Southern Gold (pre-Moot, unregistered)
15% below market
Avoiding the Winter-Moot tariff
Ashborn person (Xaria)
200-1500
Enormously variable by skill/appearance
Escaped Ashborn shelter (Chain-Breakers)
No charge
Also: they don't ask your name


WHAT DIFFERENT LEVELS OF WEALTH LOOK LIKE
Destitute: No stable shelter, eating by charity or theft. 0-1 Scales in possession at any time. Relies on Ashanite hospice food distribution during fasting months. The Bonekeepers will still bury you; this is important.
Working Poor: 4-6 Scales per day, most spent on food and rent. Owns their clothes, their tools if they're skilled, and their bedding. Rents their room. The domovoi shrine in Rosland, the morning water-offering in the Red Coast, the alba-stone in the Horns — these domestic rituals cost nothing and are everything.
Comfortable Laborer: 8-15 Scales per day. Owns their house (usually). Has savings: 50-200 Scales in a hiding place (not a bank — that's for merchants). Can afford the second-quality inn when traveling. Their family eats meat twice a week.
Guild Craftsperson: 15-30 Scales per day. Net worth 300-1500 Scales. Has a house, owns their tools, has a Vaultkeeper account if they're in the Heartlands. Can afford to send a child to an Order of the Quill school. Political rights in Rosland.
Successful Merchant: 50-200 Scales per day income equivalent. Net worth 2000-20,000 Scales. Has employees. Has a townhouse. Has a relationship with the Vaultkeepers. Has the kind of problem where whether to loan money to a minor lord at what interest rate is an actual personal decision they make.
Minor Lord: Net worth 20,000-100,000 Scales. Annual income 2000-8000 Silver Weights. Has a household of 15-40 people. Has an estate. Has a militia obligation. Has debt to the Vaultkeepers because maintaining the estate requires consistent capital outlays that don't always align with revenues.
Major Duke: Annual income 5000-50,000 Silver Weights. Has hundreds in household. Has armies. Has the problem of other powerful people wanting things from them. Has so much that the specific amounts stop mattering; what matters is leverage, alliance, and the ability to project force.

PART FOUR: MINOR COURT CULTURES

THE VAULTKEEPER CLASS — HEARTLANDS
The Vaultkeepers of Silvermont are officially a banking guild. Practically, they have created a class of financial administrators who are wealthier than most minor nobles and have no hereditary title and don't care.
The clavarro (literally "key-holder") is a senior Vaultkeeper agent stationed in a major city. They manage their clients' accounts, extend letters of credit, negotiate commercial loans, and — unofficially — serve as the most reliable intelligence network in the Heartlands because every significant transaction passes through their hands and they are professionally curious about patterns.
Social customs specific to the clavarro class:
The tavola d'argento ("silver table") — the regular gathering at a specific inn table, by invitation, where financial information is exchanged before markets open; attendance signals status; the conversation is never written down
Marriage strategy: clavarro daughters marry into minor noble houses; clavarro sons become Vaultkeepers; this has been happening for four generations and has blurred the distinction between old money and new capability
Dress code: silver but calibrated — a clavarro wearing more silver than the client they're meeting has made a social error; always dress one register below the most powerful person in the room
The specific posture of deference to nobility while maintaining actual power: Vaultkeepers have financed enough ruin to know exactly where the leverage is; they are exquisitely polite and never threaten
Notable specific customs:
A clavarro never quotes a price before asking three questions: what it's for, who will see it, and what happens if it doesn't work — this is functionally a risk-assessment protocol dressed as social interest
The Vaultkeeper handshake: a specific grip that encodes in its pressure and duration whether the agreement being sealed is considered sound, risky, or a favor being extended; only recognizable to other Vaultkeepers
They do not attend the Guild Tables; they send a representative who arrives, leaves early, and reports back

THE CAPOSTRADA — NIONIA
The quarry foremen class. Not nobility. Not servants. Something older.
A capostrada family has run a specific quarry face for as many as eight generations. They know which veins will produce albasto (white) grade and which will give tostana (cream), not because they've studied the geology but because their grandfather's grandfather learned it by listening to the stone. The specific sound a hammer makes in a particular seam tells them the yield before the first block is cut. The Cassian family depends on this knowledge entirely; removing a capostrada would cut marble production by a third until the replacement learned what the family knew.
Capostrada social life occupies a specific niche:
They eat with the workers, not with the family
They dress in the quarry's colors (each major quarry has developed a distinctive pigment combination for the workers' clothes — practical identification underground; also a subtle identity marker)
Their marriages are managed internally: capostrada families marry capostrada families, preserving the knowledge lineage and preventing it from diluting into the broader working class
They have their own songs — the quarry-songs, which are Pyrantha hymns adapted over centuries — that the Pure Way cannot touch because removing them would affect productivity
Under Jous's Pure Way, the capostrada class is experiencing new friction: Ferronus-appointed overseers have been inserted into the quarry hierarchy above them, and the overseers don't know the stone. Three serious accidents in the past two years are attributed to overseers overriding capostrada safety judgments. The capostrada have not publicly protested. They have begun keeping detailed written records of every instance when an overseer override preceded an adverse event. These records are being maintained with the meticulous precision of people who expect to need evidence eventually.

THE MAYORAZGO — SANGREA
The estate managers. Not noble; not servant; a profession so old it predates the title.
The word mayorazgo technically refers to a specific form of inheritance law (the estate passes intact rather than divided), but in Sangrean usage it has shifted to mean the person who runs the inheritance — the estate manager, the operational center of any functioning hacienda.
A good mayorazgo:
Knows the yield of every row of vines on the property
Knows which workers are reliable, which need watching, which have personal problems that affect output
Maintains the personal relationships with the Carvallo relay-station operators that determine whether your messages arrive before your rivals'
Manages the lord's debts without the lord knowing how close to the edge they are, because the lord's peace of mind is part of the job
Has a separate private ledger that the lord will never see, in which the actual financial position of the estate is recorded honestly
Mayorazgo social customs:
They address the lord formally and are addressed by surname only — no title, no first name
They eat alone or with the chief household staff; not with the workers, not with the family
When guests arrive, the mayorazgo appears exactly once — to confirm the arrangements are in order — and then disappears until something requires managing
The specific gesture of the mayorazgo's report: standing at the lord's left shoulder, slightly behind, voice low, face forward — delivering information without making it a conversation unless the lord turns to make it one
Some mayorazgo families have been on a specific hacienda for three generations and are, in practical terms, more central to the estate's identity than the noble family whose name the estate bears. The most powerful mayorazgo on the continent is arguably Rosalba Moreno, who runs the combined Solé-Castesol properties and has for twenty-three years. She has outlived two Lord-Patrons and is outliving the current one's attention span.

THE MASTER-SMITH DYNASTIES — ROSLAND
In Forgetown and Karthold, the distinction between "guild family" and "minor nobility" has essentially dissolved through three generations of strategic marriage and political leverage.
The Stelev family is the exemplary case. They are not noble. They own the city's most important forge-complex. The current matriarch, Zora Stelev (age 68), has been smithing for fifty years and refuses to stop doing it herself — she runs the most important commercial operation in Forgetown while personally working the forge for several hours every morning. Her son Gregor is Marshal of Rosland. The family has never applied for a noble title and never needed one.
Master-smith dynasty customs:
The forge-name: every master smith in a dynasty family takes a forge-name in addition to their birth name — a single syllable or short word that becomes their signature on their work. Zora Stelev's forge-name is Ruk (hand). Her son Gregor's is Zel (iron). The lineage of forge-names is a separate genealogy, running parallel to the family tree, documenting who made what
The proof blade: when a member of a dynasty family completes their apprenticeship, they make a single blade under their own judgment with no supervision. The blade is kept by the family, never sold, as the permanent record of the moment they became themselves
The Hammer Festival in Karthold: the annual forge-beat competition held in the worked-out mine shafts; the Stelev family has won it eleven times in thirty years; this is considered normal

THE PILOT-FAMILIES — THE HORNS
The Pilots' Guild is meritocratic in formal structure and hereditary in practice. You cannot buy your way into pilot certification; you must pass the examination. The examination is administered by pilots. The pilots were taught by their parents. The questions are not rigged; the preparation is.
There are currently seven families that have produced consecutive generations of certified pilots: Thorne (Guildmaster Revka's family), Halversen, Kolgaard, Nex, Bruvvik, Daelm, and Akervik. Between them they account for sixty percent of the Guild's active membership.
Pilot-family customs:
Tidal dreaming: many experienced pilots report dreaming in tidal patterns — their sleep follows the cycle of the moons, with deeper sleep during high tides and lighter during low. Whether this is physiological adaptation or folk belief is unclear; the correlation is real enough that pilot families track their children's sleep to assess aptitude
The crossing gift: when a pilot-family child makes their first unassisted crossing of the main strait, the family presents them with a carved bone tablet engraved with the tidal table for the day of their birth — the specific combination of Aura and Teln positions at the moment they entered the world. This is their personal tidal signature
Marriages within the pilot community are strongly preferred; the knowledge base is treated as something that should concentrate, not dilute

THE QANAT-ENGINEER CLASS — RED COAST
The Qanat-Khanan (Water-Lords) guild maintains the underground aqueduct systems that are the Red Coast's actual infrastructure. They are not nobility; they do not aspire to be; their guild authority supersedes noble privilege in all matters of water management and is legally recognized in the Red Crown's court system.
A Qanat-Khanan master-engineer is among the most practically powerful people in any Red Coast city. Their authority to close a lord's water-access is not theoretical — it has been exercised, and the lord complied.
Qanat-Khanan customs:
The underground year: most master-engineers spend at least one month per year working below ground in the qanats they manage. This is not ceremonial; the tunnel systems require regular inspection that can only be done on foot, in the dark, with the water flowing around your knees. Engineers who stop doing this lose the intuitive understanding of the system that makes their authority meaningful
The sound-map: experienced Qanat-Khanan engineers can navigate specific qanat systems by sound alone — the particular echo a tunnel produces at each junction, the distinctive drip-pattern where a known fracture is occurring. A master engineer can identify a new fracture by a change in the sound before it's large enough to see
Dress: the Qanat-Khanan wear copper-green sashes — the color of oxidized copper, which appears on every qanat pipe junction where water has been running for years. This is not ornamental; it's identification in the field

PART FIVE: SONGS, ART, AND LITERATURE

MUSIC — NAMED WORKS AND TRADITIONS
Sangrean Coplas
La Verdad de la Sangre (The Truth of the Blood) — The censored copla about the Sunstone Wars. Forty minutes, naming every atrocity, every lie, every bribe. Maela de la Fuente sang it once at the Festival of the Red Grape and vanished into the riot it caused. Illegal to sing in full in some territories. Fragments are circulated as acts of political speech.
El Matador de los Nombres (The Killer of Names) — Composed within weeks of the Feast of Poison. Circulating in Sangrean lower districts. Asks, over and over, who had the motive and the contacts to poison every important name in one room. Not a gentle song.
La Novia del Río (The River Bride) — The universal Sangrean wedding song. About Ixchela's tears becoming rivers. Five hundred years old, approximately, with new verses added in every generation. The verse added by a specific copla-master in 1284 AF (the year Jous Lorethian was born) is considered unlucky to sing at weddings in Nionia, but plays elsewhere constantly.
Siete Campanadas (Seven Bells) — A bell-ringing work song that became a love song that became an anti-war song that became a work song again. Currently it means at least three different things in three different Sangrean provinces.
Canto del Hueso Blanco (Song of the White Bone) — A funeral copla sung when someone dies far from home. About the body that won't be returned. Specific to the War of the Red Tide period but now used for any distant death. Sailors particularly favor it.
Roslandic Fire-Songs
Sorvost na Daudrvik (Winter in the Deadwood) — About the Frostguard rangers. The oldest fire-song in active circulation that anyone can reliably date; pre-imperial. Its middle section is in a dialect that no one fully understands anymore; the Frostguard sing it anyway. It sounds like warning.
Tri Mosta, Tri Reki (Three Bridges, Three Rivers) — The founding song of the republic. Sung at every High Baron election. Vaguely describes the Treaty of the Five Bridges; the specifics are wrong in every version. The emotion is correct.
Zhelezna Klyatva (The Iron Oath) — The stratocratic oath-song. Sung when soldiers graduate from their first campaign season. The modern version has different verses from the original; the original apparently included a verse about what happens to oaths sworn to kings, which was removed during the imperial period and hasn't been restored.
Pesnya Yezhy (The Hedgehog's Song) — A children's lullaby. A hedgehog knows the names of all the things in the forest and won't tell them to anyone who asks directly; you have to give the hedgehog a gift and wait. This is the Roslandic attitude toward information in song form, taught to children before they can read.
Maren's Cup (various titles) — Not a single song but a genre. Ballads about Maren of the Broken Cup. There are at least twelve distinct versions currently in circulation; the most extreme (and most suppressed under Ironside) has a final verse that is essentially a call for violence against tyrannical rulers.
Nionian Lamentos
Canzone del Marmo (Song of the Marble) — The quarry-workers' hymn to Pyrantha. Pre-Lovist. Pre-empire. The oldest continuously performed song on the continent that can be dated with reasonable confidence. The Pure Way has banned it. It is sung every morning in the Marchia Ferrus before the first shift. No one has been arrested for this yet.
La Notte Senza Luce (The Night Without Light) — A civil war resistance song. About the night the Scriptorium burned. Written by someone who was there; they remain anonymous. The Pure Way has banned it with explicit threat of execution. It is sung in the Anchor & Chain after the shift-change when no white cloaks are visible.
Voce di Thalvex (Thalvex's Voice) — A sailors' work song. Modal and unsettling. About hearing the sea say your name. It doesn't mean you're going to die; it means the sea has noticed you. Whether this is good or bad is the song's deliberate ambiguity.
Heartlander Ballads
The Three Bridges of Argenhold — About Daven the Peacemaker. Long, formal, precise about the political details of the Treaty of Five Bridges. Sung at every Argenlord election. Also sung by people who want the Argenlord system to mean what Daven intended, which is increasingly a political statement.
Marvoss's Sons — Three boys thrown from Stonebridge. Considered bad luck to sing indoors; must be sung under open sky. The last verse lists their names, their ages, and their father's crime, then asks: "Was the crime worth the weight?" The question is rhetorical in one direction.
Caelia's Fire — The Roslandic ballad about the guerrilla woman who burned imperial records. Spread into the Heartlands during the last century through trade routes. In some Silverblood territories it's banned. In Argenhold it plays at festivals and the local Ayanite court has quietly declined to prosecute.

VISUAL ART — TRADITIONS AND NAMED WORKS
Nionia
The Republic Frescoes — The Senate walls, now covered by Jous's plaster. Depicting electoral debates, naval victories, the founding of the republic. They are intact under the plaster; this is known by at least forty people on the island and spoken of by none of them. If the Pure Way falls, the plaster could be removed. If the plaster is removed first, it would be an act of war.
The Argentum Libri — Not Nionian but the Heartlands' most prestigious art form that appears most often in Nionian patrician houses as imports. Illuminated manuscripts with silver-leaf illumination, produced by the Order of the Quill's Heartlander branch. Several patrician families have complete genealogical records in this form. The Marcellus family's genealogical Argentum Liber traces their line to the senator who survived the Great Pyre. It is the most dangerous piece of paper on Nionia.
Lamp-Glass Panels — Colored glass hanging objects produced by Antheon glass-blowers. Cast colored light rather than admitting light; the effect in a stone room at night is extraordinary. Not windows — too fragile and too small. Decorative objects that signal wealth and aesthetic taste. The Deep Crimson series (using blood-copper oxide for the red) are a pre-Pure Way Nionian specialty that is now politically charged — wearing crimson or keeping crimson glass is quietly being interpreted as a republican statement.
Sangrea
Corrida Paintings — The dominant Sangrean visual art form by market volume. Specific painters specialize in capturing corrida moments: the pass, the turn, the kill. The best work is genuinely thrilling — the best painters have found a way to convey motion in static image that architectural painters in the same period haven't matched. Every tavern has one. Every noble hall has several. The best ones hang at the Alcázar in Castesol.
Las Siete Verdades (The Seven Truths) — A specific painting by an anonymous Terrarossa-court artist, approximately 1180 AF. Seven panels depicting the seven Sunstone Wars, each panel showing the same valley from the same angle with different ruins. Currently in the Altavista great hall. House Solé has offered to buy it three times. House Terrarossa has refused each time. The painting is the clearest visual argument ever made for why the war never resolves anything.
Azulejo Tradition — The Loma-tile tradition. Not just decoration: specific patterns encode specific meanings. A threshold with a sol y agua pattern (sun and water, alternating) signals a hospitable house open to travelers. A threshold with a mano roja (red hand) pattern signals a house in mourning. A threshold with a cascabela (rattle-pattern) signals — to those who know — a Cascabella distribution point.
The Heartlands
La Pace dei Cinque Ponti (The Peace of the Five Bridges) — The great tapestry in the Argenhold Riverhall. Forty feet wide, eight feet tall, depicting the Treaty signing and the five bridges being rebuilt simultaneously across the region. The borders show every major house involved, with their sigils. Three of the border sigils depict houses that no longer exist. Three depict houses currently at war with each other. The tapestry is frequently referenced in political arguments about what the Argenlord system was supposed to be.
River Maps — The Navegantes guild's master charts of the Heartlands river system. The public versions are beautiful and accurate. The intelligence-grade versions are classified. Even the public versions are art objects: color-coded by depth and current speed, annotated with every waystation, every ford, every seasonal flood pattern. The best river maps are passed down through merchant families as heirlooms.
The Silver Chronicle of House Silverblood — An Argentum Liber genealogical record begun in 951 AF and maintained continuously. Currently seventeen volumes. The most recent volume was commissioned by Argenlord Theron and stops at his ascension, which the scribes have noted with careful ambiguity is "the current generation's beginning." What happens next is unwritten and the blank pages feel political.
Rosland
The Pesnya-Reza Tradition — Woodcuts illustrating notable fire-songs. Produced as broadsheets and traded across the republic. The technique: a specific method of multiple-pass cutting that produces almost photographic depth of shadow. The most valuable pesnya-reza are those depicting banned or suppressed fire-songs — Maren's Cup in several versions, Caelia's Fire, and the fragmented verse of Zhelezna Klyatva that was removed during imperial occupation.
Guild-Mark Collecting — Every master craftsperson stamps their work with their personal mark. The practice of collecting pieces specifically for the rarity of their maker-mark is a Roslandic form of art appreciation. Zhelezka Marks (marks from Zelnik family smiths) and Stelev Marks (from the Stelev dynasty) are the most collected. A complete set of Stelev-family marks across four generations represents over sixty distinct individuals and is worth more than the objects themselves.
Cemetery Art — The quality of a Roslandic gravestone reflects the quality of a life, which has created a competitive art market around death. The best cemetery in Fairhaven (the Vechniy Sad — the Eternal Garden, established 920 AF) has gravestones that are considered the finest stone-carving on the continent. Poor families save for decades for a good stone. The best carvers are booked years in advance.
The Red Coast
The Miqyas Tradition — Precision instruments made beautiful. The Red Coast has the most sophisticated astronomical and mathematical tradition on the continent (driven by the Tariqat al-Nur and its predecessors). Astrolabes, water-clocks, qanat-flow measuring vessels — functional objects elevated to art through geometric inlay, copper filigree, and the specific visual language of Arabic-adjacent geometric beauty. The best instruments are in the Grand Souk of Alsiroth's Gate; some have been in circulation for centuries.
Al-Khattat al-Ahmar (The Red Calligrapher) — a specific manuscript illuminator active approximately 1150-1180 AF whose identity is unknown. Produced a series of Tariqat al-Nur contemplative texts in a script-illumination style that later became the standard for Red Coast formal documents. The original manuscripts are in three locations: the Saravenna royal archive, the Tariqat al-Nur retreat at Wahaat al-Sirr, and — according to a persistent rumor — the Magos vault on the Isle of Knowledge.
The Frozen South
The Kjölfoss Goldwork — Already established as the finest on the continent. The specific technique: interlocking knotwork on a base metal form, with the gold wire worked into the base in patterns that represent specific fire-song passages. A piece of Kjölfoss goldwork is simultaneously jewelry, portable property store, and a chunk of encoded oral tradition. If you know how to read the knotwork patterns, you can tell which fire-songs a goldsmith was thinking about when they made a piece.
Bone Carving — Small portable objects, seal-bone and whale-ivory. The Frozen South equivalent of pocket art. The best carvers produce objects of extraordinary delicacy and expressiveness. A specific tradition: carving the faces of the dead from memory. Not portraits — the Frozen South doesn't have portrait tradition — but spirit-impressions; the carver produces what they felt from the person rather than what the person looked like. These pieces are deeply unsettling to mainlanders.
Xaria
The Teocalli Reliefs — The sequential carved panels on the pyramid faces at Ix'Pal and Canopolis. The most elaborate stone-carving on the continent. Each panel tells a segment of the cosmological narrative; reading the complete story of K'tharr's descent and ascent requires walking around the entire base of the great Teocalli, which takes approximately an hour if you stop to read. The panels are painted (the paint is regularly renewed); the original stone beneath some panels is reportedly carved differently from the surface layer, which the K'ay storytellers say is because the deeper story is different from the public one.
Featherwork Cloaks — Already established as the highest Xarian art form. Named works exist. The K'tharr's Mantle — a cloak held in the Ix'Pal treasury, attributed to a master featherworker who lived approximately 400 years ago — depicts K'tharr's descent into the underworld in a mosaic of quetzal and macaw feathers so detailed that the jaguar spots of his fire-form are individually placed feathers. The cloak requires two people to carry it.

LITERATURE — NAMED TEXTS
The sacred texts (Aya's Scrolls, Asha's Tomes of Vibration, the Alon Codex) are already documented in the Lovist faith section.
The Cogitant Letters by Father Thesan of Silvermont — The Logosian philosophical text. Banned everywhere; present everywhere. Arguing that the divine echoes are natural phenomena rather than divine remnants, that the gods are dead in the literal sense and always were, and that Loveism's ethical framework can survive the removal of its theological foundation. This last claim is what makes it dangerous — not the atheism but the argument that the Church is unnecessary even if Loveism is true.
The Menna Papers by Corvath Menna — The Starveling Church founding text. A hundred pages of unadorned observation: what the prophets owned (nothing), what the Church owns (a partial list, with approximate values). The style is deliberately plain, almost boring. The effect is not.
The Gardens of Altavista — A Sangrean erotic novel set during a Sunstone War. Officially suppressed; widely circulated. The military setting is the frame; the actual subject is desire under conditions of mortality, which is the correct subject. The author's identity is unknown. Current consensus among people who discuss this: someone in the Terrarossa court, female, with access to both houses' intelligence services. The Solé intelligence service's theory: it was written by a man. The disagreement has become a secondary drama in Sangrean cultural circles.
Seravann's Preface — The introduction to the Alon Codex by his primary disciple. The most quoted single document in Lovist scripture. "He did not speak. He therefore could not be misunderstood. What he did remained what it was." Short, careful, devastating in its implications about language and its failures.
The Velindra Calculations — The Magos astronomical text that confirmed the world's sphericity through lunar eclipse analysis during Concordance. Three hundred years old. Required reading at the Isle; available at any Ayanite school with a decent library. The specific mathematical proof has been reproduced, checked, extended, and accepted. The theological implications (the world is a sphere; the spherical shape has no preference; the divine center the Lovist faith posits is not architecturally available in a sphere) are addressed in a lengthy appendix that manages to be simultaneously rigorous and carefully inconclusive.
On the Nature of Echoes — Elder Corvath's unpublished research notes at the Isle of Knowledge. Exists in three partial copies, none complete. The most important unacknowledged scientific text in existence. Documenting the echo-field's distribution, its historical decline, and the first theoretical framework that accounts for both the folk magic traditions and the measurable phenomena the Magos have been pretending aren't measurable. Corvath's proposed mechanism (residual divine consciousness saturating matter, diminishing as matter is processed) is correct. He knows it's correct. He cannot publish it because it would validate the Logosians while also validating the Church's theology about the divine sacrifice, which would force two camps that currently can't agree on anything into an uncomfortable alliance.
Caelia's Fire — Technically a ballad but also a written text. The narrative of the woman who burned imperial records for eight years. Exists in at least three written versions (the oldest is in the Magos archive, noted as "Roslandic folk material, approximate date 440 AF"). The most recent written version (1289 AF) has a final section that the previous versions don't include: a first-person passage supposedly in Caelia's voice, describing what she saw in the mountains before she disappeared. No one knows if this section is historically real or added for political effect. The addition of a first-person voice to a woman the empire erased entirely is, regardless of its historicity, one of the most significant political acts in recent Roslandic literary history.

PART SIX: LEGAL CODES AND SUCCESSION

CONTINENTAL OVERVIEW
The Book of Chains — the imperial legal code compiled under Varran I "the Just" (440-478 AF) — remains the baseline legal reference for most of the continent. Every regional legal system is either derived from it, reacting against it, or (in the Frozen South and Xaria) indifferent to it. The Ayanite order trains its judges in the Book of Chains and in regional modifications; the most consistent legal authority on the continent is the traveling Ayanite Arbiter, who can technically impose the Church's legal framework anywhere the secular authorities have failed or collapsed.

NIONIA
Legal foundation: Imperial law (Book of Chains) overlaid with Pure Way religious law since 1306 AF. Two parallel court systems: the civil Triumvirate courts (handling property, trade, inheritance) and the Domus Lux Inquisitorial courts (handling doctrinal crimes, political crimes, anything Jous's regime finds inconvenient to try in civil court).
Succession: Primogeniture — eldest son inherits title and primary property. Daughters inherit if no sons survive. The Senate previously could legitimize bastards by vote; the Pure Way has abolished this, which has created several legal disputes that the Triumvirate courts are handling very carefully.
Marriage law: Requires a Pure Way ceremony. The Church (Lovist) ceremony is now insufficient. Pre-Pure Way marriages are grandfathered. Divorce is technically possible (the old Senate procedure survives on paper) but requires Triumvirate approval, which requires Domus Lux non-objection, which is rare.
Criminal law highlights:
Heresy: Domus Lux jurisdiction; penalties from public penance to execution
Murder: civil courts; compensation to the victim's family; imprisonment or exile; execution rare except for serial cases
Theft: restitution + equal penalty (steal 10 Scales, return 10 and pay 10)
Debt default: civil indentured service to the creditor until the debt is worked off; limited to seven years under the old law; the Pure Way has extended this to life in cases of "deliberate deception" which is defined broadly
Unique to Nionia: The lex marmorea (marble law) — the specific legal tradition governing quarry rights, marble grade disputes, and the capostrada authority. Developed before the empire, never codified by the empire, surviving entirely on custom and Cassian family enforcement. The Pure Way doesn't know it exists. This is deliberate.

THE HEARTLANDS
Legal foundation: The Book of Chains as modified by four centuries of ducal decree. The Argenlord has emergency modification power. The Vaultkeepers maintain a parallel commercial arbitration system that handles all significant trade disputes faster and more reliably than the ducal courts.
Succession: Agnatic primogeniture (eldest son) for major ducal titles. The Argenlord title is explicitly non-hereditary by the Treaty of Five Bridges — elective every three years. Multiple attempts to make it hereditary have been blocked by the minor houses who lose power if any single dynasty consolidates the title permanently.
The Argenhold succession crisis: With the Feast of Poison, the neutral house that has held the Heartlands together for four centuries has one surviving heir. The succession question is: does Kaeo Argenhold inherit the duchy, and if so, under what conditions? The Book of Chains supports his claim unambiguously. Silverblood's regency is a political act with no legal basis. The Ayanite court in Faithir has declined to rule on this, which is the most political non-decision anyone in the region has made in years.
Inheritance law specifics:
Primary title and land: eldest son
Secondary properties: divided equally among all children, male and female
Bastards: inherit nothing without explicit testamentary inclusion, which requires Ayanite notarization
Guild-property inheritance: the guild decides, not the family; this creates constant friction
Marriage law:
Lovist ceremony required for legal validity
Betrothal contracts are legally binding property agreements; breaking a betrothal requires compensating the other party for what they would have received through the marriage
Dowry/bride-price negotiations are the primary content of betrothal contracts; the Vaultkeepers notarize and hold these in escrow
Criminal law highlights:
The grain laws: stealing grain during famine is treated more severely than murder; property crimes against agricultural infrastructure carry the harshest penalties in the region
Bridge law: destroying or obstructing a recognized trade bridge is a capital offense; this was used to threaten Morvayn and not enforced, which has damaged its deterrent value
Debt: same as Nionian base, but the Vaultkeepers' commercial law takes precedence for debts owed to registered merchants

ROSLAND
Legal foundation: The Iron Codex (the Roslandic constitution, ratified 905 AF and significantly modified 990 AF by Tomas Greenhand's guild reforms). The most complete written legal code on the continent for a republic; modeled on the remembered principles of the Aethelian stratocracy but adapted for post-imperial reality.
The Iron Codex's key provisions (currently under threat):
The High Baron is elected every ten years by nobles and guild representatives in equal proportion
The High Baron can be recalled by two-thirds supermajority
Guild voting rights are inheritable from parent to eldest child; they cannot be bought or sold
The judiciary is appointed by a joint committee of the High Baron and senior guild representatives; neither can control it alone
The emergency powers (invoked by Vlado's "Long Vigil") require renewal every six months; they have been renewed three consecutive times without reaching the constitutional threshold for a recall vote
Succession: Noble houses use eldest-child inheritance (not just eldest son — this is a specific Roslandic divergence from most of the continent). The High Barony is explicitly non-hereditary. Vlado Ironside's adoption of Valo and his plan to have Valo win the next election is technically legal but violates the spirit of the constitution in ways the Iron Codex cannot quite explicitly prohibit.
Marriage law:
The republic recognizes two forms of marriage: the civic bond (registered at the muster-field Speaking Stone, legally equivalent, no religious requirement) and the Lovist bond (Church ceremony, provides additional legal advantages in inheritance disputes). Both are legal; the civic bond was a Greenhand reform that the nobility fought and lost.
Divorce by mutual declaration at the Speaking Stone; requires division of shared property by the magistrate; contentious but exists
Children born outside of any bond are spoken-children — acknowledged if the parent names them at the Speaking Stone; this requires no ceremony, only the declaration. An unacknowledged child inherits nothing; a spoken-child inherits on equal footing with bonded-children
Criminal law highlights:
The Iron Codex's most Roslandic provision: the Forge-Witness rule — any citizen who witnesses a crime may give testimony in any court regardless of their social status. This is explicitly not the case in most Heartlander and Nionian courts, where a commoner's testimony requires corroboration by a propertied person
Corporal punishment for minor crimes replaced by fine or work-service in 990 AF reform; Ironside's Long Vigil has reintroduced flogging for certain political offenses under emergency powers

SANGREA
Legal foundation: No unified law. Each lord-patron's territory is legally autonomous. The Church (Ayanite courts) provides a backstop that technically applies everywhere; in practice, it applies where the secular lord hasn't already decided. The ley de sangre (blood law) — the customary law governing noble house obligations, feudal duties, and inter-house conflict — is as binding as written law in practice.
Succession: Strict agnatic primogeniture (eldest legitimate son). No exceptions without explicit testamentary provision. The catastrophic case: if Terrarossa ran out of male heirs, the house would legally dissolve and its property revert to the Doravanto crown — which is currently what House Solé is quietly engineering. Terrarossa's current line is Titus (58), Roric (30), and Roric has no children. The next fifteen years are existential for the old house.
The mayorazgo legal position: Legally a servant with specific contractual rights. In practice, as powerful as any minor noble. The mayorazgo contract is a Sangrean legal innovation that has no equivalent elsewhere — a detailed specifications-and-performance agreement between the lord and the estate manager that includes specific grounds for dismissal, specific duties, and specific protections. The best mayorazgos have contracts that are functionally irrevocable short of criminal conviction.
Marriage law:
Noble marriages require both families' consent, a Church ceremony, and — uniquely in Sangrea — a notarized carta de dote (dowry letter) that specifies exactly what passes between families. The carta de dote is the actual marriage contract; the ceremony is the public acknowledgment
Sangrean divorce is rare and effectively impossible for nobility: it requires Church tribunal ruling, which requires grounds (abuse, abandonment, or the specific ground of "incapacidad de sangre" — inability to produce heirs, which must be proven by a physician's testimony); most incompatible noble marriages simply maintain separate households
Criminal law highlights:
Honra law: the ley de honor allows noble-to-noble violence in specific circumstances (direct insult to honor, adultery, betrayal of hospitality) without criminal penalty if conducted according to the formal duel tradition; this is regularly abused
The Campaneros' legal immunity: by ancient custom (pre-empire), the Campaneros are legally neutral — they cannot be prosecuted for the messages they carry, even if those messages contain treasonous content. This protection has been tested three times and has held each time.

THE RED COAST
Legal foundation: The Copper Courts (traveling Ayanite judges empowered by the Red Crown) apply the Book of Chains modified by the specific Red Crown water law that supersedes it in hydraulic matters. The Sand-Law (Saffaren customary code) applies in the deep desert and is legally recognized by the Red Crown as a parallel jurisdiction.
Succession: Bilateral descent for the Red Crown title (eldest child, gender-neutral). The Alsiroth house uses strict agnatic succession, which creates a succession crisis every other generation. The Sadiq family uses bilateral succession internally, which has kept their commercial empire functioning across three generations while the Alsiroth title has passed to men of decreasing competence.
Water law (unique to the Red Coast):
The Qanat Right: whoever built a qanat owns it; whoever maintains it has usage rights; whoever lets it fall into disrepair loses usage rights. This creates a strong incentive structure for maintenance.
The Sharing Decree: when a qanat serves multiple communities, all communities have equal water access regardless of the building-house's preferences. Violation of the Sharing Decree is tried by Copper Court and can result in the qanat being placed under Crown management.
The Dry Season Protocol: when water supplies fall below threshold levels, the Crown can requisition any private water reserves for communal distribution. This has been invoked four times. Each time, the noble houses that lost private reserves have funded candidates against the sitting Red King at the next opportunity.
Marriage law:
The 'aqd al-zawaj (marriage contract) is primarily a property agreement; the emotional content is considered private. Both parties negotiate through family representatives; the couple may not be present at the negotiation. The contract specifies: what each party brings, what each party receives on dissolution, what the children's arrangement will be, and what grounds constitute legitimate dissolution.
Polygyny is legal (up to four, per the traditional framework); in practice it's confined to the very wealthy because the separate-household requirement makes it prohibitively expensive below a certain income level

THE FROZEN SOUTH
Legal foundation: The Whaletooth Compact — an oral agreement. The fire-songs serve as legal record. The fire-singer is the legal authority when disputes require historical reference. The Holmgang resolves disputes when negotiation fails. The Winter-Moot is the supreme legal authority of the south, binding on all signatories.
The fire-song as legal record:
A fire-song that references a specific agreement, border, or promise is legally binding
Altering a fire-song to change the recorded facts of an agreement is a serious offense — treated the same as destroying a written contract on the mainland
The extinction of a clan's fire-songs (as happened to Clan Hroth after their absorption into Aurax) is the legal equivalent of non-existence: you cannot sue, claim, testify, or inherit if your clan has no fire-songs
Succession: Primogeniture broadly, but with strong collective override: if the clan believes the heir is unfit, the Winter-Moot can name an alternative. This has happened six documented times in living memory, always under circumstances that were less about fitness than about which way the leverage ran. The Beinsverd have been quietly noting that Eirikr Aurax's current attempt to make the Pack Leader title permanent would effectively remove this override mechanism for the south's most powerful clan.
Marriage law:
No ceremony required; a couple who maintains a shared household for one full winter cycle is legally married
Dissolution by mutual declaration before a fire-singer
Children belong to the mother's clan by default; this is the single most important legal distinction between the Frozen South and everywhere else on the continent
Capital offenses (the short list):
Destroying a fire-song record
Violating Holmgang terms after the combat
Killing outside the Holmgang without the Moot's recognition
Betraying the location of a secret well to outsiders

VALLAN
Legal foundation: The most detailed minor legal tradition on the continent. The Waystone Law — the body of road-use and infrastructure obligations that grew up around the road-tax system — has the force of constitutional principle: obligations created by passing a waystone are legally binding.
Unique legal innovations:
The Bridge Guarantee: any bridge maintained by Vallan must be open to any peaceful traveler regardless of origin, faith, or relationship with Vallan's nobles. Violation of the Bridge Guarantee results in Bridge Revocation — the bridge is declared legally public property of the canton and the owning family loses maintenance control. This has never been invoked. The threat is sufficient.
The Canton Sovereignty principle: no Valley-King can impose any policy within a canton without a canton-elder vote. The Valley-King's authority is strictly cross-canton and external.
The Road-Tax Receipt as legal tender: a Road-Key bearing the Valley-King's seal functions as proof of lawful transit, which protects the holder from questioning about their presence in Vallan. This is used by people who need to cross Vallan without explaining why and who can afford the standard transit fee.
Succession: The Valley-Kingship is elective (canton elders vote); by tradition, the Valenne family is always nominated and always wins, but the fiction of election is maintained because the alternative (making it explicitly hereditary) would require constitutional amendment that the canton elders would never approve. Noble house inheritance follows eldest-child principle.

Document ends — Divine Veins Living World Codex, Part Two. Economics · Minor Courts · Art & Song · Law 1308 AF
DIVINE VEINS — THE DARK WORLD SUPPLEMENT
Folk Horror · Grimdark Texture · Lovecraftian Echo · Named Dark Places · Living Superstitions
Supplementary to the Living World Codex — 1308 AF

This document exists alongside the encyclopedic codex. Where the codex names what things are, this document names what things feel like — the darkness underneath the daily life, the horror indigenous to each culture, the superstitions that are quietly correct, the folk legends that encode truths the scholars haven't reached yet, and the named places where the world is thinnest.

PART ONE: THE DARK GRAIN OF EACH REGION

NIONIA — THE ISLAND THAT REMEMBERS BEING FREE
What the darkness feels like here: bureaucratic dread. The horror is not the monster under the bed — it is the man with a ledger deciding whether your name appears on a list. Under the Pure Way, Nionia has developed the specific terror of a society in which your neighbor may have reported you, your employer may have reported you, and the man who delivered your bread this morning may be compiling his weekly observations into a form that will reach the Domus Lux within the week. Everyone performs normalcy. Everyone performs compliance. The horror is that you can't tell the performers from the believers anymore.
The Pale House: Not just a detention facility — the thing that detention facilities become when they operate for two years without oversight. The building was originally the Admiralty Archives. It still smells of old ink and salt-canvas. The detained are held in the map-rooms; the interrogations happen in what was formerly the Harbor-Master's private study, which has a window facing the sea that the Harbor-Master used to watch the ships from and that now watches nothing. People released from the Pale House return slightly off — not broken, not changed in any way they can name, just slightly wrong about small things. They misjudge distances. They flinch at ink stains. Three of the forty-two released so far have walked into the sea within a month of release and not come back. This is not reported anywhere.
The Cantus at Dawn: The Pure Way's mandatory pre-dawn prayer broadcast from the Great Dome reaches every part of the island. It is a human voice — a specific Lux Cantor whose identity is never disclosed — and it sings the same fifteen notes in the same order every morning. There is a specific quality to the fifteenth note, the final one, that sailors have begun calling la nota che manca (the missing note) — the silence after it is slightly too long. Three beats where one beat belongs. Dockhands have started leaving before the cantus ends, not wanting to hear the silence. Nobody talks about this.
The Luminous Marble Vein: In the deepest section of the Marchia Ferrus quarry, sealed under a false floor put in by capostrada patriarch Benedar Sola forty years ago, there is a marble seam that glows. Not reflects light — generates it. The glow is warm-white, slightly gold, and completely steady — no flicker, no variation with temperature, nothing. Benedar sealed it because the workers who spent more than a few hours near it started having the same dream. In the dream, someone is counting. The counting never stops and never reaches a final number. Benedar's son Tomas has never opened the floor again. He checks the seal every morning.
Named Lovecraftian/dark locations:
La Bocca Nera (The Black Mouth) — a coastal sea-cave that produces, at specific low tides, a sound that sounds like a voice speaking a language no one recognizes; fishermen have been writing down what they hear for three generations; the words are consistent across different transcriptions
Il Campo dei Senza-Nome (The Field of the Unnamed) — the mass grave from the first Pure Way purge, now a public garden planted with white flowers; the flowers are healthier than any garden soil should support; the gardeners never notice that weeding is unnecessary
Thalvex's Anchor Point — a specific spot on the sea floor, marked on pre-imperial charts, where ships' compasses behave strangely; pre-Pure Way sailors considered it the location where Thalvex sank his anchor to hold the island in place; in 1308 AF, the echo-field reading there (if anyone knew how to read it) would be the highest concentration on the island

THE HORNS — WHERE THE TIDE HAS OPINIONS
What the darkness feels like here: maritime dread. The sea is not a metaphor here. The sea is the actual problem. It has behaviors that experienced pilots recognize and cannot explain: courses where the water is the wrong temperature, passages where sound travels differently, specific coordinates where ships arrive to find their clocks have disagreed with the sun by anywhere from six minutes to four hours. The Pilots' Guild logs these anomalies. They call the logs "Thalvex's Margin Notes" and they are the most carefully maintained records in the Horns — not because anyone understands them but because the pattern of non-understanding is itself information.
Bone Walk: The annual ritual where the Horns' dead of the past year are carried to the sea. Not burial — release. The bodies are placed on flat-bottomed craft and pushed into the outgoing tide at Brinehold, and the Pilot who reads the tide decides in which direction the dead are sent based on the specific conditions of that night. This is not metaphorical. There is a specific relationship between the direction the dead are sent and what the following fishing season looks like that the Pilots have been tracking since the guild was founded. The correlation is not perfect. It is also not explicable by any mechanism anyone has been able to identify. The Halversen Codex — the guild's private record — has a section on this that has never been shared with any mainlander and never will be.
The Galewater Void: A specific section of the Galewater passage — approximately forty square miles of open water — where, since approximately 1240 AF, fish have not been caught. Not fewer fish. No fish. The water is otherwise normal. The Horns' fishers have stopped trying to explain it and simply sail around it. The Pilots call it Thal's Silence and record the expansion of its boundary in the same logs as the clock anomalies. The boundary expands approximately one mile per decade. At current rate, it will reach the main harbor approaches of Nightspike in approximately thirty years.
Named dark locations:
Knotgrip Shallows — a bay where three separate ships have beached themselves in perfectly calm conditions with no mechanical failure; the ships are intact; the crews were never found; the shallows are six feet deep and perfectly navigable
The Skinned Coast — a stretch of cliff face north of Westhorn where the stone has no lichen, no moss, nothing; the rock is visually scoured; the Horns say a storm did it centuries ago; the area of bare rock has been slowly expanding toward the south at approximately one yard per year since anyone began measuring
Revka's First Chart — the Guildmaster's private original navigation chart, inherited from her grandmother's grandmother, shows a landmass in the Galewater where no landmass exists; she has checked the coordinates personally; there is nothing there; the chart cannot be explained away because it predates any reason to fabricate a phantom island

SANGREA — THE BEAUTY WITH THE DARK CENTER
What the darkness feels like here: the horror of abundance turned toward sacrifice. Sangrea is beautiful and violent and the violence is aesthetic. The corrida is the most honest expression of this: a tradition about ritual death, practiced in public, celebrated as art. The thing underneath it is the Xarian cosmological influence that came through three hundred years of trade contact — the understanding that beauty requires a price, that the sacred requires blood, and that this is not tragedy but structure. Most Sangreans feel this without being able to articulate it. The Ix'Vorath cult on the Red Coast has the articulation; some Sangreans in the border regions have noticed.
The Cascabella Night Market: In Altavista, in a specific plaza that changes location every week (the current location transmitted through the Carvallo relay system to those who need to know), a market operates from the third hour after midnight until one hour before dawn. The goods sold range from the mundane (goods that can't be moved during daylight for tax reasons) to the concerning (services that require darkness for reasons of discretion) to the genuinely alarming (the specific stall, present perhaps once in five markets, that sells objects the vendor calls "memorias del río" — river memories — small river-worn stones that, when held, produce in the holder a specific memory that is not their own; the vendor claims the memories come from people who drowned in the Fuente; the memories are consistent with accounts of the dead; no one has proved the vendor is not simply a skilled manipulator of the grieving and credulous; no one has proved the opposite either).
The Parrots After a Death: In Sangrean households with trained Carvallo parrots, the birds fall silent when a member of the household dies. Not quieter — completely silent, for an interval that varies from six hours to three days. When they resume speech, the first word they say is not from their trained vocabulary. No trainer has ever been able to explain this. Several trainers have documented it. The words vary; the phenomenon is consistent. The most documented first-word list (maintained by the Altavista Carvallo Guild chapter, never distributed) shows that seven of the forty-three recorded first words match names of living people who were subsequently involved in violent events within a year of the silence.
The Red Tapestry: In the Terrarossa great hall at Fuenterroja, a tapestry depicting the founding of House Terrarossa. Eight panels. In the sixth panel, a woman is depicted in a doorway holding a child. The woman's face is turned away. The woman's face has been turned away in every inspection, every drawing, every record of the tapestry's description, going back to the tapestry's creation. No one has ever seen it facing forward. This is not possible for a tapestry. The explanation that the tapestry was made with her face turned is unsatisfying because there are clear technical indicators that the facing-away is not the original weaving. The Terrarossa family does not discuss the tapestry.
Named dark locations:
El Pozo de las Voces (The Well of Voices) — a dry well outside Castesol where, if you lean in on moonless nights, you hear what sounds like people arguing in a dialect that no living Sangrean linguist can fully parse; the dialect is clearly Sangrean-rooted but archaic in ways that suggest it predates the Sunstone Wars
La Casa Sin Sombra (The House Without Shadow) — a specific abandoned hacienda on the Velazco road that casts no shadow at noon; geometrically impossible; documented in four separate surveys over eighty years; the current explanation is "unusual local topography," which satisfies no one who has stood there
Los Campos Rojos (The Red Fields) — the eastern battlefield of the Third Sunstone War, where the Fuente ran red for three days; the soil still produces, every spring, a specific red-tinted wildflower that grows nowhere else on the continent; botanists from the Isle who have analyzed it find no pigment mechanism to explain the coloration

THE HEARTLANDS — SILVER AND ROT
What the darkness feels like here: the darkness of institutions. The horror is not supernatural — it is the horror of a functional system allowed to function long enough that it has developed purposes its creators never intended. The Vaultkeepers are not evil; they are optimized for their function, and their function is now partially independent of the human beings they were created to serve. The ducal houses are not evil; they are old enough to have outlasted every value that originally justified their authority. The Book of Chains is not evil; it is simply incomplete in ways that the people who benefit from those gaps have successfully prevented from being addressed for four centuries.
The Silver Blight: A recurring agricultural phenomenon in the Argen basin that occurs approximately once every generation — a season where the grain harvest produces perfectly shaped grain with no nutritional value. The grain grinds into flour; the flour bakes into bread; the bread feeds no one. People fed exclusively on silver-blight grain for more than a week begin to lose weight regardless of quantity consumed, and begin to see, at the corners of their vision, figures standing at distance. The figures do not approach. They appear to be watching. They disappear when looked at directly. The current agricultural understanding: the blight is a fungal infection. The figures are early-stage nutritional collapse hallucinations. Both of these explanations are correct. Neither explanation addresses why the figures appear to be in roughly the same places every generation, or why three of those locations correspond to the sites of significant pre-imperial events that the people experiencing the hallucinations have no knowledge of.
Marvoss's Grave: The graves of the three children drowned at Stonebridge are marked. The graves are in the village church of Rivergate. The graves have been in the village church since the drowning, approximately 340 years ago. The graves are the correct size for children. Every priest who has tended the Rivergate church for the past century has noted in the parish records, using different language but consistent observation: the graves are warm. Warmer than the stone around them. Not body-temperature warm — just several degrees above ambient. The current priest has recorded this observation and then explicitly noted "I do not know what to make of this and choose not to speculate."
Named dark locations:
The Silvermere Depression — a perfectly circular lake twelve miles from Vornhold that has no inlet or outlet and maintains a constant water level regardless of rainfall or drought; the water is slightly silver-tinted from mineral content; local children are forbidden from swimming there; the prohibition predates any recorded reason for it; the fish in the lake are edible but have no eyes
The Broken Ledger — a specific room in the old Argenhold archives where no candle will stay lit; the room contains the financial records of the first Argenlord administration; three scholars who have attempted to read those records using portable lanterns have reported the same experience: the ledger appears to be written in a different hand on every page, and the hand on any page you're currently reading looks fresh, as if the ink is still wet
Marvoss's Reach — the section of the Argen river directly beneath Stonebridge where the three children drowned; the water there is measurably colder than fifty yards upstream or downstream; this has been measured six times; it is always colder; the cold extends to exactly the length of the bridge's shadow at noon

ROSLAND — IRON FOREST REPUBLIC
What the darkness feels like here: the darkness of deep time. Rosland is old. The forest is older. The empire came and built roads and left and the forest absorbed the roads and in another two hundred years the forest will have absorbed everything the empire built and then it will absorb everything the republic built and then it will still be there. The specific Lovecraftian quality of Rosland is this: the forest is not indifferent. Something in the forest has been there longer than humanity has been on this continent, and it has developed what might be called opinions, and its opinions manifest slowly, across the scale of centuries, in ways that look like weather or disease or simply bad luck until you lay the incidents end to end across generations and realize they form a pattern pointing in a direction.
The Daudrwood Petrified Trees: Already established. The trees are not dead. They are warm to the touch. Verra Daurn knows this and has not reported it because she has been measuring the warmth for eleven years and has noted that it increases approximately three degrees per decade and that the increase began in approximately 1280 AF, which is also when the first reports of unexplained miners disappearing in the eastern shafts began, which is also when the Blood Cartographers' maps first showed an anomalous echo-concentration in this region, though the Blood Cartographers and Verra Daurn have never communicated with each other.
What the Thorvach Feed Their Trees: The Hungry Grove sect believes the petrified trees in the Daudrwood hold something imprisoned. They believe feeding them — specifically feeding them bodies, which is what bodies mean in this context — loosens the prison incrementally. What they have not considered, because their theology provides no framework for it: what if the prison exists because whatever is inside needs to stay inside? What if the warmth increasing is not proof that the feeding is working but proof that the imprisoned thing is becoming aware of the feeding and reacting to it? Verra Daurn, who has been measuring the temperature, has also been noting the spatial distribution of the warmest trees. They are not random. They form a shape that she has been reluctant to write down and hasn't.
The Fire-Song Memory Problem: Several Roslandic fire-singers of advanced age have noted, in their own private records (never shared; this is the kind of thing you don't discuss), that the fire-songs know things that the fire-singers don't. Specifically: fire-songs sung in full, in the correct traditional setting, occasionally produce additional verses that no one in the room recognizes and that no one in the room sang. Not misheard existing verses — new material, consistently worded across different occasions, appearing to be continuations of songs that were interrupted by historical events (the imperial period, when fire-songs were banned). The "returning verses" — the fire-singers' private term — have been written down by three independent singers. The written records are stored in three different locations and have never been compared. If they were compared, they would be identical.
Named dark locations:
The Vitred Shaft — Mine shaft #7 in the Karthold eastern complex, collapsed and sealed in 1291 AF; the official cause was structural failure; the actual cause is in the Stelev family's private records; the shaft goes deeper than the survey records indicate and whatever is at the bottom has not been established because the three survey teams sent down before the collapse each returned two members fewer than they went in, each time
Koschei's Well — A specific spring in the eastern forest that has been producing water for documented centuries; the water is the best-tasting water in Rosland and has a specific quality that makes people who drink it sleep more deeply than usual; the sleep is dreamless; fire-singers have noted that people who drink Koschei's Well water regularly cannot participate in fire-song evenings — they open their mouth and nothing comes out
The Unnamed Mound — A burial mound in the forest east of Fairhaven that predates the empire, predates the Roslandic nation, predates any culture currently in the region; the Frostguard rangers use it as a landmark but do not camp within a hundred yards of it; the rule about not camping near it is in the Frostguard training material but the reason for the rule has been removed from every edition since approximately 1180 AF

THE HORNS — ADDITIONAL NAMED THINGS (ISLANDS)
Verwhisper: The moss island. Already the most echo-dense inhabited location in the known world. Prior Oaken, who has been meditating there for eleven years, has begun to hear the trees' root-systems processing water as something closer to language than fluid dynamics. He has been writing down what the roots say. The notebooks fill at approximately one per month. He is on his forty-third notebook. The notebooks are stored in the Silence Wing. He has not told anyone what they say because he is not sure anyone would understand the question well enough to be asked.
Shadowtide: The southern tooth. The midnight sun at midsummer. The specific dark of Shadowtide is thermal: the island sits in a warm current from the south that has no business being there given the island's latitude, and the warmth means the island is inhabitable by species that shouldn't survive this far north. The Ix'Vorath cultists who have established a quiet community on Shadowtide's western shore chose it specifically because the warmth extends belowground, and the specific ritual of the Vessel-Cutters requires a certain ambient temperature for the echo-release to propagate correctly. The community is small, organized, and has been there for twelve years. The Pilots' Guild knows the community exists. The Pilots' Guild does not discuss it with anyone from the mainland.

THE RED COAST — COPPER TEETH AND DESERT SILENCE
What the darkness feels like here: the darkness of thirst elevated to cosmology. The desert is not a metaphor. The desert kills and the desert takes and the desert is indifferent in a way that human beings in desert cultures have historically personified as the divine, because indifference at that scale requires a psychology to be manageable. The specific Red Coast dark is the dark of T'zal — the unnamed eastern deep, the direction from which no ship returns, the direction in which dying people sometimes turn their faces in their last hours without any explanation for why east suddenly matters.
The Night Market at Wahaat al-Sirr: The oasis of secret water (already the Tariqat al-Nur's retreat). The night market here is not the Cascabella's chaotic underground trade — it is formal, ancient, and organized. Twice yearly, at specific Velosi calendar dates that the Tariqat tracks with the miqyas instruments, merchants arrive at Wahaat al-Sirr from both inland and coast. What they trade is information. Not trade intelligence — cosmological intelligence. Observations of astronomical events. Records of echo-field fluctuations. The accounts of travelers who have gone east of the Saffaren's range and returned (these accounts are extremely rare; most travelers who go east do not return; the accounts of those who do are treated as primary source material for something no one is willing to name). The market keeps records. The records are encrypted in the Red Calligrapher's geometric script. The records go back approximately four hundred years.
The Eastern Horizon Prohibition: The Saffaren deep-desert clans have a prohibition that is not in the Sand-Law but is observed as if it were: you do not look east at the third hour after midnight. Not because anything visibly happens. Because three generations of Saffaren wise-people have noted, in consistent terms across that time, that looking east at the third hour produces the specific sensation of being looked at in return. From something very far away. That has been aware of you for a long time.
The Copper Taste of the Deep Qanat: In the oldest sections of the Al-Wadi qanat system — sections that predate the Red Crown by at least three hundred years and that no living engineer has personally inspected end-to-end — the water that emerges has a copper taste slightly different from the ordinary mineral content. The Qanat-Khanan master-engineers call this al-dam al-ard (the earth's blood). It is not harmful. It is not explicable. The oldest sections of the qanat occasionally produce, along with the water, objects that were not placed there: small carved stones in a geometric style no living craftsperson can reproduce, sometimes small flakes of an unidentified dark metal that does not rust.
Named dark locations:
Qasr al-Dhaba'ib (Castle of the Vanished) — a pre-Dominion fortress in the deep Saffaren that appears on no official maps; the Saffaren clans know its location; no one stays there; the outer walls contain, carved into the stone, a text in the pre-Dominion script that scholars have partially translated as a list; the list appears to be a census; the population number it records is larger than the entire current Red Coast population
The Mirror Flat — a section of the deep desert where the sand has been fused into dark glass over an area of approximately twenty square miles; no explosion, no volcanic activity, no heat source in the historical record explains it; the glass is very old, pre-empire; standing on it you can see your reflection directly beneath your feet; the reflection, in low light, has a slight delay

THE FROZEN SOUTH — GOLD AND COLD AND WHAT LIVES UNDER THE ICE
What the darkness feels like here: the darkness of scale and isolation. The horror of the Frozen South is the horror of being very small in a very large cold place where the thing that kills you is not malevolent — it simply cannot perceive you. Glacier Bear, blizzard, frostbite, starvation — none of these want to kill you. They simply are what they are and you are in the way. The specific existential dread of the Frozen South is that the universe operates at a scale where human beings don't register. The gold they dig from the mountains feels like compensation. The fire-songs feel like defiance. Both are.
The Glacier's Memory: The southern glaciers contain, visible through the ice in specific locations, objects. Not geological inclusions — objects. Tools. Structures. At one documented location near the Heitdalr's eastern face, a section of the glacier that calved in 1287 AF exposed what appeared to be a stone floor — flat, worked, with carved borders — that extended back into the ice for an unknown distance before the ice refroze over it. The Burned Priests of the Heitdalr sealed the site immediately. The Frostguard ranger who first found it (Sigrun of Clan Daelvik) reported what she saw. Her report is in the Guildmaster's locked records. The Heitdalr priests came to see her within two weeks of the report. She retracted her account publicly six months later and has declined to speak about it since.
The Winter-Moot's Sealed Record: Every Winter-Moot produces public records of the sessions. The sealed session — held on the second night of every Moot, attended only by the Pack Leader and the senior fire-singer of each clan — produces a record that is stored in the Kjölfoss Deeps Vault and never circulated. The sealed session's subject is consistent across every Moot: what has been seen in the south that year that cannot be publicly acknowledged. The contents of the sealed records from the past thirty years, if read in sequence, form a consistent picture of something that has been moving northward, in the ice, at approximately one mile per decade. The same senior fire-singer rarely attends consecutive Moots. This is not officially because of the sealed session content. It is also not not because of it.
Named dark locations:
Hvelving Djúp (The Hollow Deep) — a specific location on the southern coast where, at low tide, a cave system is accessible for approximately two hours; the cave system extends down and south at a steep angle; the sounds from inside the cave during the two-hour window are not wind-based; the Bearclaw clan, who consider it their territory, have a prohibition against entering that goes back further than their fire-songs can reach
Bjálki's Head — the mountain where Bjálki of the Bearclaw was shaved and exiled; the mountain is named after this event, which happened approximately 200 years ago; the mountain has no summit camp because the specific peak, which should be entirely granite, is warm to the touch in the section where the exile reportedly sat for the three days before he walked south and was never seen again
Gullfjara (Gold-Sand Beach) — the only beach in the Frozen South where gold flakes wash up in the surf regularly; Aurax controls it exclusively; the gold is real; it is also the only beach in the Frozen South where the sea doesn't freeze in winter; this is not geologically consistent with any available explanation

XARIA — THE BEAUTIFUL TERRIBLE
What the darkness feels like here: the darkness of a cosmology that is correct. Everywhere else in the world, the folk horror is uncertain — maybe the petrified trees are just trees, maybe the silver blight is just fungus, maybe the cave sounds are just wind. In Xaria, the cosmology says the gods ate each other, the remainder of the gods is present in all matter, feeding that remainder is the correct response to existence, and the mechanism for feeding it includes human blood. The specific horror of Xaria is that this is not a mistake, not a deception, not a primitive misunderstanding of a deeper truth. The echo-field is real. The Great Exchange is real. The blood really does matter. The exact details of the mechanism are wrong in ways that the K'tharr priesthood doesn't know and the Blood Cartographers are beginning to suspect — but the underlying premise is the closest any civilization on Mundus has come to the actual truth.
The Ix'Orath Children: Already established. The full horror: they are not just green-eyed. In full darkness — deep darkness, the kind found only underground or in rooms with no light source — they produce a faint luminescence. Not enough to read by. Enough to see that a child is in the corner. The K'tharr priesthood has been looking for these children with increasing systematic effort for the past forty years. The increasing effort correlates with the Ix'Orath children becoming more common. The priesthood's theory: the children are an aberration. The Reformation's theory: the children are what Ashborn have always been — the echo-field is responding to the concentrated suffering of the bound community by producing individuals capable of perceiving it directly. Both theories predict the children will become more common as the field strengthens. Neither theory has a good answer for what happens if the priesthood finds all of them.
The Codex Beneath the Codex: The K'ay tradition of folded bark-book production preserves Xaria's cosmological history. The public codices tell K'tharr's story in sequential panels, starting with the creation and ending with the establishment of the Great Exchange. There is a second tradition, known only to the most senior K'ay keepers, of a second set of panels — not depicted in any surviving complete form — that continue the story after the Exchange's establishment. The surviving fragments of these continuation panels are held in three separate locations and show, in the fragment that appears to come earliest in the sequence, something that the K'ay keeper who last catalogued them described as "K'tharr noticing something that was already there before he arrived." The keeper died six months after writing that description. The death was natural. The description is the last thing in her notebook.
Named dark locations:
Ix'Kan Zeroth — an unacknowledged location in the Xarian interior that the Great Exchange cartographers' maps circle but never label; the K'tharr priesthood calls it the Navel; what the Blood Cartographers' maps (which are being built from echo-density readings and have no cultural pre-knowledge) call it is: the highest echo-concentration on the continent, by a factor of seven, sitting under a dense jungle hill with no architectural features visible from outside
The Canal That Runs Backward — a specific canal in Canopolis's northern district that flows, during certain festivals, in the wrong direction; not symbolic; measurably wrong; the Qanat-Khanan equivalent (the Yaxché-Khanan, the tree-water engineers) have measured it with their instruments; the hydraulic explanation requires a pressure source below the city that cannot be accounted for by any known aquifer
The Featherwork That Won't Stay Still — in the Ix'Pal treasury, among the great featherwork pieces including K'tharr's Mantle, one piece (unlabeled; no provenance; appeared in the inventory in approximately 1190 AF with no record of acquisition) depicts not a divine scene but a landscape; the landscape is unrecognizable; the feathers in the landscape section of the piece are, when examined closely, slightly displaced from their original positions each time the inventory is taken; the total displacement is small; it has been, over 118 years, moving the depicted landscape incrementally toward something

PART TWO: FOLK SUPERSTITIONS AND WHAT THEY'RE ACTUALLY RESPONDING TO
These are things ordinary people believe. Most are wrong about the mechanism. Very few are wrong about the phenomenon.

"The second candle lights itself" (Nionian) If you have two candles burning and one goes out, the second will briefly flare before returning to normal height. Interpreted as Velos acknowledging Keth, or vice versa. Actually: the echo-field around a burning source is briefly disrupted when the source ends; the second candle's flame behavior reflects this disruption. The people who notice this are, statistically, slightly more echo-sensitive than average.
"Bread baked on the day of a death feeds only grief" (Heartlands) Don't bake bread in a house where someone died that day. The bread will be technically fine and emotionally wrong — people who eat it report a specific melancholy that lasts the rest of the day. The Magos explanation: a dying person's echo-presence saturates the immediate environment briefly; food prepared in this saturation absorbs trace impressions; the melancholy is a somatic response to echo-contact, not a supernatural phenomenon. This doesn't make the bread any less sad.
"The domovoi takes the first bite" (Rosland) The first portion of every meal left at the hearth. The domovoi is not present in most households. But in approximately one in forty Roslandic homes, something takes the portion. Not rats — the food disappears too cleanly, too consistently, without physical evidence. What takes it is not determined. What taking it does is: homes where the portion is regularly left have measurably warmer hearthstones year-round.
"Don't name a child at a crossing" (Horns) Children should not be named on a bridge, at a ford, at a tide-point. The explanation is folklore — it gives the water-spirits a hold on the name. The actual observed phenomenon: children named at crossing points are statistically more likely to die near water before age ten. This has been recorded by the Pilots' Guild in their demographic logs, where it appears as an anomaly they have classified as "cultural data point — mechanism unclear."
"The parrot knows who'll die next" (Sangrea) Trained Carvallo parrots have, documented across many trainers over generations, a consistent behavioral change in the 48-72 hours before a household member dies: they refuse to speak to that person specifically while continuing to speak normally to everyone else. The trainer community knows this. They do not discuss it with the households because there is no actionable information in it — you cannot stop a death by knowing it's coming, but you can cause tremendous distress by telling someone their parrot won't look at them.
"Three bears, three years" (Frozen South) If a Glacier Bear is seen three times in one winter near a specific settlement, that settlement will be abandoned within three years. The Frozen South clans treat this as literal predictive fact. The actual mechanism: Glacier Bears avoid areas of dense human activity; if one is appearing repeatedly near a settlement, the settlement's environmental footprint is shrinking — either because the population is declining or because the resource base is collapsing. The bear is the symptom, not the cause.
"Salt at the threshold keeps the Vessel-Cutters out" (Red Coast) Leave a thin line of salt across the main threshold of your home. The Ix'Vorath/Vessel-Cutter cult, which practices directed killing to release echo-density, specifically avoids targeting homes with salt thresholds because the salt-line is a recognizable folk protection marker and targeting a home with visible protections creates unnecessary attention risk. The superstition works because the cult makes it work by respecting it. This is not the reason the salt-line believers think it works.
"A fire-song unfinished will finish itself" (Rosland) If a fire-song is stopped mid-verse in a formal context, it will, on the same night, complete itself — someone in the group will begin singing the remaining verse without consciously choosing to. This is documented sufficiently that the Roslandic fire-singer tradition has formal protocols for deliberate interruptions. What is less documented, and what three fire-singers have noted in their private records: when an unfinished song completes itself, the completing singer occasionally sings verses that weren't in the original song. The additional verses are consistent across different singers completing the same song.

PART THREE: NAMING SUPPLEMENT
New names for things that needed better names. These replace or augment compound-word names in the existing codex.

INSTITUTIONS AND SOCIAL STRUCTURES
Old/Generic
New Name
Region
Notes
"Stone-Guard"
Ferranti
Nionia
The quarry security force; from ferro + suffix
"Bridge Guards"
Viadanti
Vallan
Those who walk the via; the Road-Walkers
"Pure Way Police"
Lucernas
Nionia
"Lantern-holders" — they carry the Lux; pointed irony
"Death-Priests"
Bonekeepers
Heartlands
Already established; keep it
"Ice-Priests"
Hrímkynna
Frozen South
"Frost-kin" — those born for the cold knowledge
"Temple guards"
Ix'Cavar
Xaria
Those who stand at the sacred threshold
"Fire-watcher"
Strazh-Ogon
Rosland
The fire-warden; from strazh (guard) + ogon (fire)
"Blood-map maker"
Vena-Cartógrafo
Red Coast border
Those who map the vein; bilingual Munnish/Red Coast
"Water-engineers"
Qanat-Khanan
Red Coast
Already established; keep it
"Guild council"
Zhelezna Rada
Rosland
The Iron Council; rada is council in the Slavic base
"Spy network"
La Telaraña Sorda
Sangrea
"The Deaf Web" — hears everything, reveals nothing
"Secret police"
Occhi Bianchi
Nionia
"White Eyes" — the informer network under Pure Way


PLACES AND LANDMARKS
Generic/Old
New Name
Region
Meaning/Notes
"The bad mine"
Vitred Shaft
Rosland
Glass-mine; the sealed eastern shaft
"The bone beach"
Ossara
Nionia coast
From ossa (bones); the coast below the Pale House
"The haunted palace"
Palazzo Vuoto
Nionia
"The Empty Palace" — the republic's Senate building, now a Pure Way administrative center
"The dead field"
Campo Quieto
Heartlands
"The Quiet Field" — the silver-blight zone
"The secret oasis"
Wahaat al-Sirr
Red Coast
Already established; keep it
"The warm cave"
Hvelving Djúp
Frozen South
Already established; keep it
"The jungle hill"
Ix'Kan Zeroth
Xaria
Already established; keep it
"The dangerous tavern"
El Rincón de los Huesos
Sangrea
Already established; keep it
"The dark forest"
Daudrwood
Rosland
Already established; keep it
"The tall quarry"
Marchia Ferrus
Nionia
"Iron March" — the industrial quarry zone
"The market city"
Alsiroth's Gate
Red Coast
Already established; keep it
"Foggy harbor town"
Brinehold
Horns
Already established; keep it


NAMED INDIVIDUALS IN MINOR COURTS (USABLE FOR SCENES)
These are not major characters — they are the people who are there when the protagonist arrives somewhere. Named, specific, with a texture.
Nionia:
Benedar Sola (already established) — capostrada patriarch; sealed the glowing vein; dead; his son Tomas checks the seal every morning
Tomas Sola (48) — current capostrada of the Luminous Vein quarry face; hard, careful, not talking to anyone about the floor
Sister Luca (34) — an Ashanite hospice nurse near the Pale House; has been treating people released from detention for two years; keeping her own notes on the patterns she sees; doesn't know what she's documenting
Carino Reth (27) — a dockhand who hears la nota che manca more clearly than anyone and has started missing the final note of every song he hears, waiting for something that doesn't come
Sangrea:
Rosalba Moreno (51) — mayorazgo of the Solé-Castesol properties; twenty-three years in post; knows where every significant secret is buried, literally and otherwise
Drum Velazco (40) — a provincial lord with a moderate hacienda on the second terrace road, facing sunrise; gambling debts to a Heartlander Vaultkeeper that he hasn't told his mayorazgo about
Cira Paloma (22) — a Carvallo trainer in Castesol; her training log includes the documented case of a bird's post-death silence producing the name Kaeo as its first returning word; she doesn't know who that is
Rosland:
Zora Stelev (68) — master smith; forge-name Ruk; still working the forge every morning; her private log includes three observations about Vitred Shaft that her son Gregor has not been told
Verna Dausk (55) — a fire-singer in Fairhaven who has been writing down the returning verses; her forty-third notebook is hidden in the wall behind her second-best kolpak
Pitor Gorsh (38) — a Frostguard ranger who was Sigrun of Daelvik's partner when she found the glacier floor; he was not mentioned in the retracted report; he has said nothing for five years and drinks Koschei's Well water every time he passes that way, which is now less and less often
Heartlands:
Elder Marit (73) — a senior Vaultkeeper at Silvermont; has the financial records of four major ducal houses that would constitute blackmail material in the wrong hands; has not used them; considers their existence sufficient
Brother Corvath — Isle of Knowledge; already the most important person in the world who is not being listened to; his latest notebook has a chapter he's titled "On Why The Field Strengthening Is Not Random"
Red Coast:
Qanat-Master Selim al-Nahar (60) — the chief engineer of the Al-Wadi deepest sections; the only living person to have personally walked those sections in the past decade; has been translating the carved stones that emerge with the water for fifteen years; has not told anyone what they say
Night-Merchant Yasira (age unknown) — sells memorias del río at the Cascabella night market; appears approximately once in five markets; cannot be located between appearances; the objects she sells are consistently accurate
Xaria:
K'ay Keeper Atzel-Ix (43) — the K'ay keeper currently holding the continuation codex fragment; has been sitting with the fragment for two years; the fragment shows K'tharr noticing something; something now appears in his peripheral vision during meditation; he has not opened the fragment again since summer
Ixtal (age unclear — appears young, eyes entirely green) — an Ix'Orath child successfully hidden for six years; currently living as a kitchen worker in the household of a mid-rank merchant who believes she is a niece of his third mayorazgo; she has started hearing conversations from the adjacent rooms before they happen

NAMED FOODS AND DRINKS (WITH BETTER NAMES)
Old/Generic
New Name
Region
Notes
"Blood porridge"
Blod-Graut
Frozen South
Already established; keep
"Spirit-porridge"
Zhivka-Kasha
Rosland
Already established; keep
"Black flatbread"
Krovny Khleb
Rosland
Already established; keep
"The fancy bread"
Fior di Sale (Flower of Salt)
Nionia
Fine white bread with sea-salt crust
"Market pie"
Vornhold Hastata
Heartlands
Hastata = "built in haste"; a term of affection for inconsistent quality
"The dark sweet"
Sombra Fría
Sangrea
Already established; cold chocolate/cacao drink at funerals
"Bull sausage"
Sangre del Toro
Sangrea
Already established; corrida-season food
"Herb water"
Sharab al-Nahar
Red Coast
Already established; keep
"Festival honey"
Glacier-Honey
Frozen South
Already established; keep
"Rich stew"
Caldera Negra
Sangrea
"Black Cauldron" — slow-cooked festival stew in a sealed iron pot; served at corrida finales
"Trade wine"
Velo Secco
Nionia
"Dry Veil" — the specific character of Nionian wine from high-altitude vines; austere, mineral, divisive
"Lucky tea"
Agua de Concordia
Heartlands
Served on Concordis; a specific herb preparation; tastes like peace, which tastes like anise and grass


NAMED GUILDS, FACTIONS, SMALL ORGANIZATIONS
Generic
Name
Region
Notes
"The resistance"
La Voce Sommersa
Nionia
"The Submerged Voice" — anti-Pure Way network; name is whispered, never written
"Street gang"
Los Cuchillos del Río
Sangrea
"River Knives" — the Castesol dock guild's enforcement arm
"The scholars"
Orden del Hilo de Plata
Heartlands
"Order of the Silver Thread" — the Vaultkeeper clients' informal club; the silver tables' organizing principle
"The informers"
Occhi Bianchi
Nionia
Already named above
"The shadow traders"
La Telaraña
Sangrea
"The Web" — the Cascabella's mainland distribution network
"The death-cultists"
Thorvach
Rosland
Already established; keep
"The vessel people"
Ix'Vorath
Xaria/Red Coast
Already established; keep
"The rebels"
Chain-Breakers
Xaria
Already established; keep
"The mappers"
Vena-Cartógrafos
Continental
Blood Cartographers; this bilingual name suits their cross-regional operation
"The fire-fanatics"
Velanthari Ardenti
Continental/Nionian
The burning faction of the Velanthari heresy; the "flame-walkers"
"The star-readers"
Tariqat al-Nur
Red Coast
Already established; keep
"Logosian scholars"
Los Hijos del Silencio
Heartlands/Academic
"Children of Silence" — they follow the Cogitant Letters' argument that the gods' silence is the most honest theology


NAMED WEAPONS, ARMOR, AND OBJECTS OF QUALITY
These are the specific named items that exist in the world — not artifacts, just very good things made by real craftspeople.
Weapons:
Ruk's Silence — a Stelev-family blade, full name Tishina Ruka (Silence of the Hand); currently in the Rosland Marshal's office; Zora made it for Gregor when he was appointed; the blade was described by three different people who've seen it as "the kind of blade that makes you understand why people kill"
Vox Ferri — "Voice of Iron"; a Heartlander long sword made by a deceased smith of the Wexler family; currently in the Argenhold arsenal; one of the few weapons forged specifically with the Velindra alignment in mind (the smith was a student of the Magos before becoming a smith)
The Cascabella — not a weapon type; the name used for a specific style of short blade produced in the Sangrean border region; curved inward at the tip, designed specifically for the draw-and-cut motion of someone who needs to kill quickly and quietly; the Cascabella network is named after this blade
Khorim Navalha (Khorim Razor) — the standard obsidian blade format produced for Khorim's formal trade; not as long as the decorative pieces; not as beautiful; purely functional and sharper than anything steel can produce in equivalent length; brittle in cold below zero degrees
Objects:
The Halversen Chart — Guildmaster Revka's navigational inheritance; shows the phantom landmass in the Galewater; her most carefully guarded possession
The Sola Floor-Key — the iron key to the sealed section of the Marchia Ferrus quarry; Tomas wears it on a cord under his work clothes; he has never used it since he checked the seam at age fourteen
The Menna-Relic — the specific writing instrument Corvath Menna used to draft the original Menna Papers; held by the Starveling Church's innermost chapter; the paper it touched apparently produces, when held, the specific feeling Menna described in his journals as "standing in the middle of everything that's wrong and knowing it exactly"
The Third Notebook — Brother Corvath's working title for volume three of his On the Nature of Echoes research; the one he started this year; the chapter titled "On Why The Field Strengthening Is Not Random" is forty-two pages and entirely in a cipher he invented for the purpose; no one at the Isle knows the cipher

DIVINE VEINS — BOOK ONE CHARACTER ARCS
Working Title: The Nest of Knives Date: 28th Day of Architecton, 1308 AF — End of Winter, Arrival of Spring

KAIO ARGENHOLD, 28
The Duke
Returns to Argenhold after eleven years in Xaria following his family's murder at the Feast of Poison. Arrives at his own gates to find Lyra Silverblood and the regency council waiting — the castle is his in name only. Brings a full Xarian retinue including gifted slaves, creating immediate suspicion from the population but these are the only people he fully trusts.
Spends the early book reclaiming his castle politically, earning the trust of his people, securing the Bargemen's Guild through Cella Bargemont and settling the Valenti debt. His Feast of Poison investigation slowly produces something real — the poison has Nionian origins traceable through Beaumont's forest supply routes.
Braven arrives at his gates with the Millhaven story, confirming what Kaio already suspects about Nionian operations in the Heartlands. He recognizes a broken man and deliberately shapes that grief into something useful — funding the Flaming Heart, having his Xarian assassin train the crew, giving Braven a mandate to map Nionian networks and eventually follow them home. The Faustian bargain: at some point Kaio will ask one thing in return. The thing is implied but never named. Braven accepts.
His relationship with Lyra moves from formal adversarial trade negotiations to something real when he presents her privately with proof of Nionian involvement in the Feast — not as an accusation but as a question about what House Silverblood actually wants to survive what is coming. She makes her choice and brings Silverblood intelligence resources to his side.
Book 1 ends with Kaio elected as Grand Duke of the Heartlands, having built a fragile coalition, understanding the full scale of the threat, and watching Rosland descend into crisis knowing the fleet is already built and the sea lanes open in weeks.

BRAVEN LORETHSON, 24
The Burned Knight
Opens stationed at Millhaven, a village on a road through Beaumont's forest. One chapter establishes his life — the lodge, the order's rhythm, his relationship with Sela the mill keeper's daughter developing across small moments. We see what he has before we see him lose it.
The night of the attack: Beaumont's men carry it out with Nionian soldiers present to observe and ensure thoroughness. Braven sees them take Sela. He is burned during the fighting, leaving him disfigured. He fights a Nionian soldier burning the mill records and takes his insignia.
Recovers, tells Ser Aldric Carn everything including the Nionian uniform. Carn's refusal is genuine, grieved, and absolute — the order cannot pursue a foreign military power without church sanction. Braven leaves before dawn with Carn's sealed letter in his pocket unopened.
Arrives at Argenhold. Kaio receives him, hears him, asks three questions that tell Braven this man has already been thinking about Nionia. The Faustian bargain is struck. The Flaming Heart forms from survivors of the Millhaven attack, trained by Kaio's Xarian assassin into something ruthless and shadow-like.
The order travels toward the Horns following rumors of Nionian agents and intelligence on Sela's location. While Braven searches separately, two of the order's most capable knights attempt to assassinate Jous at the victory tournament acting on impulse without telling Braven. Both are killed. A surviving knight witnesses it and flees to find Braven.
Before receiving this news Braven gets confirmation that Sela is alive but in the Horns. The Nionian crackdown after the assassination attempt sweeps through the region — people who won't renounce their faith being rounded up. Sela was among them. Braven kills two soldiers on the road, gets the information, and rides to the inn where she was being held to find it already burning.
His PTSD from Millhaven hits in real time. He swears he sees her at the window. He rides in. He survives but is burned again — more extensively, more permanently. Wrapped in healing ointments, the burned knight is now complete. He lets the last Nionian soldier go. It is the last mercy he will ever give.
Book 1 ends with Braven on a ship heading for Nionia proper, carrying false papers from a Nionian agent he studied for two weeks before killing him.

ANGYA GREENHAND, 26
The Revolutionary
Opens in Fairhaven watching Vlado deliver a speech that causes immediate uproar from guilds and Greenhand-aligned houses. This is our entry into Rosland — through her reaction to what is being done publicly and what it means for what she's fighting.
Wins the Greenhand candidacy against her own father, her victory built on genuine closeness with the guild population and common people of southern Rosland. The pressure campaign begins immediately — permits delayed, guild leaders quietly flipped, the party's Fairhaven residence burns in a fire of disputed origin.
First council session: she makes four correct arguments that are procedurally tabled. Valo tells her the accident rate figures are worse than she knows. She cannot determine whose side he is on and this bothers her more than the pressure campaign.
Evidence accumulates of foreign money in Vlado's operation — she can see the shape of it without naming the source. The guild crackdown escalates — hall closures, arrests of leaders on suspicion of conspiracy in the assassination.
Vlado is publicly assassinated by someone from her circle acting alone, revealed immediately by the mob. The chaos is immediate and total. She returns to her base to prepare for what's coming, makes the long shot decision to contact Valo privately.
To her surprise he shows up. She talks, he listens, she tells him everything about her beliefs and that she didn't order it. He says almost nothing. When he leaves he hints that he is more on her side than she thinks but their correspondence must remain completely secret. She doesn't like depending on something she cannot verify but the pressure is too thick and the guild violence too immediate to have better options.
Book 1 ends with Valo chosen as High Baron and Angya not knowing what he will do with the power he now holds.

VALO IRONSIDE, 23
The Silent Heir
Opens being briefed by Vlado on everything — his plans, his contingencies, his Nionian arrangement. Vlado hides nothing because he reads Valo's silence as compliance. Valo receives all of it without visible reaction. The reader cannot tell what he thinks.
He already knows about the Nionian funding. He has known for months. He has been waiting for the moment when the decision has a clear weight.
Attends the council session where Angya appears. Tells her the accident rate figures are worse than she knows. He cannot fully explain to himself why he did that.
Witnesses Vlado's public assassination and the chaos that follows. The northern barons choose him as successor believing him controllable, boosted by being Vlado's adopted son. He accepts without visible emotion.
Angya's letter arrives requesting a private meeting. He goes. He listens to everything she says. He leaves her with the hint that he is more on her side than she thinks. He does not tell her what he knows or what he intends.
Book 1 ends with Valo as High Baron of Rosland, holding documentation of the full Nionian arrangement, and his intentions completely unreadable to everyone including the reader.

JOUS LORETHIAN, 24
The God King
Opens in the throne room of the Dome Palace in Vellium, the Horns freshly vassalized, the fleet being assembled. Council scenes establish his continental picture — Rosland being handled through Vlado, Heartlands being destabilized, agents active across the continent.
His council: Patriarch Aldous Cael the fanatical Pure Way head, Commander Harkon Varek his devoted guard commander, Lord Admiral Titus Navarrus the skeptical fleet master, Minister Davan Silan the pragmatic city logistics man, Lord Kaelen Ferronus the iron magnate who funded his rise, and Envoy Maret the blind Sister of the Veil whose hold on him neither of them has found language for.
Travels to the Horns for the victory tournament celebrating the Holy Kingdom of Nionia's first continental conquest. The Flaming Heart's two most capable knights attempt to assassinate him, acting on impulse without Braven's knowledge. Both are killed. Jous misreads it as a church operation, accelerating his animosity toward orthodox Loveism. Patriarch Cael uses the attempt to push for formal declaration against the Council of Three.
His visions throughout — sharper and more specific than they have ever been. The hand on dark wet sand recurring and uninterpretable. He reshapes every dark vision his certainty cannot accommodate into something acceptable. The one image he cannot reshape he does not look at directly.
Vlado's murder reaches him. He decides to go to Rosland personally — his first step onto the mainland.
Book 1 ends with Jous standing on Rosland soil, the fleet launching behind him, the continent's pieces moving exactly as he arranged them, carrying the uninterpretable vision of the enormous hand and the warmth that was not fire.

BOH VAAKOR, 19
The Scholar
Based in the Isle of Knowledge's comparative mythology collection — the library's attic, staffed by a first circle novice nobody knows what to do with yet. His chapters function as windows into the wider world, the Magos receiving and debating reports from every region filtered through his specific way of seeing connections nobody asked him to find.
The Isle has the texture of an ancient institution — mess hall gossip about the Horns falling, scholars arguing about Nionian theology versus orthodox Loveism, junior novices versus senior Elders, the student who stays up too late in the wrong sections. Boh moves through it with frictionless invisibility, hearing everything, absorbing everything, belonging nowhere socially and not particularly minding.
Finds the fire-song during routine cataloguing. Stops midway through a reference number. The Xarian inscription match. Two days in sections he wasn't assigned to. The phrase before fire appearing in two civilizations that have never had documented contact. He is not investigating — he is in love with a mystery the way you fall in love with a song.
Threads accumulate over months alongside the political reports coming into the Isle — the Nionian naval record, the Roslandic folk tale, the Corvath footnote. Twelve sheets of paper in notation only he can read.
Finds a non-standard channel to reach Corvath. Leaves a précis of his research. Gets summoned within days. Corvath is alarmed and not showing it. Vault access, the compass that doesn't point north, the low sound in the deep archive felt more than heard.
Book 1 ends with Boh understanding for the first time that the echo system is real, measurable, declining, and that something came from somewhere that the continent's oldest stories have never stopped remembering.

VENANIA SARKO, 18
The Witness
One chapter. Late Architecton, high in the Silver Mountain passes above the sea-facing slope with her father Davan. Mountain folk, hardy, resourceful — she knows these passes the way most people know the streets around their home.
The weather clears. She looks down at the beach on the Red Coast side and sees the wrecked ship and the shape on the sand that is not a rock and not a whale. The shape's eyes open. She doesn't tell her father that part.
Davan's assessment on the descent: whatever that is, the wrong people knowing before the right people do will go badly for the thing on the beach. Not House Sandsword, not yet. They go home first.
Her chapter ends there. The Giant is background noise and rumor for the rest of Book 1. The secret travels with her.


